--
-- PostgreSQL database dump
--

-- Dumped from database version 13.2
-- Dumped by pg_dump version 13.2

-- Started on 2021-03-22 00:35:40

SET statement_timeout = 0;
SET lock_timeout = 0;
SET idle_in_transaction_session_timeout = 0;
SET client_encoding = 'UTF8';
SET standard_conforming_strings = on;
SELECT pg_catalog.set_config('search_path', '', false);
SET check_function_bodies = false;
SET xmloption = content;
SET client_min_messages = warning;
SET row_security = off;

--
-- TOC entry 3 (class 2615 OID 2200)
-- Name: public; Type: SCHEMA; Schema: -; Owner: postgres
--

CREATE SCHEMA public;


ALTER SCHEMA public OWNER TO postgres;

--
-- TOC entry 3044 (class 0 OID 0)
-- Dependencies: 3
-- Name: SCHEMA public; Type: COMMENT; Schema: -; Owner: postgres
--

COMMENT ON SCHEMA public IS 'standard public schema';


SET default_tablespace = '';

SET default_table_access_method = heap;

--
-- TOC entry 200 (class 1259 OID 17727)
-- Name: episode; Type: TABLE; Schema: public; Owner: postgres
--

CREATE TABLE public.episode (
    number integer NOT NULL,
    air_date timestamp with time zone,
    overview character varying,
    serie character varying,
    serie_id bigint NOT NULL,
    name character varying,
    season character varying NOT NULL
);


ALTER TABLE public.episode OWNER TO postgres;

--
-- TOC entry 201 (class 1259 OID 17733)
-- Name: genres; Type: TABLE; Schema: public; Owner: postgres
--

CREATE TABLE public.genres (
    name character varying NOT NULL
);


ALTER TABLE public.genres OWNER TO postgres;

--
-- TOC entry 202 (class 1259 OID 17739)
-- Name: seasons; Type: TABLE; Schema: public; Owner: postgres
--

CREATE TABLE public.seasons (
    serie_id bigint NOT NULL,
    name character varying NOT NULL,
    air_date timestamp with time zone,
    overview character varying,
    poster character varying NOT NULL,
    id bigint NOT NULL,
    number integer NOT NULL,
    serie character varying NOT NULL
);


ALTER TABLE public.seasons OWNER TO postgres;

--
-- TOC entry 203 (class 1259 OID 17745)
-- Name: seasons_id_seq; Type: SEQUENCE; Schema: public; Owner: postgres
--

ALTER TABLE public.seasons ALTER COLUMN id ADD GENERATED ALWAYS AS IDENTITY (
    SEQUENCE NAME public.seasons_id_seq
    START WITH 1
    INCREMENT BY 1
    NO MINVALUE
    NO MAXVALUE
    CACHE 1
);


--
-- TOC entry 204 (class 1259 OID 17747)
-- Name: series; Type: TABLE; Schema: public; Owner: postgres
--

CREATE TABLE public.series (
    description character varying,
    image character varying NOT NULL,
    language character varying(2),
    name character varying NOT NULL,
    network character varying,
    tagline character varying,
    url character varying,
    id integer NOT NULL,
    air_date timestamp with time zone,
    in_production boolean
);


ALTER TABLE public.series OWNER TO postgres;

--
-- TOC entry 205 (class 1259 OID 17753)
-- Name: series_genres; Type: TABLE; Schema: public; Owner: postgres
--

CREATE TABLE public.series_genres (
    series_id bigint NOT NULL,
    genres_name character varying NOT NULL
);


ALTER TABLE public.series_genres OWNER TO postgres;

--
-- TOC entry 206 (class 1259 OID 17759)
-- Name: series_id_seq; Type: SEQUENCE; Schema: public; Owner: postgres
--

CREATE SEQUENCE public.series_id_seq
    AS integer
    START WITH 1
    INCREMENT BY 1
    NO MINVALUE
    NO MAXVALUE
    CACHE 1;


ALTER TABLE public.series_id_seq OWNER TO postgres;

--
-- TOC entry 3045 (class 0 OID 0)
-- Dependencies: 206
-- Name: series_id_seq; Type: SEQUENCE OWNED BY; Schema: public; Owner: postgres
--

ALTER SEQUENCE public.series_id_seq OWNED BY public.series.id;


--
-- TOC entry 207 (class 1259 OID 17761)
-- Name: users; Type: TABLE; Schema: public; Owner: postgres
--

CREATE TABLE public.users (
    id bigint NOT NULL,
    password character varying NOT NULL,
    admin boolean DEFAULT false NOT NULL,
    username character varying NOT NULL,
    email character varying NOT NULL,
    CONSTRAINT minlength CHECK ((length((password)::text) >= 10))
);


ALTER TABLE public.users OWNER TO postgres;

--
-- TOC entry 208 (class 1259 OID 17769)
-- Name: users_id_seq; Type: SEQUENCE; Schema: public; Owner: postgres
--

CREATE SEQUENCE public.users_id_seq
    AS integer
    START WITH 1
    INCREMENT BY 1
    NO MINVALUE
    NO MAXVALUE
    CACHE 1;


ALTER TABLE public.users_id_seq OWNER TO postgres;

--
-- TOC entry 3046 (class 0 OID 0)
-- Dependencies: 208
-- Name: users_id_seq; Type: SEQUENCE OWNED BY; Schema: public; Owner: postgres
--

ALTER SEQUENCE public.users_id_seq OWNED BY public.users.id;


--
-- TOC entry 209 (class 1259 OID 17771)
-- Name: users_series; Type: TABLE; Schema: public; Owner: postgres
--

CREATE TABLE public.users_series (
    series_id bigint NOT NULL,
    user_id bigint NOT NULL,
    status character varying,
    rating integer NOT NULL
);


ALTER TABLE public.users_series OWNER TO postgres;

--
-- TOC entry 2885 (class 2604 OID 17777)
-- Name: series id; Type: DEFAULT; Schema: public; Owner: postgres
--

ALTER TABLE ONLY public.series ALTER COLUMN id SET DEFAULT nextval('public.series_id_seq'::regclass);


--
-- TOC entry 2887 (class 2604 OID 17778)
-- Name: users id; Type: DEFAULT; Schema: public; Owner: postgres
--

ALTER TABLE ONLY public.users ALTER COLUMN id SET DEFAULT nextval('public.users_id_seq'::regclass);


--
-- TOC entry 3029 (class 0 OID 17727)
-- Dependencies: 200
-- Data for Name: episode; Type: TABLE DATA; Schema: public; Owner: postgres
--

COPY public.episode (number, air_date, overview, serie, serie_id, name, season) FROM stdin;
1	\N	Wanda and Vision struggle to conceal their powers during dinner with Vision’s boss and his wife.	WandaVision	1	Filmed Before a Live Studio Audience	1
2	\N	In an effort to fit in, Wanda and Vision perform a magic act in their community talent show.	WandaVision	1	Don't Touch That Dial	1
4	\N	Monica Rambeau, tasked with a special assignment regarding sentient weapons, goes missing.	WandaVision	1	We Interrupt This Program	1
6	\N	Disturbances on Halloween separate Wanda from Vision, who looks into anomalous activity in Westview.	WandaVision	1	All-New Halloween Spooktacular!	1
3	\N	Wanda's pregnancy fritzes her powers as she and Vision prepare for an accelerated delivery.	WandaVision	1	Now in Color	1
2	\N	As new details of Jason’s death begin to emerge, Archie pleads with Miss Grundy to come forward with what they heard at Sweetwater River.  Betty makes an effort to mend her friendship with Archie but takes a different stance with Veronica who is trying to make up for her actions.  With rumors around her brother’s death running rampant, Cheryl deals with the pressure in true Queen Bee fashion, while tensions boil over when Jughead stumbles upon a secret Archie was hoping to keep hidden.  Finally, plans for the annual fall pep rally move forward with a performance by Josie and the Pussycats and a special appearance by Mayor McCoy.	Riverdale	2	Chapter Two: A Touch of Evil	1
3	\N	After new information surrounding Jason's death comes to light, Cheryl finds herself under a cloud of suspicion and forced to come clean about the last time she saw her brother. Meanwhile, Archie makes a tough decision that puts a major strain on his relationship with Miss Grundy. Elsewhere, Betty decides to revive the school newspaper and asks for Jughead's help in investigating Jason's death, while Veronica and Ethel work on exposing some of Riverdale High's football players after rumors of a "shame book" begin to circulate. Finally, after getting grounded by his dad Fred, Archie must figure out a way to make it to the Taste of Riverdale event where Josie and the Pussycats will be performing a song he helped write.	Riverdale	2	Chapter Three: Body Double	1
6	\N	With Riverdale High's annual variety show around the corner, Valerie's efforts to help Archie prepare for his big performance lead to some major fallout between her and Josie. Meanwhile, Betty and Jughead's investigation into Jason's death brings them to a home for troubled youth and face-to-face with Polly. Just as her relationship with her mother was on the upswing, an unexpected betrayal sends Veronica spiraling, while Josie deals with her own pressures at home after her overbearing father returns for her performance at the variety show. Finally, Hermoine's first day at Andrew's Construction finds her and Fred growing closer.	Riverdale	2	Chapter Six: Faster, Pussycats! Kill! Kill!	1
4	\N	When Jughead learns that an anonymous buyer has plans to tear down the local drive-in, he fights desperately to keep it open. Betty finds her friendship with Archie on the line after stumbling upon some startling information she's uncovered about Miss Grundy's past. Elsewhere, Veronica confronts her mother Hermoine about a suspicious meeting she witnessed between her mother and a shady Southside Serpent. Finally, after uncovering Betty's diary, Alice finds the perfect opportunity to destroy Archie's golden boy image.	Riverdale	2	Chapter Four: The Last Picture Show	1
5	\N	With Jason's funeral around the corner, the Blossom family moves forward with last minute preparations - and a secret agenda. Meanwhile, Archie's attempt to refocus his energy on football comes to a halt when an opportunity to work with a new music mentor presents itself. Betty dives deeper into her investigation of Jason's death and unearths some dark revelations about her family. Elsewhere, after uncovering secrets about her own family, Veronica forms an unlikely friendship with Cheryl, who is having a tougher time with Jason's impending funeral than she lets on. Finally, Hermoine turns to Fred for help after receiving a cryptic message from the Southside Serpents.	Riverdale	2	Chapter Five: Heart of Darkness	1
7	\N	Monica plots her return to the anomaly while Wanda navigates a slew of unsettling complications, and Vision forms a new alliance to help.	WandaVision	1	Breaking the Fourth Wall	1
7	\N	When a major piece of evidence is mysteriously destroyed, new rumors begin to swirl as to who was really behind Jason's murder. Tensions build when Jughead's father returns to the fray and it's revealed that he and Fred have some unresolved issues between them. Meanwhile, Veronica takes matters into her own hands after her fight with Hermione. Cheryl approaches Betty with an unexpected proposal that leaves Betty torn.	Riverdale	2	Chapter Seven: In a Lonely Place	1
5	\N	Wanda addresses Vision's worries when he grows suspicious of the neighbors' strange behavior.	WandaVision	1	On a Very Special Episode...	1
9	\N	Archie reluctantly agrees to escort Cheryl to her family’s official start of maple syrup tapping because he gets an offer that could help his future. Archie starts to become skeptical of the real reason the Blossoms are so eager to help him, however he gets some helpful information for Betty about her sister. Veronica is trying to be nice and unbeknownst to her, befriends a classmate that her father’s illegal doings has hurt. Hermione is conflicted about telling Fred the truth. Meanwhile, Alice is ready to get revenge on the Blossoms once and for all with the help of her two daughters.	Riverdale	2	Chapter Nine: La Grande Illusion	1
10	\N	When Fred decides to finalize the divorce with Archie’s mother Mary, Archie hides his true feelings.  Archie tries to win Valerie back with a romantic evening, however, Betty hijacks his plans when she decides to throw Jughead a surprise birthday party.  Once Cheryl learns of the party, she decides to make it interesting and things quickly get out of control.  Meanwhile, Veronica contemplates whether she should participate in the deposition to help get her Dad released.	Riverdale	2	Chapter Ten: The Lost Weekend	1
8	\N	As Fred and his crew are about to start construction he loses his crew, which could put his livelihood in jeopardy. Wanting to help his dad, Archie and his friends pitch in to help but after one of them is attacked, the gang comes up with a plan that lands them in Southside Serpent territory. With Jughead’s secret revealed, he is worried about how his friends will react. Meanwhile, Veronica and Betty suggest throwing Polly a baby shower to make her feel better, but Polly is hesitant knowing how everyone feels.	Riverdale	2	Chapter Eight: The Outsiders	1
11	\N	Betty is slammed overseeing Homecoming and Reunion weekend, but Alice wants her to help with the Jason Blossom investigation. Alice turns to Archie and Veronica for help, but when Betty discovers they are working with her mom, she is not happy. After seeing his father FP start to clean up his act, Jughead wonders if it's the right time to give him another chance. Cheryl and Polly have both decided to go to Homecoming in Jason's honor, until a revelation waylays their plans. Meanwhile, Fred and Mary attend the Homecoming dance, leaving Fred to possibly reconsider the divorce.	Riverdale	2	Chapter Eleven: To Riverdale and Back Again	1
999	2021-03-21 03:40:41.747+01	\N	\N	9	Test episode	1
12	\N	Archie and Veronica are shocked to learn of the arrest but know they need to come clean to their parents about what they uncovered. Still hurt by the betrayal of his friends and torn over who to trust, Jughead reluctantly joins them in a quest for truth. Meanwhile, Cheryl confronts her mom about why she treats her so much worse than she ever did with Jason.	Riverdale	2	Chapter Twelve: Anatomy of a Murder	1
1	\N	As a new school year begins, the town of Riverdale is reeling from the recent, tragic death of high school golden boy Jason Blossom — and nothing feels the same.	Riverdale	2	Chapter One: The River's Edge	1
7	\N	Riverdale remains on edge after a chilling letter from the Black Hood challenges the town’s residents to remain sinless for 48 hours – or he’ll strike again. Meanwhile, Jughead and Archie’s friendship gets tested after Penny Peabody unexpectedly calls in a favor that Jughead owes her. Elsewhere, Betty and Veronica team up to investigate someone who Betty thinks could be the Black Hood killer. Finally, things take an unexpected turn for Josie when a secret admirer takes things one step too far.	Riverdale	2	Chapter Twenty: Tales from the Darkside	2
6	\N	After a charge led by Mayor McCoy threatens to further escalate tensions between the North and Southside, Jughead, along with Archie, tries to put a stop to a dangerous alliance being considered between the Serpents and a long-time rival. Betty turns to Veronica for help when she’s thrust into the center of a burgeoning mystery surrounding The Sugarman. Finally, Cheryl confronts her mother Penelope after a traumatic run-in forces her to make a stark realization.	Riverdale	2	Chapter Nineteen: Death Proof	2
16	\N	In the aftermath of Hiram’s newly announced plans for Riverdale, Jughead resorts to drastic measures to voice his opposition. After making her own big announcement, Hermoine’s friend Andy Cohen comes to town to lend a hand. Meanwhile, Veronica goes against her parent’s wishes to keep a low profile when she decides to run for student council president. Elsewhere, Mary arrives in Riverdale just as tensions between Fred and Archie reach a breaking point. Finally, following a series of mysterious events, Cheryl begins to fear that someone is out to get her.	Riverdale	2	Chapter Twenty-Nine: Primary Colors	2
18	\N	As Riverdale High begins rehearsals for its upcoming production of “Carrie the Musical”, the arrival of an ominous letter forces director Kevin to make a difficult decision about the show. Jughead uses his cover as the musical’s documentarian to solve the mystery behind the letter. Meanwhile, tensions between Betty and Veronica continue to escalate just as Alice announces she is joining the musical to spend more time with Betty. Elsewhere, Hiram enacts a devious plan to further drive a wedge between Fred and Archie, while Cheryl channels Carrie White during a showdown with her mother.	Riverdale	2	Chapter Thirty-One: A Night to Remember	2
4	\N	When Betty confronts Alice about Gryphons and Gargoyles, Alice has no choice but to come clean about how she, along with a young Fred, FP, Hermoine, Hiram, Sierra, Penelope and Tom, played the game in the early 90’s – and how a shocking mystery has been plaguing them all ever since.	Riverdale	2	Chapter Thirty-Nine: The Midnight Club	3
6	\N	After confronting the parents, who were part of “The Midnight Club” twenty-five years ago, Betty follows some strong leads in hopes of finding out who the true Gargoyle King is. Meanwhile, Veronica’s attempt to prove Archie’s innocence lands her in hot water. Finally, Archie turns to Kevin for help making things right.	Riverdale	2	Chapter Forty-One: Manhunter	3
14	\N	Betty takes matters into her own hands when she learns that The Farm has set their sights on someone in her inner circle. Meanwhile, when Hiram and Gladys’ control over Veronica becomes too much to handle, she sets a plan in motion to turn the tables on them. Elsewhere, Archie grows concerned about a young runaway he meets at the gym, while Jughead struggles to maintain control over the Serpents.	Riverdale	2	Chapter Forty-Nine: Fire Walk with Me	3
16	\N	As rehearsals for this year’s musical “Heathers: The Musical” get underway, Cheryl, as queen bee Heather Chandler, channels her own HBIC to deal with a recent fallout. Meanwhile, Betty grows increasingly annoyed by Evelyn’s involvement with the musical – as well as the lives of her friends. Elsewhere, Veronica learns some devastating news about her family, and Archie and Josie make a decision about their future. Lastly, Jughead makes a surprising move against Gladys,	Riverdale	2	Chapter Fifty-One: Big Fun	3
2	\N	Archie encourages Mad Dog to attend Riverdale High and join the football team. Jughead meets Mr. Chipping, who offers him a spot at an elite school called Stonewall Prep. Veronica is conflicted when information about her involvement in Hiram’s arrest leaks to the public.	Riverdale	2	Chapter Fifty-Nine: Fast Times at Riverdale High	4
4	\N	When ominous videotapes begin appearing on doorsteps across Riverdale, widespread fear quickly returns to the town. At Stonewall Prep, Jughead learns about a series of mysterious disappearances that have occurred to former students at the school. Meanwhile, Archie’s plan to create a safe space for the town’s kids gets derailed when some unwanted visitors crash their Halloween party. Elsewhere, Veronica comes face to face with trouble, while Betty’s past comes back to haunt her. Lastly, a haunting at Thistlehouse rocks Cheryl  and Toni to their core.	Riverdale	2	Chapter Sixty-One: Halloween	4
12	\N	Archie grows concerned for Frank after someone from his past arrives in Riverdale. Betty and Alice’s investigation into incidents at Stonewall Prep leads them on a collision course with their number one suspect. Jughead challenges Bret to a duel to settle their grievances, while Toni, Kevin  and Fangs seek revenge against Nick St. Clair, who has shown up unexpectedly in Riverdale. Finally, a trip to New York City gives Veronica an opportunity to catch up with her old friend Katy Keene.	Riverdale	2	Chapter Sixty-Nine: Men of Honor	4
14	\N	When a night in the woods goes horribly awry, Betty, Archie and Veronica are forced to confront what one of them may be capable of.	Riverdale	2	Chapter Seventy-One: How to Get Away with Murder	4
3	\N	With Graduation Day around the corner, the gang consider their next steps beyond Riverdale High. Archie learns whether he will be able to graduate with his classmates. FP makes a difficult decision about his and Jellybean's future.	Riverdale	2	Chapter Seventy-Nine: Graduation	5
4	\N	After spending seven years away from Riverdale, Archie returns to find the town is now under Hiram Lodge's grip and on the verge of becoming a ghost town. When Toni catches him up on what's been going on, Archie reaches out to the rest of the gang to return home.	Riverdale	2	Chapter Eighty: Purgatorio	5
10	\N	A charming young doctor puts a member of the surgical team in an awkward position at work; Dr. Glassman suggests that Dr. Shaun Murphy meet with a therapist.	The Good Doctor	3	Sacrifice	1
1	\N	Miguel's fighting for his life, Robby's missing, and Daniel and Johnny's reputations are in tatters as the community reacts to the West Valley brawl.	Cobra Kai	7	Aftermath	3
13	\N	Archie and Veronica continue to grow closer.  Betty is tired of her family acting as if nothing has happened and confronts her mother.  Jughead finds himself in an unexpected situation, leaving Archie and the gang scrambling.  Hermione makes Fred an offer that seems too good to be true.  Meanwhile, the truth about Blossoms’ family business is revealed leaving Cheryl to take matters into her own hands.	Riverdale	2	Chapter Thirteen: The Sweet Hereafter	1
8	\N	When Jughead learns that FP is getting released from prison, he and Betty organize a welcome home party with the Serpents to ease him back into his former life. Meanwhile, Archie and Veronica reach a crossroad in their relationship, but are forced to push their issues aside after Jughead and Betty ask them to take over the Black Hood investigation.	Riverdale	2	Chapter Twenty-One: House of the Devil	2
17	\N	Just as the town’s mayoral race gets underway, Riverdale High’s own student council election heats up. Archie steps up to help after learning that Hiram’s mobster associates have come to Riverdale to stir up some trouble. Meanwhile, things take a dangerous turn for Alice, Betty and Chic when an unexpected guest shows up at the Cooper residence. Finally, Toni, Veronica and Josie team up to solve a strange mystery involving Cheryl.	Riverdale	2	Chapter Thirty: The Noose Tightens	2
5	\N	After weeks go by with no contact from Archie, Veronica  devises a dangerous plan to break him out of juvie. Meanwhile, when Betty learns that Jughead has taken their investigation into Griffins & Gargoyles a step too far, she finds herself in a race against the clock to save him.	Riverdale	2	Chapter Forty: The Great Escape	3
15	\N	As Gladys prepares for FP’s 50th birthday party, Jughead questions his mom’s motives for returning to Riverdale. When an unexpected encounter brings Archie back into the world of G&G, Jughead and Betty devise a plan to help him face his past head-on. Finally, Cheryl and Toni find themselves at a crossroads, and Veronica reveals a damaging secret to Betty.	Riverdale	2	Chapter Fifty: American Dreams	3
3	\N	Things take a dangerous turn when Betty and Charles  track down Edgar and his Farmies. Archie and Veronica hold a car wash fundraiser at Pop’s to raise money for the community center. Elsewhere, Jughead’s first day at Stonewall Prep doesn’t go as planned. Lastly, Cheryl learns a dark family secret from Nana Rose.	Riverdale	2	Chapter Sixty: Dog Day Afternoon	4
13	\N	Worried about what the future may hold for him after high school, Archie seeks advice from an unlikely source -- Hiram Lodge. Meanwhile, Veronica begins to spiral after learning some devastating news about someone close to her. Finally, accusations made against Jughead  leaves his future at Stonewall Prep hanging in the balance.	Riverdale	2	Chapter Seventy: The Ides of March	4
5	\N	Toni, Alice, Archie and Kevin fight to keep Riverdale High's doors open after learning that its budget had been cut by Hiram Lodge. Veronica gets creative when she discovers Chad is having her followed. Jughead starts a new job after debt collectors show up in Riverdale.	Riverdale	2	Chapter Eighty-One: The Homecoming	5
6	\N	Dr. Shaun Murphy and Dr. Claire Browne devise an experimental procedure that can save the leg and life of a young groom, that is if his bride-to-be and parents can learn to work together. Meanwhile, Jared struggles to emotionally connect with his patient whose scars may prove too deep to overcome.	The Good Doctor	3	Not Fake	1
16	\N	When the team treats a patient who has to decide between a dangerous surgery that could change his life or remain the same, he asks Dr. Shaun Murphy what he would if he had that same choice.	The Good Doctor	3	Pain	1
8	\N	Dr. Shaun Murphy, Dr. Audrey Lim and Dr. Claire Brown’s E.R. patient is forced to reveal a secret to her husband after their treatment caused a complication. Meanwhile, Dr. Neil Melendez, Dr. Morgan Reznick and Dr. Alex Park struggle with a patient whose parents don’t believe in vaccinations.	The Good Doctor	3	Stories	2
17	\N	Dr. Shaun Murphy is desperate to join the team on a dangerous procedure involving a patient’s tumor removal. However, having been removed from the surgery team by Dr. Jackson Han, Shaun must use his talents to help figure out the cause of an infant’s injuries.	The Good Doctor	3	Breakdown	2
9	\N	Shaun is ready for the next step in his relationship with Carly; however, he continues to struggle as they grow closer and more intimate, and is dealt some troubling news about a deeply personal issue. Meanwhile, a young patient must decide on a treatment that could save her life or possibly destroy her marriage.	The Good Doctor	3	Incomplete	3
19	\N	The city of San Jose is rocked by a massive earthquake that puts the staff of St. Bonaventure Hospital on high alert as they race to assess the damage and account for the safety of their colleagues and friends. Meanwhile, Dr. Neil Melendez and Dr. Aaron Glassman are attending a charity event when their lives are threatened by the earthquake.	The Good Doctor	3	Hurt (1)	3
12	\N		The Good Doctor	3	Episode 12	4
8	\N	After discovering that Landon is in trouble, Hope and Alaric set out in search for him.  Along the way, they uncover some startling information about Landon’s past.	Legacies	4	Maybe I Should Start From the End	1
1	\N	Hope becomes more determined than ever to find her way back to Mystic Falls. Alaric continues looking into the mysterious night Malivore was destroyed. As the students leave for summer vacation, Landon stays behind to keep an eye on Rafael.	Legacies	4	I'll Never Give Up Hope	2
12	\N	When a series of events leads Josie, Lizzie and Alaric to the prison world, they come face to face with the twins' evil uncle Kai.	Legacies	4	Kai Parker Screwed Us	2
5	\N	After one of their own goes missing, Alaric suggests Hope turn to the therapy box, which thrusts her into a twisted game set in a summer camp slasher flick. Lizzie's attempt to spend some time with MG doesn't go quite as planned.	Legacies	4	This Is What It Takes	3
8	\N	Meredith grows increasingly dissatisfied with the unknown details of Derek's life. Meanwhile, Alex treats Devo, a patient whose religious beliefs jeopardize her chances for recovery; Izzie contemplates reconnecting with her estranged mother; Zoey, a pregnant woman in her 40s who's been diagnosed with cancer, disagrees with Cristina's medical advice; and the interns are mystified by Cable, a patient who's being treated for seizures and who thinks he's psychic.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Save Me	1
17	\N	Meredith goes on an ambulance ride with Owen and Nathan to pick up a heart for a transplant patient. Musician &amp; MS patient Kyle Diaz is admitted to Grey Sloan Memorial with a tremor in his hand, and the residents apply for the Preminger Grant. Meanwhile, Catherine continues to insert herself into Jackson and April’s business against Richard’s wishes.	Grey's Anatomy	5	I Wear the Face	12
9	\N	It's Christmastime in the Valley, and romance is in the air. Daniel and Miguel find unexpected common ground, and the Cobra Kai recruits go on a mission.	Cobra Kai	7	Feel the Night	3
5	\N	When Alice publishes a fiery piece in the Riverdale Register blasting the Southside, Jughead is forced to take matters into his own hands to try and keep the peace. Betty turns to Archie for help after receiving an ultimatum that could potentially destroy some of her closest relationships. With their SoDale open house fast approaching, Hiram and Hermoine enlist the help of an unlikely ally to get some potential investors on board. Finally, Veronica welcomes her old friend Nick St. Clair to Riverdale, but his plans for a wild night with the gang quickly takes an unexpected turn.	Riverdale	2	Chapter Eighteen: When A Stranger Calls	2
9	\N	After snooping around for Christmas gifts, Veronica uncovers a major secret Hiram has been keeping from her. Fallout from Jughead’s encounter with Penny Peabody creates tension between him and FP. Meanwhile, a defiant Cheryl takes matters into her own hands after Penelope tells her they cannot afford Christmas this year. Finally, Betty and Archie’s vow to take down the Black Hood once and for all leads to a dangerous showdown.	Riverdale	2	Chapter Twenty-Two: Silent Night, Deadly Night	2
19	\N	After an incident at Riverdale High leaves the town on edge, Archie leads the charge to uncover the culprit. Meanwhile, the reveal of a devastating secret leads to a violent showdown between Chic, Jughead, Betty and Alice. Elsewhere, Veronica takes matters into her own hands when someone from her past comes to town seeking revenge. Finally, Hermoine and Cheryl conspire to take down Sheriff Keller.	Riverdale	2	Chapter Thirty-Two: Prisoners	2
7	\N	Fearful that he will be caught, Archie hits the road and ends up at a farm outside Riverdale, where he meets Laurie Lake. Meanwhile, after Alice takes extreme measures to ensure Betty’s safety from the Gargoyle King, Betty finds herself up against a formidable foe from her past. Finally, after learning that La Bonne Nuit is in trouble, Veronica makes a risky business decision that could cost her everything.	Riverdale	2	Chapter Forty-Two: The Man in Black	3
17	\N	As Betty enlists Cheryl’s help to infiltrate The Farm, Archie and Veronica help an ally from his past. Meanwhile, Jughead’s attempt to put a stop to Riverdale’s drug trade puts him on a collision course with Gladys. Finally, Hiram breaks some surprising news to Veronica.	Riverdale	2	Chapter Fifty-Two: The Raid	3
5	\N	Caught between Hiram and Hermoine’s double trial, Veronica  grapples with what the future holds for her family. Archie finds himself the unexpected target of the town’s local businesses. Betty and Kevin  join the Junior FBI Training Program, and Jughead learns some surprising information about his family history.	Riverdale	2	Chapter Sixty-Two: Witness For The Prosecution	4
15	\N	Alice begins shooting a documentary about Riverdale and the latest mystery involving one of its own. Meanwhile, Betty, Archie and Veronica fall deeper into a web of lies as the investigation gets underway.	Riverdale	2	Chapter Seventy-Two: To Die For	4
2	\N	Dr. Shaun Murphy’s attention to detail complicates his first day at St. Bonaventure Hospital. Meanwhile, Dr. Claire Browne learns a valuable lesson about honesty when confronted with a difficult diagnosis for her patient.	The Good Doctor	3	Mount Rushmore	1
13	\N	Dr. Shaun Murphy suspects his patient is lying about the reason for her injury and makes a controversial assumption about her motives. Meanwhile, Dr. Neil Melendez’s personal life could be affecting his work and, ultimately, his patients lives.	The Good Doctor	3	Seven Reasons	1
7	\N	Dr. Shaun Murphy and Dr. Morgan Reznick must contend with two brothers who are bargaining over life and death. Meanwhile, Dr. Claire Brown’s friend who is dying of cancer asks her for something she doesn’t think she can give her; and Dr. Aaron Glassman is dealing with the effects of his treatment.	The Good Doctor	3	Hubert	2
16	\N	The new chief of surgery, Dr. Jackson Han, believes Dr. Shaun Murphy is a liability more than an asset and works to keep him out of the operating room permanently.	The Good Doctor	3	Believe	2
8	\N	Carly’s attempts at increasing her intimacy with Shaun are becoming more of a frustration than either of them expected. Meanwhile, Lim and Melendez struggle in their relationship as they work to separate their work from their personal life.	The Good Doctor	3	Moonshot	3
18	\N	Claire and Shaun treat a patient with a rare form of dwarfism. Reznick, Lim and Park treat a young man who had both arms torn off in a previous farming accident. Shaun reacts to an emotional situation.	The Good Doctor	3	Heartbreak	3
11	\N		The Good Doctor	3	Episode 11	4
7	\N	As Hope hit the books to learn more about the latest creature to arrive to the school, things take a dark and twisted turn leaving her to confront one of her darkest fears. Meanwhile, Alaric attempts to help Rafael cope after his past comes back to haunt him.	Legacies	4	Death Keeps Knocking On My Door	1
2	\N	Determined to move forward with her new life alone, Hope's latest hunt leads her on a collision course with the past. Landon's newfound status as the popular guy leads to tensions with Josie. MG contemplates telling Lizzie how he feels about her.	Legacies	4	This Year Will Be Different	2
10	\N	As the witches of the Salvatore School come together to celebrate Coven Day, the latest monster to infiltrate the school targets Alyssa Chang and the other students by spreading discord and creating chaos among the covens. Elsewhere, Alaric, Lizzie and Josie search for a solution that keeps Josie protected from the dark magic brewing inside the mora miserium. Fed up with feeling powerless alongside Hope, Landon asks her to give him self- defense training. Finally, Alaric's past comes back to haunt him.	Legacies	4	This Is Why We Don't Entrust Plans to Muppet Babies	2
4	\N	The Super Squad bands together after the Necromancer's next move unleashes more than anyone bargained for. A run-in with Ethan reminds Josie why she doesn't trust herself with magic.	Legacies	4	Hold on Tight	3
1	\N	Picks up where the last episode left off. Meredith attempts to work with Addison Shepard. George is pimped out to relay the hospital gossip back to Webber. Meredith and Cristina relate at Emerald City Bar about what dating their respective attendings is like. Cristina ponders her relationship with Burke while trying to make a decision. Meredith is devastated by the latest blow to her love life. Meanwhile, Joe the bartender collapses.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Raindrops Keep Falling On My Head	2
3	\N	A car crash at a funeral brings a bickering family into the hospital. Back from New York, Arizona ends up caught between Alex and Andrew. While Ben takes on a new parenting role, Amelia helps Meredith and Maggie through a problem.	Grey's Anatomy	5	I Ain't No Miracle Worker	13
17	\N	Diane Pierce returns to Grey Sloan, but Maggie is still in the dark as to why she’s really there. Owen and Amelia hash out their problems as they work a trauma case together, and Bailey tries to mend her relationship with Richard.	Grey's Anatomy	5	'Til I Hear It From You	13
999	2021-03-21 03:40:41.747+01	\N	\N	9	Test episode	1
3	\N	Archie gets frustrated by the lack of progress made in catching his father’s shooter, so he takes matters into his own hands to send the gunman a message. Meanwhile, Veronica is thrilled when Hiram’s attempt to start fresh means she gets to introduce him to her friends, including Archie. Elsewhere, Jughead starts his first day at Southside High and is befriended by a Southside Serpent named Toni, while Kevin’s attempt at having a little fun causes Betty to grow concerned for his safety.	Riverdale	2	Chapter Sixteen: The Watcher in the Woods	2
10	\N	Tensions mount when the sudden shut down of Southside High forces Jughead and his fellow serpents to transfer to Riverdale High. Veronica ensures Hiram and Hermoine that she’s still on board with their plans for SoDale. Archie is conflicted when he is asked to gather some information on Hiram’s suspicious business dealings. Betty sets out on a quest to find her long-lost brother, Chic.	Riverdale	2	Chapter Twenty-Three: The Blackboard Jungle	2
20	\N	As the town’s mayoral race between Fred and Hermoine heats up, Hiram sets his sights on a new ally – Sheriff Minetta. Betty turns to Cheryl for help when she has a suspicion about the Black Hood. Meanwhile, the reveal of a dark secret forces Archie and Jughead to try and ease tensions between the Bulldogs and Serpents. Finally, on the eve of the mayoral debate, a mysterious message leaves everyone on edge.	Riverdale	2	Chapter Thirty-Three: Shadow of a Doubt	2
10	\N	With SAT’s around the corner, Alice and FP urge Jughead and Betty to stop investigating G&G and start focusing on their SAT prep. However, when Alice takes things one step too far, Betty is forced to come face-to-face with someone from her past. Finally, Jughead makes a bold move against the Gargoyle Gang.	Riverdale	2	Chapter Forty-Five: The Stranger	3
19	\N	When Jellybean goes missing, Jughead, Gladys and FP follow a series of cryptic clues to get her home. Elsewhere, Archie faces the fallout from his latest boxing match, while Betty makes a major discovery about Evelyn’s past. Finally, Josie makes a big decision about her future.	Riverdale	2	Chapter Fifty-Four: Fear the Reaper	3
7	\N	Archie’s plan to host a peaceful Thanksgiving dinner at the community center quickly gets derailed when some unexpected guests arrive. Stranded at Stonewall Prep by an ice storm, Jughead and Betty search for clues about a recent death on campus. Elsewhere, while FP, Alice, Hiram and Hermoine wait out the storm together at Pop’s, Cheryl and Toni get resourceful as they host a dinner for Cheryl’s family.	Riverdale	2	Chapter Sixty-Four: The Ice Storm	4
17	\N	Kevin decides to revive Riverdale High’s tradition of hosting a variety show. But when Mr. Honey forbids him from performing a number from “Hedwig and the Angry Inch,” Kevin and the gang rally against their principal turning the variety show into a full-fledged musical that reflects the students’ inner lives and struggles. And amidst all the drama, one forbidden “showmance” begins to blossom.	Riverdale	2	Chapter Seventy-Four: Wicked Little Town	4
1	\N	Dr. Shaun Murphy, a young surgeon with autism and savant syndrome, relocates from a quiet country life to join the prestigious St. Bonaventure hospital’s surgical unit. Alone in the world and unable to personally connect with those around him, his only advocate, Dr. Aaron Glassman, challenges the skepticism and prejudices of the hospital’s board and staff when he brings him in to join the team. Shaun will need to work harder than he ever has before, as he navigates his new environment and relationships to prove to his colleagues that his extraordinary medical gifts will save lives.	The Good Doctor	3	Burnt Food	1
8	\N	During a robbery at the grocery mart Dr. Shaun Murphy is shopping at, his communication limitations puts lives at risk. Meanwhile, after Shaun's traumatic day, Dr. Aaron Glassman worries that he isn't doing enough to help Shaun.	The Good Doctor	3	Apple	1
17	\N	Dr. Shaun Murphy questions the need for an elective surgery that will allow his young patient to smile for the first time. Meanwhile, Dr. Claire Brown and Dr. Morgan Reznick discover that their patient lied about her identity.	The Good Doctor	3	Smile	1
9	\N	Dr. Neil Melendez, Dr. Morgan Reznick and Dr. Claire Brown grapple with a patient’s wish to perform an operation that would keep him from acting on his pedophilic urges; and Dr. Shaun Murphy learns a lesson in empathy.	The Good Doctor	3	Empathy	2
3	\N	Dr. Claire Brown faces complications at home and work as she prepares to lead her first surgery. Meanwhile, a sports fishing accident challenges the rest of the staff as they look to treat the fisherman’s injuries without damaging his prize catch.	The Good Doctor	3	Claire	3
13	\N	A terminal cancer patient is determined to live the last few months of his life without inhibition; Dr. Reznik must confront her relationship with her mother when she comes in for a third opinion from Dr. Glassman.	The Good Doctor	3	Sex and Death	3
6	\N	As Chief of Surgery Dr. Audrey Lim struggles to cope with the residual emotional trauma of COVID-19, she encounters a young war veteran fighting debilitating PTSD. After discussing his case with the team, Dr. Claire Browne suggests a radical treatment to help him. Meanwhile, still reeling from the recent loss of his mentee’s patient, Dr. Shaun Murphy declares he doesn’t want to teach the new residents anymore. And elsewhere, an eccentric patient keeps the team entertained.	The Good Doctor	3	Lim	4
1	\N	Under the guidance of headmaster Alaric Saltzman, the next generation of supernatural beings at The Salvatore Boarding School for the Young and Gifted — including tri-brid Hope Mikaelson, Alaric’s twins Lizzie and Josie, high-energy vampire MG, newly-triggered werewolf Rafael and the mysterious Landon — come of age in the most unconventional way possible, nurtured to be their best selves...in spite of their worst impulses.	Legacies	4	This Is the Part Where You Run	1
11	\N	When Alaric decides to postpone the school’s annual talent show, Lizzie and Josie are determined to make sure the show goes on. Meanwhile, tensions arise when the students face a creature that lowers their inhibitions. Lastly, Alaric decides to play hooky with Emma	Legacies	4	We're Gonna Need A Spotlight	1
8	\N	Hope joins forces with an unlikely ally to take down a Christmas monster, who’s using holiday cheer to infiltrate the Salvatore School. Elsewhere, Landon surprises Rafael with news about his family lineage, and Sebastian accompanies Lizzie on her latest mission.	Legacies	4	This Christmas Was Surprisingly Violent	2
2	\N	The Super Squad pulls out all the stops when they learn some devastating news involving one of their own.  Alaric turns to Sheriff Mac for help getting some timely affairs in order.	Legacies	4	Goodbyes Sure Do Suck	3
22	\N	April and Andrew consult with a fiery patient who has a giant, inoperable heart tumor. Meanwhile, Alex and Eliza are at odds over the treatment of a young patient, and Stephanie and Ben make decisions that could affect their careers.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Leave It Inside	13
4	\N	When Archie’s attempt to take matters into his own hands spirals out of control, Mayor McCoy calls an emergency town hall meeting to deal with the growing chaos in Riverdale. Meanwhile, when Betty finds herself at the center of a deepening mystery, her decision to keep some parts of it from Jughead causes further friction between the two. Elsewhere, Veronica grows concerned for Archie when she realizes the lengths he would go to seek revenge against the person terrorizing Riverdale. Finally, tensions between the North and Southside finally come to a head and leads to an unexpected showdown.	Riverdale	2	Chapter Seventeen: The Town That Dreaded Sundown	2
11	\N	Amidst preparations for the town’s annual Picken’s Day festivities, Jughead interviews Toni’s grandfather and learns some shocking details about Riverdale’s history. In an attempt to get closer to Hiram, Archie tries out for the Riverdale wrestling team after learning of Hiram’s love of the sport. Meanwhile, Betty unearths some dark secrets about her brother Chic, and Veronica and Josie clash as they prepare for their Picken’s Day performance.	Riverdale	2	Chapter Twenty-Four: The Wrestler	2
21	\N	When an incident at the Sheriff’s station triggers an all-out war between the North and the Southside, Archie and Jughead find themselves in the fight of their lives. Meanwhile Veronica makes a devastating discovery about Hiram, just as someone from his past arrives in Riverdale looking for revenge. Finally, Betty comes face to face with the Black Hood.	Riverdale	2	Chapter Thirty-Four: Judgment Night	2
8	\N	On the road and running out of places to stay, Jughead and Archie head to Toledo to visit Jughead’s mother Gladys and sister Jellybean. Back in Riverdale, Betty inches closer to uncovering the truth about Griffins & Gargoyles, while Veronica and Cheryl take on Hiram, Hermoine and Penelope after more students fall victim to seizures.	Riverdale	2	Chapter Forty-Three: Outbreak	3
18	\N	When a tainted batch of fizzle rocks makes its way through Riverdale, Jughead and FP set out to find who’s responsible. After asking Veronica to help get him into an upcoming boxing tournament, Archie quickly learns he may be in over his head. Elsewhere, Betty makes one last attempt to rescue Alice from The Farm’s grip, and Toni becomes unsettled by a sudden change in Cheryl’s behavior.	Riverdale	2	Chapter Fifty-Three: Jawbreaker	3
6	\N	As Archie struggles to keep the neighborhood kids away from Dodger’s influence, he turns to an unexpected ally for help. Jughead uncovers a mystery surrounding the author of the Baxter Brothers books, while Betty confronts Charles about his past. Finally, Veronica deals with a major shake-up at home, and Cheryl and Toni get some unexpected visitors at Thistlehouse.	Riverdale	2	Chapter Sixty-Three: Hereditary	4
16	\N	Jughead and Betty confront Bret, Donna and Professor DuPont and unravel their plan to commit the perfect murder.	Riverdale	2	Chapter Seventy-Three: The Locked Room	4
6	\N	Archie, Betty, Veronica and Jughead prepare for their first day as Riverdale High's newest teachers. Veronica introduces her husband Chad to the group after he shows up unexpectedly in Riverdale. After realizing they are out of funds, Archie and Toni turn to Cheryl for help restarting the football and cheer teams. Finally, Betty, Kevin and Alice follow a lead after learning that Polly may be in trouble.	Riverdale	2	Chapter Eighty-Two	5
12	\N	The twins suffer complications from their surgery forcing the team at San Jose Boneventure Hospital to make a life-changing decision. Meanwhile, Dr. Shaun Murphy returns to the hospital after his trip with Lea and decides he needs a more permanent change and gives Dr. Aaron Glassman his two weeks’ notice.	The Good Doctor	3	Islands Part Two (2)	1
4	\N	Shaun recalls his own past to help an intellectually disabled teenager face separation from his mother, while Claire is put between an injured teenage rock climber and her worried parents. Meanwhile, Glassman’s post-op hallucinations force him to confront a personal tragedy.	The Good Doctor	3	Tough Titmouse	2
13	\N	Dr. Shaun Murphy, Dr. Morgan Reznick and Dr. Audrey Lim treat a woman with autism and a delicate brain condition while navigating the complicated relationship she has with her roommate, who is also on the spectrum. Meanwhile, Lea and Shaun are still figuring out their friendship and roommate status.	The Good Doctor	3	Xin	2
5	\N	Dr. Shaun Murphy has been assigned his first surgery by Dr. Audrey Lim. However, Dr. Marcus Andrews questions whether he is really ready. Meanwhile, as Dr. Claire Brown continues to avoid her complicated emotions about her mother, she and Dr. Morgan Reznick have a patient whose diagnosis has them doubting his story.	The Good Doctor	3	First Case, Second Base	3
15	\N	Despite everyone else’s doubts, Shaun is hopeful that Carly is truly fine with his friendship with Lea. The team treats a young boy born without a fully formed trachea and unable to speak, and who may be a good candidate for an experimental procedure.	The Good Doctor	3	Unsaid	3
10	\N	When the hospital is hit with a cyberattack threatening to shut down life-saving machines, Lea rises to the challenge and looks to outsmart the hackers to prove herself. Meanwhile, the team treats an inspirational cancer survivor-turned-successful-philanthropist who harbors a dark secret.	The Good Doctor	3	Decrypt	4
9	\N	During a stressful week of exams, Hope, Rafael, Landon and MG’s attempts to study get thwarted by the arrival of a new monster who feeds off their worst fears. Meanwhile, Hope struggles with a secret she’s been keeping from Landon.	Legacies	4	What Was Hope Doing in Your Dreams?	1
3	\N	As the Salvatore School prepares for its annual football game against Mystic Falls High, the latest monster to arrive in Mystic Falls sets its eyes on one of the students. Alaric goes head to head with Professor Vardemus.	Legacies	4	You Remind Me of Someone I Used to Know	2
11	\N	After learning that Josie, Lizzie and Alaric are in trouble, Hope leads the charge to save them. Meanwhile, Landon seizes the chance to keep an eye on the latest monster in town in order to prove himself useful. Elsewhere, MG’s attempt at a perfect first date with Kym takes a disastrous turn when Hope enlists his help in her plan.	Legacies	4	What Cupid Problem?	2
7	\N		Legacies	4	Episode 7	3
7	\N	Derek and Meredith try (unsuccessfully) to be discreet as they spend the night together at Meredith's house, but their haggard appearance speaks volumes to everyone - including Bailey, who warns Meredith to end the relationship. Meanwhile George suspects an anesthesiologist of drinking on the job but is reluctant to speak up about it, Alex treats a former competitor who now finds honor in self-mutilation, Izzie has to deal with a patient who won't let go of his girlfriend - literally, and Cristina seems to be battling a case of the flu.	Grey's Anatomy	5	The Self-Destruct Button	1
7	\N	Cristina, Izzie and Meredith take care of Shane, a man who appears to be crazy and claims that he is pregnant. Shane's case induces a spreading fascination among the staff. George relates to a patient's husband.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Something to Talk About	2
2	\N	With the gunman still at large and the residents of Riverdale on edge, Betty leads the charge to save Pop's after learning that the diner may be forced to close its doors forever. Meanwhile, the gang becomes increasingly concerned for Archie's well being after noticing a string of unusual behavior from him. Elsewhere, Betty and Veronica approach Cheryl and Josie for their help saving Pop's, while Jughead's attempt to find FP a new lawyer may have some serious repercussions. Finally, when a past betrayal unexpectedly comes to light, Veronica finds herself at a crossroads with Hiram and Hermione.	Riverdale	2	Chapter Fifteen: Nighthawks	2
12	\N	As preparations for her confirmation ceremony get underway, Veronica becomes concerned that Archie, who’s agreed to be Hiram’s "intern," may be learning too much about her family’s secret business dealings. Jughead and FP lead the charge after an incident at Pickens Park leads to increased tensions among the Serpents. Meanwhile, Chic helps Betty deal with her inner darkness, while Archie finds himself in over his head after a high-stakes poker game with Hiram’s shady inner-circle goes awry.	Riverdale	2	Chapter Twenty-Five: The Wicked and the Divine	2
22	\N	With Fred trailing in the polls, Archie steps in to lend a hand in his dad’s mayoral campaign. Veronica stays one step ahead after uncovering Hiram’s latest scheme. Elsewhere, Cheryl finalizes her emancipation from her mother, while FP makes a surprising announcement to Jughead and the Serpents. Finally, Betty confronts her darkest demons.	Riverdale	2	Chapter Thirty-Five: Brave New World	2
9	\N	With Riverdale in disarray following Hiram’s takeover, Veronica leads the charge against her father after he takes aim at La Bonne Nuit. Meanwhile, as Betty reluctantly houses the group of patients who escaped the Sisters of Quiet Mercy, Jughead confronts a group of desperate Serpents, who have resorted to drastic measures to make ends meet. Finally, Archie is forced to face his demons.	Riverdale	2	Chapter Forty-Four: No Exit	3
20	\N	Betty takes matters into her own hands after learning some unsettling news about her father. Mary grows concerned by Archie’s desire to take boxing to the next level. Elsewhere, Cheryl runs into a roadblock during her campaign for prom queen, while Jughead and Betty’s plan to confront the Gargoyle King takes an unexpected turn.	Riverdale	2	Chapter Fifty-Five: Prom Night	3
8	\N	As residents across Riverdale begin receiving more mysterious videotapes on their doorsteps, the seniors of Riverdale High eagerly await their college decision letters. Concerned that the stress may be getting to them, Mrs. Burble, the school's guidance counselor, meets with Betty, Archie, Veronica, Cheryl and Jughead to discuss what's plaguing them.	Riverdale	2	Chapter Sixty-Five: In Treatment	4
18	\N	Jughead and Charles follow a new lead after the contents of the latest videotape takes a sinister turn. Meanwhile, Kevin, Reggie and Fangs take their latest business venture to the next level, while Cheryl and Veronica's maple rum business faces a new threat. Finally, Archie and Betty contemplate their next steps.	Riverdale	2	Chapter Seventy-Five: Lynchian	4
7	\N		Riverdale	2	Chapter Eighty-Three: Fire in the Sky	5
7	\N	Dr. Shaun Murphy has to confront prejudice from an unlikely source when he takes on the case of a patient with autism, and Dr. Jared Kalu has to learn to accept his limitations as a surgeon.	The Good Doctor	3	22 Steps	1
1	\N	Shaun’s proposed treatment for a homeless patient puts him and Dr. Kalu in Dr. Andrews’ crosshairs. Claire tries to overcome Dr. Melendez’s reluctance to do a risky heart operation. Dr. Glassman faces a difficult decision about his health.	The Good Doctor	3	Hello	2
11	\N	The hospital is still in quarantine as Dr. Shaun Murphy continues to be overwhelmed by the chaos and noise in the emergency room; Dr. Morgan Reznick struggles to keep her patients alive, and Dr. Audrey Lim fights for her life. Meanwhile, Dr. Neil Melendez and Dr. Claire Browne must find a way to complete their patient’s bone marrow transplant, despite the quarantine.	The Good Doctor	3	Quarantine Part Two (2)	2
2	\N	As Dr. Marcus Andrews vows to help a good Samaritan who was injured while stopping a sexual assault, Dr. Audrey Lim faces a difficult decision when a young patient’s parents suspect that Dr. Neil Melendez made a mistake. Meanwhile, Dr. Shaun Murphy fields advice following his disastrous date with Dr. Carly Lever; and Dr. Claire Browne gets a surprise visit from her mother.	The Good Doctor	3	Debts	3
12	\N	The doctors must treat a 25-year-old runner who is suffering from severe swelling; two 16-year-old cancer patients are dating; Dr. Shaun Murphy and Dr. Carly Lever work toward intimacy.	The Good Doctor	3	Mutations	3
2	\N	Shaun has a hard time balancing his fears and concerns about potentially jeopardizing Lea's health and wanting to be with the woman he loves. Claire looks for a way to grieve Melendez's death. Park and Mia discuss their future together.	The Good Doctor	3	Frontline, Part 2	4
8	\N	The team treats a teenage gymnast who experiences complications from her intensive training. Meanwhile, Shaun meets Lea's parents for the first time.	The Good Doctor	3	Parenting	4
6	\N	As Lizzie and Josie prepare for their long awaited sweet sixteen party, Alaric finds himself preoccupied with the latest supernatural arrival – one that hits a little too close to home. Elsewhere, Penelope’s latest plan gives MG one last shot at impressing Lizzie on her big day, while an unexpected betrayal causes tensions to boil over between Hope and Rafael.	Legacies	4	Mombie Dearest	1
16	\N	When a group of unwelcome visitors descends upon The Salvatore School, Hope leads the charge to keep her friends safe. Meanwhile, MG uncovers a secret about his mother and Josie finds herself in a dire situation.	Legacies	4	There's Always a Loophole	1
13	\N	Hope finds herself in a race against the clock as the threat of the prophecy looms and the pressure to rescue the Saltzmans grows. Meanwhile, Alaric's attempt to keep his family safe leads him to make a difficult decision.	Legacies	4	You Can't Save Them All	2
6	\N		Legacies	4	Episode 6	3
6	\N	Izzie tries to get George to find the courage to ask Meredith out.   All of the interns are in awe when a woman comes in with a record breaking tumor, but it is so far advanced that the woman's prognosis is not good.   Now that Bailey knows about Meredith and Derek's affair, their jobs are in jeopardy, and she advises Meredith to end it.   Meanwhile, Cristina and Burke's secret relationship is also getting more complicated...	Grey's Anatomy	5	If Tomorrow Never Comes	1
9	\N	It's Thanksgiving at Seattle Grace Hospital but the holiday's festivites are less than in order. Meredith and Derek try to counsel a family after their relative has had a seriously traumatic accident.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Thanks for the Memories	2
5	\N	A seer reads Earl Haraldson's future and tells him that Ragnar searches for his death.	Vikings	8	Raid	1
1	\N	As Fred's life hangs in the balance following the shooting at Pop's diner, Archie struggles with the emotional aftermath of what he witnessed. Meanwhile, as Veronica steps out of her comfort zone to support Archie, she learns that her father Hiram has arrived to Riverdale earlier than expected. Elsewhere, at Pop's diner, Pop Tate recounts the chilling details of the shooting, which leaves Jughead and Betty questioning the gunman's true motives. Lastly, after running into Cheryl at the hospital, Betty and Kevin are surprised to learn about the fire at Thornhill.	Riverdale	2	Chapter Fourteen: A Kiss Before Dying	2
8	\N		WandaVision	1	Episode 8	1
9	\N		WandaVision	1	Episode 9	1
13	\N	Betty turns to Jughead for help when the consequences of a hasty decision come back to haunt her. Veronica organizes a face to face meeting after tensions between Hiram, FP and Jughead spiral out of control. Elsewhere, Archie is forced to make a tough decision after Agent Adams takes things one step too far.	Riverdale	2	Chapter Twenty-Six: The Tell-Tale Heart	2
14	\N	When Hiram suggests that Veronica and Archie head up to their lake house for the weekend, Veronica decides to invite Betty and Jughead to join them. Determined to uncover Hiram’s plans for Riverdale, Jughead uses his time at the lake house to press Veronica about what she may know. Back in Riverdale, Cheryl makes a surprising connection with an unlikely friend, while Josie lands in hot water after revealing a secret to Kevin.	Riverdale	2	Chapter Twenty-Seven: The Hills Have Eyes	2
15	\N	After learning that his dad is considering running for mayor of Riverdale, Archie begins to grow concerned that the Lodges may have found their newest pawn in Fred. Meanwhile, Betty becomes increasingly suspicious of Chic’s strange behavior and enlists Kevin’s help to figure out what Chic is hiding. Finally, Cheryl and Penelope are surprised when they learn that Clifford left a secret will, and Jughead makes a major discovery in his quest to take down Hiram.	Riverdale	2	Chapter Twenty-Eight: There Will Be Blood	2
2	\N	After a gruesome discovery is made in the forest, Jughead and Betty team up to investigate Riverdale's latest mystery. As Archie navigates his new surroundings, Veronica devises a plan to bring a bit of home to him. Elsewhere, when Moose decides to join the RROTC, Kevin worries he may be pulling away from him.	Riverdale	2	Chapter Thirty-Seven: Fortune and Men's Eyes	3
3	\N	When a series of suspicious roadblocks threaten to delay the opening of the speakeasy, Veronica enlists the help of Cheryl, Toni, Reggie, Kevin and Josie to ensure opening night goes off without a hitch. Elsewhere, Betty and Jughead follow different leads to learn more about the strange incidents going on in the town. Finally, some unwanted attention forces Archie to make a difficult decision about his future.	Riverdale	2	Chapter Thirty-Eight: As Above, So Below	3
1	\N	As the jury begins deliberations in his murder trial, Archie makes a surprising request about how he wants to spend his final days of summer. Betty is forced to deal with her problems head-on after a heated confrontation with Alice and Polly brings up some dark secrets she’s kept hidden. Veronica pleads with Hiram to step in and help Archie before a verdict is announced. Finally, Jughead leads the Serpents against the Ghoulies latest attack.	Riverdale	2	Chapter Thirty-Six: Labor Day	3
12	\N	Amidst preparations for their upcoming wedding, Sierra and Tom receive an unsettling message, which forces "The Midnight Club" to reunite. Meanwhile, Veronica and Reggie take drastic measures to clean up a mess they created. Cheryl learns some unexpected news about the college she has set her sights on. Lastly, Kevin gives Moose an ultimatum.	Riverdale	2	Chapter Forty-Seven: Bizarrodale	3
11	\N	After one of their own becomes the target of an unseen assailant, the gang works together to get to the bottom of Riverdale's latest mystery. Meanwhile, Betty works with a surprising ally to piece together clues about a series of deaths in the town. Elsewhere, a spiraling Archie sets out on a new path, while Jughead comes face to face with Ms. Mulwray, Hiram's alleged mistress.	Riverdale	2	Chapter Forty-Six: The Red Dahlia	3
13	\N	Archie steps back into the ring; Alice goes deeper with the Farm; Jughead visits the Heart of Darkness; Veronica juggles dueling villains.	Riverdale	2	Chapter Forty-Eight: Requiem For A Welterweight	3
21	\N	Veronica turns to Mary and Archie for help after uncovering a secret that Hiram had been keeping from her. Betty raises questions after witnessing some strange activities at The Farm. Jughead finds himself one step closer to uncovering the Gargoyle King’s identity.	Riverdale	2	Chapter Fifty-Six: The Dark Secret of Harvest House	3
1	\N	As the residence of Riverdale prepare for its upcoming Independence Day parade, Archie receives a phone call that will change the rest of his life forever.	Riverdale	2	Chapter Fifty-Eight: In Memoriam	4
22	\N	After receiving mysterious invitations, Archie, Betty, Veronica and Jughead band together to confront the evils of their past once and for all. Meanwhile, chaos ensues at The Farm after Edgar makes a chilling announcement.	Riverdale	2	Chapter Fifty-Seven: Survive the Night	3
9	\N	After declaring war on Hiram, Veronica enlists a secret weapon against her father - her Abuelita. Archie and FP team up to take Dodge down for good, while Betty and Charles investigate a series of strange attacks aimed at Betty. Elsewhere, Jughead's search for his grandpa, Forsythe Pendleton Jones I, leads to more questions than answers, while Cheryl finally makes peace with the past that's been haunting her.	Riverdale	2	Chapter Sixty-Six: Tangerine	4
10	\N	As Riverdale High prepares for the championship football game against Stonewall Prep, Betty gets to work on a story about the rivalry between the schools. Archie is conflicted when Mary tells him about Uncle Frank’s troubled past. Cheryl goes head to head with Ms. Appleyard, the school’s new cheerleading coach, and Veronica hits a road block with her latest Luna Rum recipe. Finally, Jughead is forced to pick a side after the perks of attending Stonewall Prep begin to interfere with his personal life.	Riverdale	2	Chapter Sixty-Seven: Varsity Blues	4
11	\N	Determined to give Frank a second chance, Archie gives him a job at Andrew’s Construction. Betty channels her energy into taking Bret down and defeating Stonewall Prep at the Quiz Show Championship, while Veronica and Cheryl team up for an unlikely business venture. Finally, Kevin’s date with a new suitor takes a strange and unexpected turn.	Riverdale	2	Chapter Sixty-Eight: Quiz Show	4
19	\N	After receiving a letter from the University of Iowa asking him to submit a story, Jughead works on a twisted tale about the gang's revenge fantasy against Principal Honey for all the ways he's ruined their senior year. Season Finale.	Riverdale	2	Chapter Seventy-Six: Killing Mr. Honey	4
2	\N	Meredith struggles to come up with a new plan for Owen’s sister. Jo makes a surprising choice regarding Alex, and Andrew’s sister’s controversial research leads to a shocking discovery.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Get off on the Pain	14
1	\N	Betty and Jughead's investigation into the auteur leads them to the discovery of a secret underground for red-band screenings. Elsewhere, in order to impress the visiting Naval Academy Commandant, Archie agrees to participate in a boxing exhibition against another candidate - KO Kelly. Meanwhile, as Cheryl prepares for prom, she stumbles upon a major secret that Toni's been keeping from her.	Riverdale	2	Chapter Seventy-Seven: Climax	5
4	\N	Dr. Neil Melendez and the team have to wade through legal waters when a husband and wife have to make a life-changing decision about their unborn child. Meanwhile, Dr. Shaun Murphy struggles to adjust to his new environment at home and makes a huge step forward with his colleagues.	The Good Doctor	3	Pipes	1
14	\N	Dr. Shaun Murphy is surprised to learn that his young cancer patient identifies as a girl while being biologically male. Shaun must quickly learn to understand his patient, her medical needs and how to work with her family, who all feel they know what is best for her.	The Good Doctor	3	She	1
5	\N	When a patient suffering from anorexia can’t gain the necessary weight needed to survive heart surgery, Claire suggests they perform an experimental surgery which Melendez strongly opposes. Shaun worries Glassman’s refusal to walk the hospital floor will keep him from being discharged and tries to persuade him to ambulate. Meanwhile, Shaun and Lea change the terms of their current relationship.	The Good Doctor	3	Carrots	2
15	\N	Shaun’s blunt honesty with a distraught mother of a critically ill newborn baby causes the new chief of Surgery to question keeping him on as a resident.	The Good Doctor	3	Risk and Reward	2
6	\N	While performing his first solo surgery, Dr. Shaun Murphy alienates a nurse, which puts his residency in jeopardy. Dr. Neil Melendez disagrees with Dr. Audrey Lim on a risky surgery. Dr. Claire Brown spirals into self-destructive behaviors, causing negative ramifications in the workplace.	The Good Doctor	3	45-Degree Angle	3
16	\N	When Dr. Shaun Murphy makes an emotional confession, the result may not be as desired. Meanwhile, he becomes obsessed with performing an autopsy on a Jane Doe, which challenges his relationships at the hospital; and Dr. Claire Browne, Dr. Morgan Reznick and Dr. Marcus Andrews treat a male college student with a mysterious split personality disorder.	The Good Doctor	3	Autopsy	3
7	\N	Dr. Morgan Reznik discovers her patient’s wealth and obsession with extending his life is a dangerous mix that could end up costing more than he can afford.	The Good Doctor	3	The Uncertainty Principle	4
3	\N	As punishment for breaking the rules, Hope, Lizzie, Josie and MG are forced to participate in a community service project in the Mystic Falls town square. Meanwhile, Landon and Rafael’s attempt at a carefree life on the road takes a dangerous turn when they become unsuspecting targets. Finally, Alaric realizes that keeping secrets from his students may be causing more harm than good.	Legacies	4	We're Being Punked, Pedro	1
13	\N	When a spontaneous road trip to visit MG’s parents leaves him and Landon missing, and a distressed Rafael with no memory of what happened, Hope, Alaric and Kaleb set out to find them before it’s too late.	Legacies	4	The Boy Who Still Has a Lot of Good to Do	1
5	\N	As the Salvatore School prepares for its upcoming ‘80s-themed decade dance, Hope and Lizzie find themselves trapped inside a never-ending labyrinth with a monster on their trail.	Legacies	4	Screw Endgame	2
14	\N	In order to deal with their recent trauma, Emma suggests the students participate in a group simulation that transports them to a film noir world. Hope, Josie, Lizzie, MG and Rafael quickly learn they must confront their conflicts head-on or risk facing the game’s catastrophic consequences.	Legacies	4	There's a Place Where the Lost Things Go	2
1	\N	Meet Meredith Grey. Daughter of famous surgeon Ellis Grey and currently recovering from a one-night stand. She shoos away her evening's companion, saying she'll be late for her first day of work. She is a first year intern at Seattle Grace Hospital and is working alongside some colorful characters. Cristina Yang is a highly competitive Stanford graduate who befriends Meredith. George O'Malley is a quirky warm hearted man who learns a lesson or two on his first day. Izzie Stevens is a former model who doesn't get any special treatment on her first day. And Alex Karev is an arrogant jerk who misdiagnoses a patient on his first shift. Overseeing them is Miranda Bailey, (not-so-) affectionately dubbed 'The Nazi'. Meredith also gets a surprise when she realizes that her friend from the night before is a co-worker, and even worse, her boss.	Grey's Anatomy	5	A Hard Day's Night	1
2	\N	There's tension between Meredith and Addison. We find out why Derek and Addison aren't together. Bailey puts George on an impossible case. The rest of the interns operate on a family that was just in a car accident.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Enough is Enough (No More Tears)	2
13	\N	Cristina is bothered by a new year's mandatory work limit. Izzie patient, Denny Duquette, wants two things: 1. a heart transplant, 2. Izzie. Addison detests Derek's trailer, Derek visits Meredith's mom, George treats a young teen hermaphrodite frustrated by her  pre-pubescence. Other news includes patients doing uncanny things and relationship havoc being wrecked between the doctors, as per usual.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Begin the Begin	2
20	\N	The doctors are up to their necks in their usual levels of drama. Meredith is dealing with the backlash of sleeping with George, George and Burke are bonding in ways that bother and creep out Cristina, Cristina gets stuck on diaper duty, Bailey gets involved in a case even though she's still supposed to be on maternity leave, Addison and Derek have a talk, and Izzie is still flaking on Alex for Denny Duquette, the heart patient who didn't get a heart. In the patients-of-the-week department we've got a very pregnant woman, a hockey player who desires medically unnessasary amputation, and a woman with a fork in her neck who happens to be dying and has a struggling marriage.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Band-Aid Covers the Bullet Hole	2
3	\N	The staff tries to prevent a patient from getting an elective surgery. Cristina tries to help Preston cope with the after effects of his surgery. A patient bails on their surgery. Someone goes to a bed-and breakfast. Alex deals with a patient who has had a high amount of injuries in the past. A man undergoes surgery. Before the surgery his wife was only somewhat supportive, but the results may be too much for her to handle. Izzie tries to go back to the hospital for the first time since Denny died. One child's constant visits are noted by a nurse. Two foster patients are met with suspicions of child abuse. George and Callie's relationship moves forward.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Sometimes a Fantasy	3
8	\N	A hacker compromises the hospital’s computer system, causing monitors, phones, labs and patient files to all go down. As technology fails them, Bailey attempts to keep the peace but chaos erupts and the doctors are forced to get creative in their methods to treat the patients.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Out of Nowhere	14
3	\N	Dr. Neil Melendez and Dr. Jared Kalu discover their patient isn’t being completely honest with them which may cost him his chance at a life-saving surgery. Meanwhile, Dr. Claire Browne must learn to communicate with Dr. Shaun Murphy as they race back to St. Bonaventure Hospital with a donated organ.	The Good Doctor	3	Oliver	1
9	\N	As part of St. Bonaventure hospital's international humanitarian program, the team takes on the case of a young boy from the Congo who has severe congenital heart anomalies. Dr. Neil Melendez has doubts about the safety of the procedure, while Dr. Shaun Murphy works out the best course of action. Meanwhile, Murphy's latest encounter with his neighbor Lea has him confused.	The Good Doctor	3	Intangibles	1
18	\N	The team at St. Bonaventure needs to quickly discover the truth behind a young college student’s unexplained injuries before his condition worsens. Meanwhile, after losing his most prized possession, Shaun’s distraction during a surgical procedure may end up risking more than just his job.	The Good Doctor	3	More	1
10	\N	Dr. Shaun Murphy and Dr. Alex Park treat two patients who collapse at the local airport and whose symptoms point to an infection that may become airborne. The staff races to contain the infection before it spreads to the rest of the patients in the ER, resulting in a hospital quarantine during the holidays.	The Good Doctor	3	Quarantine (1)	2
18	\N	As a barroom fight sends Dr. Shaun Murphy to seek treatment at St. Bonaventure’s, Dr. Alex Park and Dr. Audrey Lim disagree over an elderly woman’s post-operative symptoms. Meanwhile, Dr. Neil Melendez and Dr. Lim make their romance public, and Dr. Aaron Glassman continues to pursue a relationship with a good friend.	The Good Doctor	3	Trampoline	2
10	\N	Shaun visits his father on his deathbed and the family reunion reveals unexpected results. Melendez, Park, Reznick and Claire treat an injured star NFL player with severe spinal damage. Claire addresses her mental health.	The Good Doctor	3	Friends and Family	3
20	\N	The staff of St. Bonaventure Hospital works against time and their own personal safety to save the lives of those around them.	The Good Doctor	3	I Love You (2)	3
3	\N	With several candidates vying for residency at St. Bonaventure, Chief of Surgery Dr. Audrey Lim tasks Dr. Shaun Murphy, Dr. Claire Browne and Dr. Alex Park with mentoring the top first-year resident contenders. As their mentees shadow them for the day, Shaun and Park meet with Andrews to discuss a difficult surgery scheduled for a minor. Later, Shaun inadvertently insults Lea while discussing the pros and cons of the controversial surgery. And elsewhere, Dr. Morgan Reznick seeks out Claire and Lim’s help on a consult.	The Good Doctor	3	Newbies	4
13	\N		The Good Doctor	3	Episode 13	4
10	\N	Following a stay in Europe with her mother, Lizzie returns to Mystic Falls and comes face to face with someone who could make all her wishes come true – including making Hope Mikaelson disappear.	Legacies	4	There's a World Where Your Dreams Come True	1
6	\N	When a truth-seeking monster arrives in Mystic Falls during Commonwealth Day, Hope and Lizzie fear that the secrets they’ve each been keeping have made them targets. Meanwhile, MG, Kaleb and Kym seek out an unlikely ally, who may have knowledge on how to take down the latest monster. Finally, Freya  receives an unexpected visit from one of the Salvatore Students.	Legacies	4	That's Nothing I Had to Remember	2
15	\N	When things take a dark turn on the twins’ 17th birthday, Lizzie is left to make a difficult decision. Meanwhile, Hope takes drastic measures when she and Alaric clash over how to handle an issue involving Josie. Finally, Rafael makes a heartbreaking discovery.	Legacies	4	Life Was So Much Easier When I Only Cared About Myself	2
2	\N	The surgical staff tries to be optimistic as a young woman clings to life after a brutal attack. Meanwhile Meredith puts her career on the line to save a newborn in the hospital nursery, and the other interns learn that it takes more than just medical knowledge to be good at their jobs.	Grey's Anatomy	5	The First Cut is the Deepest	1
3	\N	Cristina and Meredith try to figure out if Cristina should tell Burke that she's pregnant right before Cristina faces an emergency. Alex and Izzie get closer while Meredith's mother gets too close.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Make Me Lose Control	2
5	\N	Cristina goes right back to working right after being discharged. Izzie isn't talking to Alex. Derek and Meredith treat a patient. George and Alex get stuck in an elevator.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Bring the Pain	2
15	\N	All the nurses at Seattle Grace Hospital go on strike, leaving the doctors to fend for themselves. George refuses to cross the picket line and finally joins the nurses on their strike while Alex, Cristina, Izzie and Meredith meets Bailey's stand-in: Dr. Cindy Aaron, the complete opposite of Miranda Bailey. Izzie agrees to work on a difficult pregnancy case with Addison, while Cristina and Alex are in the pit attending to a young married woman with a real bad case of rash. Meredith happens on an old woman that she needs to intubate and then learns she was DNR.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Break on Through	2
25	\N	George and Derek work together, Denny still doesn't have a heart, and Meredith gets paired with Callie. A 12-week pregnant girl dies in the O.R. and her parents try to keep the baby alive. This causes tension between Derek and Addison. One doctor's overreaction unites two bickering patients. Finn is still treating Doc for medical problems.	Grey's Anatomy	5	17 Seconds	2
8	\N	George's father has a serious heart problem that requires surgery and George chooses Burke to do the procedure. Burke doubts himself because he knows the pressure this kind of surgery will put on him, but Cristina believes the team can handle it. Derek works with Meredith on being a couple again and tries work with Addison on more civil terms. A patient has had mutiple plastic surgeries so that his girlfriend will like him more. A mom wants her daughter's babysitter fired, after she is brought in with multiple injuries, but the girl likes the babysitter more than her mother.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Staring at the Sun	3
18	\N	The race between the attending physicians for the Chief of Surgery position heats up after a new competitor enters the fray. They soon realize that the new surgeon, Colin Marlow, was Cristina's professor in medical school and they used to have a long-term relationship. He begins to lie to Burke in order to protect her secret, but is soon faced with the realization that their relationship is on the rocks. George finds out that Callie's family is rich, but she had previously hidden the fact in order to find out whether George loves her for who she really is. Derek treats his former colleague from New York, and forces her to have surgery for brain cancer in order to save her future, no matter what the post-surgery risks are. Alex continues to work with Jane Doe, whose memory doesn't seem to come back. He moves in with Meredith and they have a dinner with her father and stepmother. She seems to connect with Susan, but her relationship with Thatcher seems to be irreparable. Izzie wakes up, realizing that she has slept with George while they were both drunk.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Scars and Souvenirs	3
11	\N	Dr. Marcus Andrews enlists Dr. Neil Melendez on a very sensitive kidney transplant between a pair of twins; Dr. Shaun Murphy decides to take an impromptu trip with his friend Lea and leave his problems behind.	The Good Doctor	3	Islands Part One (1)	1
3	\N	Dr. Melendez, Dr. Brown and Dr. Park have given a young married couple two choices about their future: save the wife’s life or their future ability to start a family. Meanwhile, when Dr. Lim has to take care of some personal business, she leaves oversight of the emergency room to Dr. Murphy and Dr. Reznick; and Dr. Glassman’s post-op recovery leaves him struggling to get the rest he needs for recovery and also confronting his relationship with his daughter.	The Good Doctor	3	36 Hours	2
12	\N	In the aftermath of the quarantine, the staff tries to return to their normal routines. Meanwhile, as Dr. Lim recovers from the virus, she and Dr. Melendez navigate their new personal and working relationship, while Dr. Murphy and Dr. Glassman visit Lea.	The Good Doctor	3	Aftermath	2
4	\N	As a conspiracy theorist questions Dr. Neil Melendez’s diagnosis, Dr. Claire Brown treats a woman whose inability to feel pain is threatening both her marriage and her life. Meanwhile, Dr. Shaun Murphy and Dr. Aaron Glassman each face crises in their romantic relationships.	The Good Doctor	3	Take My Hand	3
14	\N	After Dr. Shaun Murphy treats a patient who is a social influencer, he deals with unwanted attention. Meanwhile, the team treats a woman who is in abdominal distress after an at-home fecal transplant; and Dr. Carly Lever’s efforts to separate Shaun from Lea are challenged.	The Good Doctor	3	Influence	3
4	\N	Dr. Morgan Reznik and Dr. Shaun Murphy's pregnant patient with twins is having pain and they are forced to grapple with a decision no one wants to make. Meanwhile, Shaun asks Lea to move back in despite her reservations	The Good Doctor	3	Not the Same	4
4	\N	When two local students go missing, Alaric sends Hope, Lizzie, MG and Landon  to Mystic Falls High to investigate. Meanwhile, as Josie helps Rafael adjust to his new life at the school, his reluctance to follow the wolf pack’s rules puts a target on his back. Lastly, an unsettling discovery puts Alaric and Sheriff Donovan at odds with one another.	Legacies	4	Hope Is Not the Goal	1
14	\N	As the Salvatore School prepares to host the Miss Mystic Falls pageant, Hope secretly deals with a recent trauma that’s causing her magic to go on the fritz. Meanwhile, the unexpected arrival of Roman, a boy from Hope’s past, causes Landon to be on alert. Elsewhere, MG struggles with the fallout from his recent actions, while Josie’s secret desire to win Miss Mystic Falls takes a backseat to Lizzie’s plan for the pageant.	Legacies	4	Let's Just Finish the Dance	1
4	\N	When a samurai shows up looking for a demon that possesses its victims, Josie leads the charge to defend her friends from the demon's wrath; MG is conflicted by a secret he's uncovered about Lizzie's new vampire friend, Sebastian.	Legacies	4	Since When Do You Speak Japanese?	2
16	\N	In a race to save Josie, Hope infiltrates her subconscious and finds herself in a fairytale world filled with dark magic. Back at the Salvatore School, Alaric, Lizzie and the Super Squad commit to their own risky plan to get Josie back despite the potential consequences.	Legacies	4	Facing Darkness is Kinda My Thing	2
5	\N	Meredith realizes that she must take on a lot more responsibility when she is told that her mother needs to sign over all of her assets to her. As Izzie prepares to have a party for her boyfriend Hank (the scale of which is unknown to Meredith), Meredith has her first heart surgery.  During the surgery she fears that she has fallen asleep and damaged the patient's heart. Meanwhile, Cristina and Burke hit it off. At the party, Meredith and Derek get caught together by Dr. Bailey.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Shake Your Groove Thing	1
8	\N	Meredith tries to avoid the Shepherds. Cristina and Burke go out on a date and end up getting caught up in their jobs. Derek asks Meredith not to ignore him until Addison comes walking around the corner.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Let It Be	2
21	\N	After a series of deaths at the hospital some of the staff become very superstitious. Izzie worries about Denny and gets confronted by Alex.  A patient with OCD drives Cristina crazy. Derek and Addison discuss their relationships with Meredith. Richard treats a friend from 17 years ago who reveals a secret about a dark time in his past that involves Ellis. George gets an earful about the women he's not talking to. Burke and Cristina argue about kicking George out.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Superstition	2
4	\N	Shawn Sullivan, a car salesman who just had surgery, wants to get back to his routine so he doesn't lose his renown. Addison works with a pregnant woman named Rebecca who may need a C-section and Addison doubts her medical skills. Rebecca wants to have the baby naturally. Derek and Mark's opinions clash when the try to decide the course of treatment for a burn victim. Izzie gets surprised. Cristina pushes Burke to get better faster.	Grey's Anatomy	5	What I Am	3
14	\N	The race for the Chief's position is on, and the attending physicians, Derek, Burke, Addison and Mark, compete for Richard's affections by trying to help out everywhere possible. The Denny Duquette Memorial Clinic is open for business, but only one single patient shows up. Izzie is disappointed in what she invested Denny's legacy in, and tries to steal patients from the emergency room. Callie and George get back from Las Vegas, announcing their marriage, much to everyone's disbelief. Izzie is not supportive of their marriage and tries to get George to realize the mistake he has made. Meanwhile, Meredith's Alzheimer's-stricken mother, Ellis Grey, experiences a change in her medical condition by becoming lucid for the day. She is disappointed in the mediocrity her daughter has fallen into and begins to despise Derek, blaming him for what happened to the Meredith that used to be "a force of nature". Ellis has to have heart surgery and, despite her wishes, Meredith schedules her upcoming surgery. Richard talks to Ellis and realizes that she is still in love with him, but loses her memory after their talk ends, before Meredith has the chance to tell her how she really feels.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Wishin' and Hopin'	3
12	\N	April is in charge of the new Grey Sloan Surgical Innovation Contest, and the doctors are eager to start their projects. Meanwhile, Catherine’s old friend has a shocking idea for Catherine and Jackson; and Meredith treats a returning patient who inspires her project.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Harder, Better, Faster, Stronger	14
21	\N	The hospital brings in crisis management to help them sort out allegations against Harper Avery. Nurse Olivia shows up at Grey Sloan with her son, throwing Alex and Jo for a loop Arizona decides to spend more time with Sofia who is having a hard time at school.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Bad Reputation	14
8	\N	Johnny prepares his Cobra Kai students for the next All Valley Karate Tournament and in turn, he is inspired to clean up his life. Daniel is still unaware of his new pupil’s background. But as events unfold, it seems nothing has changed between Daniel and Johnny in 30 years.	Cobra Kai	7	Molting	1
2	\N	As Shaun pushes back against Dr. Melendez in order to treat a gravely ill hospital janitor, Dr. Lim risks a lawsuit to repair a teenage girl’s ritual circumcision. Dr. Glassman exercises demanding oversight in choosing a doctor for his brain surgery.	The Good Doctor	3	Middle Ground	2
1	\N	Dr. Shaun Murphy proposes a radical surgery to save a woman's life after what he believes was a disastrous first date with Carly. Meanwhile, after the new chief of surgery, Dr. Audrey Lim, announces that the residents can lead surgeries, Dr. Morgan Reznick and Dr. Alex Park compete for the chance to operate on an elderly patient who has been diagnosed with cancer.	The Good Doctor	3	Disaster	3
11	\N	Following his father's death, Shaun must deal with the effects his intimacy with Lea will have on his relationship with Carly; the team operates on a patient who is refusing all anesthesia during surgery for fear of relapsing.	The Good Doctor	3	Fractured	3
1	\N	Dr. Murphy treats a patient who has an illness that is not only unpredictable in nature, but also unlike anything he or the team has seen before. Dr. Claire Brown continues to work through her grief, still reeling from Dr. Neil Melendez's death.	The Good Doctor	3	Frontline, Part 1	4
9	\N	Lim is challenged by the unique circumstances surrounding a pregnant patient with an aggressive tumor. Elsewhere, after misdiagnosing a patient, Claire makes a disconcerting discovery about certain practices at the hospital.	The Good Doctor	3	Irresponsible Salad Bar Practices	4
5	\N	Tensions rise among the students after Alaric decides to give the students a bigger voice by forming an honor council. Determined to find out more about Landon’s past, Hope does a series of magical tests on him. Meanwhile, Alaric and Dorian take on the next creature to try and find out what they want and where they are coming from.	Legacies	4	Malivore	1
15	\N	When the fallout of Hope’s actions leaves her and Landon on the outs, she turns to Lizzie for help making things right. Meanwhile, Landon uncovers secrets about his past, while Josie looks into a secret that Alaric has been keeping.	Legacies	4	I’ll Tell You a Story	1
9	\N	Back and ready to wreak havoc, The Necromancer's plan for revenge on Malivore takes a turn when he realizes he is now a human and powerless. To mend fences with Josie, Hope offers to help her learn more about the mora miserium. Elsewhere, Alaric enlists Landon's help to find out if Sebastian is a threat to the school.	Legacies	4	I Couldn't Have Done This Without You	2
3	\N	The students prepare to put on a musical about the founding of the Salvatore School at the behest of their mysterious new guidance counselor. Meanwhile, as Landon throws himself into writing the musical and Lizzie, Josie, Kaleb and Jed dive into their roles, Hope distances herself from the musical.	Legacies	4	Salvatore: The Musical!	3
9	\N	A sexually transmitted disease breaks out and affects several members of the hospital staff. Chief Webber promptly calls a meeting. Meanwhile, the chief reluctantly tells Dr. Derek Shepherd about his own medical concerns. Izzie and Cristina worry about a patient's wife and daughter who can't agree on his care. Burke treats his college buddy Bill, whose medical diagnosis raises some questions regarding his wife's actions. Then just as Meredith and Derek grow more intimate, a surprise is revealed.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Who's Zoomin' Who?	1
11	\N	Cristina Yang has little sympathy for Constance Ferguson (special guest star Rosanna Arquette), a prison inmate who jeopardizes her health just to get out of solitary confinement. Meanwhile the interns all keep careful watch on the family of premature quintuplets with a variety of serious health challenges, Izzie's anger at Alex reaches boiling point, and Dr. Addison Shepherd decides to teach Izzie a very painful lesson.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Owner of a Lonely Heart	2
16	\N	An explosive case arrives at the O.R. that might endanger all the lives of the people working there, which leads Dr. Burke to declare a "Code Black" for the hospital. Bailey worries where her husband is as she is in labor.  Also Izzie and Alex may be creating some heat.	Grey's Anatomy	5	It's the End of the World	2
1	\N	Meredith must make an important choice about which path she wants to follow to determine the future of her love life. While she considers her future she and others have flashbacks of their pasts. Cristina spends time with Burke while he recovers. Webber and Adele have a conversation after he spends the night at the hospital. Everyone attempts to deal with Izzie's choice to quit. George seeks relationship advice from Derek.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Time Has Come Today	3
11	\N	Meredith discovers that Derek has a problem sleeping while her father comes to visit the hospital. George's father is moving from one surgery to another. A patient named Heather checks into the hospital. Heather is 17 and has a nasty attitude that results from her medical condition and all the surgeries it has required her to have. Izzie has an emotional breakdown when she tries to hand over something very important to her. George's family comes to visit to celebrate his father's surgery. Cristina and Burke are playing Uncle.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Six Days (1)	3
20	\N	Colin Marlow continues to try to get in the way of Cristina and Burke's relationship. The daughter that Izzie gave up for adoption needs something from her. This episode features a pro chess player, a flirtatious woman, and a mother named Mrs. Malone. Mr. and Mrs. Malone haven't talked to their daugther in a while because of their son-in-law. Someone goes to see a priest.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Time After Time	3
6	\N	A patient comes to the ER with a dream and a condition which may prevent him form realizing it. Two patients are competing to win something big. One of them convinces an intern to take their place.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Kung Fu Fighting	4
16	\N	A couple undergoes surgery. Derek and Meredith's clinical trial gets a second shot from a new patient. Izzie helps Alex. McSteamy hooks up with someone.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Freedom (1)	4
9	\N	Meredith, Cristina and Bailey come to Lexie and Sadie's rescue when a routine surgery goes horribly wrong, as Owen and Derek treat a man seriously injured while sleepwalking and Mark comforts the sleepwalker's distraught daughter.	Grey's Anatomy	5	In the Midnight Hour	5
1	\N	The hospital staff is left to deal with the aftermath of George's passing. Hitting the staff hard, they all find unique ways to get through the various stages of grief. George's mom returns, faced with the difficult task of deciding what to do with his organs.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Good Mourning	6
15	\N	In his new role as Chief, Derek restores the hospital lecture series, and Richard, Bailey and Callie present to the group pivotal surgical cases from their pasts Bailey reflects on her first days as a shy resident, Callie looks back on a polio case, and Richard recalls a case in which he and Ellis worked on a patient diagnosed with GRID, a virus later called AIDS.	Grey's Anatomy	5	The Time Warp	6
1	\N	The battle begins between Ragnar and King Horik's forces against Jarl Borg; Princess Aslaug makes her way to Kattegat.	Vikings	8	Brother's War	2
4	\N	While George is feeling a little less masculine because of the way Izzie and Meredith have been treating him (like a sister), Izzie is assigned to a patient about to loose all of his masculinity. Cristina, true to her competitive spirit, shows up early and assigns herself to an ill woman, who happens to have been Meredith's moms scrub nurse. Alex, meanwhile, is busying himself copying and pasting pictures of Izzie's racy magazine spread all over the interns' locker room. And while Meredith is trying to cope with her mother's Alzheimer's, Derek treats a patient who has managed to get nails stuck in his head.	Grey's Anatomy	5	No Man's Land	1
6	\N	Train Wreck victims come to Seattle Grace and all staff gets called in. Everyone deals with really weird cases. Except Addison and Izzie. They work with a woman who is pregnant.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Into You Like a Train	2
18	\N	Derek and Addison's relationship is rocked to the core when a former friend comes to Seattle Grace and his presence promises to shake things up for a few members of the staff. Burke and Cristina's relationship is affected when one of her secrets is outted. Alex and Izzie are having similar reactions to their closet scenes during the Code Black crisis. On top of this a cocky doctor shows up to piss Derek off in all kinds of ways. A patient is suffering from constant orgasms and her condition sparks interesting conversations among the staff. George is trying to figure out how to get Meredith to see him as more than just a housemate. Another patient, that Derek is treating, is dealing with a rare disorder and needs his parents support and understanding. Burke has a patient who inspires him to talk to Meredith and Cristina about doing what they say they will. Meanwhile, Meredith learns more about her family (in fact maybe more than she may have wanted to know) through her parents.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Yesterday	2
2	\N	Cristina meets Burke's parents, the interns try to get Izzie's job back, and Addison takes a day off, a surgical patient may be living her last day. Some of the interns want to know why Bailey won't talk to Izzie. Meredith tries to decide between Derek and Finn and comes to a decision somewhat. Webber finds out that Callie has been living in the hosiptal and he confronts her about it.	Grey's Anatomy	5	I Am a Tree	3
10	\N	Recent events strain Burke and Cristina's relationship. Mark and Derek must work together when two close-knit brothers seek medical help. One of Meredith's half sisters is admitted to the hospital.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Don't Stand So Close to Me	3
21	\N	The attendings vie to be Chief. Two people who haven't slept together before, will. McSteamy's 60-day vow of chastity has a conclusion. We meet a boss, his assistant, and his wife. We also get to see someone being treated in the clinic. Derek has more questions about his relationship with Meredith. The chairman of the hospital board is admitted as patient. Callie confronts Izzie about her relationship with George.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Desire	3
7	\N	Izzie and George's new-founded relationship results in them having bad sex. Callie's Chief Resident position is taken away from her, and Bailey is the humble replacement. Meredith can barely handle it with Lexie anymore.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Physical Attraction, Chemical Reaction	4
17	\N	A couple undergoes surgery. Derek and Meredith's clinical trial gets a second shot from a new patient. Izzie helps Alex. McSteamy hooks up with someone.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Freedom (2)	4
10	\N	Cristina is awarded the first solo surgery among the residents, but she is forced to give it up and choose her replacement; Lexie is impressed when Mark performs a cutting-edge procedure; Callie doesn't know if Sadie is friendly or flirtatious.	Grey's Anatomy	5	All by Myself	5
24	\N	In the second part of the two hour season finale, George delivers stunning news to Bailey, sending shockwaves throughout the hospital, and Izzie's friends anxiously await her recovery from surgery. Meanwhile Bailey is surprisingly displeased after being accepted into the pediatric fellowship program, and the victim of a near-fatal traffic accident brings the talents of Seattle Grace's doctors together. This is the second hour of a 2-hour season finale.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Now or Never	5
22	\N	An elderly patient admitted into the E.R. for a heart condition sees a familiar face, a long lost love who happens to be in the E.R. as well for a fractured arm, and the staff find themselves caught up in their love story. Meanwhile, Karev treats a troubled teenage patient (guest star Demi Lovato) whose parents brought her in for schizophrenia, and Meredith can't help but tell Cristina about her suspicions of Owen -- which inevitably messes with Cristina's head.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Shiny Happy People	6
7	\N	Owen puts the residents through a rigorous trauma certification drill; Cristina is left alone to monitor an ill lung transplant patient.	Grey's Anatomy	5	That's Me Trying	7
20	\N	As Callie and Arizona's wedding approaches, the couple quickly realize that the day they've been looking forward to is not turning out the way they'd envisioned. Meanwhile Alex continues to make the other residents jealous as he appears to be the top contender for Chief Resident, Meredith and Derek make a decision that will change their lives forever, and Dr. Perkins presents Teddy with a very tempting proposition.	Grey's Anatomy	5	White Wedding	7
7	\N	Owen stresses teamwork and moves his leadership role over to the baseball field when he signs the doctors up for a baseball league, pitting them against their biggest competition, Seattle Presbyterian; Lexie tries to hide her jealous rage when she sees Mark with a new woman, but her emotions get the better of her; Alex fights to keep Zola at Seattle Grace after it is suggested that she be moved to another hospital due to a conflict of interest with Meredith and Derek; and Richard scolds Meredith and Bailey for their feud	Grey's Anatomy	5	Put Me In, Coach	8
17	\N	Derek encourages a hesitant Meredith to work with him again in neurology; Jackson's mother, Catherine Avery, returns to Seattle Grace with a urology fellow and develops an interest in Richard; and Cristina becomes increasingly suspicious of Owen's every move. Meanwhile, Alex tries to deny the fact that Morgan may be falling for him.	Grey's Anatomy	5	One Step Too Far	8
3	\N	The survivors from the crash are asked to make an almost impossible decision that will affect the rest of their lives. Meanwhile, tension grows between Jackson and April after they're forced to work together, and Alex tries to restrain himself with one of the interns.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Love the One You're With	9
5	\N	In this Meredith & Cristina-centric episode, the two friends continue to cope with life after the plane crash and their ever-growing responsibilities at their respective hospitals. As Meredith juggles taking care of Zola with a case that hits close to home, Cristina assists Dr. Thomas on a challenging heart surgery.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Beautiful Doom	9
14	\N	Competition heats up as several of the doctors fight to become the new face of Seattle Grace; April brings in an emergency case, and Jackson and Alex work with a transgender teen couple. Meanwhile, the hospital implements new policies which test the patience of the staff.	Grey's Anatomy	5	The Face of Change	9
12	\N	The holiday season has started but not everyone is in a festive mood. This is Alex's last day in the hospital unless he passes his boards practical exam the next day, thus everyone helps him to review so that he succeeds. However, Izzie is not happy about the others helping him and Meredith has to remind her of the true spirit of the Christmas holiday. Justin is in need of a new heart. One is available but he does not want it because he does not believe Santa gave it to him as his mother said. Cristina and Burke, both handling Justin's case, have opposing views on the matter due to their different stances on religion. Despite a reconciliation with his wife, Derek isn't in a festive mood. George has a simple case of a woman who has a bleeding ulcer, he realizes that the ulcer is caused by her entourage but fails to keep them away, with the consequence that it perforates.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Grandma Got Run Over By a Reindeer	2
24	\N	The staff attends to an intern from another hospital who has short-term memory loss. This intern, named Marshall, also has caused a car accident that involved a married couple, their unborn baby and the woman's parents who the staff are also treating. The pregnant woman is named Melanie and she will die but her baby may survive. One of the female interns meets up with a woman from her past who is planning on having a family of her own. Cristina is in a good mood although Alex, Izzie, George, and Meredith are having problems but in the meantime Burke hasn't forgiven Cristina for her late night faux pas. Meredith and Izzie are making fun of Callie's household habits and George and Callie are having a fight because of George's roommates. Addison is continuing to own Alex and he's upset about it. Denny has an outburst at Izzie and Derek has an outburst at Meredith.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Damage Case	2
7	\N	The men of Seattle Grace go on a camping trip together, Addison and Callie must team up to work on a patient, Meredith assists Sloan with a procedure unlike any she has experienced, and, suspicious of her recent actions at the hospital, Bailey confronts Cristina. A 9-year-old is seen by Cristina after he swallowed Monopoly game pieces. A pregnant 25-year-old, is brought in after she slipped in the shower. She doesn't want medicine to take away the pain from her injury so not to put her baby's growth in jeopardy. Doctors take care of Daniel, a man who wants a sexual reassignment surgery and who now goes under the name Donna. Accompanying Daniel is his wife of the past 10 years, who was surprised to see him want that surgery but, after much struggling, decided to stay by his side.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Where the Boys Are	3
17	\N	Everyone is pushing for Meredith to survive, or in this case to be revived. People are still dealing with the fallout from the ferry disaster. A young man named Lucas is having problems with brain-mouth coordination. Someone else dies.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Some Kind of Miracle	3
2	\N	A patient is in the hospital because they fell asleep in a hazardous situation. A patient's home laboratory blew up in an apartment building and the victims flood the hospital. Alex investigates the cause of the incident by talking to a really old guy who lived in the building. Jane Burke shows up to deal with what her son left behind. Lexie tries to talk to Meredith. Callie is overwhelmed by her new position while Bailey is searching for things to do.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Love/Addiction	4
12	\N	Time has passed but not much has changed. Sexual angst still runs rampant in the halls of Seattle Grace. Derek and Rose have been dating and Meredith has noticed the activities of her current off-again ex-boyfriend. The doctor's are in the midst of a competition.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Where The Wild Things Are	4
4	\N	Meredith is sent into a state of panic when Derek finds her mother's diary in the house. Meanwhile, Callie stresses while preparing for her first date with Erica. Later, Cristina stumbles across a part of the hospital no one has ever seen before.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Brave New World	5
14	\N	Now that Derek has the engagement ring, he searches for the perfect way to propose to Meredith, as Lexie demands that Mark go public with their relationship, and Bailey, encouraged by her work on recent cases and by Dr. Dixon, considers a new direction for her medical career.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Beat Your Heart Out	5
21	\N	As preparations continue for Meredith and Derek's wedding, Izzie receives a surprise hospital visit from her handful-of-a-mother, Robbie. Meanwhile, a newly sober Thatcher visits his daughters, Meredith and Lexie, in order to make amends, and the Chief and Meredith bitterly fight over a controversial medical case.	Grey's Anatomy	5	No Good at Saying Sorry (One More Chance)	5
7	\N	When Isaac has an inoperable tumor wrapped around his spine, he wants Derek to do the impossible. Derek tests the Chief's authority when Richard objects to moving forward with the risky surgery.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Give Peace a Chance	6
19	\N	When Alex's younger brother, Aaron, shows up at Seattle Grace-Mercy West with a hernia, it's up to Alex to get Bailey's approval for his pro bono surgery. Matters are further complicated when Aaron discloses that his family has not heard from Alex since he arrived in Seattle, and parts of Alex's past long kept secret are revealed to his friends and fellow doctors.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Sympathy for the Parents	6
9	\N	The residents are on their own with the dreaded night shifts while the attendings go out to play to celebrate Derek's grant for his clinical trial.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Slow Night, So Long	7
21	\N	Personal and work pressures are adding up and have Meredith visibly on edge, Owen conducts formal interviews for the Chief Resident position, Cristina grows increasingly defiant, Alex and Lucy's undefined relationship gets tested, and Jackson suddenly backs out of the Webber's diabetes trial.	Grey's Anatomy	5	I Will Survive	7
12	\N	Richard performs a monumental surgery in his career; Derek and Lexie attempt to work miracles for a patient with an inoperable tumor	Grey's Anatomy	5	Hope for the Hopeless	8
20	\N	The doctors work on a Jane Doe, who turns out to be the subject of a case that gained national interest; Cristina proves to be the highest in demand as the residents begin their interviews for post-residency positions at prospective hospitals; and Richard is faced with an unsettling realization when he visits Adele at Rose Ridge.	Grey's Anatomy	5	The Girl With No Name	8
11	\N	Meredith, Derek, Cristina and Arizona receive big news regarding the plane crash lawsuit, Richard avoids Catherine's romantic advances and Jackson takes on one of Mark Sloane's old patients. Meanwhile, Derek begins recovery on his hand.	Grey's Anatomy	5	The End is the Beginning is the End	9
24	\N	Grey Sloan Memorial Hospital enters crisis mode as the storm rages, resources become scarce and patients flood in by the busload. Meanwhile, one of the doctors fights for their life.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Perfect Storm	9
10	\N	Ben worries that a casual conversation with Derek could potentially cause issues for Bailey, Cristina turns to Shane as tension grows with Meredith, and April's upcoming wedding makes for an uncomfortable situation between Jackson and Stephanie. Meanwhile, Meredith plans a Thanksgiving dinner at her house.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Somebody That I Used To Know	10
10	\N	Dorie Russell is waiting for quintuplets, all 5 girls. Her husband seems more concerned than she is but she is set to bring her babies to their term of 36 weeks. All the departments are on call for the quintuplets as three of them have developped problems of different kinds.    Meredith last night's stand shows up at the hospital with priapism and they need to call Derek Sheperd for a consult which puts Meredith in a very embarassing position. Alex and Derek must take care of a patient who has a tumor inducing thirst as a side effect.   On the love side, Alex and Izzie are having some slight sexual problems, while Meredith goes on adding one night stands and Cristina is thrown off course by being "keyed."	Grey's Anatomy	5	Much Too Much	2
17	\N	Derek is still operating when he finds out about Meredith's current situation. Meredith is freaking out about her situation. Webber and Bailey are dealing with medical health issues. Cristina and Izzie have their own issues to deal with because of Meredith's situation. Addison freaks out when George tries to find a solution to Bailey's impromtu postponement. Overall, Seattle Grace Hospital is still under code black and the situation is getting worse.	Grey's Anatomy	5	As We Know It	2
27	\N	This episode is the second part of a two-hour season finale.  Richard tries to get information from Addison about a family member's condition. Callie and George have a talk about his feelings. Meredith and Derek have a talk about Doc.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Losing My Religion	2
12	\N	Cristina and Burke continue to play Uncle until one of them gives in. Derek and Meredith are fighting over the reason for their sleepless nights. Meredith tries to talk to her father about his side of the story. There's tension between Alex and Addison. There is even more tension between Addison and Mark. Addison confides in Callie. Bailey wishes she didn't have to keep a secret from one of the interns. Callie rushes to be with George after she learns that his dad needs an emergency procedure. Izzie may have found 'some good to do' with her inheritance.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Six Days (2)	3
22	\N	Meredith works on her relationship with Susan and Thatcher. Cristina has to deal with her mother and Burke's. Alex continues to tend to Jane Doe/Ava. Meredith and Derek's relationship has a problem that needs resolution quick. Addison sees her god-daughter which leads to a job offer outside of Seattle. Derek has to perform surgery. Burke has a reservation about marrying Cristina. Many new people guest star in the course of Addison's road trip to California. Addison considers moving to be closer to her old med school friends until she discovers that drama she wishes to leave behind isn't exclusive to Seattle. Her friends who she thought had it all, are divorced. A pregnant woman must discover who the father of her child is.	Grey's Anatomy	5	The Other Side of This Life (1)	3
4	\N	A face familiar to one of the year-twos shows up and dredges up issues that were never really dealt with. A teen soccer player needs counseling because of his father and surgery for an injury he sustained while playing the game. Another patient's, named Courtney, finds out that her cancer is back.	Grey's Anatomy	5	The Heart of the Matter	4
14	\N	The clinical trial continues to make progress. The anti-McSteamy club creates new initiatives but that isn't enough to stop one woman from spending time with him. Christina is affected by Burke's career developments.	Grey's Anatomy	5	The Becoming	4
7	\N	When the Chief makes an announcement that a solo surgery is up as an award, the residents are sent into a frenzy all trying to get an edge over one another. Meanwhile, Derek asks Bailey for advice after Cristina continues to interfere in his relationship with Meredith. Elsewhere, Erica uncovers a shocking connection between a resident and a patient.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Rise Up	5
15	\N	Addison, Naomi and Sam rush the ailing Archer to Seattle Grace and reunite with old friends Derek and Mark to help save his life; meanwhile, Izzie employs her fellow doctors in a medical game designed to help teach the interns, and Owen runs into a significant someone from his past	Grey's Anatomy	5	Before and After	5
19	\N	All eyes are on Derek as he is set to perform his first surgery after his breakdown; attention is also set on Izzie, whose medical condition requires her to undergo a difficult surgery; and Owen has another PTSD episode that injures Cristina and traumatizes both of them, throwing the future of their relationship into question.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Elevator Love Letter	5
5	\N	The residents of Seattle Grace and Mercy West vie for surgeries and their careers as day one of the hospital merger begins. Meanwhile, Arizona stands by an enraged Callie when her father, Mr. Torres, employs a priest to help convince her to date men, and Izzie experiences the brunt of her new surgical competition.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Invasion	6
10	\N	As Thanksgiving, Christmas and New Year's pass, Miranda gets a visit from her father, William who disapproves of her choices in life. Mark and Lexie cope with an arrival of a woman from his past. Thatcher questions the Chief's recent behavior as Meredith comes to his defense.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Holidaze	6
16	\N	When famous surgeon Dr. Harper Avery is rushed to Seattle Grace-Mercy West, the staff is surprised to discover that one of their own is related to this legend, and his unorthodox request for his surgery causes tensions t between Derek and Richard. Meanwhile Callie and Arizona try to help Teddy and Sloan move on from their pasts and find greener pastures.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Perfect Little Accident	6
1	\N	In the wake of the shooting at Seattle Grace-Mercy West, the doctors find themselves in a frenzy: Christina and Owen will be getting married, and others are trying to deal with the recent blood bath. Derek is arrested for speeding!	Grey's Anatomy	5	With You I'm Born Again	7
4	\N	Derek and Meredith visit the obstetrician and receive disturbing news; Lexie notices April and Meredith growing closer; Jackson tries to get ahead in the operating room.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Can't Fight Biology	7
14	\N	Thatcher Grey, Meredith and Lexie's father, returns to Seattle Grace with stomach pains and a new, twenty-something tattooed girlfriend, Danielle. Meanwhile, Alex clashes with the new OB, Dr. Lucy Fields, over a patient and Mark places Jackson on his service in exchange for information on Lexie.	Grey's Anatomy	5	P.Y.T. (Pretty Young Thing)	7
18	\N	A cataclysmic event leaves the doctors shaken; Callie, on the verge of a life-changing moment, starts imagining about the hospital and her friends.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Song Beneath the Song	7
5	\N	The residents try their hardest to impress surgical great Catherine Avery-who also happens to be Jackson's mother-when she arrives at Seattle Grace to perform a groundbreaking transplant surgery; Arizona and Alex find their hands tied with a confidentiality issue when a familiar patient comes into the ER; meanwhile, a love-struck Teddy throws a dinner party for the couples, and Bailey makes a decision regarding her love life	Grey's Anatomy	5	Love, Loss and Legacy	8
3	\N	King Ecbert visits the developing Viking settlement as the first harvest is sown.	Vikings	8	Warrior's Fate	3
22	\N	Meredith and Izzie take up knitting. Derek operates on Andrew, a spelling bee champ with a serious head injury. Bailey gets in on Andrew's surgery because she's worried that her coworkers won't recognize her Nazi-status now that she's a mother. Addison's patient has an unborn baby with medical issues. After Alex fails to bite his tongue when a terminal patient routinely lies to her daughter about her health he gets a lesson in bedside manners from Burke. George also begins to overstay his welcome at Burke's apartment after Callie visits him. Meredith has more confusing and uncomfortable encounters with members of her family. One of the female doctors meets a veterinarian named Finn. Izzie flirts with Denny and they play more naughty-Scrabble. Meredith, Derek, and Addison sarcastically take another small stab at their friendships.	Grey's Anatomy	5	The Name of the Game	2
5	\N	Derek learns one of Addison's secrets. Bailey talks about motherhood and depression to a mother who is set to have cancer surgery and who seems to not care about any decisions concerning the future. A resident is fiercely questioned about the death of a male patient. An ex-couple meet before lunch and get stuck - Meredith and Addison work on their case. Things get awkward when the ex-couple's daughter, Michelle, arrives at the hospital.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Oh, the Guilt	3
15	\N	A mass trauma situation, which turns out to be a ferryboat accident, challenges the whole staff of Seattle Grace Hospital. Richard finds difficulty in coping with his separation from his wife and dyes his hair "for the ladies", which becomes an internal joke between Mark, Burke and Derek. Cristina tries to tell Meredith about her upcoming marriage, but doesn't have the strength to. George promises to find a woman's son, who has been separated from her at the accident. The woman refuses to go into surgery until she is assured that her son is alive. Izzie has to take care of a man who got stuck between two cars on the ferry, but nobody helps her due to the large number of injured people. Alex rescues a pregnant woman with severe wounds on her face, and promises to take care of her. Meredith looks after a girl who has been separated from her mother after the accident, but accidentally falls into the water and drowns, with nobody but the little girl as a witness.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Walk on Water	3
24	\N	The interns finally take their first year medical exams, the biggest test of their careers, and one of them is ill-prepared. Callie grows more suspicious of George and Izzie. The doctors treat a patient named Dale. Three mountain climbers are treated. Cristina works on her vows. Adele wants Addison to keep a secret from Richard.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Testing 1-2-3	3
8	\N	There has been a bus crash and the patients are in the ER. Meredith and Derek's relationship gets more complicated when he dates a fellow doctor. Meredith's dad goes to visit her at the hospital.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Forever Young	4
1	\N	As Meredith and Derek begin to find that their "happily ever after" is anything but easy, Cristina develops a crush on a military doctor who brings in a trauma patient. Meanwhile, the Chief and his staff cope with the news that Seattle Grace is no longer considered a top-tier teaching hospital.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Dream a Little Dream of Me (1)	5
11	\N	Bailey teams with Seattle Grace's new pediatric surgeon, Dr. Arizona Robbins, to save the life of a young patient near and dear to her heart, as the admittance of a death row inmate at the hospital stirs anger in Derek and further erodes Meredith and Cristina's friendship; meanwhile, Callie and Sloan work as a team to fight their respective attractions to Sadie and Lexie, and Izzie tells Alex that she's seeing Denny.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Wish You Were Here	5
16	\N	Derek's confidence is shaken like never before as he faces off with Addison over what course is best for their dying pregnant patient; Cristina calls the abilities of a renown surgeon into question after she botches a standard procedure; and Bailey, who has decided to pursue a fellowship in Pediatrics, is appalled by the Chief's less-than-stellar recommendation letter.	Grey's Anatomy	5	An Honest Mistake	5
2	\N	Everyone is struggling after losing one of their own and are turning to any distraction they can find. Meredith and Derek seem to be consummating their marriage anywhere and everywhere, while Cristina and Owen have been instructed to abstain from sex by Dr. Wyatt.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Goodbye	6
9	\N	Owen recruits Dr. Teddy Altman, a former Iraqi veteran, as the new cardiothoracic surgeon.  Cristina questions her abilities in the E.R. and relationship with Owen.  Izzie returns to Seattle Grace with her high school mentor seeking treatment for his dementia.  Richard's responsibilities, post-merger, are taking a toll on him.	Grey's Anatomy	5	New History	6
17	\N	A patient who needs an extremely difficult surgery comes to Seattle Grace, and it's Richard and Owen who vie for the opportunity to tackle it. But the decision lies in the hands of Derek, who deems that Owen should take on the surgery, leaving Richard bitter. Meanwhile, Bailey deals with her own personal struggles when she nervously prepares for another date with Ben.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Push	6
2	\N	Meredith finally tells Derek about her pregnancy and miscarriage; during a surgery, Cristina experiences PTSD; Bailey won't let Alex operate until he has the bullet in his chest removed.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Shock to the System	7
5	\N	As part of their training, Seattle Grace's residents are put in charge; the attending surgeons compete for a million-dollar grant.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Almost Grown	7
13	\N	Derek breaks ground on his Alzheimer's clinical trial and Meredith can't help but feel left out; Bailey's attempt to take the hospital into the age of new media with live tweets from the OR does not go over well with the Chief; and Callie, Mark and Arizona must learn to navigate through the pregnancy together, which starts off with Callie driving her new obstetrician crazy.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Don't Deceive Me (Please Don't Go)	7
17	\N	Richard is desperate for Derek and Meredith to accept Adele into their Alzheimer's trial, but will Adele stand in her own way? Meanwhile Mark and Arizona have conflicting ideas of the kind of baby shower Callie wants, Teddy is freaked out when Henry has another health complication -- leaving them both a little exposed -- and the competitiveness amongst the residents for the Chief Resident position is amplified when Richard receives the green light for his diabetes clinical trial.	Grey's Anatomy	5	This is How We Do it	7
3	\N	The chief makes a decision that shocks everyone at Seattle Grace; Owen and Cristina attempt to find normalcy; April struggles in her new role; the 5th-year residents receive their first solo surgery assignments.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Take the Lead	8
11	\N	The doctors split into teams for a risky surgery involving conjoined twins; Bailey recruits Meredith to be a buffer between her and Ben when he puts pressure on moving their relationship to a more serious level; Richard teaches Alex a tough lesson in the OR; meanwhile Teddy questions Cristina about what exactly happened to Henry during his surgery.	Grey's Anatomy	5	This Magic Moment	8
4	\N	There is bitterness in the camp, Floki is angry over the alliance with Ecbert.	Vikings	8	Scarred	3
23	\N	Addison's patient is a Catholic mother of seven. Addison gets in trouble after learning that the patient's husband won't use contraceptives. Derek treats a divorce attorney who asks if Derek is in need of her services. While Izzie and George are talking about their personal lives they "overhear" part of Derek's conversation with the divorce attorney who calls herself one of Seattle's best. Alex gets in trouble with Addison yet again for not being able to keep his mouth shut when other people think he should. A legendary jazz musician refuses to see medical reason. The musician is Burke's musical hero. Finn makes Meredith breakfast.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Blues for Sister Someone	2
6	\N	Cristina gets to scrub in on a rare surgery which incites envy. Alex questions his future in plastics. George and Addison work together with Noelle. Noelle is pregnant with twins but one of them is growing slower than the other. Her fiancé has problems of his own. Derek's sister visits. A patient's wife makes things hard on the staff since she has made her husband's health her job. A woman's sexual exploits are questioned.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Let the Angels Commit	3
16	\N	Meredith is still underwater, but nobody seems to notice. Her worsening condition makes her rescuing an urgent matter. Derek finds her coat on a man she had helped, and starts looking for her and, much to his shock, the little girl Meredith took care of suggests that she is in the water. Derek saves her, but she is almost dead, due to hypothermia. Izzie has to perform brain surgery on a man stuck between cars, as he begins to experience seizures. She drills holes into his head, perforates his skull and ultimately saves his life before he is rescued and transferred to Seattle Grace Hospital. George lies to the woman whose son he had been looking for, in order to get to surgery, but still doesn't have any luck in locating him. Alex finds no hope in searching for the pregnant Jane Doe's family as she undergoes surgery. The interns find out about Meredith's situation and express their hopelessness. She wakes up in what appears to be limbo and meets her deceased acquaintances.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Drowning on Dry Land	3
1	\N	Entering their first year as residents, Meredith Grey, Cristina Yang, Izzie Stevens and Alex Karev now have interns of their own to mentor. Among the new interns are George, forced to repeat his internship after failing his exams, and Lexie Grey, Meredith's half-sister.\\n\\nAnother two new interns will be introduced in this season premiere. And they'll have their hands full when a three-car accident sends multiple casualties pouring into Seattle Grace. Some of the doctors need to deal with new stressed out interns. A young boy brings his bleeding deer to the hospital in the hope a doctor will save her.	Grey's Anatomy	5	A Change Is Gonna Come	4
10	\N	Meredith works furiously to save a paramedic trapped in an ambulance; Lexie holds the life of a patient in her hands; Derek must rely on a nurse to save a patient; Bailey struggles to balance her personal life with her work.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Crash Into Me (2)	4
2	\N	Alex is offended when Izzie talks about how great a man Alex is to Meredith. Derek is stabbed with the scalpel in the palm of his hand by Rose, while the Chief is stunned over Mercy West's increase in the number of patients, a deadly ice storm ravages Seattle.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Dream a Little Dream of Me (2)	5
12	\N	Derek's mother, Carolyn, makes a surprise visit to Seattle and meets Meredith for the first time, as Mark tries to conceal his relationship with Lexie from her as well; meanwhile, death row inmate William wishes to donate his organs to Bailey and Arizona's patient, as Owen and Cristina try to go on their first date.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Sympathy for the Devil	5
18	\N	After his fellow surgeons try and fail to bring Derek back to work, Meredith must summon the strength to convince him. Meanwhile the hospital is abuzz as Mark attempts a rare face transplant surgery. Cristina, at last awarded her first solo surgery, is more focused on the needs of her friends, and Izzie does her best to keep her medical condition a secret.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Stand By Me	5
4	\N	When Meredith and Lexie's father, Thatcher, returns to the hospital with a failed liver, it's up to Meredith to save his life. Meanwhile, Izzie empathizes with a patient riddled with tumors, as Mark, annoyed with Cristina's competitive zeal, tricks her into assisting on an unusual surgery.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Tainted Obligation	6
12	\N	After learning of Richard's drinking problem, Derek confronts him for the sake of his friend and the hospital, Izzie returns, hoping to reconcile with Alex, and tensions run high between Teddy, Cristina and Owen in the aftermath of Cristina's startling confession.	Grey's Anatomy	5	I Like You So Much Better When You're Naked	6
20	\N	Sloan returns to Mark's apartment, just as she's going into labor, and Teddy, Mark and the still-fighting Callie and Arizona are there to help with the birth and to get Mark through his grandson's pending adoption. Meanwhile Teddy sees Derek's invitation to illustrious cardiothoracic surgeon Tom Evans' as a threat to her future employment at the hospital, and the team work on a crab boat captain who has been stabbed with a giant shark hook.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Hook, Line and Sinner	6
6	\N	A documentary crew visits the hospital six months after the shooting to document the road to recovery for doctors and patients; Meredith helps Cristina put on a brave face for the cameras.	Grey's Anatomy	5	These Arms of Mine	7
19	\N	Everyone pulls together to help Callie and baby Sofia on their painstaking journeys to recovery in hopes of allowing mother and baby to finally meet; the sudden death of a clinical trial patient has Derek proceeding with more caution while Meredith makes a calculated and risky move; Alex treats a cranky old rich woman dying of cancer and gets an idea for a grandiose endeavor that is sure to get him the Chief Resident spot; and Teddy is pleasantly surprised by the return of a familiar face.	Grey's Anatomy	5	It's a Long Way Back	7
6	\N	After being blackballed by most of the surgeons, Meredith uses Lexie to spark Derek's interest in her patient's rare brain tumor case and, in secret, gives guidance to April with Bailey's clinical trial; Callie's wish for Arizona and Mark to form a friendship comes to fruition and she realizes it's more irritating than helpful; Alex and Teddy research alternative surgeries for a very superficial patient; and Callie and Cristina struggle with a very difficult spinal surgery.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Poker Face	8
15	\N	Amelia arrives at Seattle Grace to beg Derek to help with the gliosarcoma case; Cristina and Owen have heated arguments during marriage counseling; Alex realizes he needs to improve his people skills in order to be a good doctor.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Have You Seen Me Lately?	8
2	\N	In this flashback episode, return to the site of the plane crash and watch as each doctor tries to cope with the heartache and injuries caused by the crash. Meanwhile, back at Seattle Grace, everyone struggles to find a bit of normalcy amidst the chaos.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Remember The Time	9
7	\N	Ragnar and King Horik clash over how to dispense justice to Jarl Borg; King Aelle in Wessex; Ecbert has an eye on a new alliance.	Vikings	8	Blood Eagle	2
9	\N	A traumatic car accident fills the ER. Izzie pushes the boundaries of her probation. Cristina has a crisis of conscience about her deceptive teamwork with Burke.	Grey's Anatomy	5	From a Whisper to a Scream	3
19	\N	In the aftermath of Izzie's affair with George, he doesn't seem to remember anything. Callie lets him know that they will be having dinner with her father, but George does not make a good impression, being hung over after last night's events. Alex helps Jane Doe choose how her face will look like after Mark Sloan performs reconstructive surgery on her. He also gives her a new perspective on how the world will see her from then on. The hospital board begins interviewing the candidates for the Chief's position, and Colin Marlow intimidates everyone with his ten-year plan. However, after taking advice from Bailey, Mark seems to have convinced the board that he is appropriate for the job, despite continuous efforts from Derek, Burke and Addison, whose careers in the hospital outlast his. Izzie seeks advice from Addison about her affair, telling her sleeping with George felt right, despite him being married. Mark takes Meredith as his intern for the day in order to impress the Chief, something that Derek doesn't approve of, feeling that Mark has become manipulative.	Grey's Anatomy	5	My Favorite Mistake	3
5	\N	It's Halloween at Seattle Grace! There may be jokes, pranks, and/or scare tactics. Some of the women form a club based on an experience they all share. A man volunteers for what most of the doctors believe is an unnecessary surgery. One of the patients is in the hospital because they tried to carve a pumpkin in an unconventional manner.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Haunt You Every Day	4
15	\N	Dr. Wyatt refuses to let Meredith give up on therapy. Alex learns something else about Rebecca. The Chief wants Erica to perform a daring surgery. Christina continues to act strange.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Losing My Mind	4
8	\N	One of Meredith's oldest friends, Sadie, becomes an intern at Seattle Grace, but Mer's friends are less-than-welcoming to her.	Grey's Anatomy	5	These Ties That Bind	5
22	\N	As Meredith, Derek and all of their friends prepare for the big wedding, a group of college students, injured in a car crash as they were heading to their graduation ceremony, is admitted to the ER. Meanwhile, Izzie fears the worst when she begins experiencing familiar symptoms.	Grey's Anatomy	5	What a Difference a Day Makes	5
8	\N	A generous 25 million donation is offered to Seattle Grace by the parents of Arizonas 10-year-old patient, she finds herself in a conflict of interest when his condition worsens. Cristina tests her boundaries with Owen at the hospital. Alex is left with all of Izzies hospital bills to contend with.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Invest In Love	6
21	\N	Bailey preps the team with mandatory sensitivity training prior to admitting a 700-pound patient with compounded medical issues, and the case proves to be challenging in every sense of the word. Meanwhile Derek has to come face to face with a former patient's husband in a wrongful death deposition, and spending time with a heart patient's daughter opens up some old wounds for Cristina.	Grey's Anatomy	5	How Insensitive	6
8	\N	A team of doctors tries to save the life of a political figure from the Middle East; Cristina decides to decorate her new place and throw a housewarming party; Alex shows up late to his first day of rounds with the new pediatrics attending.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Something's Gotta Give	7
16	\N	Meredith must choose between her fertility treatments and her eyesight when she begins having trouble seeing, Mark makes it clear to Callie and Arizona that he takes his role as father-to-be very seriously, and April discovers there's more to Dr. Stark than first appears.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Not Responsible	7
9	\N	Teddy puts her husband’s life in the hands of her peers when Henry is sent to the OR for surgery and she’s called away on another case; Meredith and Derek receive the long-awaited news about Zola; Callie and Jackson come under fire when their patient experiences post-surgery complications; and Meredith and Alex are involved in a life-threatening situation when they travel to a neighboring hospital to tend to a sick newborn, on Grey’s Anatomy	Grey's Anatomy	5	Dark Was the Night	8
22	\N	The residents agonize over their oral boards, reliving every answer they gave during their exams; Arizona's close childhood friend comes to Seattle Grace for medical help; the doctors work on a patient who is missing one third of his skull; and Julia asks Mark to start a family with her. Meanwhile Catherine tells Richard that one of his residents has failed.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Let the Bad Times Roll	8
10	\N	Bailey puts her wedding day on hold and continues her efforts to save Adele's life, Cristina and Owen remain undecided about their pending divorce, while Arizona and Callie try to get their spark back. Meanwhile, the hospital becomes inundated with a group of bikers after a horrible accident.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Things We Said Today	9
1	\N	The Grey Sloan Memorial Hospital doctors are faced with the devastation left by the storm. A giant mudslide in Seattle injures a group of first responders and citizens, causing the already short handed ER to spring into action. Meanwhile, Meredith is faced with a tough decision that will affect the life of a loved one, Callie is rocked by the reality of Arizona’s infidelity, and Richard’s life is in extreme danger.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Seal Our Fate	10
11	\N	April’s sisters arrive to help celebrate April’s upcoming nuptials and quickly get on her nerves. Matthew and Jackson are forced to work together when they witness a terrible accident, Callie and Arizona work hard to reestablish their relationship and Cristina is pressured to live stream an upcoming surgery. Meanwhile, a familiar face returns to the hospital.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Man on the Moon	10
20	\N	Cristina enlists Meredith to help her prepare an acceptance speech for her possible Harper Avery win and while Owen offers to attend the ceremony with her, she insists on going alone. Meanwhile, Derek feels overwhelmed between his responsibilities at home and at the hospital. April and Jackson come to a disagreement on children and religion, and Callie and Arizona try to reconnect in their marriage.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Go It Alone	10
6	\N	Owen becomes invested in a patient when he realizes she may have served in the military, April’s mother pays her daughter a visit and bonds with Jackson, and Derek plans a family dinner. Meanwhile, a patient’s diagnosis causes Bailey to reconsider her own health issues and Dr. Herman drops a bombshell on Arizona	Grey's Anatomy	5	Don't Let's Start	11
16	\N	A patient's condition sparks a conversation between Richard and Maggie about Alzheimer's disease; April and Jackson struggle to return to their normal lives and Arizona is faced with the reality that Callie is moving on. Meanwhile, Meredith reveals her biggest fears about Derek.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Don't Dream It's Over	11
15	\N	Meredith tries to learn more about Marie Cerone's history with her mother. Meanwhile, Jo is applying for fellowships around the country and it throws Alex for a loop; and Tom Koracick helps April acknowledge her crisis of faith.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Old Scars, Future Hearts	14
13	\N	After the Chief announces his retirement, rumors begin to circulate on his departure and successor. Mark is determined to leave Seattle for good but Meredith accidentally has him stay after letting him know of the open Chief position. Derek is angry at Meredith for causing Mark to stay in Seattle, but soon realizes that she is not the reason he is really angry. The attending physicians at Seattle Grace Hospital fight to get Richard's attention, but he expresses his disappointment. He also displays his lack of support in Bailey's plan to create a free medical clinic, but she ultimately goes through with her plan when Izzie offers to spend her entire 8.7 million dollar inheritance on the project. George, devastated after his father's death, uses sex to overcome his grief, and eventually proposes to Callie. Cristina and Burke still don't speak to each other, but he breaks the agreement when he proposes to her. Richard endeavors to reunite with his wife, Adele, and decides to retire, only to come home and find his wife with another man.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Great Expectations	3
23	\N	Meredith works on her relationship with Susan and Thatcher. Cristina has to deal with her mother and Burke's. Alex continues to tend to Jane Doe/Ava. Meredith and Derek's relationship has a problem that needs resolution quick. Addison sees her god-daughter which leads to a job offer outside of Seattle. Derek has to perform surgery. Burke has a reservation about marrying Cristina. Many new people guest star in the course of Addison's road trip to California. Addison considers moving to be closer to her old med school friends until she discovers that drama she wishes to leave behind isn't exclusive to Seattle. Her friends who she thought had it all, are divorced. A pregnant woman must discover who the father of her child is.	Grey's Anatomy	5	The Other Side of This Life (2)	3
9	\N	An ambulance crash endangers the lives of the paramedics involved, as Meredith and the Chief work on-site to save them, Bailey treats a patient who refuses her help, and Ava returns for Alex and meets his other girlfriend in the process.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Crash Into Me (1)	4
5	\N	Bailey heads up a "domino procedure" in which each surgery hinges on the one preceding it. Meanwhile, Derek gets sole credit for the brain-tumor study he did with Meredith; Lexie tries to get George to notice her romantically; and Sloan counsels a desperate Callie in the ways of love.	Grey's Anatomy	5	There's No 'I' in Team	5
23	\N	In the first part of the two hour season finale, Izzie spends time with a fellow cancer patient and contemplates whether or not to undergo a risky surgery, as Mark is ready to take his relationship with Lexie to the next level and a patient makes Owen reassess his place at Seattle Grace.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Here's to Future Days	5
13	\N	As Derek begins his role as interim chief, he faces a potential lawsuit when Bailey and Meredith's patient awakens from anesthesia mid-surgery. Meanwhile, Teddy refuses to place Cristina on her service, as Arizona tests Alex out in Pediatrics, and Mark refuses to speak to a heartbroken Lexie.	Grey's Anatomy	5	State of Love and Trust	6
23	\N	Seattle Grace Hospital is hit with a crisis like no other in its' history.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Sanctuary	6
11	\N	A gunman opens fire at a local college, sending mass casualties to the hospital; Arizona's return is not warmly received.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Disarm	7
1	\N	The fifth-year residents return for the first day of a year that will make or break their careers: Meredith faces the consequences of tampering with Derek's clinical trial and is terminated at the hospital; April tries to step up to the plate as Chief Resident in the wake of a giant sinkhole in the middle of Seattle; and Cristina and Owen are still at odds over their drastically different feelings for their unborn child.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Free Falling	8
10	\N	A severe car crash involving an entire family results in an all-hands-on situation in the ER, as the eldest daughter is left to make the toughest decision of her life. Meanwhile Teddy, still in the dark about Henry's death, calls upon Cristina to help with her patient in the O.R., and Lexie finds herself working alongside Mark's new girlfriend, Julia, during an eye surgery.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Suddenly	8
18	\N	A lion breaks loose in Seattle, leaving a couple's lives and relationship at risk; Lexie overhears Mark's discussion about moving in with Julia; Teddy begins to take steps towards coming to terms with Henry's death; Callie grills Arizona on her past lovers; and Alex requests to be taken off Morgan's preemie case when she becomes too dependent on him. Meanwhile, Meredith tries to be a support for Cristina as the tension between her and Owen hits a boiling point.	Grey's Anatomy	5	The Lion Sleeps Tonight	8
4	\N	Aware that Derek might never operate again, Meredith stops talking about the surgeries she's performing. Meanwhile, Richard calls on Dr. Catherine Avery to help him perform a complicated procedure, as things continue to heat up between Jackson and April; and Arizona's struggle to accept her fate forces Callie and Alex to face their guilt.	Grey's Anatomy	5	I Saw Her Standing There	9
19	\N	A gas tanker explodes on a Seattle highway, causing multiple injuries, including paramedic Matthew. Meredith and Jo help a frantic mother whose child is suffering from a mysterious illness. Owen bonds with a young boy whose parents are in critical condition. Meanwhile true colors are revealed when Alex is forced to work with Jo's boyfriend on an ailing patient.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Can't Fight This Feeling	9
23	\N	The doctors of Grey Sloan Memorial Hospital prepare for a super storm heading towards Seattle. Owen's desire to be a parent gets stronger as he becomes closer to Ethan. One wrong move puts the lives of Meredith and her baby in jeopardy. Meanwhile, Jo looks to Alex for help in a moment of crisis, and one doctor gets the shock of her life.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Readiness is All	9
9	\N	When an unexpected malpractice suit turns Callie's world upside down, her supportive father  arrives and shares an interesting secret with her. Meanwhile, through flashbacks, we learn some surprising details about Callie and Arizona's marriage.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Sorry Seems to Be the Hardest Word	10
18	\N	The hospital gets inundated with flu infected patients, which causes the doctors to slowly fall ill one by one. Derek must fight off the sickness as he prepares to give a speech on brain mapping and the residents place bets on who will fall ill first. Meanwhile, a new doctor at the hospital gives Alex a glimpse into an alternate form of medical practice.	Grey's Anatomy	5	You Be Illin'	10
1	\N	With Cristina gone, a new doctor, Maggie Pierce, making the rounds and Derek wanting to move to Washington DC, Meredith struggles to regain a sense of normalcy both at home and in the hospital. Meanwhile, Callie and Arizona come to a decision about surrogacy, Amelia overhears a big secret, Bailey realizes she will have to fight Alex for Cristina’s board seat and a freak accident causes two teenagers to be caught in a very compromising position.	Grey's Anatomy	5	I Must Have Lost It on the Wind	11
10	\N	Ragnar and King Horik return to Kattegat; Ragnar places his trust in those who have stood by him.	Vikings	8	The Lord's Prayer	2
25	\N	The mountain climbers lie about the axe in their friend's head, telling Derek that it accidentally got there. During surgery, he and George discover that it was deliberately put there, and one of the climbers admit that he was trying to "put him out of his misery". Adele is saved after Richard finds her lying in the bathroom and is stabilized, but soon suffers a miscarriage. Richard learns Adele was actually pregnant with his son, not someone she had one night stand with. Bailey is disappointed to see that Callie is the new Chief Resident and begins to question her abilities as a surgeon. Richard chooses Derek as Chief of Surgery, but he refuses, telling him that he isn't done doing what he does best. Cristina and Burke's wedding day arrives, but Cristina won't stay out of the hospital. However, Cristina's nervousness results in Burke's realizing that he does not love the real Cristina and leaves her. Meredith and Derek are uncertain about their future and despite Derek admitting that she is the love of his life, they call their relationship over.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Didn't We Almost Have It All?	3
11	\N	George has a surprise visitor. Bailey's family is falling apart. Derek sorts through what kissing Rose means. Meredith discovers something that doesn't inspire hope or happiness in her. Alex treats a faith healer.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Lay Your Hands on Me	4
3	\N	When the plumbing springs a leak, chaos breaks out at Seattle Grace as the Chief tries to put in place new teaching methods. Meanwhile, George takes his residency exam; and Derek attempts to get Meredith's roommates to move out, much to their surprise.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Here Comes the Flood	5
13	\N	Bailey grows desperate as a patient's condition becomes more and more dire. Everyone in the hospital is stepping up to try to find the boy a new organ donor, including Meredith, who considers a death row patient's wish to die before execution. Meanwhile, an injury leaves Mark in a compromising position in the OR and Cristina awkwardly avoids Owen.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Stairway to Heaven	5
20	\N	As she endures aggressive treatment for her cancer, Izzie throws herself into planning Derek and Meredith's wedding.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Sweet Surrender	5
6	\N	After a burn victim unexpectedly dies in the midst of a chaotic ER, the Chief and board member Jennings interrogate the residents to find the culprit, as all the Mercy West and Seattle Grace resident defends their actions in an effort to save their jobs.	Grey's Anatomy	5	I Saw What I Saw	6
14	\N	It's Valentine's Day, and the doctors must treat dozens of injured people after the roof collapses at a popular romantic restaurant; Derek tries to manage his busy schedule as Chief of Surgery; Meredith wrestles with her new duties as the Chief's wife; and Mark and Callie team up to convince Sloan to do the right thing for her baby.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Valentine's Day Massacre	6
24	\N	Cristina and Meredith's surgical skills are put to the ultimate test.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Death and All His Friends	6
15	\N	Meredith, looking to prove she is Chief Resident material, learns that anything and everything can happen in an hour's time when she steps up to run the ER for a night; meanwhile, Bailey sneaks off with Eli and gets into a little mischief, and everyone is surprised when the Chief's wife, Adele, shows up as one of the ER patients.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Golden Hour	7
22	\N	News of Meredith's dishonesty in the clinical trial comes to light, leading to unanticipated consequences for her and others; Cristina finds herself in a compromising situation, which forces her to decide between her career and her relationship; Owen posts his decision for Chief Resident, and Teddy makes a surprising choice regarding her love life -- and her future.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Unaccompanied Minor	7
13	\N	As Meredith puts Zola to bed and falls asleep, she begins to wonder -- what if her mother had never had Alzheimer's and she'd had loving, supportive parents? The reverberations of a happy Meredith Grey change the world of Seattle Grace as we know it. What if she had never met Derek in that bar and he had never separated from Addison? What if Callie and Owen had become a couple long before she met Arizona? And what if Bailey never evolved from the meek intern she once was?	Grey's Anatomy	5	If/Then	8
19	\N	A devastated Cristina presses Owen to confess the intimate details of his affair; Mark takes his new authority very seriously when he steps in as chief for the day and butts heads with Richard over a patient's liver transplant; and Callie deems Meredith ready for the boards, while the rest of the residents continue to stress about the exam. Meanwhile, Callie, Arizona and Bailey plan a much needed ladies night for Teddy.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Support System	8
9	\N	As the rest of the doctors prepare for Bailey's wedding, Richard helps her through a bout of pre-wedding jitters. Meanwhile, Lizzie butts heads with Meredith, and Callie and Jackson try to convince Derek to participate in a risky surgery that could fix his hand.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Run, Baby, Run	9
18	\N	As the hospital continues to make positive changes under the new management, the doctors begin to realize that owning a hospital comes with its own set of problems and responsibilities. Meanwhile, Meredith worries about the wellbeing of her unborn baby, Callie and Arizona try to get the spark back in their relationship, and Alex gives Jo‘s new boyfriend a run for his money.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Idle Hands	9
8	\N	A betrayal intensifies the issues between Cristina and Meredith; Matthew and April make a decision about their relationship; Bailey faces difficulties with Ben's return.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Two Against One	10
16	\N	It's Richard's birthday and Bailey invites him to scrub in on the case of a lifetime. Meredith hires a research assistant to help with her portal vein project. A scorned Callie gives Derek quite the shock. Meanwhile, Shane helps screen candidates for Cristina's clinical trial and meets a young expectant mother who needs his help.	Grey's Anatomy	5	We Gotta Get Out of This Place	10
3	\N	Owen tries to get Callie to help Veterans Hospital patients with the robotic limb lab. Alex and Meredith's friendship makes Jo jealous. Alex and Bailey prepare to go in front of the board.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Got to Be Real	11
12	\N	Maggie gets upset when Meredith dodges her questions about DC; Bailey and Ben become concerned about Ben’s brother after he is admitted to the hospital, and Dr. Herman starts to warm up to Arizona. Meanwhile, Richard feels manipulated by Catherine.	Grey's Anatomy	5	The Great Pretender	11
22	\N	We see how Meredith and the doctors cope after they learn the news of Derek's death. Meanwhile, April makes a shocking decision that Jackson cannot understand, and Bailey and Ben argue over their future.	Grey's Anatomy	5	She's Leaving Home	11
8	\N	Midseason Finale -  As the rumor mill around the hospital continues to spiral out of control, Grey Sloan Memorial is flooded with injured firefighters from a nearby wildfire. Maggie struggles to keep things with Andrew professional at work; meanwhile, Jo questions Alex’s priorities.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Things We Lost in the Fire	12
3	\N	The doctors meet the world's oldest intern. Marcy brings in her son Henry because she finds his change in behavior suspicious. A patient named Connie may lose her vocal chords unless Mark and Richard can perform a radical new surgery. George impresses the other interns at work but at home he is trying to deal with his guilt about having sex with Izzie.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Let the Truth Sting	4
13	\N	Addison visits Seattle Grace because they need skills that only she has. Rebecca/Ava returns with news for Alex. Meredith and Derek's clinical trial experiences one or two developments.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Piece of My Heart	4
6	\N	The chief gives Bailey new power and responsibility. He also gives her a very difficult surgical assignment: remove a girl's inoperable tumor. Meanwhile, new trauma chief Owen (Kevin McKidd) challenges the attendings' methods and the residents' skills.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Life During Wartime	5
17	\N	Derek decides to quit after learning that more of his patients have died than survived; Izzie's interns make an unsettling discovery about "Patient X."	Grey's Anatomy	5	I Will Follow You Into the Dark	5
3	\N	Several weeks after her near-death experience, a recovering Izzie returns to work. Meanwhile, nervous that there will be layoffs in the hospital in the wake of an announcement from the Chief, the Seattle Grace residents compete to survive the cuts, including Cristina, who attempts to work alongside Arizona in pediatrics. And Bailey and Alex's patient's already complex case is further complicated by her schizophrenic son.	Grey's Anatomy	5	I Always Feel Like Somebody's Watchin' Me	6
11	\N	Mark flies Addison to Seattle to help with a difficult procedure on his pregnant daughter, Sloan, Owen questions Teddy's motives when she assigns Cristina the lead on a complicated surgery, and Derek's suspicions are raised when the Chief recruits Meredith to assist with a high profile operation on.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Blink	6
18	\N	When Teddy's patient seeks to end treatment and her life, she turns to Hunt for help. The situation triggers Hunt's memories of his life at war and his past relationship with Teddy. Meanwhile, Callie and Arizona have a difference in opinion on what their future holds, and Richard tries to adjust to his role as a surgeon.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Suicide is Painless	6
3	\N	Issues surface when Derek's estranged sister, Amelia (Caterina Scorsone), visits unexpectedly; Meredith and Derek continue to try to ease Cristina back into surgery.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Superfreak	7
10	\N	Derek takes Cristina out on a fishing trip; Teddy tries to help a patient who lacks the proper insurance to seek medical treatment.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Adrift and at Peace	7
4	\N	A stampede at a comic book convention leads to an influx of colorful characters in the ER; Mark continues to make life difficult for Jackson; Ben returns and realizes Bailey has moved on.	Grey's Anatomy	5	What is it About Men?	8
16	\N	As Adele's condition continues to deteriorate, Richard considers altering their living situation; an explosion at a local coffee shop results in a busy day in the ER for the doctors; Callie takes Meredith under her wing by helping her study for her boards; Lexie joins Arizona and Alex in peds, as they continue to care for intern Morgan's premature son; and when Jackson snaps at a patient, Mark encourages him to find ways to relieve his stress. Meanwhile, Cristina lets her suspicions get the best of her.	Grey's Anatomy	5	If Only You Were Lonely	8
23	\N	The residents determine their future as they make their final decisions regarding post residency positions; Mark admits to Derek that he is torn between his love for Lexie and the fact that Julia can give him everything he's ever wanted; Ben plans something extra special for Bailey, but she is preoccupied with her work; and Arizona encourages her childhood friend, Nick, to have surgery. Meanwhile a couple on their third honeymoon come to the hospital complaining of mysterious symptoms.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Migration	8
12	\N	The Seattle Grace doctors are on edge when a new medical professional enters the hospital; Arizona struggles with the emotional and physical pain of a phantom limb; and while battling pregnancy hormones, an overly-emotional Meredith is confronted with her worst fear.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Walking on a Dream	9
2	\N	Callie makes a decision about her relationship; the doctors receive devastating news.	Grey's Anatomy	5	I Want You With Me	10
12	\N	On the day of April's wedding, the Grey Sloan Memorial doctors are all preoccupied with their own drama. Meredith and Cristina continue to argue about their research and careers, Bailey comes clean to Ben about her feelings regarding him moving back to Seattle, and Shane puts himself in a risky situation. Meanwhile, Derek gets a phone call that will change his life.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Get Up, Stand Up	10
21	\N	Jackson is given the daunting task of delivering disappointing news to the doctors. Meanwhile, Derek's sister Amelia drops by for a surprise visit, Richard surprises Catherine in Boston and when Bailey gets frustrated by the slow pace of her research, she makes a risky decision.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Change of Heart	10
7	\N	Information about Amelia's past emerges and causes problems for her at the hospital.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Could We Start Again, Please?	11
17	\N	Meredith, rattled by the latest events, tries to figure out what to do about Derek. Meanwhile, Owen is shocked when his mother is admitted to the hospital.	Grey's Anatomy	5	With or Without You	11
5	\N	In the midst of the sisters’ dinner party, Maggie ditches her cooking duties to rush to the hospital. Meanwhile, April steps in to help cook as an attempt to avoid Jackson, and Arizona nervously waits to find out more about Callie’s new girlfriend.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Guess Who's Coming to Dinner?	12
13	\N	Meredith, Bailey, Jackson, Callie and Jo travel to a military hospital to perform an extraordinary and extremely risky surgery on a veteran with an advanced tumor. Meanwhile back at Grey Sloan, Andrew is tired of being Maggie’s worst kept secret; Ben makes an impulsive surgical decision; and a team of cheerleaders wreak havoc in the ER.	Grey's Anatomy	5	All Eyez on Me	12
24	\N	Meredith and Maggie support Amelia on an important day; Jo reveals that she has been keeping secrets from Alex while Arizona and Callie deal with the impact of their custody arrangement. Meanwhile, Ben leaps into action to help a friend.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Family Affair	12
8	\N	A difficult surgery brings back pivotal memories for Meredith, Richard, Owen and Stephanie, as they work together to save a life.	Grey's Anatomy	5	The Room Where It Happens	13
13	\N	The residents are excited for Eliza’s next phase of teaching, but they spend the day caught between the warring attendings. Meanwhile, April has a challenging first day in her new role at the hospital.	Grey's Anatomy	5	It Only Gets Much Worse	13
1	\N	Ragnar and Lagertha's fleets depart Kattegat once more for Wessex but this time they bring settlers.	Vikings	8	Mercenary	3
12	\N	Arizona tries to reconcile with Callie, who has big news to share; Teddy faces an important decision; the residents receive new interns; the Chief makes an announcement.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Start Me Up	7
2	\N	News of Meredith and Derek's unsteady relationship raises a red flag for Zola's adoption counselor; Alex quickly realizes that he has become the outcast of the group after ratting out Meredith; and Cristina makes a tough decision regarding her unexpected pregnancy. Also, Chief Webber brings Henry in for a last minute surgery, alarming Teddy.\\n\\nThis is an historic episode that finally crosses a long-standing barrier.	Grey's Anatomy	5	She's Gone	8
8	\N	The doctors become nostalgic when George O'Malley's mother, Louise, returns to Seattle Grace for medical help after a botched surgery at a neighboring hospital; the residents are inspired by a medical miracle when they witness a harvested heart that continues to beat outside the body; a new pediatric fellow excites Arizona and makes Alex feel threatened; Jackson lets his suspicions about Mark and Lexie interfere with his work; and Henry and Teddy have their first marital fight when he expresses interest in pursuing medical school	Grey's Anatomy	5	Heart-Shaped Box	8
21	\N	After eight years of practice, the residents head to San Francisco for their oral boards; sparks fly between Catherine and Richard when they bump into each other at the hotel; Bailey intervenes after Owen and Teddy get into a heated argument about their young car crash patient; and Mark tries to recruit Lexie for one of his cases. Meanwhile, Alex feels guilty for being away from the hospital when Tommy's health begins to fail.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Moment of Truth	8
8	\N	The new batch of interns find themselves involved in all the drama at Seattle Grace: Meredith asks Heather to go above and beyond to help fix Derek's hand; Cristina starts a healthy competition between Stephanie and Leah, which inadvertently leads to a medical emergency for Cristina's patient; Alex sees Jo in a new light as they work to save a baby's life, and April teaches Shane a valuable lesson during "lumps and bumps" duty.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Love Turns You Upside Down	9
17	\N	The discord and chaos created by the hospital's new management team causes one physician to question his future at Seattle Grace. Meanwhile, the doctors and the interns must juggle several transplant surgeries at once, each coming with its own set of obstacles.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Transplant Wasteland	9
7	\N	Costumed patients create a challenge for the doctors; Derek and Ben work on a new surgical technique; Richard asks a resident to perform his next surgery, angering Bailey.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Thriller	10
15	\N	Arizona has a bad day which escalates when she advises one of Callie's patients on a potential double amputation. Derek goes back on a promise to Callie, and Jo and Stephanie come across an abandoned baby outside the hospital. Meanwhile, the doctors deal with the repercussions of the non-fraternization rule, which include meetings with HR and one doctor's suspension.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Throwing it All Away	10
2	\N	Maggie tries to make a good impression but finds herself in unfortunate situations; Richard keeps hiding his secret.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Puzzle With a Piece Missing	11
11	\N	After several discussions with Dr. Herman, April and Jackson must face their situation head on and make a difficult decision regarding their unborn child. Catherine arrives in Seattle and bumps into Richard at the hospital. Meanwhile, Meredith tries to find someone to take care of the kids so she can visit Derek for the weekend, and Amelia shows Stephanie some tough love when they work together on a case	Grey's Anatomy	5	All I Could Do Was Cry	11
21	\N	Derek witnesses a horrible car accident and springs into action to save lives.	Grey's Anatomy	5	How to Save a Life	11
7	\N	The team of doctors work on a high stakes case of a long time patient, adding additional pressure to an already tense environment. Meanwhile, Bailey wants Ben to kick out their new roommate, and Arizona is eager to get back into the dating world with a new wingman.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Something Against You	12
20	\N	The doctors work frantically to save a young boy who was accidentally shot. Meanwhile, Arizona is upset when Callie tries to make an important decision about Sofia’s future without consulting her	Grey's Anatomy	5	Trigger Happy	12
6	\N	A familiar face returns to Grey Sloan, throwing many of the doctors for a loop. With Catherine putting on the pressure, Bailey has to make a decision about Alex while a tough ER case makes Amelia’s bad day even worse.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Roar	13
12	\N	Maggie gets a surprise visit from her mother at the hospital. Bailey has to make a difficult decision when one of the attendings refuses to work with Eliza, and Stephanie gets caught up in Owen and Amelia’s personal drama.	Grey's Anatomy	5	None of Your Business	13
23	\N	The doctors of Grey Sloan encounter a difficult case involving a dangerous patient. Meanwhile, Owen receives life-changing news that pushes Amelia to step up to support him, and Alex attends a medical conference after making a shocking discovery.	Grey's Anatomy	5	True Colors	13
9	\N	Jo finally faces her estranged, abusive husband Paul Stadler, while Grey Sloan continues to work with the FBI after a hacker has compromised the hospital’s computer system.	Grey's Anatomy	5	1-800-799-7233	14
11	\N	The stress of managing the hospital and coming to terms with Ben’s decision to become a Seattle firefighter pushes Bailey to her limits.	Grey's Anatomy	5	(Don't Fear) the Reaper	14
20	\N	During presentations on Grey Sloan Surgical Innovation Prototypes Day, Arizona shares cookies from an appreciative patient that, unbeknownst to her, contain a special ingredient. Meanwhile, Catherine reveals shocking details to Jackson about his grandfather's past; and Jo steps in mid-operation on a major surgery.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Judgement Day	14
23	\N	One of Grey Sloan Memorial’s own is seriously injured, making the team reflect on what is truly important to them. Meanwhile, Nicole Herman pays a visit to Grey Sloan and talks to Arizona about an exciting opportunity.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Cold as Ice	14
7	\N	Catherine is in Los Angeles getting the new foundation ready and summons Meredith and Koracick to visit for a highly confidential consult. Meanwhile, one of the nurses is 28 weeks pregnant and collapses at the hospital while talking to Richard.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Anybody Have a Map?	15
9	\N	When the power goes out at Grey Sloan, the doctors are left scrambling to save their patients' lives; Owen, Amelia and Teddy confront their complicated situation.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Shelter From the Storm	15
17	\N	Ties are strained as Andrew and Carina confront an unforgiving family history. Meanwhile, Teddy and Owen work together on a married couple who is expecting, and Amelia attends a conference for alternative pain relief.	Grey's Anatomy	5	And Dream of Sheep	15
2	\N	Lagertha and Athelstan help to set up the Viking settlement. A mysterious wanderer turns up.	Vikings	8	The Wanderer	3
14	\N	In the spirit of Valentine's Day, Meredith and Derek try to have a night to themselves when Lexie offers to watch Zola; Callie hands babysitting duties over to Mark so that she can surprise Arizona with a romantic evening; and Ben proves to Bailey that he knows her better than she thinks. Meanwhile, the ER fills with romantics, including a 10-year-old girl who has an allergic reaction to chocolates from her valentine and a man who is hit by a car while chasing down his frustrated girlfriend.	Grey's Anatomy	5	All You Need is Love	8
1	\N	The doctors of Seattle Grace are faced with the aftermath of last season's plane crash. As they try to move on with their lives, they must learn to adapt to the changes, cope with their losses and move forward with their relationships and careers.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Going Going Gone	9
7	\N	Cristina and Owen continue to figure out their relationship amidst the pending lawsuit; and Bailey argues with Ben over plans for their upcoming nuptials. Meanwhile, Callie recruits Jackson to help find a solution to Derek's hand, but he is preoccupied by a shocking situation with April.	Grey's Anatomy	5	I Was Made for Lovin' You	9
16	\N	As word of Seattle Grace's financial trouble spreads, Catherine encourages Jackson to move to Boston, and the interns fear they might lose their jobs. Meanwhile, the doctors meet with a potential investor in a last-ditch effort to save the hospital, and Alex impresses Jo while caring for a patient.	Grey's Anatomy	5	This is Why We Fight	9
22	\N	The doctors reach out to Bailey but she continues to shut everyone out; after an incident with Ethan's grandmother, Owen fears the child could end up in foster care. A new craniofacial specialist arrives at Grey Sloan Memorial Hospital to work on a young patient. Meanwhile, a magician's assistant is rushed into the ER after a magic trick goes terribly wrong.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Do You Believe in Magic?	9
6	\N	Derek and Callie work on a brain mapping project, Richard encourages the interns to use his physical condition as a learning tool and after a discussion with Callie, Meredith considers continuing her mother’s research. Meanwhile, Shane continues to feel guilty about Heather’s death.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Map of You	10
19	\N	Cristina won't let herself get excited when she is nominated for a Harper Avery award; Alex thinks about making a change; Callie and Derek work with a machine that recognizes emotions.	Grey's Anatomy	5	I'm Winning	10
5	\N	Callie and Arizona examine their marital problems and what's contributed to them. Meanwhile, Callie devotes herself to the veterans' project, Arizona strives to impress Dr. Herman, and Richard seeks guidance from Bailey.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Bend and Break	11
15	\N	An earthquake shakes the ground at Grey Sloan Memorial Hospital, trapping Maggie in an elevator and threatening Meredith’s long streak of successful surgeries. Meanwhile, Owen gives medical advice to a child over the phone and Ben confides in Jackson.	Grey's Anatomy	5	I Feel the Earth Move	11
1	\N	The doctors from Grey Sloan Memorial Hospital spring into action to save  the lives of two girls with a powerful story. Meanwhile, Meredith tries  to cope with the fact that Amelia is now living with her and Jackson  prepares for April's return back to Seattle.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Sledgehammer	12
11	\N	The evolution of April and Jackson’s relationship is revealed through a series of flashbacks dating back to when they first met. Simultaneously, we follow the years-long progress of one of Jackson’s patients.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Unbreak My Heart	12
21	\N	Stephanie’s relationship with Kyle becomes complicated. Meanwhile, Meredith encourages Amelia and Owen to take a chance and choose to be a real couple. Arizona and Callie are at odds and put their friends in the middle of an uncomfortable situation.	Grey's Anatomy	5	You're Gonna Need Someone on Your Side	12
7	\N	The arrival of a new consultant puts all of the doctors on edge, especially once she starts stepping on toes in the OR. Amelia and Owen bring their personal problems into the hospital, while April explores some uncharted territory.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Why Try to Change Me Now	13
14	\N	Alex returns to the hospital and discovers a lot has changed since he left. Meanwhile, Jo has to make a difficult decision on a case, and Arizona tries to distance herself from Eliza.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Back Where You Belong	13
5	\N	In a flashback to Iraq in 2007, the events leading up to Megan’s kidnapping are revealed. In present day, Owen and Megan hash out old wounds.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Danger Zone	14
17	\N	April's crisis of faith is challenged by a patient she treats who is a rabbi, and Meredith treats a patient who is a transplant surgeon from another hospital.	Grey's Anatomy	5	One Day Like This	14
1	\N	The doctors at Grey Sloan Memorial vie for a new position. Meredith is seemingly distracted and struggles to stay focused, and Maggie finds herself the keeper of a big secret while Amelia and Owen try to figure out their relationship. Meanwhile, Jo and Alex's honeymoon doesn't go exactly as planned.	Grey's Anatomy	5	With a Wonder and a Wild Desire	15
6	\N	Meredith has a patient whose family is celebrating Day of the Dead, making the doctors remember loved ones they have lost. Richard shares unexpected news with Meredith about her father, Thatcher. Meanwhile, Teddy tries to tell Owen that she is pregnant but they get sidetracked, and Jo encourages Link to pursue one of the doctors.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Flowers Grow Out of My Grave	15
11	\N	Amelia and Koracick tackle a daunting surgery on Catherine while Richard and Jackson hope for the best. Meanwhile, Richard urges Meredith to visit her father, Thatcher, before his time is up.	Grey's Anatomy	5	The Winner Takes It All	15
16	\N	Meredith finds herself having to side with either Alex or DeLuca during a difficult situation, but she doesn’t want to betray either of them. Meanwhile, Maggie reveals details about her personal life that cause a public stir, and Levi struggles with whether or not to tell his family about Nico.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Blood and Water	15
19	\N	When a trauma patient arrives at Grey Sloan, it forces Jo to confront her past. Meanwhile, Bailey and Ben have to talk to Tuck about dating.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Silent All These Years	15
25	\N	As fog begins to cover Seattle, the doctors of Grey Sloan navigate through personal complications. Meredith and Alex attempt to save Gus, while Levi talks some sense into a struggling Nico.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Jump into the Fog	15
4	\N	After Meredith inadvertently stirs up negative press for Grey Sloan, she tries to make things right with her former colleagues, jeopardizing her community service hours. Station 19’s Ben and Vic bring a young woman into the hospital, and Jackson stands up to Koracick when he goes too far with a patient’s family. Meanwhile, Bailey receives unexpected news; and Owen finds himself at Pac-Gen North, which Alex sees as a recruiting opportunity.	Grey's Anatomy	5	It's Raining Men	16
24	\N	Faced with a life threatening situation, the doctors must fight to stay alive while trying to save the lives of their peers; Bailey and Ben make a decision regarding their relationship; and Teddy is presented with a tempting offer. Meanwhile, Richard plans a special dinner for the residents.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Flight	8
13	\N	As Derek and April work around the clock to find a solution for the hospital, Cristina struggles to respect the wishes of a family whose son is dying. Meanwhile, Arizona empathizes with a teenager who faces problems similar to her own.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Bad Blood	9
3	\N	Derek and Meredith adjust to life at home with their newborn; Arizona tries to repair her marriage; Jackson and Owen clash over financial issues.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Everybody's Crying Mercy	10
13	\N	The doctors are faced with the consequences of the events at April's wedding. Alex reacts to the news about his father. Callie and Arizona make a decision about their relationship.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Take It Back	10
23	\N	With Derek away, Meredith spends time with Amelia and finds out her true feelings about her time in Seattle. Bailey deals with the ramifications of her actions and Callie receives devastating news. Meanwhile, the residents panic after hearing that one of them will be fired	Grey's Anatomy	5	Everything I Try to Do, Nothing Seems to Turn Out Right	10
9	\N	As Derek prepares for his move to DC, Meredith keeps herself busy at the hospital. Meanwhile, Jackson and April deal with difficult news, and Arizona and Amelia discuss how to best approach Dr. Herman.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Where Do We Go From Here?	11
19	\N	Upon realizing that Owen and Amelia have been seeing each other behind her back, Meredith comes down hard on her sister-in-law causing Amelia to rethink things. Meanwhile, Catherine springs into action when a man is brought into the hospital after his wife seeks revenge on his cheating ways.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Crazy Love	11
4	\N	Owen suggests the interns learn a vital lesson on how to break bad news to patients’ families, and Arizona’s 90-year-old patient reassures her that she’s destined to find love again. Meanwhile, the sisters completely forget about the dinner party they’re hosting for everyone.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Old-Time Rock-and-Roll	12
15	\N	Jackson learns about April's pregnancy, while Alex and the team of doctors handle an hours-long triple-organ transplant surgery. Meredith considers dating again, and Andrew insists on not receiving special treatment after he and Maggie go public.	Grey's Anatomy	5	I Am Not Waiting Anymore	12
1	\N	When one of Grey Sloan’s own lands in the hospital, Bailey tries to figure out what happened while the rest of the doctors jump in to help. Meredith juggles huge secrets that affect her relationships with Alex and Maggie. While Richard helps Jo with a big decision, April and Catherine clash over the new baby.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Undo	13
11	\N	Richard and the attendings set out to make Eliza’s first day at Grey Sloan a bumpy one. Meanwhile, Meredith tries to track down Alex.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Jukebox Hero	13
21	\N	Bailey and April work to fix things between Richard and Catherine; Eliza continues to pursue Arizona; one of Alex's previous patients returns to Grey Sloan.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Don't Stop Me Now	13
7	\N	After a roller coaster car falls off the track at the county fair, the doctors at Grey Sloan tend to patients who spark memories about ghosts from their past. The series 300th episode!	Grey's Anatomy	5	Who Lives, Who Dies, Who Tells Your Story	14
14	\N	Maggie's relationship with Clive starts to progress; she invites him over for a game night to meet Meredith and Amelia; Meredith and Jo meet with the owner of the patent to the polymer they need for their project, who is a friend of the family.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Games People Play	14
24	\N	Meredith Grey and the team of doctors at Grey Sloan Memorial are faced with life-or-death decisions on a daily basis. They seek comfort from one another, and, at times, more than just friendship. Together they discover that neither medicine nor relationships can be defined in black and white.	Grey's Anatomy	5	All of Me	14
10	\N	Meredith questions Link’s laid-back approach over a patient’s treatment. Maggie worries that Richard, Jackson and Catherine haven’t come to terms with Catherine’s diagnosis. Meanwhile, Deluca steps up in the O.R. when Owen faces a setback.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Help, I'm Alive	15
20	\N	Owen and Teddy have to deal with the surprise arrival of Megan Hunt, who knows nothing about their situation. Catherine preps for her first surgery back on a war veteran who’s not emotionally prepared for his procedure. Meredith worries about DeLuca operating alone with Richard.	Grey's Anatomy	5	The Whole Package	15
22	\N	Meredith debates how to handle an unexpected situation in her personal life, while Richard has an untimely reunion with an old friend. Jo has a hard time at work, and Owen tries therapy.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Head Over High Heels	15
6	\N	Alex enlists Richard to help distract investors when he hears disturbing news about skeletons on the construction site grounds. Teddy tasks herself with creating original Halloween costumes for Allison and Leo.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Whistlin' Past The Graveyard	16
7	\N	Catherine is back in town and has no idea what’s been going on between Jackson and Maggie, while her relationship with Richard has become distant. Owen and Amelia treat a woman who fell in the basement and quickly realize that there is more to the story, and Maggie is shocked to learn about some of Richard’s relatives who are seeking help.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Papa Don't Preach	16
14	\N	DeLuca is irritated after Meredith takes over his patient Suzanne whose symptoms continue to stump the doctors at Grey Sloan. Elsewhere in the hospital, Jackson, Owen and Jo work on a couple injured in a bear attack; and Levi is hurt when Nico doesn’t want him to meet his parents.	Grey's Anatomy	5	A Diagnosis	16
19	\N	Richard preps to present his PATH pen at the LA Surgical Innovation Conference but becomes distracted by his issues with Catherine. Maggie and Teddy run into people from their past at the same conference, while Hayes relives moments from when he met his late wife.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Love of My Life	16
3	\N	The Grey Sloan doctors continue to face their new COVID-19 reality and deal with a familiar and stubborn patient. Koracick is put in charge of the interns who recently joined the hospital ranks and Link operates on a sex therapist. Elsewhere, Maggie finds comfort in Winston's virtual presence.	Grey's Anatomy	5	My Happy Ending	17
7	\N		Grey's Anatomy	5	Episode 7	17
5	\N	Daniel tries to strike a shady deal to undermine Johnny’s dojo. Meanwhile, Johnny expands his enrollment ranks in the dojo. Miguel puts his karate practice into reality as Samantha faces rejection in school.	Cobra Kai	7	Counterbalance	1
9	\N	Ragnar's warriors march on to King Ecbert's villa and are met with a surprisingly vicious welcome party.	Vikings	8	The Choice	2
6	\N	As the doctors continue with their lawsuit, they’re forced to confront the realities of their injuries. Meanwhile, Bailey tricks Arizona into helping her with a pediatric case, and Cristina tries to find normalcy in her new environment.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Second Opinion	9
15	\N	As the hospital spirals closer to financial ruin, Owen must make some tough decisions, which includes foregoing an expensive surgery that could save the life of a child. Meanwhile, Alex and Jo work together to save the life of an infant, and April asks Jackson for dating advice.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Hard Bargain	9
21	\N	Bailey finds herself at the center of a CDC investigation surrounding the death of several of her patients, as Jackson and the rest of the board members argue over how to address the crisis with the public. Meanwhile, Cristina teases Alex about his unspoken feelings for Jo, and Owen continues to take special care of Ethan as the condition of his parents remains uncertain.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Sleeping Monster	9
5	\N	Meredith struggles to balance her roles as a surgeon and a mother when she returns to work; Stephanie tries to impress Jackson's mother; Jo becomes overly involved with a patient.	Grey's Anatomy	5	I Bet It Stung	10
17	\N	Cristina imagines the two routes her life can take based on one decision she makes. Meanwhile one of the hospital’s patients decides whether or not to live.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Do You Know?	10
24	\N	The doctors of Grey Sloan Memorial Hospital bid an emotional farewell to the beloved Cristina Yang. A possible act of terrorism rocks Seattle and causes chaos at the hospital. Meanwhile, Meredith makes a life changing decision and one doctor receives shocking news.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Fear (of the Unknown)	10
10	\N	April stays optimistic as Arizona begins testing on her baby; Dr. Herman plans out a crash course in fetal surgery; and Owen and Callie encourage each other to get back into the dating scene. Meanwhile, Meredith, Maggie and Bailey use the 3D printer to gain a better understanding of their patient's tumor.	Grey's Anatomy	5	The Bed's Too Big Without You	11
20	\N	A small plane crash in Seattle causes multiple casualties and brings back horrible memories for the doctors, especially Meredith and Arizona. Meanwhile, friction between Owen and Amelia makes for an uncomfortable working situation for Stephanie.	Grey's Anatomy	5	One Flight Down	11
6	\N	Grey Sloan Memorial not only welcomes a new transfer resident, but also a patient who's the topic of converstation after accidentally sending his sex tape to his entire congregation. Meanwhile, Richard wrestles with how to progress his relationship with Maggie when an old friend visits the hospital, and April brings in a case of a young boy from the Middle-East.	Grey's Anatomy	5	The Me Nobody Knows	12
16	\N	Meredith takes a step forward with Will but quickly regrets it; Maggie senses a disconnection with Andrew; and Amelia reevaluates her relationship with Owen. Meanwhile, Catherine comes into town and really shakes things up with April and Jackson.	Grey's Anatomy	5	When It Hurts So Bad	12
2	\N	Meredith considers her loyalties, as Alex deals with the repercussions of his actions. Newlyweds Amelia and Owen host a dinner party with unlikely guests, and Jackson proposes an arrangement to help April through her recovery.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Catastrophe and the Cure	13
16	\N	Jackson and April travel to Montana in order to perform a complicated surgery on a young patient, but Jackson’s mind is elsewhere, and April is forced to step up and get him back on track.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Who Is He (And What Is He To You)?	13
1	\N	Meredith and the team are focused on helping Owen’s sister after her shocking return, and Amelia faces a conflict over a patient. Meanwhile, Bailey is forced to give Grey Sloan a facelift after the fire, and the doctors are introduced to a few new faces that spice things up around the hospital.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Break Down the House	14
18	\N	Amelia, Koracick and DeLuca perform a risky, groundbreaking procedure using ultrasound waves to remove a young patient’s brain tumor. Meanwhile, Meredith and Jo work with different polymers to try to salvage their project submission; and Richard’s AA sponsor is admitted to Grey Sloan with a DNR.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Hold Back the River	14
4	\N	Meredith turns heads when she shows up to work done up and ready for her blind date later that day, while Alex makes a questionable decision in order to save a patient. Meanwhile, the burden of knowing Teddy’s secret keeps Maggie up at night, ultimately making her decide she has to tell someone.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Momma Knows Best	15
13	\N	Patients flood the hospital after gunfire goes off at a parade; a blast from the past throws Maggie off her game on the same day that Meredith tries to talk to her about dating Deluca; Owen and Amelia get some potentially life-altering news.	Grey's Anatomy	5	I Walk the Line	15
24	\N	Alex tries desperately to save his patient Gus while he waits for a severely agoraphobic blood donor to arrive from London. Jo reveals to Meredith why she’s been so down, while Catherine and Bailey hold a meeting to get down to the bottom of an insurance issue. Meanwhile, Maggie and Jackson go camping.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Drawn to the Blood	15
2	\N	The doctors operate on a man who crashed into Maggie's car as Owen, back from paternity leave, struggles with Tom's new position. Meredith's recent firing doesn't stop her from diagnosing those around her. Richard and Alex start anew and it's not easy.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Back in the Saddle	16
9	\N	Jo becomes a safe haven volunteer and gets a call that a baby has been dropped off at Station 19. Meanwhile, Meredith moves forward with her life after facing the medical board. Jackson takes a big step in his budding romance with Vic, while Bailey and Amelia swap pregnancy updates.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Let's All Go to the Bar	16
12	\N	Jackson creates an uncomfortable situation when he invites new girlfriend, Vic, to what he thinks is Richard and Catherine’s anniversary celebration, only to discover the dinner was called for different reasons. Elsewhere, Levi brings Nico on a trip to visit an ailing family member.	Grey's Anatomy	5	The Last Supper	16
16	\N	Bailey and Ben face a huge, life-altering decision, while Meredith and several of the doctors reflect on the past.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Leave a Light On	16
21	\N	Link tries to convince Amelia to take it easy during the final stage of her pregnancy. Hayes asks Meredith a surprising question, and Owen makes a shocking discovery.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Put on a Happy Face	16
5	\N	Bailey panics as she hears there has been a surge of COVID-19 cases, knowing she has loved ones in an assisted living facility. Meanwhile, Jackson and Richard team up against Catherine to teach her a lesson, and Teddy continues to try to mend her frayed relationships. After an intense surgery, Jo is uncertain about her future.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Fight the Power	17
3	\N		Marvel Studios: Legends	6	Episode 3	1
20	\N	Upon receiving some unsettling news, Meredith and Derek take preventative steps for their children’s future; a group of Syrian doctors arrive at Grey Sloan Memorial Hospital for a crash course in basic surgical skills that they plan to apply in the field; and April decides to come clean to Matthew regarding the truth about her virginity. Meanwhile, multiple pre-op patients develop infections, causing one doctor to wonder if she is at fault.	Grey's Anatomy	5	She's Killing Me	9
4	\N	The doctors of Grey Sloan Memorial throw a fundraising gala which turns wildly competitive after Jackson makes a rash promise. Back at the hospital, Bailey’s patience is tested when she has to deal with several extremely difficult patients. Meanwhile, Shane and Stephanie handle an incredibly busy ER by themselves and Alex reveals an emotional secret to Jo.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Puttin' on the Ritz	10
14	\N	After an anonymous complaint is issued by one of their own, the hospital implements a non-fraternizing policy causing the couples to panic. Meanwhile, Emma and Owen talk about the future, Cristina and Meredith enjoy a little girl time, and Richard enlists the residents to help research a rare cancer case.	Grey's Anatomy	5	You've Got to Hide Your Love Away	10
4	\N	Secrets from Ellis Grey’s past come to light when Meredith watches old videos and reads through her mother’s journals. Meanwhile, Maggie rocks the hospital with an unexpected announcement; Alex gets new responsibilities and Callie focuses her attention on the Veterans’ project.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Only Mama Knows	11
14	\N	In this Amelia-centric episode, Amelia engages in the surgery of a lifetime as a crowd of doctors look on from the gallery. With Stephanie by her side, she begins operating on Dr. Herman, but quickly realizes it's far more difficult than she anticipated. Meanwhile, Bailey becomes skeptical when Arizona takes on one of Herman’s cases.	Grey's Anatomy	5	The Distance	11
24	\N	As the doctors continue to tackle an unfathomable crisis, they are reminded of what is important and are brought closer together.	Grey's Anatomy	5	You're My Home	11
10	\N	Everybody attempts to deals with Meredith's trauma as Maggie and Callie perform a risky, experimental surgery on a teenager. Nathan and Owen continue to be at odds. Maggie and Andrew's relationship continues to progress.	Grey's Anatomy	5	All I Want Is You	12
19	\N	Miranda continues to deal with the aftermath of Ben's reckless decision and forms an advisory committee to recommend proper disciplinary action against him. Meanwhile, April and Jackson try to put their differences aside for the sake of their baby, and Arizona makes a decision that could affect her relationship with Callie forever.	Grey's Anatomy	5	It’s Alright, Ma (I’m Only Bleeding)	12
5	\N	Meredith and Bailey are at odds when both of their patients need a liver transplant, Owen seeks help from the other doctors when he is charged with babysitting baby Harriet for the day, and Amelia struggles with telling Owen some important news.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Both Sides Now	13
19	\N	When Maggie takes on a big case, many of the doctors are worried she’s not the right one for the job while Stephanie makes a mistake treating one of Grey Sloan’s own.	Grey's Anatomy	5	What's Inside	13
3	\N	Harper Avery arrives at Grey Sloan, putting Bailey on edge. A familiar face from Meredith’s past returns as a patient, and Amelia tries to manage a secret.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Go Big or Go Home	14
13	\N	Seattle firefighters Ben Warren and Andy Herrera head to Grey Sloan after rescuing two boys who were injured in a house fire; the doctors work on their projects for the surgical innovation contest; Amelia brings Tom Koracick in to consult.	Grey's Anatomy	5	You Really Got a Hold on Me	14
22	\N	Alex and Jo go on a road trip to Iowa to find Alex’s mom, whom he hasn’t heard from in a very long time. Meanwhile, Meredith gives a presentation on her mini-livers project, which attracts a ton of attention; and Jackson works to rebuild the foundation after its reputation is threatened.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Fight for Your Mind	14
8	\N	Seattle is hit by a huge wind storm and Grey Sloan becomes inundated with patients. Alex and Jo are stuck at home and decide to make the best of it by having a second honeymoon, while Meredith confronts Richard about getting his life back on track. The winter finale.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Blowin' in the Wind	15
18	\N	Maggie introduces mood rooms as an alternative approach to medicine. Alex and DeLuca butt heads over an 11-year-old patient who tries to sabotage her own surgery. Jackson and Richard deal with a gender non-binary patient. Meanwhile, Teddy has a pregnancy scare that brings Owen and Koracick to odds.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Add It Up	15
3	\N	A patient at the hospital is brain dead after falling into a construction site, and her two sisters must decide whether or not to keep her alive.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Reunited	16
10	\N	Following the car crash at Joe’s Bar and subsequent rescue efforts led by the Station 19 firefighters, Grey Sloan doctors work through the night to save the lives of their colleagues. Meanwhile, Amelia worries about sharing her pregnancy revelation with Link. Owen and Teddy take a big step, and Bailey deals with grief over her recent loss.\\n\\nThe crossover starts on Station 19 S03E01 I Know This Bar (I).	Grey's Anatomy	5	Help Me Through the Night (II)	16
18	\N	Meredith heads up a pro bono surgery day, but the overwhelming patient response causes her to struggle to keep things in order. DeLuca treats a teenage patient whom he suspects is in danger and desperately tries to get Bailey to support his theory.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Give a Little Bit	16
20	\N	Owen and Link treat an older woman who wakes up from surgery and can’t stop singing, while Teddy helps Koracick stay afloat after an estranged loved one from his past comes to the hospital looking for help. Meredith, Bailey and Maggie focus their efforts on a difficult patient with a tricky diagnosis.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Sing It Again	16
1	\N	Explore Wanda Maximoff’s growth and the unique bond shaping her destiny.	Marvel Studios: Legends	6	Wanda Maximoff	1
2	\N	Explore Vision’s quest for humanity and love, capped by selfless sacrifice.	Marvel Studios: Legends	6	Vision	1
3	\N	Johnny tries to recruit more students to join the dojo. Troubled by his daughter’s friends, Daniel chaperones her high school costume dance. Johnny takes Miguel’s training seriously and starts creating a badass.	Cobra Kai	7	Esqueleto	1
6	\N	Johnny’s dojo class attracts a group of misfits while his son Robby, who harbors ulterior motives, lands a new job. Samantha makes a new friend in science class. Daniel inspires interest in karate from an unlikely person.	Cobra Kai	7	Quiver	1
4	\N	Daniel makes another attempt to promote Miyagi Do, and receives guidance in a familiar form. Johnny grows suspicious about Kreese’s backstory. A new Cobra Kai student challenges Miguel and befriends Aisha, while Robby revisits a past he’d rather forget.	Cobra Kai	7	The Moment of Truth	2
22	\N	Cristina considers her future at the hospital; Amelia and Derek collaborate on a tough surgery involving conjoined twins; Jo takes on too many cases at once; Stephanie stumbles on the truth about Bailey's case.	Grey's Anatomy	5	We Are Never Ever Getting Back Together	10
8	\N	Maggie and Meredith disagree with Derek about the best way to approach a patient’s case, which leads to a bigger argument between the couple. Meanwhile Callie feels responsible when one of her veterans is pushed too far and one doctor’s routine procedure results in a devastating diagnosis.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Risk	11
18	\N	A school field trip to the hospital takes a dramatic turn when the kids witness two injured cops enter the emergency room. Meanwhile, Stephanie sets her eyes on one of the chaperons, Callie operates on the leg of the police captain and Amelia must face her feelings for Owen.	Grey's Anatomy	5	When I Grow Up	11
3	\N	Maggie reevaluates her life choices after receiving an invitation to her ex-boyfriend’s wedding; Richard questions Bailey’s loyalty, and Jo confides in Stephanie about a secret she’s been keeping from Alex. Meanwhile, Alex struggles with making a difficult decision that will affect the lives of newborn twins.\\n\\n	Grey's Anatomy	5	I Choose You	12
14	\N	There is plenty of turmoil after Richard messes with the staff pairings. Arizona takes a risk to help a woman who is pregnant with quadruplets.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Odd Man Out	12
23	\N	Owen and Amelia take their relationship to the next level; Alex gains some clarity on his future with Jo; and Callie and Arizona continue to struggle with the current custody arrangement.	Grey's Anatomy	5	At Last	12
9	\N	Believing he is going to jail tomorrow, Alex makes a big decision about his future. While the hospital is overrun with victims of a building collapse, Richard demands answers from Bailey about Eliza’s presence at Grey Sloan.	Grey's Anatomy	5	You Haven't Done Nothin'	13
15	\N	Richard, Jackson, April and Catherine tackle a grueling trauma case intensified by hospital politics. Amelia finally faces her feelings about Owen, and Meredith gets caught between Nathan and Alex over a patient.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Civil War	13
24	\N	The doctors’ lives are at risk after a dangerous patient escapes the hospital room. Alex must make a hard choice in his relationship with Jo while Meredith has some big news for Nathan that brings things to a turning point.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Ring of Fire	13
10	\N	A young boy is admitted to Grey Sloan Memorial and his case has a profound impact on the doctors. Meanwhile, April is faced with a surprising patient, and Jo continues to deal with her estranged husband.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Personal Jesus	14
19	\N	An agent from ICE shows up at Grey Sloan in search of an employee who may be working in the U.S. under DACA. Alex’s patient Kimmie wants to leave the hospital to enjoy her final days, but Alex feels differently. Meanwhile, Arizona treats Matthew Taylor’s baby and April wants to do whatever she can to help.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Beautiful Dreamer	14
5	\N	Meredith reaches out to Teddy and helps her talk through some of her personal struggles. Owen and Amelia hide out near Betty’s school after she becomes a flight risk. Meanwhile, Jo wants to get to work on the fellowship, but Bailey’s attention is elsewhere.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Everyday Angel	15
15	\N	When Jackson throws a party to celebrate Catherine’s surgery and those who worked to save her, literally nothing goes as planned. Meanwhile, Helen pays Alex and Jo a surprise visit.	Grey's Anatomy	5	We Didn't Start the Fire	15
1	\N	Meredith, Richard and Alex must deal with the consequences after Bailey fires them from Grey Sloan for insurance fraud. After disappearing in the fog, Jackson helps a man in a dangerous situation, as his relationship with Maggie comes to a new crossroad. Meanwhile, Tom gets new responsibilities at the hospital that throw the doctors for a loop.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Nothing Left to Cling To	16
11	\N	Richard finds out Maggie quit Grey Sloan and is concerned about how she’s handling the death of her patient who was her estranged cousin. Bailey returns to work after taking some personal time off, although Koracick doesn’t make her first day as easy as she’d like. Meanwhile, Meredith thinks she might miss DeLuca, and Amelia has an update for Link on her pregnancy.	Grey's Anatomy	5	A Hard Pill to Swallow	16
13	\N	DeLuca can’t figure out what’s going on with his incurable patient Suzanne and he turns to a diagnostics genius, Dr. Riley from UCSF, for help. Bailey checks in on Joey, a foster kid that Ben brought into Grey Sloan. Meanwhile, Amelia is getting the results of her paternity test and Jo confronts her about how she is treating Link.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Save the Last Dance for Me	16
1	\N	The doctors of Grey Sloan Memorial must contend with the COVID-19 pandemic; an unintentionally started fire has first responders from Station 19 bringing patients into the hospital for treatment.	Grey's Anatomy	5	All Tomorrow's Parties	17
2	\N	Bailey finds herself in the middle of an argument with patients' families as they await news about their children who were injured in a fire; Winston surprises Maggie; Amelia and Link try to have some fun as new parents.	Grey's Anatomy	5	The Center Won't Hold	17
4	\N		Marvel Studios: Legends	6	Episode 4	1
5	\N		Marvel Studios: Legends	6	Episode 5	1
7	\N	Daniel takes on teaching his new pupil using the unconventional techniques from Mr. Miyagi. Robby is tempted to return to his delinquent ways. Johnny helps Miguel with his first date.	Cobra Kai	7	All Valley	1
9	\N	Despite Johnny’s efforts to move forward, he confronts Daniel about the assault on his property. An attempt to appease Johnny makes them revisit the past together. Miguel senses Samantha is lying to him. The dojo students try to intimidate the popular kids at a party.	Cobra Kai	7	Different But Same	1
2	\N	When Daniel starts teaching his first karate students, he questions whether he can fill Mr. Miyagi’s shoes. Johnny invents some unorthodox training methods with help from an unlikely source.	Cobra Kai	7	Back in Black	2
7	\N	To prepare his students, Daniel gives some new training methods a shot. Miguel puts a new lesson into practice. Johnny makes a tough but pivotal decision that affects Cobra Kai.	Cobra Kai	7	Lull	2
9	\N	Johnny cautiously takes a stab at love, while Daniel and Amanda enjoy a romantic date night. An attempt to bring the students of the two dojos together backfires as hostilities between the teens escalate.	Cobra Kai	7	Pulpo	2
2	\N	Daniel and Johnny team up to find Robby. Miguel faces an uncertain future. Kreese tries to bring Tory back to Cobra Kai.	Cobra Kai	7	Nature Vs. Nurture	3
5	\N	In Okinawa, Daniel spends time with an old friend — and an old enemy, who has much to teach him. The dueling dojos' rivalry comes to a nasty head.	Cobra Kai	7	Miyagi-Do	3
13	\N	The hospital doctors become fascinated with Dr. Herman’s case when Amelia gives a lecture detailing the intricacies of the surgery. Arizona and Herman continue to bond over the amount of cases they are trying to complete before the big surgery. Meanwhile, Bailey brings them a case of a pregnant woman who is close to her heart.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Staring at the End	11
23	\N	The doctors of Grey Sloan Memorial Hospital are forced to put their emotions aside when a catastrophic event occurs.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Time Stops	11
9	\N	Meredith is brutally attacked by a patient, and Penny is the one who discovers her. The doctors of Grey Sloan Memorial rush to stabilize Meredith and remain by her side in the harrowing aftermath.	Grey's Anatomy	5	The Sound of Silence	12
18	\N	After a missing child forces the hospital into lockdown, Ben decides to operate on a pregnant mother without the proper surgical equipment. Miranda, as Chief, is faced with the repercussions of  the event and whether or not Ben's impulsive actions were justified.	Grey's Anatomy	5	There’s a Fine, Fine Line	12
4	\N	Alex tries to do the right thing but still cant catch a break. Jackson and April adjust to their “new normal” with the baby. While Meredith and Nathan establish what’s going on between them, Amelia questions the state of her relationship with Owen.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Falling Slowly	13
18	\N	When Maggie’s mom’s health deteriorates, the doctors are at odds over how to treat her. Meanwhile, Richard comes to grips with Bailey’s betrayal over the Residency Program.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Be Still, My Soul	13
4	\N	Amelia confronts a difficult situation, while Meredith deals with the fallout from her conversation with Nathan. Maggie finds herself at an awkward family dinner, Jackson receives big news, and Richard and Bailey search for the stars of tomorrow.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Ain't That a Kick in the Head	14
3	\N	Meredith works on a patient who happens to specialize in matchmaking, and a seemingly drunk patient pushes Richard's buttons and gives him a medical mystery to solve. Meanwhile, Maggie tries to reach Teddy after bearing the burden of her secret becomes overwhelming as she struggles with issues in her own personal life.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Gut Feeling	15
14	\N	Meredith breaks a hospital record; the doctors are sent scrambling in the wake of a massive overdose within the community; Jackson wants to take Maggie camping; Levi and Nico's relationship continues to develop.	Grey's Anatomy	5	I Want a New Drug	15
23	\N	Maggie treats one of Station 19’s own, and Jo learns a hard lesson. Meanwhile, when working with a family seeking asylum, Meredith makes a call that could jeopardize her career.  The crossover continues on Station 19 S02E15 Always Ready (II).	Grey's Anatomy	5	What I Did for Love (I)	15
8	\N	Meredith faces the medical board as her future as a doctor remains uncertain, and she’s forced to reckon with her past in some challenging ways. Meanwhile, the interns are put to the test as they are each vying to be the most successful on their respective cases in the absence of some of the attendings.	Grey's Anatomy	5	My Shot	16
17	\N	A wealthy inventor arrives at Grey Sloan and asks Koracick for help, while Meredith struggles to save a woman with diabetes who has been rationing her insulin. Jo and Link fight to save a young man who fell onto train tracks, and Jackson and Vic's relationship hits a snag.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Life on Mars?	16
6	\N	Grey Sloan Memorial faces new pressures as Seattle Pres is overloaded, and Grey Sloan Memorial is now on surge capacity protocol. Meanwhile, Owen and Amelia are faced with one of the most controversial surgeries of their careers.	Grey's Anatomy	5	No Time for Despair	17
1	\N	Thirty years after the events of the 1984 All Valley Karate Tournament, Johnny Lawrence’s life has taken a rocky turn as he tries to forget a past that constantly haunts him. He seeks redemption by reopening the infamous Cobra Kai karate dojo. But the LaRusso-Lawrence rivalry of yesteryear is reignited when their lives become intertwined with the next generation of “karate kids.”	Cobra Kai	7	Ace Degenerate	1
2	\N	Present day Daniel LaRusso lives a charmed life. That is, until he sees that the Cobra Kai dojo, the source of his teenage angst and rivalry, has been reestablished by Johnny Lawrence. Struggling to launch the business, Johnny starts teaching karate to his teenage neighbor Miguel. Daniel faces his former opponent and old offenses are quickly reignited.	Cobra Kai	7	Strike First	1
10	\N	The highly-anticipated All Valley Karate Tournament brings Johnny and Daniel on opposite sides again, except this time, the new generation of karate students are the combatants. Who will pay the price for ultimate victory?	Cobra Kai	7	Mercy	1
1	\N	In the aftermath of Cobra Kai’s win at the Under 18 All Valley Karate Championships, Johnny questions his dojo’s philosophy and deals with a figure from his past. Daniel searches for the right way to respond to Cobra Kai’s dominance.	Cobra Kai	7	Mercy Part II	2
8	\N	Daniel works to make amends with Amanda, while Johnny is introduced to the world of dating apps. Complications arise when Miguel, Samantha, Robby and Tory cross paths.	Cobra Kai	7	Glory of Love	2
10	\N	It’s the first day of school at West Valley High but tensions between the two dojos have not cooled with the end of summer. And the rivalry between Daniel and Johnny comes to a head.	Cobra Kai	7	No Mercy	2
3	\N	Daniel's tarnished public image takes a toll on his sales, leading to a takeover offer. Johnny tries to raise money for Miguel's surgery.	Cobra Kai	7	Now You're Gonna Pay	3
6	\N	Miguel helps Johnny craft the perfect social media message. Kreese scouts new recruits while Daniel and Amanda try to shut down Cobra Kai.	Cobra Kai	7	King Cobra	3
10	\N	Old wounds begin to heal at a country club holiday party, but a brutal assault by Kreese's students leads to new betrayals and alliances.	Cobra Kai	7	December 19	3
2	\N	The journey west begins as Ragnar gathers a crew willing to risk their lives to travel into the unknown. Earl Haraldson's paranoia reaches new heights as his fear of Ragnar's success grows.	Vikings	8	Wrath of the Northmen	1
3	\N	Ragnar and his crew return from their trip with treasure, and Earl Haraldson has no choice but to sanction another raid. The west is open for the taking, and the Vikings' world will never be the same.	Vikings	8	Dispossessed	1
2	\N	The time has come for an unlikely alliance to band together for a new raid on England; a storm pushes the Viking fleet to a new destination; Ragnar and his men may have met their match.	Vikings	8	Invasion	2
9	\N	Ragnar travels to Götaland to help King Horik resolve a land dispute with the area's leader, Jarl Borg. Meanwhile, sickness infects the village of Kattegat, and the people look to Lagertha to help them appease the gods.	Vikings	8	All Change	1
4	\N	Ragnar and his crew sail out with Earl Haraldson's permission.	Vikings	8	Trial	1
2	\N	The pressure is on as a determined Bailey tackles her first day as  Chief; meanwhile, April's marriage is in jeopardy and she finds herself  unable to address her problems; Meredith struggles to juggle all her  responsibilities and Amelia works to define her relationship with Owen.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Walking Tall	12
12	\N	A patient from Meredith's very first surgery as an Intern is readmitted to Grey Sloan Memorial with a new aneurysm, and Amelia takes her case. Meanwhile, Maggie suspects that Richard knows about her relationship with Andrew, and Arizona debates dating again.	Grey's Anatomy	5	My Next Life	12
22	\N	Callie and Arizona are at odds over Sofia’s future, and Stephanie questions the status of her relationship with Kyle. Meanwhile, Alex and April work on a pregnant teen that is readmitted to Grey Sloan Memorial.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Mama Tried	12
10	\N	Bailey, Arizona and Jo go to a maximum security women’s prison to treat a violent, 16-year-old pregnant girl and her unborn baby.	Grey's Anatomy	5	You Can Look (But You'd Better Not Touch)	13
20	\N	Meredith and Nathan have to confront their feelings when they are are stuck sitting next to each other on a plane.	Grey's Anatomy	5	In the Air Tonight	13
6	\N	Jackson decides he needs some time off and invites the guys to join him on a day out at sea. Meanwhile, Arizona, April and Maggie treat a woman who’s hiding a deadly secret.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Come on Down to My Boat, Baby	14
16	\N	Maggie and Jackson are enjoying spending time together, but he must turn his concentration toward the groundbreaking vaginoplasty surgery he has scheduled with Catherine and Richard. Meanwhile, Meredith and Jo hit a roadblock with their contest submission, so Jo helps Bailey with an incoming trauma patient who used to be an astronaut	Grey's Anatomy	5	Caught Somewhere in Time	14
2	\N	New doctors continue to shake up the hospital in typical Grey Sloan manner. Meredith bonds with a patient while Jackson struggles with the meaning behind recent experiences; and after making a life-changing decision, Jo forms an unexpected alliance.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Broken Together	15
12	\N	A patient gives Meredith some clarity on her dating situation around the holidays. The strain on Bailey and Ben’s marriage comes to a head. Meanwhile, Betty drops a bomb on Owen and Amelia.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Girlfriend in a Coma	15
21	\N	Amelia and Link travel to New York to operate on a patient with a severe spinal deformity, but they’re in for more than they bargained for when Nancy Shepherd invites them to dinner at her home.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Good Shepherd	15
5	\N	Meredith has a court hearing after skipping out on community service, while Bailey and Jo have a patient that Jo realizes is from the treatment facility. Richard and Gemma grab breakfast together and things go awry.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Breathe Again	16
15	\N	Meredith and Carina question DeLuca’s uncharacteristic behavior when he volunteers to perform a life-threatening task during a blizzard. Meanwhile, Bailey tries to help Joey with his future, while Richard trains a new intern at the hospital.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Snowblind	16
4	\N	Owen faces a medical diagnosis that challenges more than he imagined. Meanwhile, Koracick begins to go stir crazy; and Maggie gets a not-so-subtle glimpse into Winston's background.	Grey's Anatomy	5	You'll Never Walk Alone	17
6	\N		Marvel Studios: Legends	6	Episode 6	1
4	\N	When Daniel’s car dealership billboard is sprayed with lewd graffiti, it consumes Daniel and escalates tensions against a rival. Robby, Johnny’s delinquent son, is embarrassed about his father and his new dojo. The bullying escalates against Miguel and motivates Johnny in a surprising way.	Cobra Kai	7	Cobra Kai Never Dies	1
3	\N	Daniel pulls out all the stops in an effort to recruit new students to Miyagi Do. Johnny reflects on some of the major relationships in his life - and responds to Daniel’s promotional efforts with his own.	Cobra Kai	7	Fire and Ice	2
5	\N	Daniel struggles to help a new student learn. Miguel makes a new connection, while Johnny tries to repair a relationship. Tensions between the two dojos build to a breaking point.	Cobra Kai	7	All In	2
6	\N	Daniel’s students are given a lesson in overcoming their grudges. Johnny spends some time away from the dojo, while Kreese exerts his influence.	Cobra Kai	7	Take a Right	2
4	\N	Following an important meeting in Japan, Daniel revisits Mr. Miyagi's hometown on Okinawa. Johnny attempts to reconnect with Robby.	Cobra Kai	7	The Right Path	3
7	\N	Daniel spends some father-daughter time with a traumatized Sam. Johnny plans to form a new karate dojo but struggles to come up with a cool name.	Cobra Kai	7	Obstáculos	3
8	\N	Informed that this year's All Valley Karate Tournament is being canceled, the three competing sensei attend a city council meeting to save it.	Cobra Kai	7	The Good, The Bad, and The Badass	3
1	\N	Ragnar Lothbrok is a warrior and a farmer who dreams of finding riches by bucking the tradition.	Vikings	8	Rites of Passage	1
8	\N	The traditional pilgrimage to Uppsala to thank the gods brings a torrent of emotions for Ragnar, Lagertha, and Athelstan. Ragnar, pulling farther away from his wife goes to make peace with the death of his unborn son. Lagertha, still reeling from her miscarriage, wants to find out from the gods if more sons are in her future. As the Vikings come together to sacrifice and give thanks to their gods, Athelstan discovers just how strong his Christian faith still is.	Vikings	8	Sacrifice	1
7	\N	Three Viking ships sail toward the Royal Villa of King Aelle in eastern England. Ragnar wants ransom in exchange for peace, but the king has a very different plan in mind.	Vikings	8	A King's Ransom	1
6	\N	Ragnar, weak and still hurt, must meet the Earl head-on after it comes to light that Rollo has been tortured on Haraldson’s orders. The two men will come together face to face with a single outcome possible: Only one man will leave this fight alive.	Vikings	8	Burial of the Dead	1
3	\N	King Ecbert finds himself facing an entirely new kind of foe; Ragnar races to dominate in the west; Jarl Borg has his own plans in store for the future of Kattegat.	Vikings	8	Treachery	2
4	\N	Ragnar and Ecbert come face to face; Jarl Borg rules Kattegat with an iron fist; Rollo must now become the leader his people need in Ragnar's absence.	Vikings	8	Eye for an Eye	2
5	\N	Lagertha and Ragnar unite to try to win Kattegat back from Jarl Borg; Aslaug must face the truth of her prophecies; Athelstan struggles to define his faith; Bjorn must once again make a choice.	Vikings	8	Answers in Blood	2
6	\N	King Horik returns to Kattegat with a surprising proposition for Ragnar; Lagertha runs into a less than enthusiastic homecoming from her new husband; Athelstan becomes confidant to King Ecbert.	Vikings	8	Unforgiven	2
2	\N	Betty and Jughead's investigation into the auteur takes a twisted turn after receiving a call from Bret. Meanwhile, Archie is forced to make an impossible decision when the person responsible for his father's death needs his help. Elsewhere, Veronica and Hermosa come up with a plan to force Hiram into early retirement, and Cheryl makes a business move.	Riverdale	2	Chapter Seventy-Eight: The Preppy Murders	5
5	\N	While in the exam area of St. Bonaventure Hospital, Dr. Shaun Murphy encounters a young patient who looks eerily similar to his deceased brother, Steve. After discovering his parents have hidden his diagnosis from him, Shaun struggles to understand why he doesn’t deserve to hear the truth about his own health. Meanwhile, the team can’t figure out what keeps triggering their patients’ increasingly severe allergic reactions and races to find the cause before the next one kills another patient.	The Good Doctor	3	Point Three Percent	1
15	\N	Dr. Shaun Murphy's teenage patient has been confined to her home her entire life due to a rare heart condition. Despite her condition, she has cultivated a large group of friends online and hopes that the surgical team can find a way to give her the life she has always dreamed of having. Meanwhile, a young patient's perfectly matched organ donor is causing a moral dilemma for the parents and the patient.	The Good Doctor	3	Heartfelt	1
6	\N	Morgan and Shaun’s indecision on how to treat a young violinist who visits the ER with an infected finger could affect her future in more ways than one. Meanwhile, Lim, Claire and Park can’t figure out if their young patient is really ill or looking for attention.	The Good Doctor	3	Two-Ply (or Not Two-Ply)	2
14	\N	Dr. Andrews tries to convince a grieving family to donate their teenage daughter’s face to another young girl whose face was horribly disfigured in an accident.	The Good Doctor	3	Faces	2
7	\N	Dr. Shaun Murphy’s unique ability to relate to a patient isolated by an immune deficiency yields an unexpected result. Meanwhile, Dr. Claire Browne, Dr. Morgan Reznick and Dr. Marcus Andrews treat a 12-year-old patient who is about to become blind, and tension builds between Dr. Neil Melendez and Dr. Audrey Lim.	The Good Doctor	3	SFAD	3
17	\N	A patient with a mysterious and undiagnosed illness that has baffled other doctors for years forces Shaun and the team to take some big risks. Claire and Melendez continue to cautiously navigate their feelings for each other as colleagues and friends.	The Good Doctor	3	Fixation	3
5	\N	Dr. Shaun Murphy questions his decision to give the new residents autonomy when one of his intern's misdiagnosis of a patient has dire consequences. Meanwhile, Dr. Claire Browne, Dr. Alex Park and Dr. Jordan Allen treat a patient with a ruptured cyst affecting key functions of her brain. And elsewhere, Dr. Morgan Reznick and Park bond over failed relationships.	The Good Doctor	3	Fault	4
2	\N	Alaric, Hope and Rafael hit the road in search of Landon, who’s sudden disappearance has raised some suspicion. Meanwhile, during an annual flag football game against Mystic Falls High, Lizzie and Josie’s plan to stay under the radar quickly gets derailed after Penelope gets involved.	Legacies	4	Some People Just Want to Watch the World Burn	1
12	\N	When the urn goes missing, Alaric, Hope, Josie, Lizzie, Kaleb, Dorian and Emma hit the road to locate the artifact before the next Malivore creature arrives. Meanwhile, Lizzie takes aim at Hope for all the past spring breaks she’s ruined. Finally, the group bands together when a town-wide quarantine threatens to expose their supernatural identities.	Legacies	4	There's a Mummy on Main Street	1
7	\N	After deciding that leaving town would be for the best, Hope gets pulled back in after Josie comes up with a risky plan to close the Malivore portal. Elsewhere, Alaric and Dorian make an alarming discovery about Professor Vardemus, while Rafael learns some upsetting news about Landon's future.	Legacies	4	It Will All Be Painfully Clear Soon Enough	2
1	\N	In order to get a handle on some urgencies at the school, Alaric sends the students off-campus for their first-ever field day. But when a medieval monster arrives with a challenge, the students are left scrambling to guess which one of them may be a worthy opponent.	Legacies	4	We're Not Worthy	3
3	\N	A bike race injures several pedestrians as well as well as participants.  One pedestrian is left brain dead.  Christina and Issie wish to use his organs for organ donation but with Christina's detachment and Issie's ever hopeful attitude that the man will recover, they will find the organ harvesting process an emotional one.  Preston faces feelings of his dislike of organ harvesting - as a surgeon, he likes saving lives; harvesting organs doesn't save the person's life.  George deals with Mac, a friend of the chief, who won't stop flirting with him.  He is in need of a new liver.   Meredith is fed up with Alex showing off as she continues trying to push Derek away.  She also is reaching the limits of Issie's sunshine and George's politeness as she goes on living with them.  Then there is their desire to see Meredith's mother's medical tapes.  Getting through the day, Meredith realizes the keys to winning the race.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Winning a Battle, Losing the War	1
4	\N	As Cristina tries to recover, she proves to be a very difficult patient, and a visit from her mother doesn't improve her demeanor any. And Meredith's mother, Dr. Ellis Grey, has the hospital staff running in circles.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Deny, Deny, Deny	2
14	\N	Meredith and Cristina lie to each other and themselves about their relationships with McDreamy and Burke, respectively.  George is given a hard task to expel a discharged and defiant woman from the hospital. Alex learns his fate after re-taking his medical exams. At the same time Izzie is trying to stop Alex from making stupid decisions when a patient that doesn't speak English is lied to by her coach. George, Cristina, and Alex compete in a hot dog eating competition.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Tell Me Sweet Little Lies	2
19	\N	Meredith and George are experiencing  morning-after tension at home and at work and it has the rest of the doctors wondering what's up. Derek and Addison are experiencing their own version of morning-after tension as a result of Mark's visit to Seattle. Bailey, returning the favor that was done for her during the Code Black situation, must treat Addison for a specific feminine problem. Izzie and Alex are making headway in their relationship until Denny Duquette comes back. Soon Alex is not-so-oddly jealous of the attention Izzie is showing to Denny. Someone finds comfort in confiding in a patient who is going through an ordeal of his own. Burke deals with a patient and gets to observe the patient's unstable relationship with his fiancée.	Grey's Anatomy	5	What Have I Done to Deserve This?	2
26	\N	Denny needs a heart or else. Izzie and George go crazy trying to get him one. Derek has the life of a friend in his hands as he operates on Burke who has been shot. Burke cannot operate on Denny after Denny's heart stopped and now Denny is in a dire condition. Cristina gets put in charge of the ER and she is worried about Burke.	Grey's Anatomy	5	Deterioration of the Fight or Flight Response	2
8	\N	Princess Aslaug's latest prophecy comes to fruition as she readies to give birth once more; Ragnar and Horik have very different ideas about the true purpose of their trip to Wessex.	Vikings	8	Boneless	2
3	\N	Floki learns of the heavy price he has paid for his actions. Rollo finds an unlikely ally in Count Odo. Bjorn has to fight a fierce opponent in the wilderness.	Vikings	8	Mercy	4
7	\N	In England, King Ecbert's true ambitions are revealed as he plots to gain the crown of Mercia while outside Paris. The Vikings attack Paris with considerable force, but will Rollo's defenses be too much for them to overcome? Meanwhile, Harbard, the mysterious wanderer, returns and causes a stir amongst the women of Kattegat.	Vikings	8	The Profit and the Loss	4
4	\N	Guided by Heahmund's visions, the Saxons devise a battle plan. Ivar the Boneless strategises as the Vikings undergo increasing pressure. Bjorn Ironside finds himself in a new territory and must convince the local commander he is a trader.	Vikings	8	The Plan	5
14	\N	As the celebrations for Ivar continue in Kattegat, grief hits Iceland and Floki must now make a fated decision. Harald's army approaches Wessex. A conspiracy grows against King Alfred.	Vikings	8	The Lost Moment	5
4	\N	Lagertha leads her village's response to the recent attacks, but despite her best efforts, the consequences are tragic. Olaf has a bold new plan for the future of Norway. Ivar discusses Oleg's ambitions for Scandinavia.	Vikings	8	All the Prisoners	6
14	\N	As his enemies scheme for power, Harald prepares for his coronation and chooses a queen. Ubbe's party reaches shore — but not the one they're seeking.	Vikings	8	Lost Souls	6
4	\N	In an effort to get over his infatuation with Chloe, Lucifer decides that he must seduce her. Meanwhile the two team up on a missing girl case and Amenadiel confronts Maze about his concerns about Lucifer.	Lucifer	9	Manly Whatnots	1
1	\N	Lucifer is distracted by his mother’s escape from hell, as he and Chloe investigate the murder of a stand-in actress. Meanwhile, Chloe’s faith in Lucifer is tested by the new medical examiner, Ella. Also, Amenadiel hopes to rein in Lucifer’s wild side, as they both deal with the absence of Maze.	Lucifer	9	Everything's Coming Up Lucifer	2
11	\N	Lucifer and Chloe investigate the murder of two victims, who happen to be Lucifer’s ex-flames.	Lucifer	9	Stewardess Interruptus	2
2	\N	After Lucifer removes his wings yet again, Linda becomes concerned that he is too focused on tracking down the Sinnerman and neglecting his own well-being. Tensions continue to rise between Lucifer and Chloe, but they realize they must put their differences aside to solve a case in which Lucifer takes a sudden interest. Once Detective Pierce's past is revealed though, everyone realizes that the Sinnerman is much more dangerous than they thought.	Lucifer	9	The One with the Baby Carrot	3
10	\N	With the Sinnerman in custody, Lucifer is prepared to go to any length to get his devil face back. Meanwhile, Trixie is introduced to Charlotte and questions the relationship she has with her father.	Lucifer	9	The Sin Bin	3
23	\N	When Lucifer and Chloe investigate the death of a woman, they discover that they may be pursuing the wrong suspect. Then, Charlotte risks her safety when she decides to take matters into her own hands.	Lucifer	9	Quintessential Deckerstar	3
7	\N	Eve takes a more active role in her main man's professional life. Meanwhile, Lucifer gets back to basics and Amenadiel fights for his family.	Lucifer	9	Devil Is As Devil Does	4
6	\N	After a popular DJ is electrocuted on stage, Chloe searches for the killer while Lucifer tries to keep his jealousy over an ex-flame in check.	Lucifer	9	BlueBallz	5
7	\N	Ana invites Mariana and her whole family for a weekend getaway at Valle de Bravo. Mariana becomes suspicious when she sees Tere and Juan Carlos arguing.	Daughter From Another Mother	10	Quality Time	1
7	\N	An old rival extends an invitation for The Mandalorian to make peace.	The Mandalorian	11	Chapter 7: The Reckoning	1
1	\N	Jefferson Pierce is a man wrestling with a secret. As the father of Anissa and Jennifer, and principal of a charter high school that also serves as a safe-haven for young people in a neighborhood overrun by gang violence, he is a hero in his community. Nine years ago, Pierce was a hero of a different sort. Gifted with the superhuman power to harness and control electricity, he used those powers to keep his hometown streets safe as the masked vigilante Black Lightning, but he left the Superhero days behind. Almost a decade later, Pierce’s crime-fighting days are long behind him…or so he thought.	Black Lightning	12	The Resurrection	1
10	\N	Black Lightning attempts to rescue several long-missing children reveals a secret he did not anticipate, and its resulting connections. Gambi struggles to stay strong while in a compromising position. Jefferson begins to view things differently.	Black Lightning	12	Sins of the Father: The Book of Redemption	1
5	\N	Jefferson and Anissa work together investigating the hometown of a creepy man at the clinic and make a shocking discovery. Meanwhile, with Syonide gone, Tobias puts an increasing amount of pressure on Khalil to help fill some of the void left in the organization.	Black Lightning	12	The Book of Blood: Chapter One: Requiem	2
15	\N	Lynn counsels former pod kid, Wendy, in how to live in a world that's new to her but the fate of the other pod kids remains in doubt. Meanwhile, Anissa figures out Grace's secret. Lastly, Jefferson tries to install a superhero code for his metahuman offspring, but Jennifer insists on taking revenge on Tobias for her boyfriend's death.	Black Lightning	12	The Book of the Apocalypse: Chapter One: The Alpha	2
9	\N	With the coming of the red skies, Jennifer finds herself torn between worlds.	Black Lightning	12	The Book of Resistance: Chapter Four: Earth Crisis	3
2	\N	The war between the 100 and the Kobra Cartel rages on. Meanwhile, Lynn continues to be concerned about Jefferson and Jennifer's curiosity is piqued by a new boy at school.	Black Lightning	12	The Book of Reconstruction: Chapter Two	4
2	\N	Web sleuths dissect Elisa's social media posts. A grisly discovery changes everything at the hotel already known as the Night Stalker's onetime lair.	Crime Scene: The Vanishing at the Cecil Hotel	14	Secrets of the Cecil	1
4	\N	Joffrey punishes Sansa for Robb’s victories, and Tyrion scrambles to temper the king’s cruelty. Catelyn entreats Stannis and Renly to unite against the Lannisters. Dany and her khalasar arrive at the prosperous city of Qarth. Tyrion coerces a relative into being his eyes and ears. Arya and Gendry are taken to Harrenhal, where their lives are in the hands of Ser Gregor Clegane. Stannis orders Davos to smuggle Melisandre into a secret cove.	Game of Thrones	15	Garden of Bones	2
2	\N	Sansa says too much. Shae asks Tyrion for a favor. Jaime finds a way to pass the time, while Arya encounters the Brotherhood Without Banners.	Game of Thrones	15	Dark Wings, Dark Words	3
5	\N	The fleet returns to Kattegat to discover tragic circumstances await.	Vikings	8	The Usurper	3
5	\N	There's an air of betrayal as those whom Odo trusts plot against him. Ecbert agrees to support Kwenthrith in Mercia. Pregnancy brings happiness to Lagertha and Kalf and a marriage is arranged.	Vikings	8	Promised	4
7	\N	Bjorn returns to Kattegat to learn that an attack will take place during the next full moon. Ivar must decide if he can place his trust in a former enemy on the battlefield.	Vikings	8	Full Moon	5
17	\N	An unexpected turn amongst the settlers leaves Floki powerless. King Alfred confronts Judith. In York, Bjorn must strike a deal with Harald. Wessex is once again threatened by a Viking force, but who will lead the Saxon army to defend the Realm?	Vikings	8	The Most Terrible Thing	5
7	\N	Bjorn returns to Kattegat. Harald gains a measure of revenge on Olaf. In Kiev, interesting news reaches Ivar and Igor about Prince Dir.	Vikings	8	The Ice Maiden	6
1	\N	Upon leaving hell, Lucifer Morningstar retreats to Los Angeles for a more exciting life. When the murder of a friend connects him with LAPD detective Chloe Decker, Lucifer becomes intrigued with the idea of punishing criminals, sending the devil himself into a struggle between good and evil.	Lucifer	9	Pilot	1
13	\N	When Lucifer is framed for murder, he and Chloe must work together to clear his name and prove the identity of the true killer.	Lucifer	9	Take Me Back To Hell	1
10	\N	Charlotte is determined to get Lucifer to leave Earth by turning Chloe against him. Meanwhile, Amenadiel has begun working as Charlotte's soldier, which makes Maze question his loyalty.	Lucifer	9	Quid Pro Ho	2
3	\N	After talking to Lucifer and Linda, Maze realizes that she is looking for more out of life and decides to head to Canada for a tricky case. Chloe however, becomes concerned when she feels that Maze is being deceived by a scheming conman. Upon further investigation, Lucifer and Chloe make a stunning realization when they find that their target may be much closer than they thought.	Lucifer	9	Mr. and Mrs. Mazikeen Smith	3
11	\N	In a flashback episode that takes place when Lucifer first came to LA, Amenadiel comes to retrieve his fallen brother, but is shocked when he is mugged. Amenadiel enlists Lucifer's help to track down the mugger and Lucifer, in turn, offers his assistance - but only in exchange for a favor. Meanwhile, Chloe and Dan - who are still married - investigate the murder of an MMA fighter, Aidan Scott, at the hands of the same killer who mugged Amenadiel.	Lucifer	9	City of Angels?	3
22	\N	When Chloe takes some time off, Lucifer is forced to work with Dan on a murder case involving a dog show. Meanwhile, Charlotte and Maze have differing ideas for Chloe's party and after a wild night, Chloe rethinks a life-changing decision.	Lucifer	9	All Hands on Decker	3
6	\N	While Lucifer and Chloe search for a connection between a murdered auditor and a nudist colony, Amenadiel plays host to an unexpected visitor.	Lucifer	9	Orgy Pants to Work	4
5	\N	Amenadiel helps Chloe investigate a nun's untimely demise. Meanwhile, Lucifer lends Dan a hand, and Linda reveals a painful part of her history.	Lucifer	9	Detective Amenadiel	5
8	\N	Ana travels to Buenos Aires and bumps into someone from her past. As the babies start solid food, Mariana considers moving out. Ana has a health scare.	Daughter From Another Mother	10	Lies	1
8	\N	The Mandalorian comes face-to-face with an unexpected enemy.	The Mandalorian	11	Chapter 8: Redemption	1
4	\N	Black Lightning is recruited to rally against The 100 gang. Anissa investigates the new drug hitting the streets. Meanwhile, familiar faces begin to reappear.	Black Lightning	12	Black Jesus	1
1	\N	Jefferson Pierce and his family may have survived Tobias’s attack, but they’re not out of the woods yet. Concerned for the safety of Garfield’s students, the board considers a motion to shut down the school, forcing Jefferson to go to Napier Frank to sway the vote. Jennifer struggles with her powers and her actions have unforeseen repercussions. Meanwhile, Anissa finds a new way to give back to Freeland. Lastly, Lynn continues her quest much to the dismay of Agent Odell.	Black Lightning	12	The Book of Consequences: Chapter One: Rise of the Green Light Babies	2
10	\N	Still on the run, Jennifer and Khalil succumb to their feelings for one another and begin planning their future together. Meanwhile, Jefferson approaches Henderson with a favor.	Black Lightning	12	The Book of Rebellion: Chapter Three: Angelitos Negros	2
3	\N	When Lynn learns that Jefferson brokered a deal with Agent Odell without consulting her first, it begins to put a strain on their relationship. Meanwhile, Anissa and Grace have an emotional encounter.	Black Lightning	12	The Book of Occupation: Chapter Three: Agent Odell's Pipe-Dream	3
13	\N	Black Lightning and his team descend upon Markovia on a mission to rescue Lynn who finds herself in even more trouble when she meets Gravedigger, a metahuman on the Markovian side.	Black Lightning	12	The Book of Markovia: Chapter Four: Grab the Strap	3
2	\N	A new day dawns as the students explore their powers… and feelings. Bloom and Stella team up for a mission. The Burned One’s reign of terror evolves.	Fate: The Winx Saga	13	No Strangers Here	1
2	\N	While Bran recovers from his fall, Ned takes only his daughters to Kings Landing. Jon Snow goes with his uncle Benjen to The Wall. Tyrion joins them.	Game of Thrones	15	The Kingsroad	1
1	\N	As Robb Stark and his northern army continue the war against the Lannisters, Tyrion arrives in King’s Landing to counsel Joffrey and temper the young king’s excesses.  On the island of Dragonstone, Stannis Baratheon plots an invasion to claim his late brother’s throne, allying himself with the fiery Melisandre, a strange priestess of a stranger god.  Across the sea, Daenerys, her three young dragons, and the khalasar trek through the Red Waste in search of allies, or water.  In the North, Bran presides over a threadbare Winterfell, while beyond the Wall, Jon Snow and the Night’s Watch must shelter with a devious wildling.	Game of Thrones	15	The North Remembers	2
1	\N	Jon meets the King-Beyond-the-Wall while his Night Watch Brothers flee south. In King's Landing, Tyrion wants a reward, Margaery shows her charitable nature, Cersei arranges a dinner party, and Littlefinger offers to help Sansa. Across the Narrow Sea, Daenerys starts her journey west.	Game of Thrones	15	Valar Dohaeris	3
5	\N	Cersei and Tywin plan the Crown's next move; Dany discusses future plans; Jon Snow begins a new mission.	Game of Thrones	15	First of His Name	4
5	\N	Dany makes a difficult decision in Meereen. Jon recruits the help of an unexpected ally. Brienne searches for Sansa. Theon remains under Ramsay's control.	Game of Thrones	15	Kill the Boy	5
4	\N	Tyrion strikes a deal. Jorah and Daario undertake a difficult task. Jaime and Cersei try to improve their situation.	Game of Thrones	15	Book of the Stranger	6
6	\N	Preparations for the Paris raid pick up speed, and Rollo thinks about the Seer's prophecy.	Vikings	8	Born Again	3
9	\N	The labors of the Vikings eventually bear fruit as, within sight of Paris, they re-launch their boats but this time along with some interesting structures that Floki has built. Aethelwulf and Alfred eventually arrive in Rome and honors are conferred by Pope Leo but relations are not so cordial in Wessex between King Ecbert and the disgruntled King Aelle.	Vikings	8	Death All 'Round	4
17	\N	The Viking army begins to gather in Kattegat. Lagertha must remain vigilant in the absence of her son, Bjorn.	Vikings	8	The Great Army	4
2	\N	Tensions mount between the sons of Ragnar Lothbrok as the Vikings continue to threaten the very heart of England. As the Great Army moves to take York, with King Aethelwulf and his family still in hiding, Heahmund—the warrior bishop—must rally the Saxons to defend the Realm.	Vikings	8	The Departed Part Two	5
9	\N	The army leaders consider their options in the aftermath of the battle. In Floki's camp, all hopes of binding the community together are dashed as tragedy unfolds.	Vikings	8	A Simple Story	5
18	\N	Hvitserk is severely tested. Floki makes an amazing discovery. Freydis gives Ivar a surprise. Ubbe negotiates with the three Danish Kings that have massed their armies in Reading, but the negotiations may have a perilous outcome.	Vikings	8	Baldur	5
10	\N	Ivar and Igor may be plotting against Oleg, but they're still part of the force that departs Kiev to invade Scandinavia. King Harald and King Bjorn begin furious preparations for the invasion.	Vikings	8	The Best Laid Plans	6
18	\N	King Alfred falls ill as the Viking army seizes the high ground. Ingrid curses Erik. Ubbe and his people find a new world — but they're not alone.	Vikings	8	It's Only Magic	6
8	\N	When a therapist is murdered, Lucifer and Chloe enlist the help of Dr. Linda to look into possible suspects. Meanwhile, Malcolm confronts Chloe about the night he was shot, and Lucifer experiences his first bout of jealousy.	Lucifer	9	Et Tu, Doctor?	1
5	\N	Lucifer is excited to investigate the murder of his favorite action movie hero, Wesley Cabot. Longtime rival Rolf Van Zandt initially is a suspect, but the investigation soon shifts. Meanwhile, Uriel shows up and Amenadiel is forced to come clean about his lost powers. Also, Lucifer and Uriel fight about Chloe and their mother.	Lucifer	9	Weaponizer	2
14	\N	Lucifer returns to the city with a new bride in tow, oblivious to the distress his absence has caused. Determined to restore his working relationship with Chloe, he inserts himself into the investigation of the murder of an up-and-coming band's lead singer.	Lucifer	9	Candy Morningstar	2
6	\N	When Lucifer discovers Candy has gone missing, he hightails it to Las Vegas with Ella in tow. They work to find her, but interesting secrets could compromise the investigation. Meanwhile, Chloe is upset that Lucifer left on her birthday.	Lucifer	9	Vegas With Some Radish	3
16	\N	When a murder investigation reveals the dark side of Hollywood, Chloe puts her life on the line to protect an innocent victim. Then, Lucifer comes up with a hell-raising scheme to help Cain, but when Amenadiel and Maze get involved, things don't quite go as planned.	Lucifer	9	Infernal Guinea Pig	3
25	\N	Lucifer and the team investigate the murder of a child psychiatrist, while Ella thinks about a big childhood secret that she’s been hiding.	Lucifer	9	Boo Normal	3
9	\N	Lucifer's so-called epiphany has Chloe worried, but it's his physical transformation that's really freaking her out. Also, Maze gives Eve a pep talk.	Lucifer	9	Save Lucifer	4
1	\N	Four months after their babies were swapped, workaholic Ana and student Mariana prepare to carry out the exchange. But what if they don't have to?	Daughter From Another Mother	10	Eeny, Meeny, Miny, Moe	1
4	\N	The Mandalorian teams up with an ex-soldier to protect a village from raiders.	The Mandalorian	11	Chapter 4: Sanctuary	1
8	\N	The Mandalorian and his allies attempt a daring rescue.	The Mandalorian	11	Chapter 16: The Rescue	2
9	\N	In the aftermath of the latest killing, Black Lightning works to clear his name while also hunting down the person responsible for his father’s death, and anyone else involved. Tensions remain high between Black Lightning and Gambi.	Black Lightning	12	The Book of Little Black Lies	1
4	\N	Jefferson confronts Anissa about her reckless and irresponsible behavior leading to a fierce disagreement.	Black Lightning	12	The Book of Consequences: Chapter Four: Translucent Freak	2
14	\N	Looking for answers, a worried Anissa sets out to find Grace.	Black Lightning	12	The Book of Secrets: Chapter Four: Original Sin	2
8	\N	Black Lightning decides to fight back when the ASA threatens his old neighborhood. Thunder battles Painkiller, and Tobias has a plan for Lynn to stop the ASA from weaponizing the metas.	Black Lightning	12	The Book of Resistance: Chapter Three: The Battle of Franklin Terrace	3
3	\N	Jefferson is feeling even more lost after a frustrating therapy session. Meanwhile, Anissa continues to care for a still comatose Grace. Lastly, Lynn has a breakthrough.	Black Lightning	12	The Book of Reconstruction: Chapter Three	4
3	\N	The mystery deepens: Did a crime occur? The obsessed descend on the Cecil hoping to solve the case and tumble down the rabbit hole of conspiracy.	Crime Scene: The Vanishing at the Cecil Hotel	14	Down the Rabbit Hole	1
2	\N	In the wake of a bloody purge in the capital, Tyrion chastens Cersei for alienating the king’s subjects.  On the road north, Arya shares a secret with Gendry, a Night’s Watch recruit.  With supplies dwindling, one of Dany’s scouts returns with news of their position.  After nine years as a Stark ward, Theon Greyjoy reunites with his father Balon, who wants to restore the ancient Kingdom of the Iron Islands.  Davos enlists Salladhor Saan, a pirate, to join forces with Stannis and Melisandre for a naval invasion of King’s Landing.	Game of Thrones	15	The Night Lands	2
10	\N	Tyrion awakens to a changed situation. King Joffrey doles out rewards to his subjects. As Theon stirs his men to action, Luwin offers some final advice. Brienne silences Jaime. Arya receives a gift from Jaqen. Dany goes to a strange place. Jon proves himself to Qhorin.	Game of Thrones	15	Valar Morghulis	2
3	\N	Tyrion ponders his options. Tywin extends an olive branch. Sam realizes Castle Black isn’t safe, and Jon proposes a bold plan. The Hound teaches Arya the way things are. Dany chooses her champion.	Game of Thrones	15	Breaker of Chains	4
3	\N	In Braavos, Arya sees the Many-Faced God. In King's Landing, Queen Margaery enjoys her new husband. Tyrion and Varys walk the Long Bridge of Volantis.	Game of Thrones	15	High Sparrow	5
7	\N	The Viking fleet causes panic in Paris. The Emperor Charles declares he will remain in the city.	Vikings	8	Paris	3
10	\N	A ferocious battle between the Vikings and the French eventually comes down to Ragnar against Rollo. The outcome will seal the fate of the two brothers.	Vikings	8	The Last Ship	4
1	\N	Tensions mount between the sons of Ragnar Lothbrok as the Vikings continue to threaten the very heart of England. As the Great Army moves to take York, with King Aethelwulf and his family still in hiding, Heahmund—the warrior bishop—must rally the Saxons to defend the Realm.	Vikings	8	The Departed Part One	5
13	\N	Heahmund must try to convince King Alfred that his actions are in defense of the Crown. Ubbe and Torvi strengthen the position of the Vikings but not all in the Viking camp support their strategy. Another settler disappears in Iceland.	Vikings	8	A New God	5
2	\N	Messengers arrive in Kattegat with news that presents Bjorn with a dilemma. Prince Oleg of Kiev seems untroubled by his conscience. Lagertha has settled into her new, peaceful life, but danger lurks nearby.	Vikings	8	The Prophet	6
12	\N	Ubbe persuades the settlers in Iceland to embark on a voyage of exploration. The defeat of the Rus creates power vacuums in both Kattegat and Kiev.	Vikings	8	All Change	6
17	\N	Ivar and Hvitserk lead King Harald's army to England, where King Alfred of Wessex abandons his royal villa and marches to meet the sons of Ragnar.	Vikings	8	The Raft of Medusa	6
7	\N	In attempt to find the contents of his stolen container, Lucifer enlists the help of an unlikely ally. Meanwhile, Chloe digs deeper into the Palmetto case, uncovering a lead that might finally expose the truth.	Lucifer	9	Wingman	1
4	\N	After the bodies of two young L.A. transplants are found poisoned, Chloe and Lucifer hunt for the killer. Upon Maze convincing Chloe to go out for drinks, which the detective perceives as an act of friendship, but is actually part of a bet between Maze and Lucifer, the two make a shocking decision.	Lucifer	9	Lady Parts	2
16	\N	When a grisly murder takes place at an insane asylum, the prime suspect calls himself God. After realizing that this man could actually be his father, Lucifer struggles with his feelings towards him and tries to find the truth, all while trying to discover who the real killer is.	Lucifer	9	God Johnson	2
8	\N	When a murder is connected to a celebrity dating app, Lucifer and Chloe question all they know about the world of social media in order to solve the case. Meanwhile, Ella tries to avoid Charlotte, and Amenadiel helps Linda deal with the death of her ex-husband.	Lucifer	9	Chloe Does Lucifer	3
17	\N	When a superstar singer's life is threatened, the team is thrust into the world of big-ticket stadium shows, crazed fans and divas, giving Lucifer a run for his money. Meanwhile, Charlotte tries to help Linda and Maze repair their friendship.	Lucifer	9	Let Pinhead Sing!	3
26	\N	Lucifer's dad creates an alternate dimension in which Lucifer now lives in a world where he not only has never met Chloe, but is granted the freedom of choice.	Lucifer	9	Once Upon a Time	3
1	\N	Lucifer toys with a murder victim while Chloe and Maze investigate the death. Meanwhile, Amenadiel cleans up the club, and Linda mothers a genius.	Lucifer	9	Really Sad Devil Guy	5
3	\N	Pablo, Regina's dad, threatens to sue Mariana. Ana attends a class to bond with Valentina. Mariana reaches out to Anuar, her estranged dad.	Daughter From Another Mother	10	Family Dynamics	1
6	\N	The Mandalorian joins a crew of mercenaries on a dangerous mission.	The Mandalorian	11	Chapter 6: The Prisoner	1
6	\N	The Mandalorian and Child travel to an ancient site.	The Mandalorian	11	Chapter 14: The Tragedy	2
7	\N	Black Lightning’s pursuit for Tobias continues. Anissa continues to find herself in the new normal.	Black Lightning	12	Equinox: The Book of Fate	1
6	\N	Black Lightning and Thunder return to South Freeland in an attempt to figure out what is going on. When they arrive, they are directed to a nearby wood where they are surrounded by a clan of mixed-race moonshiners called the Perdi. Meanwhile, Lynn, feeling tremendous guilt, falls into a deep depression. Lastly, Tobias finds that his plan is falling apart.	Black Lightning	12	The Book of Blood: Chapter Two: The Perdi	2
16	\N	Lynn goes head to head with Dr. Jace once and for all. Meanwhile, Gambi risks his life to save Jennifer. Lastly, Tobias makes a major move to cripple Freeland and kill Black Lightning, requiring our superhero family to step up like never before.	Black Lightning	12	The Book of the Apocalypse: Chapter Two: The Omega	2
10	\N	Jefferson navigates his new reality following the events of the Crisis, and Lynn’s determination to save the meta kids deepens her troubles. Meanwhile, Anissa/Blackbird faces new challenges. Lastly, Jennifer’s bond with Brandon begins to grow.	Black Lightning	12	The Book of Markovia: Chapter One: Blessings and Curses Reborn	3
4	\N	Jefferson pays Tobias a visit and warns him to stay away from his family.	Black Lightning	12	The Book of Reconstruction: Chapter Four	4
1	\N	The once-grand Cecil Hotel provides a nightmarish backdrop for the disappearance of Elisa Lam. Her final footage in an elevator triggers a viral hunt.	Crime Scene: The Vanishing at the Cecil Hotel	14	Lost in Los Angeles	1
7	\N	Robert has been injured while hunting and is dying. Jon and the others finally take their vows to the Night's Watch. A man, sent by Robert, is captured for trying to poison Daenerys. Furious, Drogo vows to attack the Seven Kingdoms.	Game of Thrones	15	You Win or You Die	1
7	\N	Jamie meets a distant relative. Daenerys receives an invitation to the House of the Undying. Theon leads a search party. Jon loses his way in the wilderness. Cersei counsels Sansa.	Game of Thrones	15	A Man Without Honor	2
7	\N	Daenerys exchanges gifts with a slave lord outside of Yunkai. As Sansa frets about her prospects, Shae chafes at Tyrion’s new situation. Tywin counsels the king, and Melisandre reveals a secret to Gendry. Brienne faces a formidable foe in Harrenhal.	Game of Thrones	15	The Bear and the Maiden Fair	3
9	\N	Jon Snow and the Night's Watch face a big challenge.	Game of Thrones	15	The Watchers on the Wall	4
8	\N	Arya makes progress in her training. Sansa confronts an old friend. Cersei struggles. Jon travels.	Game of Thrones	15	Hardhome	5
8	\N	While Jaime weighs his options, Cersei answers a request. Tyrion's plans bear fruit. Arya faces a new test.	Game of Thrones	15	No One	6
4	\N	In the wake of a costly victory, Jon and Daenerys look to the south as Tyrion eyes a compromise that could save countless lives.	Game of Thrones	15	The Last of the Starks	8
9	\N	Lisa calls her teacher, Ms. Hoover, a hack and refuses to apologize. Then, she learns Ms. Hoover's private pain.	The Simpsons	18	Sorry Not Sorry	32
8	\N	The Viking army sets out and Paris goes into lockdown as the army prepares the defense.	Vikings	8	To the Gates!	3
11	\N	Ragnar returns to Kattegat and formulates a plan to head back to Wessex, where he intends to right past wrongs.. Meanwhile, Lagertha plans a power play in Kattegat and Bjorn prepares to fulfill his long-held dream to explore the Mediterranean in a sleek new boat built for him by Floki.	Vikings	8	The Outsider	4
5	\N	Ivar meets his match in Heahmund. Floki returns to Kattegat. Bjorn receives a lavish welcome in North Africa.	Vikings	8	The Prisoner	5
15	\N	Bishop Heahmund is wracked with guilt as he fights to renounce his passions. Viking will clash with Saxon on the battlefield leaving a key figure lost in the balance.	Vikings	8	Hell	5
5	\N	As Norway’s Kings and Jarls arrive at Harald’s territory for the election of the King of all Norway, Olaf is certain of the result, however, it may not go as smoothly as he believes. Lagertha’s village is anxious in anticipation of another attack and she is relieved when Gunnhild arrives with re-enforcements. In Kiev, Igor and Ivar engage in subterfuge and Ivar is stunned when he encounters a ghost from his past.	Vikings	8	The Key	6
15	\N	Factions in Greenland spill blood, driving Ubbe's company away. Troops under Ivar and Dir seize Kiev for Prince Igor. Gunnhild makes a fateful choice.	Vikings	8	All at Sea	6
5	\N	After a shooting occurs at a fashion show and a young woman is killed, Lucifer becomes intrigued by the danger of the situation and begs Chloe to get in on the case. Meanwhile, when Maze admits to Amenadiel that she wants to go back to hell, he sets his sights on Dr. Linda.	Lucifer	9	Sweet Kicks	1
2	\N	When Lucifer’s mother, Charlotte, turns up at the scene of a grizzly murder pleading innocence, Lucifer is hesitant to believe her tale. Not wanting to leave her on her own, he instructs Maze to babysit her – and not to torture her, allowing him to investigate the case with Chloe.	Lucifer	9	Liar, Liar, Slutty Dress on Fire	2
12	\N	Lucifer and Chloe investigate a mysterious masked killer who is poisoning college students.	Lucifer	9	Love Handles	2
4	\N	When a youth counselor is found murdered, Lucifer and Chloe venture into the world of high-end reform programs to find the killer. Meanwhile, Amenadiel adjusts his lifestyle in an attempt to help Lucifer, and Chloe questions Lt. Pierce's feelings towards her.	Lucifer	9	What Would Lucifer Do?	3
14	\N	When Chloe and Lucifer's investigation into the murder of a diamond thief points to one of Ella's brothers as the main suspect, Ella is driven to prove her brother's innocence and recruits an unlikely ally. Meanwhile, Linda is upset when Charlotte comes to her for help and Detective Pierce hashes out his issues with Amenadiel.	Lucifer	9	My Brother's Keeper	3
24	\N	Shocked by someone's death, Chloe, Lucifer and the rest of the team work together to investigate and take down the killer. Then, Lucifer has an epiphany, Maze decides to mend a broken friendship and Chloe finally sees the truth.	Lucifer	9	A Devil of My Word	3
8	\N	Lucifer and Chloe investigate a teacher's murder. Meanwhile, Lucifer goes to extremes to convince Eve to dump him, and Amenadiel mentors a teen.	Lucifer	9	Super Bad Boyfriend	4
8	\N	Chloe learns a serial killer may have embellished his crimes. Amenadiel worries about his son's health. Pete opens up to Ella.	Lucifer	9	Spoiler Alert	5
1	\N	A Mandalorian bounty hunter tracks a target for a well-paying client.	The Mandalorian	11	Chapter 1: The Mandalorian	1
5	\N	The Mandalorian journeys to a world ruled by a cruel magistrate who has made a powerful enemy.	The Mandalorian	11	Chapter 13: The Jedi	2
11	\N	As suspicions grow that Jefferson Pierce is Black Lightning, the ASA arranges to have him arrested.  Lynn seeks help from Detective Henderson. Meanwhile, as Jefferson is in custody, Gambi and Anissa work together to show Black Lightning is still running around the streets of Freeland.	Black Lightning	12	Black Jesus: The Book of Crucifixion	1
8	\N	The Pierce family is reeling in the wake of Jennifer's disappearance. Jefferson, Lynn and Anissa all gather to discuss the most effective way to find her. After learning that Jennifer is with Khalil, Lynn goes to Detective Henderson to ask him to issue a warrant for Khalil's arrest. Meanwhile, Jennifer and Khalil are doing their best to stay off the grid but Tobias's new henchwoman Cutter is closing in on them.	Black Lightning	12	The Book of Rebellion: Chapter One: Exodus	2
2	\N	With Freeland under full-blown occupation, the Pierce family gets pulled in different directions. Jefferson and Lynn find themselves at odds with each other. Meanwhile, Anissa rebels as Blackbird while Jennifer feels powerless despite having powers.	Black Lightning	12	The Book of Occupation: Chapter Two: Maryam's Tasbih	3
12	\N	Jefferson and Anissa join forces with the ASA to help one of their own. Meanwhile, Lynn is forced to continue battling her demons.	Black Lightning	12	The Book of Markovia: Chapter Three: Motherless ID	3
1	\N	In hopes of mastering her magic, Bloom begins her studies at Alfea — and crosses paths with her curious classmates. Meanwhile, a secret comes to light.	Fate: The Winx Saga	13	To the Waters and the Wild	1
1	\N	Jon Arryn, the Hand of the King, is dead. King Robert Baratheon plans to ask his oldest friend, Eddard Stark, to take Jon's place. Across the sea, Viserys Targaryen plans to wed his sister to a nomadic warlord in exchange for an army.	Game of Thrones	15	Winter Is Coming	1
3	\N	At the Red Keep, Tyrion plots three alliances through the promise of marriage.  Catelyn arrives in the Stormlands to forge an alliance of her own, but King Renly, his new wife Margaery, and her brother Loras Tyrell have other plans.  At Winterfell, Luwin tries to decipher Bran’s dreams.	Game of Thrones	15	What is Dead May Never Die	2
3	\N	Tyrion shoulders new responsibilities. Jon is taken to the Fist of the First Men. Daenerys meets with the slavers. Jaime strikes a deal with his captors.	Game of Thrones	15	Walk of Punishment	3
1	\N	Tyrion welcomes a guest to King’s Landing. At Castle Black, Jon Snow finds himself unwelcome. Dany is pointed to Meereen, the mother of all slave cities. Arya runs into an old friend.	Game of Thrones	15	Two Swords	4
10	\N	Circumstances change after an unexpected arrival from north of the Wall. Dany must face harsh realities. Bran learns more about his destiny. Tyrion sees the truth about his situation.	Game of Thrones	15	The Children	4
9	\N	Stannis confronts a troubling decision. Jon returns to The Wall. Mace visits the Iron Bank. Arya encounters someone from her past. Dany reluctantly oversees a traditional celebration of athleticism.	Game of Thrones	15	The Dance of Dragons	5
9	\N	As the Starks prepare to fight, Davos loses something dear. Ramsay plays a game. Daenerys faces a choice.	Game of Thrones	15	Battle of the Bastards	6
10	\N	With one last chance to take Paris, Ragnar, and his Vikings troops take a daring chance. Ragnar asks Bjorn for a favor that could change the course of Viking history.	Vikings	8	The Dead	3
12	\N	The Kattegat locals chide Ragnar that the gods have deserted him as he struggles to crew his voyage to Wessex. It's Bjorn who has charisma now as he prepares to fulfill his long-held dream to explore the Mediterranean in a sleek new boat built for him by Floki. By contrast, Ragnar must accept weathered boats and a crew he has bribed but when Aslaug foresees that the fleet will be lost in a vicious storm her warnings go un-heeded by Ragnar and her precious son, Ivar.	Vikings	8	The Vision	4
16	\N	Bjorn's fleet sails onward and launches a surprise attack. Back in Kattegat, Lagertha continues in her quest for power.	Vikings	8	Crossings	4
20	\N	Prince Aethelwulf finds himself subject to the Vikings' battle master plan. Ecbert remains behind with a plan of his own.	Vikings	8	The Reckoning	4
12	\N	Bjorn, Lagertha and Ubbe face an uncertain fate as Heahmund's loyalty is tested. Floki fights to understand the will of the gods. Ivar may have met his match.	Vikings	8	Murder Most Foul	5
3	\N	Lagertha is forced to take action. In Kiev, although Oleg continues to be friendly, Ivar is aware of the threat which Oleg poses to the vulnerable young heir to the throne. Bjorn has answered the call and come to the aid of an old enemy.	Vikings	8	Ghosts, Gods, and Running Dogs	6
13	\N	The election for Kattegat's new ruler is held, but a surprise visitor disrupts the proceedings. Ivar puts his plan to overthrow Oleg into action.	Vikings	8	The Signal	6
3	\N	When a 22-year-old future superstar quarterback wakes up to find a dead girl floating in his swimming pool, he turns to his friend, Lucifer, for help. Lucifer enlists Chloe to investigate the case, which leads to the world of big money sports and people who will literally kill to be number one.	Lucifer	9	The Would-Be Prince of Darkness	1
12	\N	When a woman is found dead on the Hollywood Walk of Fame - with her body  twisted into the shape of a pentagram - the investigation leads Lucifer  and team into the world of Satanists, where they soon realize, evil  doesn't always live where we expect it to.	Lucifer	9	#TeamLucifer	1
9	\N	Following the murder of the owner of the building in which Lux is located, Lucifer and Chloe search for the killer, while Lucifer also deals with the fact that the new owner wants to evict him and demolish the place. Lucifer goes to great lengths to protect his home, and is entirely shocked when Chloe is supportive of him. Meanwhile, Maze and Amenadiel follow Charlotte around, as she comes up with a plan to upset Lucifer enough to want to leave earth and go back to Heaven.	Lucifer	9	Homewrecker	2
1	\N	Lucifer enlists Chloe's help to determine why he woke up in the desert with his wings on his back again, which could be related to an active crime scene.	Lucifer	9	They're Back, Aren't They?	3
13	\N	When an ecstasy cook-turned-chemistry-teacher is found murdered in a cozy Los Angeles suburb, Lucifer and Pierce must go undercover to help track down the killer. Meanwhile, Maze has a newfound attraction for someone that she used to despise and Charlotte has a revelation.	Lucifer	9	Til Death Do Us Part	3
21	\N	When a prima ballerina is brutally murdered, Lucifer helps Chloe solve the case and attempts to keep her focus away from Pierce. Amenadiel begs Charlotte to help him with an important plan, and Maze remains devoted to a task from which Pierce asked her to back away. Then, Chloe confronts Lucifer about his meddling in her life, but as he's about to make a huge confession, he finds out something that changes everything.	Lucifer	9	Anything Pierce Can Do I Can Do Better	3
5	\N	After a collector of classic cars is killed, Lucifer and Chloe search for the culprit -- as well as some closure to their relationship.	Lucifer	9	Expire Erect	4
7	\N	As a shocking side effect of his romance with Chloe throws Lucifer for a loop, the new couple pursues a murderer with a most unusual M.O.	Lucifer	9	Our Mojo	5
9	\N	Although Ana wants the babies to be christened, Mariana wants a welcome ritual for Regina. But a secret uncovered threatens to ruin both celebrations.	Daughter From Another Mother	10	Baptism	1
1	\N	The Mandalorian is drawn to the Outer Rim in search of others of his kind.	The Mandalorian	11	Chapter 9: The Marshal	2
2	\N	As the community struggles with the violence surrounding them, a glimmer of hope appears: Is Black Lightning back? Lynn Stewart, noticing the changes in the community, is also left wondering. While Jefferson Pierce struggles with his decision, Gambi urges him to take up the mantle once more and return to life as Black Lightning. Anissa and Jennifer try to deal with the aftermath of their jolting experience.	Black Lightning	12	Lawanda: The Book of Hope	1
12	\N	Tobias returns to Freeland. He is tasked to capture – not kill – Black Lightning with the help of an unexpected source. After a battle of epic proportions, Anissa and Jennifer provide surprising aid.	Black Lightning	12	The Resurrection and the Light: The Book of Pain	1
9	\N	After Jennifer and Khalil escape, they take refuge in a barn and Jennifer desperately tries to save a now feverish Khalil, who has grown worse from Cutter's poisonous blade. Meanwhile, Jefferson, Lynn and Anissa try everything they can to track down Jennifer and Khalil.	Black Lightning	12	The Book of Rebellion: Chapter Two: Gift of Magi	2
5	\N	Jefferson struggles with the effects on his family, leading to a decision with tragic consequences. Meanwhile, Anissa's identity is threatened. Lastly, Agent Odell takes an important step toward winning over Jennifer.	Black Lightning	12	The Book of Occupation: Chapter Five: Requiem for Tavon	3
14	\N	As the battle continues, old alliances are revisited and new alliances forged.	Black Lightning	12	The Book of War: Chapter One: Homecoming	3
3	\N	Past meets present as Bloom explores a pivotal memory. Meanwhile, Aisha struggles with her studies, Silva shares a secret and a school party takes shape.	Fate: The Winx Saga	13	Heavy Mortal Hopes	1
3	\N	Lord Stark and his daughters arrive at King's Landing to discover the intrigues of the king's realm.	Game of Thrones	15	Lord Snow	1
10	\N	With Ned dead, Robb vows to get revenge on the Lannisters. Jon must officially decide if his place is with Robb or the Night's Watch. Daenerys says her final goodbye to Drogo.	Game of Thrones	15	Fire and Blood	1
5	\N	The Hound is judged by the gods. Jaime is judged by men. Jon proves himself. Robb is betrayed. Tyrion learns the cost of weddings.	Game of Thrones	15	Kissed by Fire	3
2	\N	Tyrion lends Jaime a hand. Joffrey and Margaery host a breakfast. At Dragonstone, Stannis loses patience with Davos. Ramsay finds a purpose for his pet. North of the Wall, Bran sees where they must go.	Game of Thrones	15	The Lion and the Rose	4
9	\N	Paris is hit with a second assault. Emperor Charles needs to make a difficult decision.	Vikings	8	Breaking Point	3
6	\N	Ragnar declares another raid on Paris at the Thing in Kattegat. Ecbert also has a journey in mind as he dispatches Aethelwulf and Alfred on a pilgrimage to Rome.	Vikings	8	What Might Have Been	4
15	\N	Ragnar and Ivar plot against the Saxons and reach a new level of understanding.	Vikings	8	All His Angels	4
19	\N	The Viking army causes panic in the English countryside as King Ecbert and Aethelwulf plan the defense of the realm.	Vikings	8	On the Eve	4
11	\N	Ivar is crowned the new king of Kattegat just in time to welcome Rollo home. Bjorn, Lagertha and Ubbe must rely on unsteady alliances to survive.	Vikings	8	The Revelation	5
1	\N	It’s six months after the battle of Kattegat and Bjorn is now King. As he struggles with the responsibilities of kingship, he finds he can’t rely on his mother. Ivar falls into the hands of the Kievan Rus, and in their ruthless and unpredictable ruler, Prince Oleg, he may finally have met his match.	Vikings	8	New Beginnings	6
11	\N	In Iceland, Ubbe learns the truth about Kjetill and has a difficult decision to make. Back in Norway, the battle against the Rus has had grave consequences. But re-enforcements have arrived, and Bjorn has an idea that may yet save the day.	Vikings	8	King of Kings	6
19	\N	Ubbe and the settlers open relations with the indigenous people of the new land. Ivar's strategy lures Alfred's forces into a devastating battle.	Vikings	8	The Lord Giveth...	6
9	\N	A priest seeks out Lucifer's help when he suspects an underground drug operation has set up shop at a neighborhood youth center. Meanwhile, Malcolm manipulates a way to keep an eye on Dan.	Lucifer	9	A Priest Walks Into A Bar	1
6	\N	Guilty and self-destructive, Lucifer clashes with Chloe during an investigation, leading her to team up with Dan instead. Meanwhile, Amenadiel bonds with Charlotte, and Maze takes Trixie trick-or-treating.	Lucifer	9	Monster	2
15	\N	When it is discovered that the flaming sword is the only hope for the family returning home safely, the pressure is on for Lucifer to control what he has never been able to control before – his emotions – in order to ignite it. Meanwhile, Chloe wants to air some emotions of her own, but when a therapist and head of admissions at a prestigious private school turns up dead, the team must get to the bottom of it.	Lucifer	9	Deceptive Little Parasite	2
7	\N	A reporter seeks revenge when he discovers Lucifer has been sleeping with his estranged wife; a serial killer from Lucifer's past resurfaces.	Lucifer	9	Off the Record	3
18	\N	As Chloe and Lucifer go on the hunt for a serial killer targeting couples in love, Pierce realizes the case is connected to a murder he previously solved...in 1958. Then, Lucifer becomes upset when Pierce has a change of heart about an important decision.	Lucifer	9	The Last Heartbreak	3
1	\N	While investigating a beekeeper's murder with Lucifer, Chloe insists that she's completely fine with his devilish revelation, thank you very much.	Lucifer	9	Everything's Okay	4
10	\N	With murderous demons on the loose in Los Angeles, it's up to Lucifer to reign in the chaos and protect the people he most cares about.	Lucifer	9	Who's da New King Of Hell?	4
2	\N	Mariana moves in with Ana and her family to wean Valentina. Tere, Mariana's mom, is surprised when Juan Carlos, Ana's husband, offers to help them.	Daughter From Another Mother	10	Welcome Home	1
2	\N	Target in-hand, the Mandalorian must now contend with scavengers.	The Mandalorian	11	Chapter 2: The Child	1
7	\N	To move against the Empire, the Mandalorian needs the help of an old enemy.	The Mandalorian	11	Chapter 15: The Believer	2
8	\N	Black Lightning works with Anissa to help find information to clear Black Lightning’s name. Jennifer begins interning for Lynn. Meanwhile, Gambi finds himself in a precarious situation.	Black Lightning	12	The Book of Revelations	1
3	\N	Jefferson is forced to watch as all his good work is undone before his eyes when his replacement arrives and begins implementing sweeping changes. Meanwhile, Anissa continues to play Robin Hood by stealing from one of the most powerful crime syndicates in Freeland.	Black Lightning	12	The Book of Consequences: Chapter Three: Master Lowry	2
13	\N	Lynn works on two of the pod kids in a segregated safe room. Meanwhile, Jennifer plots revenge and Jefferson receives some interesting news. Lastly, Anissa makes a shocking discovery.	Black Lightning	12	The Book of Secrets: Chapter Three: Pillar of Fire	2
7	\N	Anissa and Jefferson have a heart-to-heart and she tells him she needs Black Lightning’s help in escorting meta refugees out of the perimeter. Meanwhile, Gambi  implores Lynn to help get him access to the Pit. Lastly, Jennifer  grows closer to Brandon.	Black Lightning	12	The Book of Resistance: Chapter Two: Henderson's Opus	3
1	\N	Jefferson Pierce is still mourning the death of his long-time friend Detective Henderson. Meanwhile, Gambi is presented with an interesting opportunity. Lastly, Lynn and Jefferson are still not able to see eye to eye.	Black Lightning	12	The Book of Reconstruction: Chapter One - Collateral Damage	4
5	\N	In order to reconnect with Beatrix, Bloom seeks the help of a fellow student. Sky opens up about his past. Ms. Dowling shares more of her story.	Fate: The Winx Saga	13	Wither Into The Truth	1
5	\N	Catelyn has captured Tyrion and plans to bring him to her sister, Lysa Arryn, at The Vale, to be tried for his, supposed, crimes against Bran. Robert plans to have Daenerys killed, but Eddard refuses to be a part of it and quits.	Game of Thrones	15	The Wolf and the Lion	1
8	\N	Eddard and his men are betrayed and captured by the Lannisters. When word reaches Robb, he plans to go to war to rescue them. The White Walkers attack The Wall. Tyrion returns to his father with some new friends.	Game of Thrones	15	The Pointy End	1
8	\N	Theon receives a visitor. Arya asks her third and last death from Jaqen. While Stannis' army is reaching its destination, Davos is offered a reward.  Betrayal befalls Robb.	Game of Thrones	15	The Prince of Winterfell	2
9	\N	Robb presents himself to Walder Frey, and Edmure meets his bride. Jon faces his harshest test yet. Bran discovers a new gift. Daario and Jorah debate how to take Yunkai. House Frey joins with House Tully.	Game of Thrones	15	The Rains of Castamere	3
7	\N	Tyrion gains an unlikely ally; Daario asks Dany to allow him to do what he does best; Jon's warnings about the vulnerability of the Wall are ignored; Brienne follows a new lead.	Game of Thrones	15	Mockingbird	4
7	\N	Jon prepares for conflict. Sansa tries to talk to Theon. Brienne waits for a sign. Stannis remains stubborn. Jaime attempts to reconnect with family.	Game of Thrones	15	The Gift	5
4	\N	Ana and Juan Carlos go to couples therapy. Pablo and Regina go on their first daddy-daughter date. Tere launches her beauty business.	Daughter From Another Mother	10	Fatherhood	1
2	\N	As Ragnar and Floki remain at odds, Rollo makes great efforts in Paris to win over his new bride, Princess Gisla. Meanwhile, King Ecbert sets the task for his son Aethelwulf to rescue Queen Kwenthrith.	Vikings	8	Kill the Queen	4
4	\N	King Aelle goes to Wessex for Christmas and is not impressed with how family relations are developing. Rollo's future hangs in the balance.	Vikings	8	Yol	4
14	\N	Lagertha attempts to fulfill a long-held ambition. Ragnar negotiates an unexpected concession from King Ecbert.	Vikings	8	In the Uncertain Hour Before the Morning	4
18	\N	Ragnar's plan comes to fruition. The Viking army lands on the coast of Northumbria.	Vikings	8	Revenge	4
8	\N	Defeat for the Vikings calls Ragnar's leadership into question as they evacuate their camp and move back down river. Ragnar remains inscrutable until he orders the fleet to beach at a cliff face and unveils an ingenious plan. Rollo and Gisla have news that strengthens Rollo's position at the French Court.	Vikings	8	Portage	4
3	\N	Celebrations are cut short in the aftermath of the battle at York. Ragnar Lothbrok's sons are pitted against each other as tensions reach an all-time high, and each is forced to choose a side.	Vikings	8	Homeland	5
6	\N	Lagertha is betrayed, and Bjorn must find a way to support the distraught queen. Floki and his settlers arrive in a new land, but it is far from what they expected.	Vikings	8	The Message	5
10	\N	A sense of doom looms over Kattegat as bloodshed ensues. The defeated army flees in the face of the victors. A legendary warrior makes his way home.	Vikings	8	Moments of Vision	5
16	\N	Bjorn achieves one of Ragnar's dreams. Ivar hatches a new plan while preparing for a divine arrival. In Iceland, a settler returns in a terrible state. King Alfred faces his greatest threat yet.	Vikings	8	The Buddha	5
19	\N	Ubbe is forced into hand-to-hand combat. Floki reaches new depths and is met by a shocking sight. Bjorn sets off for Scandinavia with an old rival.	Vikings	8	What Happens in the Cave	5
6	\N	Bjorn is forced to act quickly in the aftermath of the election for the king of all Norway. The Bandits attack Lagertha’s village again confident of an easy victory. However, when the defense boils down to single combat with Lagertha, victory seems less likely. In Kattegat, haunted and paranoid, Hvitserk continues to unravel.	Vikings	8	Death and the Serpent	6
8	\N	Bjorn faces a difficult decision. Ubbe and Torvi leave Kattegat in search of new lands and perhaps old friends. Oleg's plans for the invasion of Scandinavia take shape. King Harald is baffled by the origin of a mysterious raiding party.	Vikings	8	Valhalla Can Wait	6
20	\N	Ubbe reunites with an old friend but must pass judgment on a killer. The armies of Alfred and Ivar clash as each leader looks to his god for strength.	Vikings	8	The Last Act	6
2	\N	When a movie star's son is killed after being chased by the paparazzi, Chloe takes a deep look into the case with a little help from Lucifer. Meanwhile, Maze and Amenadiel continue to encourage Lucifer to go back to hell.	Lucifer	9	Lucifer, Stay. Good Devil.	1
10	\N	Lucifer and Chloe are tasked with solving the murder of a prominent restaurateur. When they meet his son, they suspect he played a part in the death. Meanwhile, Chloe's mom returns home, sending Chloe's life into upheaval, as Lucifer learns his own dysfunctional family isn't nearly as unique as he thought.	Lucifer	9	Pops	1
11	\N	When philanthropist Tim Dunlear is found dead, Lucifer explores his good side by becoming a benefactor for Tim’s glitzy Los Angeles charity.	Lucifer	9	St. Lucifer	1
7	\N	When the prisoner convicted of killing Chloe's father is murdered, new evidence suggests he was actually framed. Meanwhile, Maze tries to find a job and Lucifer shadows Dan in order to learn how to be "normal".	Lucifer	9	My Little Monkey	2
8	\N	Lucifer links Azrael's stolen blade to a string of violent stabbings and enlists Ella's help in locating the sword.	Lucifer	9	Trip to Stabby Town	2
18	\N	After Charlotte accidentally charbroils a man to death in self-defense, Lucifer must try and keep Chloe from figuring out the truth. Lucifer puts Maze in charge of finding Charlotte and Amenadiel, who have both gone missing in light of recent circumstances, while he finds a permanent solution for the ticking-time-bomb he calls Mom.	Lucifer	9	The Good, The Bad And The Crispy	2
17	\N	When the man who had the final piece of the Flaming Sword is murdered and the piece goes missing, Mom joins Chloe and Lucifer on the case to track down the killer. But when Lucifer gets sidelined, Maze recruits him to help save Dr. Linda's endangered career and confronts him about the secrets he's been keeping.	Lucifer	9	Sympathy For The Goddess	2
9	\N	Lucifer is worried when he realizes that recipients of his favors start to turn up dead. After he and Chloe investigate, they are finally brought face-to-face with the Sinnerman. Meanwhile, Detective Pierce returns to work after taking a bullet, Charlotte finds a new career and Amenadiel has a new love interest.	Lucifer	9	The Sinnerman	3
12	\N	After Lt. Pierce's true identity is revealed, Lucifer tries to figure out his motives. In order to earn Chloe's assistance in his investigation of Pierce, Lucifer goes above and beyond to help her solve the murder of a professional surfer. Meanwhile, Amenadiel deals with a personal health issue.	Lucifer	9	All About Her	3
19	\N	When Maze is the prime suspect in a murder, Lucifer and Chloe enter the world of bounty hunting to investigate. Maze decides she wants to go back to Hell, but after Lucifer refuses, she turns to Pierce for help. Meanwhile, Charlotte's sanity is questioned when she makes a big discovery and Chloe admits she's dating someone.	Lucifer	9	Orange Is the New Maze	3
20	\N	Lucifer and Chloe investigate a murder during which a witness claims a winged guardian angel saved her life, causing Lucifer to become paranoid about his own actions. Meanwhile, Pierce and Chloe's relationship takes an interesting turn and Lucifer discovers something that could change everything.	Lucifer	9	The Angel of San Bernardino	3
3	\N	An ex-gang member's murder may mask an even darker crime. Lucifer catches Chloe in a lie. Dan and Maze go rogue. Linda braces for looming motherhood.	Lucifer	9	O, Ye Of Little Faith, Father	4
4	\N	When a jewelry designer is murdered, Lucifer and Chloe strive to solve the case without each other's help. Also, Lucifer reconnects with an old flame.	Lucifer	9	All About Eve	4
4	\N	The year is 1946. The world is black and white. And Lucifer is the star of his own noir detective story featuring familiar characters in new roles.	Lucifer	9	It Never Ends Well for the Chicken	5
3	\N	Lucifer - the real one this time - helps Chloe investigate a murder committed on the set of a TV show inspired by his own life.	Lucifer	9	¡Diablo!	5
3	\N	The battered Mandalorian returns to his client for reward.	The Mandalorian	11	Chapter 3: The Sin	1
2	\N	The Mandalorian must ferry a passenger with precious cargo on a risky journey.	The Mandalorian	11	Chapter 10: The Passenger	2
3	\N	As Jefferson Pierce tries to determine if the community can survive without the help of Black Lightning, Anissa starts to come into her own. Meanwhile, Jefferson and Lynn try and figure out their new dynamic. Finally, Jennifer reveals to her parents that she has been grappling with something big.	Black Lightning	12	Lawanda: The Book of Burial	1
13	\N	The aftermath of the showdown with Black Lightning leaves everyone reeling. Meanwhile, Tobias gathers his forces.	Black Lightning	12	Shadow of Death: The Book of War	1
11	\N	Jefferson suspects that Tobias is behind a recent malicious attack. He brings this news to Henderson but doesn’t get the answer he was looking for. Meanwhile, Lynn is confronted by her past.	Black Lightning	12	The Book of Secrets: Chapter One: Prodigal Son	2
4	\N	Jefferson faces new challenges due to the shocking state of Freeland; Lynn finds herself under intense pressure as she desperately tries to find a solution to the continuing crisis in Freeland; Anissa continues her work at the clinic.	Black Lightning	12	The Book of Occupation: Chapter Four: Lynn's Ouroboros	3
15	\N	After learning that Gravedigger and the Markovians are coming to attack Freeland, the Pierce family prepares for war.	Black Lightning	12	The Book of War: Chapter Two: Freedom Ain't Free	3
4	\N	Bloom continues her search for answers with Sky. Beatrix works to conceal her crime. A special guest visits Alfea — and leaves Stella feeling conflicted.	Fate: The Winx Saga	13	Some Wrecked Angel	1
4	\N	Eddard investigates Jon Arryn's murder. Jon befriends Samwell Tarly, a coward who has come to join the Night's Watch.	Game of Thrones	15	Cripples, Bastards, and Broken Things	1
9	\N	Robb goes to war against the Lannisters. Jon finds himself struggling on deciding if his place is with Robb or the Night's Watch. Drogo has fallen ill from a fresh battle wound. Daenerys is desperate to save him.	Game of Thrones	15	Baelor	1
9	\N	Tyrion and the Lannisters fight for their lives as Stannis’ fleet assaults King’s Landing.	Game of Thrones	15	Blackwater	2
8	\N	King’s Landing hosts a wedding, and Tyrion and Sansa spend the night together. Daenerys meets the Titan’s Bastard. Davos demands proof from Melisandre. Sam and Gilly meet an older gentleman.	Game of Thrones	15	Second Sons	3
6	\N	Stannis and Davos set sail; Dany meets with supplicants; Tyrion faces down his father.	Game of Thrones	15	The Laws of Gods and Men	4
6	\N	Arya trains. Jorah and Tyrion run into slavers. Trystane and Myrcella make plans. Jaime and Bronn reach their destination. The Sand Snakes attack.	Game of Thrones	15	Unbowed, Unbent, Unbroken	5
6	\N	An old foe comes back into the picture. Gilly meets Sam’s family. Arya faces a difficult choice. Jaime faces off against the High Sparrow.	Game of Thrones	15	Blood of My Blood	6
4	\N	Daenerys fights back. Jaime faces an unexpected situation. Arya comes home.	Game of Thrones	15	The Spoils of War	7
2	\N	As Mystic Falls gets ready for a festival to celebrate the passing of a comet, Vicki continues to recover in the hospital following Damon's attack. Stefan heads to the hospital to try to use his abilities to make Vicki forget who attacked her, but his efforts are cut short by Matt. Meanwhile, at a parent/teacher conference Mr. Tanner tells Aunt Jenna that Jeremy is in trouble and needs immediate intervention.	The Vampire Diaries	16	The Night of the Comet	1
12	\N	Damon, Elena and Stefan attend the school dance with a 1950s' theme, where Alaric introduces himself to Damon. Stefan and Damon try to figure out the identity of the new vampire in town, Stefan gives Elena jewelry filled with Vervain to protect her family and friends. To make ends meet Matt takes a job at the Mystic Grill. Ben comes to help Bonnie when he notices Damon is bothering her.	The Vampire Diaries	16	Unpleasantville	1
2	\N	When a confused and desperate Caroline leaves the hospital and joins her friends at the Mystic Falls Carnival, Damon wants to take immediate action, but Stefan and Elena come to Caroline’s defense. Matt is completely mystified by Caroline’s behavior, but still tries to tell her about his feelings for her.. Damon has suspicions about Tyler’s Uncle Mason and uses Tyler’s volatile personality in an attempt to get Mason to reveal his secret. Upset with everything going on around her, Bonnie takes her anger out on Damon.	The Vampire Diaries	16	Brave New World	2
12	\N	Stefan has his own ideas about Elena’s new plan for the future. While Damon tries to get the truth out of Jules, he asks Elena to keep an eye on Rose, a situation that turns unexpectedly dangerous. Caroline and Matt try to be honest about their feelings for one another, and Tyler’s reaction to Caroline’s generosity comes as a surprise to her... Damon struggles to hide his true feelings when a life-and-death crisis hits him harder than he expected.	The Vampire Diaries	16	The Descent	2
9	\N	On the night of the Homecoming dance, Rebekah opens up to Elena about why the evening is so important to her, leaving Elena with conflicting emotions. Caroline and Matt are both shocked at Tyler’s behavior throughout the evening. The night takes a surreal turn when Klaus puts his latest plan into action. Determined to outsmart Klaus, Damon enters into a dangerous partnership, leading to a terrifying turn of events.	The Vampire Diaries	16	Homecoming	3
19	\N	Elena and Damon set off together to make sure Jeremy is safe in Denver, and to see if his special abilities can help reveal the information they need about ancient vampire bloodlines. It doesn’t take them long to learn that Jeremy has been hanging with the wrong people. Stefan and Klaus both go to brutal extremes in their search for the missing weapon. Caroline is thrilled when Tyler returns to town, but Tyler soon suspects that something has been going on between Caroline and Klaus. Matt has his hands full trying to keep Rebecca busy organizing the school’s upcoming 1920s Decade Dance.	The Vampire Diaries	16	Heart of Darkness	3
9	\N	As a Winter Wonderland-themed party fills the streets of Mystic Falls, Stefan and Caroline find themselves at odds with Tyler over his plans for Klaus and his hybrids. When Caroline proposes a solution to their problem, Hayley finds a dramatic way to make it clear that she is not on board. Later, Klaus makes a discovery that leads to chaos and violence. Meanwhile, Elena and Damon retreat to the Gilbert Lake House to help Jeremy conquer some dangerous inner demons with the help of Bonnie and Professor Shane, who reveals a piece of ancient history that leaves them all speechless.	The Vampire Diaries	16	O Come, All Ye Faithful	4
6	\N	Ana takes a week off work to think about a life-changing promotion. Mariana decides to get back into the dating scene through an app.	Daughter From Another Mother	10	Dating	1
3	\N	The Mandalorian braves high seas and meets unexpected allies.	The Mandalorian	11	Chapter 11: The Heiress	2
5	\N	An unexpected phone call unearths the long-buried need for Jefferson to investigate the murder of his father. Meanwhile, Annisa wrestles with the fact that her actions have dire consequences. Lastly, Jennifer learns the importance of controlling her temper – in all situations.	Black Lightning	12	And Then the Devil Brought the Plague: The Book of Green Light	1
2	\N	Jefferson must break the news to his students and faculty that he is stepping down. Struggling with his new life as Painkiller, Kahlil pays a visit to Jennifer in hopes of mending things. Meanwhile, Tobias continues to enact his plan.	Black Lightning	12	The Book of Consequences: Chapter Two: Black Jesus Blues	2
12	\N	When Anissa returns to work at the clinic, she meets a domestic violence victim who motivates her to take action. Meanwhile, Gambi makes a discovery.	Black Lightning	12	The Book of Secrets: Chapter Two: Just and Unjust	2
6	\N	Jefferson, is torn between his loyalty to his family and his commitment to saving Freeland. Meanwhile, Anissa's commitment to Grace is deepening. Lastly, Jennifer makes an interesting discovery.	Black Lightning	12	The Book Of Resistance: Chapter One: Knocking on Heaven's Door	3
16	\N	Black Lightning faces off against Gravedigger. Season finale.	Black Lightning	12	The Book of War: Chapter Three: Liberation	3
6	\N	As the Alfeans fight for survival, the truth about Bloom’s destiny is revealed. Can she help defeat the Burned Ones — or will evil outperform magic?	Fate: The Winx Saga	13	A Fanatic Heart	1
6	\N	While recovering from his battle with Jamie, Eddard is forced to run the kingdom while Robert goes hunting. Tyrion demands a trial by combat for his freedom. Viserys is losing his patience with Drogo.	Game of Thrones	15	A Golden Crown	1
6	\N	Theon completes his master stroke. In King's Landing, the Lannisters send Myrcella off to be married. Arya comes face to face with a surprise visitor. Dany vows to take what is hers. Robb and Catelyn receive crucial news. Qhorin gives Jon a chance to prove himself.	Game of Thrones	15	The Old Gods and the New	2
6	\N	Tywin plans strategic unions for the Lannisters. Melisandre pays a visit to the Riverlands. Robb weighs a compromise to repair his alliance with House Frey. Roose Bolton decides what to do with Jaime Lannister. Jon, Ygritte, and the Wildlings face a daunting climb.	Game of Thrones	15	The Climb	3
1	\N	Cersei and Jaime adjust to a world without Tywin. Varys reveals a conspiracy to Tyrion. Dany faces a new threat to her rule. Jon is caught between two kings.	Game of Thrones	15	The Wars to Come	5
1	\N	The fate of Jon Snow is revealed. Daenerys meets a strong man. Cersei sees her daughter once again.	Game of Thrones	15	The Red Woman	6
2	\N	Daenerys receives an unexpected visitor. Jon faces a revolt. Tyrion plans the conquest of Westeros.	Game of Thrones	15	Stormborn	7
3	\N	The Night King and his army have arrived at Winterfell and the great battle begins. Arya looks to prove her worth as a fighter.	Game of Thrones	15	The Long Night	8
7	\N	As Vicki’s behavior becomes more dangerous, Stefan tries to help her. Elena tries to convince Jeremy to stay away from Vicki. Caroline gives Bonnie a necklace she took from Damon to wear with her Halloween costume, and when Damon tries to take it back, he is surprised by Bonnie’s abilities. Bonnie discusses the incident with Grams and learns more about her family’s past. Trying to cheer Vicki up, Matt takes her to the high school’s haunted house, but the evening soon takes a terrifying turn.	The Vampire Diaries	16	Haunted	1
17	\N	When Stefan and Damon make a dangerous new enemy, Stefan suddenly finds himself in a perilous situation. Damon and Elena try to convince Alaric to work with them to help Stefan. Matt is hopeful that his mom, Kelly, may be back to stay. After her car breaks down in a storm, Caroline make a horrific discovery that shocks everyone in town.	The Vampire Diaries	16	Let the Right One In	1
7	\N	Stefan and Damon decide on a new plan to deal with Katherine at the Lockwood’s masquerade ball. Katherine calls on an old friend, Lucy, to attend the ball with her. Bonnie, Jeremy and Alaric all do what they can to help Stefan and Damon, but Katherine has a surprise planned that none of them could foresee. Things take an ugly turn when Matt and Tyler start doing shots with their friends.	The Vampire Diaries	16	Masquerade	2
15	\N	Stefan tells Elena about a dark time in his history and the surprising person whose influence changed everything. After getting the truth out of Luka, Jonas makes his feelings clear to Bonnie and Jeremy. Trying to catch Elijah off-guard, Damon arranges a dinner party for him with Jenna, Alaric and Andie, but last-minute information throws Damon’s plan into chaos.	The Vampire Diaries	16	The Dinner Party	2
4	\N	Still in Chicago, Klaus uses Gloria, a witch he knew long ago, to help him track down missing information that will explain why his plan isn’t working. Gloria’s spells reveal intriguing glimpses of the truth, but she soon realizes she needs Stefan’s knowledge to complete the puzzle. When Stefan suddenly finds himself in danger, help comes from a surprising ally. Back in Mystic Falls, a frustrating new enemy pushes Damon over the brink and he lashes out in a way that will have lasting consequences. Caroline struggles with her own emotional issues, even as she tries to help Elena face her feelings. Jeremy makes a brief but disturbing breakthrough with one of his ghostly visitors, leaving him more confused than ever. Finally, Bonnie has a strange encounter that will affect everyone.	The Vampire Diaries	16	Disturbing Behavior	3
11	\N	Although Caroline is in no mood to celebrate her 18th birthday, Elena, Bonnie and Matt surprise her with a small party in an unusual location. Damon and Stefan disagree on the best way to handle Klaus , and a reckless Stefan decides to test his theory by taking things to dangerous extremes. Bonnie is concerned when Elena tells her about Jeremy's new plans. At a Founder's meeting, Alaric once again runs into Dr. Fell, who is in the middle of an argument with her ex-boyfriend, the medical examiner. Tyler refuses to go along with Klaus' latest demand, and is surprised when Klaus seems to accept his decision.	The Vampire Diaries	16	Our Town	3
18	\N	When Barry and Team Flash find a way to enter The Thinker’s lair, Ralph considers crossing a dangerous line to defeat DeVoe. Meanwhile, Joe is concerned by Harry’s recent behavior.	The Flash	17	Lose Yourself	4
5	\N	Nora lets something slip about the future that devastates Iris. In an attempt to distract his wife, Barry asks Iris to team up to stop a new meta, Rag Doll. Meanwhile, Caitlin learns something about her father.	The Flash	17	All Doll'd Up	5
4	\N	Dany balances justice and mercy. Jaime tasks Brienne with his honor. Jon secures volunteers while Bran, Jojen, Meera and Hodor stumble on shelter.	Game of Thrones	15	Oathkeeper	4
4	\N	The Faith Militant grow increasingly aggressive. Jaime and Bronn head south. Ellaria and the Sand Snakes vow vengeance.	Game of Thrones	15	Sons of the Harpy	5
5	\N	Tyrion seeks a strange ally. Bran learns a great deal. Brienne goes on a mission. Arya is given a chance to prove herself.	Game of Thrones	15	The Door	6
6	\N	Jon and his team go beyond the wall to capture a wight. Daenerys has to make a tough decision.	Game of Thrones	15	Beyond the Wall	7
3	\N	As Elena tries to ignore Bonnie's warnings about Stefan, Tyler tries to embarrass Stefan by throwing a ball at him. However, his effortless catch and football skills impress everyone, leading Mr. Tanner to let him join the football team. Meanwhile, Elena invites Stefan and Bonnie to dinner in order to try to get the two to know each other, but the night ends up backfiring. Finally, the town is shocked by an act of violence.	The Vampire Diaries	16	Friday Night Bites	1
13	\N	In flashbacks, Stefan and Damon recall the long-ago actions taken by townspeople including their father, Guiseppe Salvatore, and Pearl, leading to the devastating events that caused the rift in their relationship. In the present, Bonnie's date with Ben takes a frightening turn. Elena helps Stefan as he and Damon race to find the missing journal that belonged to Elena's ancestor. Stefan learns the reason behind Alaric's interest in both the journal and the town's history. Damon discovers that an old acquaintance has returned to town with an agenda he understands.	The Vampire Diaries	16	Children of the Damned	1
20	\N	While Stefan struggles to come to terms with his past, both he and Damon reveal parts of their history to Elena, until she finally learns the truth about how they became vampires. Pearl has an ugly confrontation with Johnathan Gilbert. Damon and Alaric try to find a mysterious invention before Johnathan does. The friendship and flirtation between Jeremy and Anna continues to grow.	The Vampire Diaries	16	Blood Brothers	1
8	\N	An Ancient Presence In Mystic Falls, Stefan and Damon come to Elena’s assistance and, in the process, learn surprising new information about people, vampires and events in the distant past. Jeremy helps Bonnie after she casts a difficult and exhausting spell, and Caroline does what she can to make things easier for Tyler. Finally, Stefan and Damon reach a new understanding.	The Vampire Diaries	16	Rose	2
14	\N	Stefan and Elena get away for what they hope will be a romantic weekend at the Gilbert family lake house, not realizing that they’ve been followed. Jenna starts to worry that Alaric isn’t being honest with her. Jules explains the importance of the sun and moon curse to Tyler, but leaves out an important detail. Damon attends a tea at the Historical Society in order to talk to Elijah, but Elijah isn’t giving up any secrets. With help from Caroline and Jeremy, Bonnie uses deceptive measures to get shocking new information out of Luka. Finally, Tyler offers Matt some relationship advice.	The Vampire Diaries	16	Crying Wolf	2
5	\N	Despite all that has happened, Caroline is determined to see that Elena, Bonnie, Matt and Tyler all enjoy a traditional Senior Prank Night before the school year begins at Mystic Falls High School. However, when uninvited guests show up, it doesn't take long for the evening to take a deadly turn. Damon convinces Jeremy that he can use his new connection to the other side to help find a way to defeat Klaus. Finally, Klaus deepens his hold on Stefan and uses him for increasingly violent and dangerous purposes.	The Vampire Diaries	16	The Reckoning	3
14	\N	Elena is surprised to receive an invitation to a formal ball, and when Damon and Stefan hear the party is being hosted at Klaus’s newly renovated mansion, they both insist on attending the event with her. Caroline and Matt also receive invitations to the ball from unexpected admirers. At the elegant party, Elena learns of a horrifying plan that could lead to numerous deaths and she must decide who she can trust with her new information. Caroline discovers a side of Klaus no one would have suspected. Finally, after an evening of violence and dashed hopes, Damon finds a new way to cope.	The Vampire Diaries	16	Dangerous Liaisons	3
1	\N	Elena awakens on the morning after the accident to find the thing she dreaded most has come true – she died with vampire blood in her system and now must go through the terrible transition to become a vampire…or face certain death. Stefan promises Elena that he and Bonnie will exhaust every possible way out of the situation, but Damon is furious with his brother for letting Elena die in the first place. Bonnie pays a terrible price for her attempt to change Elena’s fate, while Damon takes out his frustration and rage on Matt. In a rare moment of empathy, Rebekah is deeply touched by Stefan and Elena’s devotion to one another. Finally, Pastor Young and the Town Council members begin rounding up the vampires and their supporters, leading to an unexpected tragedy.	The Vampire Diaries	16	Growing Pains	4
11	\N	Jeremy is furious when Klaus tries to control him by putting Matt’s life in danger. Damon coaches Jeremy as he prepares to take on Klaus’ new vampires, but they find that Kol has beaten them to it. Kol makes it clear that he will stop at nothing to convince everyone to give up the search for the cure. Looking for a new ally, Rebekah reminds Stefan that they were once close friends. When Sheriff Forbes and Mayor Hopkins question Shane about his involvement in the Founders’ Council deaths, Bonnie steps in with questions of her own, and Shane’s responses push Bonnie to the edge of her powers. Elena negotiates with Klaus to keep Jeremy safe, but when danger suddenly appears from a totally unexpected enemy, Elena comes up with her own daring plan for Jeremy.	The Vampire Diaries	16	Catch Me If You Can	4
19	\N	After making a decision that infuriates Klaus, Elijah proposes a life-changing challenge for Rebekah. Caroline finds that her carefully laid plans for the perfect Senior Prom night are disrupted by Elena, so she turns to an amused Klaus for a solution. Determined to get through to Elena, Damon and Stefan both attend the prom, but the evening begins to spiral out of control despite their efforts. When Elena suddenly lashes out in a way no one could have predicted, Matt turns to Rebekah for help. Finally, Bonnie makes a terrifying discovery, and Klaus receives a message that could change everything.	The Vampire Diaries	16	Pictures of You	4
6	\N	Silas announces his new goal to Damon and Elena. Tessa tells Stefan about her next move. Katherine discovers an unexpected consequence of being human and realises she needs a new place to stay. Bonnie is touched by Jeremy's determination to stand by her. Damon is stunned when he learns the secret to Tessa's plan.	The Vampire Diaries	16	Handle with Care	5
21	\N	Stefan and Elena become stranded in a remote location, after escaping from Markos, and he gets philosophical about her relationship with Damon. Damon sets a trap for Markos. Bonnie admits that she's been keeping the truth about the Other Side from everyone. Caroline witnesses an unthinkable act of violence by one of the Travelers.	The Vampire Diaries	16	Promised Land	5
3	\N	Daenerys meets her future. Bran meets the past. Tommen confronts the High Sparrow. Arya trains to be No One. Varys finds an answer. Ramsay gets a gift.	Game of Thrones	15	Oathbreaker	6
2	\N	Arya arrives in Braavos. Podrick and Brienne run into trouble on the road. Cersei fears for her daughter's safety in Dorne as Ellaria Sand seeks revenge for Oberyn's death. Stannis tempts Jon. An adviser tempts Daenerys.	Game of Thrones	15	The House of Black and White	5
10	\N	Stannis marches. Dany is surrounded by strangers. Cersei seeks forgiveness. Jon is challenged.	Game of Thrones	15	Mother's Mercy	5
10	\N	Tyrion counsels Daenerys on the upcoming campaign. Jon and Sansa discuss their future. Trials begin in King's Landing.	Game of Thrones	15	The Winds of Winter	6
5	\N	Daenerys brings her forces to King's Landing.	Game of Thrones	15	The Bells	8
9	\N	Jeremy gets a break from the mysterious new history teacher, Alaric Saltzman and introduces Alaric to Jenna. Bonnie is having terrifying dreams about one of her ancestors. Despite Elena’s efforts to smooth things over, Bonnie and Caroline continue to argue over the medallion. When the girls hold a séance to help them decide what to do, the results are stranger than any of them expected. Matt comes to Caroline’s aid when she needs a friend. Damon finally reveals to Stefan the stunning reason he has returned to Mystic Falls.	The Vampire Diaries	16	History Repeating	1
19	\N	At the Founder’s Day Gala, Elena and Caroline compete for the title of “Miss Mystic Falls” against other girls from town, including Tina Fell and Amber Bradley. Elena is happy to have Bonnie back in town, but Bonnie still has issues to work through. John Gilbert attempts to intimidate Damon, but his plan doesn’t have the desired effect. Damon discovers that Stefan is hiding a dangerous secret that could impact everyone in town.	The Vampire Diaries	16	Miss Mystic Falls	1
6	\N	Despite Elena’s efforts to keep Jeremy safe, he offers to help Damon and Alaric deal with Katherine... Sheriff Forbes and Caroline share a few rare moments of quality mother/daughter time. Bonnie accidentally discovers new information about Mason and shares it with Stefan, leading Damon to take matters into his own hands.	The Vampire Diaries	16	Plan B	2
16	\N	Katherine’s mind games are getting on everyone’s nerves, but Damon, Stefan and Elena realize that her knowledge of Mystic Falls history will help them stay alive. Frustrated with her relationship with Matt, Caroline finds a new way to get his attention. Alaric makes a surprising confession to Jenna, and Katherine makes a different kind of confession to Damon. Stefan and Bonnie try to convince Jonas and Luka that they should all be working together, but Jonas’ lack of trust leads to a violent and fiery confrontation.	The Vampire Diaries	16	The House Guest	2
3	\N	Klaus and Stefan arrive in Chicago, where Stefan is reunited with a vampire who hasn't really moved on from her interest in him decades earlier. In a flashback to Chicago in the 1920s, Stefan comes face-to-face with a shocking chapter from his wild past. After Damon gets a tip on Stefan and Klaus' whereabouts from an unexpected source, he and Elena follow their trail. Back in Mystic Falls, Tyler is concerned about Caroline and turns to Sheriff Forbes for help.	The Vampire Diaries	16	The End of the Affair	3
10	\N	Stefan has hidden the coffins containing the bodies of Klaus’ family, and Klaus quickly turns to violence to convince Damon and Elena that no one will be safe until he finds Stefan and gets his family back. Tyler continues to make the most of his new abilities as a hybrid, but he has to face the disturbing consequences of his actions as well. After a terrifying incident, Elena and Alaric grow increasingly concerned about Jeremy’s attitude and, ultimately, his safety. Alaric meets the beautiful Dr. Fell, who is intrigued with his amazing ability to heal. While trying to strike a deal with Klaus, Elena delivers news that truly shocks him.	The Vampire Diaries	16	The New Deal	3
15	\N	After starting her day with a startling discovery of Damon’s latest indiscretion, Elena is frustrated to find that none of her friends agree with her on how they should react to the Original family’s internal power struggle. Once again caught up in the destiny of the Bennett witches, Bonnie and Abby find themselves playing a part in a ritual to appease the spirits of nature. When Elijah gives Damon and Stefan a dangerous ultimatum that puts Elena in danger, they turn to Alaric and Meredith for help with a plan that leads them to a terrible choice.	The Vampire Diaries	16	All My Children	3
3	\N	Connor continues his search to uncover the secrets of Mystic Falls and tries to convince Jeremy to work with him. With Dr. Fell’s help, Damon and Klaus question Connor, but the confrontation takes a lethal turn. Trying to keep her new life as normal as possible, Elena is determined to continue her senior year at Mystic Falls High with support from Matt and Caroline. Rebekah’s arrival at school makes it difficult for Elena to control her anger, but she learns that confronting Rebekah can be extremely dangerous. Later, Rebekah realizes how alone she is, and reaches out to April. Stefan takes Elena on a thrilling motorcycle ride in an effort to show her that life can still be fun. Tyler gets a surprise visit from Hayley, a werewolf who helped him through the ordeal of breaking his sire-bond to Klaus. Concerned about Elena, as well as his own emotions, Stefan turns to a sympathetic Caroline for advice.	The Vampire Diaries	16	The Rager	4
13	\N	Shane leads an expedition to a desolate island off the coast of Nova Scotia, where he believes the secret of the cure lies hidden. On the trek to the island’s interior, Rebekah and Elena continue their bitter rivalry, Stefan does his best to keep the peace, and Damon accuses Shane of leading them into a trap. Bonnie and Jeremy try to figure out the message of the Hunter’s mark, while Shane reveals more of the legend of Silas and the witch Qetsiyah, along with his own personal history. Back in Mystic Falls, Tyler confronts Klaus, and Caroline is caught up in the violence that follows.	The Vampire Diaries	16	Into the Wild	4
23	\N	On Graduation Day, Mystic Falls is overrun with ghosts intent on settling old scores and fulfilling their supernatural destinies. Damon’s life is in danger after a ghostly encounter, while Matt and Rebekah join forces to battle a ghost determined to find the cure. As everyone gathers for the graduation ceremony and the ghosts converge, help comes from an unlikely hero. Caroline receives a touching and unexpected graduation present, and Bonnie’s plan leads to the closing of the veil. Elena makes a decision about the Salvatore brothers and faces an epic confrontation with Katherine. Finally, Stefan discovers a horrifying clue to the mystery surrounding Silas.	The Vampire Diaries	16	Graduation	4
9	\N	Caroline offers Stefan an unusual form of therapy. Meanwhile, Damon tells Elena about a terrible ordeal in his past that he has kept secret for decades, and she shares with him some disturbing information she recently learned about her family.	The Vampire Diaries	16	The Cell	5
17	\N	Bonnie has an unsettling encounter with Luke, and learns more about his family history. The Travelers' leader, Markos, arrives in Mystic Falls.	The Vampire Diaries	16	Rescue Me	5
15	\N	Homer tries to reunite a mechanical band from his youth, but film and TV creator J.J. Abrams gets ahold of them first.	The Simpsons	18	Do PizzaBots Dream of Electric Guitars?	32
2	\N	Bran trains with the Three-Eyed Raven. In King’s Landing, Jaime advises Tommen. Tyrion demands good news, but has to make his own. At Castle Black, the Night’s Watch stands behind Thorne. Ramsay Bolton proposes a plan, and Balon Greyjoy entertains other proposals.	Game of Thrones	15	Home	6
1	\N	Jon organizes the defense of the North. Cersei tries to even the odds. Daenerys comes home.	Game of Thrones	15	Dragonstone	7
2	\N	The battle at Winterfell is approaching. Jaime is confronted with the consequences of the past. A tense interaction between Sansa and Daenerys follows.	Game of Thrones	15	A Knight of the Seven Kingdoms	8
6	\N	In a flashback sequence, Stefan reveals the Salvatore family history to Elena. Elena demands that Stefan explain the frightening events that have been happening in Mystic Falls. In flashbacks, Stefan explains how his rivalry with Damon began. Back in the present, Damon impulsively takes control of Vicki’s future, and a confused and frightened Vicki runs away. Finally, Sheriff Forbes and Mayor Lockwood take steps to protect the town.	The Vampire Diaries	16	Lost Girls	1
16	\N	Anna brings a surprising guest along when she pays a visit to Damon. Elena and Stefan go on an awkward double date with Caroline and Matt, but Stefan and Matt find they have some common ground. Jenna reunites with her old friend Kelly, and Jeremy’s relationship with Anna takes an unexpected direction.	The Vampire Diaries	16	There Goes the Neighborhood	1
4	\N	Stefan takes drastic measures to find out the real reason Katherine has returned to Mystic Falls, and is shocked when she reveals new secrets about what really happened in 1864. Damon tries a new tactic to resolve his issues with Mason,.... but it proves costly. Tyler pushes Mason to tell him the truth about the Lockwoods. Finally, when Katherine delivers an ultimatum, Stefan and Elena are left with very few options.	The Vampire Diaries	16	Memory Lane	2
17	\N	Elena and Alaric both lash out at John when Isobel’s unexpected arrival leaves Jenna devastated. Bonnie works with Damon and Jeremy to find the spell they’ll need to harness her ancestors’ power. A heartbroken Caroline doesn’t know what to do about Matt. Stefan and Damon realize they have a new secret weapon.	The Vampire Diaries	16	Know Thy Enemy	2
1	\N	On the morning of Elena’s 18th birthday, Caroline is busy planning a party, but Elena is focused on searching for any clues that might help her discover where Stefan is. Damon is also searching for Stefan, while trying to protect Elena and keep her from doing anything that would draw Klaus’ attention. Meanwhile, Klaus and Stefan are busy trailing a werewolf named Ray Sutton. Now working at the Mystic Grill along with Matt, Jeremy is struggling to understand why he keeps seeing the ghosts of Vicki and Anna since he was brought back to life by Bonnie’s magic. Meanwhile, Alaric does his best to watch over Elena and Jeremy, while dealing with his grief over Jenna’s death. Finally, Caroline and Tyler face a new and unexpected challenge.	The Vampire Diaries	16	The Birthday	3
20	\N	Alaric finds an unexpected ally to guide him on his dangerous new path, while Damon and Meredith try to figure out what their next move should be. At the school’s 1920s Decade Dance, Bonnie asks Jamie to go with her and, at Caroline’s suggestion, Elena asks Stefan to be her date. Caroline is pleasantly surprised when Tyle shows up at the dance determined to sweep her off her feet, but Klaus does his best to come between them. The dance takes a deadly turn when Damon and Stefan realize they need the help of Matt, Jeremy  and especially Bonnie to undo a spell that could prove devastating for everyone.	The Vampire Diaries	16	Do Not Go Gentle	3
7	\N	Caroline does her best to be there for Stefan and Elena in a tough time. Damon tries to convince Stefan to help him uncover Prof. Shane’s motives, but Stefan is intent on carrying out a different plan with Klaus. At the annual Miss Mystic Falls Pageant, Elena and Caroline give April advice on which dress to wear, while Tyler and Hayley work together on a secret project, and Damon confronts Prof. Shane with his suspicions. Alarmed by the vivid nightmares he’s having, Jeremy turns to Matt for help, but the situation escalates sooner than anyone expected.	The Vampire Diaries	16	My Brother’s Keeper	4
17	\N	Realizing that Elena needs some time away from Mystic Falls, Damon takes her to New York City, where he lived and partied hard in the 1970s. When Rebekah also shows up in New York, she’s impressed with Elena’s secret agenda. Flashbacks reveal Damon’s hedonistic life in the underground club scene and a complicated encounter with Lexi. Meanwhile, Caroline and Stefan try to convince Klaus that it would be in his own best interest to help them track Silas down, and Bonnie struggles to keep her grasp on reality and do the right thing.	The Vampire Diaries	16	Because the Night	4
4	\N	Damon and Elena try to help Stefan through a confusing time, which ends up taking Elena on an emotional journey. Caroline makes an effort to know Jesse better.	The Vampire Diaries	16	For Whom the Bell Tolls	5
14	\N	Damon's behavior escalates from destructive to deadly. Stefan begins to regret their last conversation and tries to track Damon down and intervene. Dr. Wes enlists the Travelers to set a trap that will test Damon's friendship with Enzo; and a talk between Caroline and Stefan leads to a horrifying realization.	The Vampire Diaries	16	No Exit	5
2	\N	Knowing she needs to come to terms with the loss of Damon, Elena turns to Alaric to help her move on with her life. Enzo convinces Caroline to join him as he tracks down a lead to get Damon and Bonnie back, but Caroline is shocked when they make an unexpected detour and uncover what Stefan has been up to. Meanwhile, Matt worries about Jeremy who is spending time with Sarah, a mysterious girl who has recently arrived in Mystic Falls. Elsewhere, Tripp, leader of the community protection program, makes an interesting confession to Matt about his connection to the town. Lastly, with the Other Side destroyed and gone for good, Damon and Bonnie reluctantly band together to uncover the mystery of where they are and how they are going to get back home.	The Vampire Diaries	16	Yellow Ledbetter	6
12	\N	When Liv and Luke’s father arrives to town to celebrate their birthday, they try and convince him to let Jo and Kai take their place in the merge ceremony. After Tyler finds out that the merge is happening sooner than he expected, he urges Liv to let him talk to her father. Meanwhile, after Caroline’s plan to cure her mother takes an unexpected and devastating turn, Elena, Stefan and Damon gather at the hospital, while Jo attempts to save Sheriff Forbes’ life. Lastly, with the merge set to take place, Damon’s risky plan quickly sends things spiraling out of control, forcing one of the twins to take matters into their own hands.	The Vampire Diaries	16	Prayer For the Dying	6
22	\N	When DeVoe assaults an A.R.G.U.S. facility to complete his Enlightenment Machine, Barry realizes the only way he can stop him is if he allows Cisco and Caitlin to accompany him into the facility. Still shaken by Ralph’s death, Barry isn’t sure he wants to risk any more of his friends’ lives and considers taking on DeVoe solo.	The Flash	17	Think Fast	4
16	\N		The Simpsons	18	Manger Things	32
3	\N	Daenerys holds court. Tyrion backchannels. Cersei returns a gift. Jaime learns from his mistakes.	Game of Thrones	15	The Queen's Justice	7
6	\N	In the aftermath of the devastating attack on King's Landing, Daenerys must face the survivors.	Game of Thrones	15	The Iron Throne	8
10	\N	After reading the journal left by one of the Gilbert ancestors, Jeremy is inspired to return to his hobby of sketching fantasy creatures, a talent he had abandoned when his parents died. Much to the surprise of their friends, Matt and Caroline continue to hang out together. When Sheriff Forbes tells Damon there has been another attack, he offers to track down the killer and learns a startling piece of information about the town’s founding families. Alaric steps in to help during an awkward scene with Jeremy, Tyler and Mayor Lockwood. Stefan and Elena come to a new understanding, but everything changes when Elena accidentally makes a devastating discovery.	The Vampire Diaries	16	The Turning Point	1
22	\N	Founder's Day has finally arrived, and everyone is busy with last-minute preparations for floats and fireworks. Stefan is uncomfortable with Damon's new attitude toward Elena, but Elena is more concerned about repairing her relationship with Jeremy. Jeremy is worried about Anna, but not sure he's on board with her latest plan for the future. While Caroline is enjoying her day as Queen of the celebration, she also tries to help Matt and Tyler get their friendship back on track. Finally, although Damon and Alaric do their best to stop him, Johnathan Gilbert sets a plan in motion that brings Founder's Day to an end amid chaos, destruction and death.	The Vampire Diaries	16	Founder's Day	1
11	\N	As the full moon approaches, Caroline helps Tyler prepare for the transformation he is powerless to stop. While Stefan and Katherine play mind games on one another, Damon and Alaric are suspicious when a stranger named Jules shows up in Mystic Falls, searching for her missing friend, Mason. Elena is frustrated at the lengths Jeremy and her friends have gone to in order to keep her safe. Bonnie and Luca work together on a spell, while still keeping secrets from one another. Finally, Elijah makes an unexpected appearance with an offer that could change everything.	The Vampire Diaries	16	By the Light of the Moon	2
21	\N	With the arrival of the full moon, Elena tries to prepare for whatever Klaus has planned and Tyler faces his second transformation. The terrifying events quickly spin out of control, despite an unexpected act of courage. Finally, Damon admits the truth to Stefan about a terrible new development they must face...	The Vampire Diaries	16	The Sun Also Rises	2
12	\N	Bonnie believes her recurring dreams about Klaus’ coffins will tell her how he can be killed. The dreams also lead Bonnie to a reunion with her mother, Abby, whom Bonnie hasn’t seen for 15 years. At Abby’s remote farmhouse, Bonnie and Elena meet Jamie, the young man Abby took in years earlier. Bonnie’s sudden appearance catches Abby off-guard, but she does her best to explain the past. Tyler turns to an unexpected ally in his quest to regain his free will. Damon is intrigued by Alaric’s new friend, Dr. Fell, and Klaus continues his bitter negotiations with Stefan over control of the coffins containing his family members.	The Vampire Diaries	16	The Ties That Bind	3
22	\N	Determined to protect his sister, Jeremy makes a decision that will change everything. In the harsh reality of the present situation, Elena longs for simpler times when her parents, Grayson and Miranda, and Aunt Jenna were still alive and her biggest concern was her relationship with Matt. Stefan and Damon leave Mystic Falls together on a mission, but soon split up when Elena needs one of them. Caroline and Tyler are forced to make a life-changing decision. Finally, Bonnie makes a secret deal that has heartbreaking consequences.	The Vampire Diaries	16	The Departed	3
10	\N	Appearing unexpectedly at Mystic Falls High, Rebekah wastes no time trying to force Stefan, Elena and Caroline to answer her questions about the search for a cure, leading to a bombshell piece of information from Elena. When Bonnie’s father, Rudy Owens, accepts the role of Interim Mayor, he makes it a priority to protect his daughter, who isn’t at all comfortable with the role he suddenly wants to play in her life. Professor Shane continues to encourage Bonnie to believe in her powers, but he soon finds himself in danger when he reveals too much to the wrong person. Later, Caroline does her best to comfort Tyler after a violent confrontation. Meanwhile, at the lake house, Damon and Matt train Jeremy, trying to raise his game as a hunter, but Klaus is impatient with their progress and intervenes to speed up the process.	The Vampire Diaries	16	After School Special	4
15	\N	When Stefan arrives back in Mystic Falls with Elena and Jeremy, Caroline is immediately worried about Elena’s state of mind. Stefan reaches out to Dr. Fell and Matt for help. Still on the island, Damon relays somber news to Rebekah, and is surprised at her reaction. Together, Damon and Rebekah learn an unexpected bit of recent history from Vaughn. Everyone is horrified when Bonnie reveals the rest of Shane’s plan. Finally, after Damon does his best to help her, Elena comes up with a plan of her own.	The Vampire Diaries	16	Stand by Me	4
2	\N	A fellow Whitmore student named Jesse gives Elena some intriguing information about Professor Wes Maxfield. Damon asks for help finding Stefan.	The Vampire Diaries	16	True Lies	5
12	\N	Damon tries to get back together with Elena, however, Katherine has a plan and attempts to take Elena's body permanently. Tyler is upset with Caroline and Matt is used by Katherine. Enzo finds Damon and they decide to become a team again.	The Vampire Diaries	16	The Devil Inside	5
22	\N	Damon's plan causes a huge explosion in Mystic Falls, and everyone is caught up in the confusion, leaving a trail of heroism, sacrifice, relief and despair.	The Vampire Diaries	16	Home	5
10	\N	With the holidays approaching, Bonnie attempts to replicate her favorite traditions, while reminiscing about happier times with her friends. Not able to return home to Mystic Falls for her favorite time of the year, Caroline is surprised when Sheriff Forbes brings the holidays to her at Whitmore College. Meanwhile, after discovering that Jo has gone missing, Alaric turns to Damon and Elena for help, while Liv and Luke find themselves at odds when Tyler approaches them with a risky plan. Elsewhere, Jeremy helps Matt carry out a plan to take down Enzo but grows concerned when Matt takes things too far. Lastly, Stefan is forced to break some devastating news to Caroline.	The Vampire Diaries	16	Christmas Through Your Eyes	6
3	\N	After Cicada's attack on The Flash, the team realizes they need to think outside the box to stop this dangerous new foe. Desperate to help her parents, Nora comes up with a plan that ultimately puts a member of Team Flash in danger. Meanwhile, Caitlin delves into her past.	The Flash	17	The Death of Vibe	5
14	\N	Cletus becomes a singing sensation, while Homer becomes a new man. Then, Cletus turns on his fans, ruining everything.	The Simpsons	18	Yokel Hero	32
7	\N	The High Sparrow eyes another target. Jaime confronts a hero. Arya makes a plan. The North is reminded.	Game of Thrones	15	The Broken Man	6
7	\N	A meeting is held in King's Landing. Problems arise in the North.	Game of Thrones	15	The Dragon and the Wolf	7
4	\N	Elena asks Stefan to escort her to the town's annual Founder's Party. Vicki gets Tyler to ask her to the party, then accuses him of trying to hide their relationship from his family. Zach reveals a useful family secret to Stefan. At the party, Damon tells Elena a story about the Salvatore family's past, leaving Elena with questions that Stefan refuses to answer. Finally, Stefan takes action to get Damon out of his life for good.	The Vampire Diaries	16	Family Ties	1
14	\N	Stefan helps Elena and Bonnie out of a dangerous situation. Jeremy asks Anna to a party in the woods, unaware that she has her own reasons for wanting to meet him there. When Stefan, Damon, and Elena work with Bonnie and Grams to open the tomb, everyone is shocked by what they discover.	The Vampire Diaries	16	Fool Me Once	1
3	\N	Elena, Damon and Alaric take a road trip to Duke University and search through Isobel’s research on folklore and paranormal phenomena to see if they can uncover any clues to the mystery surrounding the Lockwood family. Isobel’s former student, Vanessa offers to guide them through the research and ends up getting quite an education herself. Stefan comes face to face with a terrifying new danger in the woods, and Tyler makes a shocking discovery about Mason.....	The Vampire Diaries	16	Bad Moon Rising	2
9	\N	Elena puts herself in a dangerous position as she searches for the truth about Katherine’s past and what her own future may hold. Knowing that Stefan would never agree to her plan, Elena swears Caroline to secrecy. Damon uses a new-found confidant to help him try to discover the real purpose and power of the moonstone. Jeremy and Bonnie meet Luka, a new student with a surprising family history.	The Vampire Diaries	16	Katerina	2
19	\N	Stefan and Damon are furious when they discover that Elena has defied them both to make a new ally and take control of the plan to out-maneuver Klaus. Disagreement over how to protect Elena leads to growing tension between the Salvatore brothers. Meanwhile, Stefan has his hands full trying to keep a confused and frightened Jenna safe. Flashbacks to 1491 reveal Katherine’s introduction to Elijah and Klaus, along with the origin of the moonstone curse. Elena learns shocking new information about Klaus’ motives.	The Vampire Diaries	16	Klaus	2
6	\N	On the first day of their senior year, Elena, Caroline, Bonnie and Matt are still reeling from recent events, while Tyler seems to be enjoying everything a little too much. Damon is annoyed by a new houseguest, and everyone is surprised by the arrival of a new student in Alaric's history class. Matt asks Bonnie for help when he realizes he made a serious mistake. Meanwhile, Stefan continues to carry out his latest assignment from Klaus.	The Vampire Diaries	16	Smells Like Teen Spirit	3
17	\N	A century after their first encounter, Damon and Sage meet again at the ceremony to kick-off the restoration of Wickery Bridge. Damon is surprised to learn the reason Sage has returned, and pleased when she devises an unusual method to help him figure out what Rebekah is up to. Abby is having a hard time adjusting to her new reality, despite Bonnie and Caroline’s efforts to help. When Damon informs Elena of Stefan’s latest struggles, she reaches out to Stefan to help her save a friend in danger, in hopes that it will help bring Stefan even closer to his humanity. Finally, when Damon discovers a new secret weapon, he lets Stefan in on the news.	The Vampire Diaries	16	Break On Through	3
6	\N	Terrifying hallucinations leave Elena shaken and confused, causing her to make a dangerous mistake. After giving Stefan some very disturbing news about Elena, Klaus takes matters into his own hands. Professor Shane reveals a story of ancient witchcraft to Damon and Bonnie. With help from Klaus and Stefan, Jeremy begins a new chapter in his life. Finally, Elena makes a painful personal confession to Stefan, and Matt gives Damon startling new information about Professor Shane.	The Vampire Diaries	16	We All Go A Little Mad Sometimes	4
21	\N	Damon and Stefan try a brutal new approach to provoke Elena into turning her humanity back on, and Caroline is frustrated when her attempt to intervene backfires. When Elena figures out a way to call the Salvatore brothers' bluff, they call for backup from a surprising source. Matt gives Rebekah some unsolicited advice on her life choices, and she tries to help him in return. Caroline has a confusing and dangerous encounter with Klaus, and Katherine is suspicious when Bonnie makes her an offer that she promises will benefit them both.	The Vampire Diaries	16	She's Come Undone	4
8	\N	Elena and Caroline plan a big party at school, but their plans are interrupted when Jesse suddenly needs Caroline's help. Meanwhile, Damon makes a terrifying discovery about a secret society.	The Vampire Diaries	16	Dead Man on Campus	5
16	\N	Damon tries to find the right way to make a disturbing confession to Elena. Caroline discovers a scary secret in Dr. Wes' files. Enzo claims to have a solution everyone is searching for. Sloan reveals new information on the importance of doppelgangers.	The Vampire Diaries	16	While You Were Sleeping	5
4	\N	When Damon and Bonnie realize that uncovering a time in Damon’s past may provide clues to finding their way home, Damon is forced to relive one of the worst days of his life. After an awkward run-in with Jo at the hospital, Alaric steps in to help Jeremy get his life together and cope with the loss of Bonnie. Elsewhere, Stefan attempts to show Elena what it’s like to start over and create a new identity, while an unsuspecting Matt finds himself in a disturbing situation when Tripp lets him in on a dark secret. Lastly, Stefan, who is desperate to regain some normalcy in his life, is stunned when an unexpected visitor shows up.	The Vampire Diaries	16	Black Hole Sun	6
13	\N	Determined to celebrate Bonnie’s birthday, Elena convinces Jeremy that it’s what Bonnie would have wanted. After piecing the broken ascendant back together, Elena, Jeremy and Damon attempt to send Bonnie a message, but the situation turns dire when they make an unsettling discovery. Meanwhile, after uncovering Stefan’s secret about his great-niece Sarah Salvatore, Enzo enlists a reluctant Matt to help interfere with her life. Elsewhere, Stefan keeps a close eye on Caroline as she unconventionally attempts to cope with everything going on around her. Lastly, realizing it might be time to move on with his life, Jeremy contemplates leaving Mystic Falls for good.	The Vampire Diaries	16	The Day I Tried To Live	6
11	\N	During a battle with Cicada, Nora is severely injured. Due to Cicada's dampening powers, Nora's speed healing isn't working, leaving Barry and Iris scared for their daughter's future. Upset about his injured child, The Flash is filled with rage and confronts Cicada in a brutal battle. Meanwhile, Killer Frost keeps interfering with Caitlin's work on the cure.	The Flash	17	Seeing Red	5
10	\N	In the revolution's aftermath, Layton and Melanie realize the greatest threat to their survival is right over their shoulder.	Snowpiercer	19	994 Cars Long	1
5	\N	Tyrion tries to find a way to make Daenerys listen to reason while Jon plans a dangerous new mission.	Game of Thrones	15	Eastwatch	7
1	\N	Elena Gilbert and her brother Jeremy come to terms with the death of their parents. Elena is popular amongst her peers and the perfect straight A student, but has difficulties hiding her grief from the world. Meanwhile, Jeremy treads on a dangerous path of using drugs to ease his pain. The arrival of new student Stefan Salvatore, however, makes Elena think about romantic possibilities.	The Vampire Diaries	16	Pilot	1
11	\N	Damon takes a trip to Georgia, where he surprises an old flame, Bree and enlists her help to figure out how to open the tomb. In the process, Damon comes face to face with someone who is determined to make him pay for past wrongs. Stefan opens up to Grams in his effort to help Bonnie overcome her fears and accept her powers. While researching his history paper in the public library, Jeremy meets a cute-but-geeky girl named Anna who has her own theories on the folklore of Mystic Falls. When Damon returns from Georgia, Stefan is waiting with news that will change their world.	The Vampire Diaries	16	Bloodlines	1
21	\N	Isobel returns to town and stuns Alaric with her attitude and her demands that he arrange a meeting with Elena. When mother and daughter finally meet, Isobel refuses to answer most of Elena’s questions, but reveals that she will stop at nothing to find the mysterious invention Johnathan Gilbert has been searching for. Isobel’s dangerous actions lead Stefan, Damon and Bonnie to step in and help Elena deal with the situation.	The Vampire Diaries	16	Isobel	1
10	\N	Elena decides to take matters into her own hands and offers a tempting incentive to Rose for her help. When things take an unexpected turn, however, Rose calls on Damon to deal with the plan Elena has set in motion. Jeremy’s reckless attempt to help Bonnie retrieve the moonstone lands him in a life-threatening position and forces Stefan to put himself in danger. Bonnie and Luka form a closer connection. Tyler shows Caroline the Lockwood cellar, where she makes a discovery that leaves them both terrified.	The Vampire Diaries	16	The Sacrifice	2
20	\N	Damon is willing to go to extraordinary lengths to prevent Elena from being a victim of Klaus’ plan to break the curse. Damon’s actions put him at terrible odds with Stefan and the tension that started brewing between the brothers over their differing opinions of how to help save Elena’s life blows up into full-scale conflict. Tyler returns to Mystic Falls after receiving a disturbing phone call. With the full moon marking the arrival of the sacrifice ritual, Stefan and Elena spend a romantic day together — afraid it might be their last.	The Vampire Diaries	16	The Last Day	2
2	\N	Klaus puts a plan in motion that will give him even more power, but even with the unwilling participation of werewolf Ray Sutton, things don’t go exactly as Klaus had planned. Damon and Alaric reluctantly go along with Elena’s new strategy to find Stefan, leading Damon into a dangerous fight with an unexpected enemy. Jeremy turns to Matt for help as he continues to try to understand what the ghosts from his past want from him. Unaware that Caroline is in need of his help, Tyler faces an emotional confrontation with his mother.	The Vampire Diaries	16	The Hybrid	3
7	\N	As Mystic Falls prepares to celebrate the traditional Illumination Night, the town is invaded by spirits of the dead. After a particularly violent encounter with an angry spirit, Damon asks Bonnie to find the reason behind the ghosts' surprising power. Elena convinces Jeremy to use his connection to the other side to help her find a new way to reach Stefan, leading Jeremy to a terrible choice. Finally, Alaric discovers a long-hidden clue to the past.	The Vampire Diaries	16	Ghost World	3
18	\N	Damon and Stefan focus a new project that will bring them closer to destroying Klaus, and they quickly bring Elena, Caroline and Matt in on the plan. After Klaus threatens someone close to Bonnie, she has no choice but to work on the spell he needs. Meanwhile, Klaus and Rebekah find the perfect motivator to convince Finn to cooperate with them, but Rebekah is more interested in her own brutal plan to take revenge on Damon. Stefan’s emotional turmoil leads him to a dangerous confrontation with Klaus and, later, to a heartbreaking moment with Elena.	The Vampire Diaries	16	The Murder of One	3
5	\N	Stefan and Klaus form an uneasy alliance to try and contain the danger that Connor has unleashed on the town. When Connor takes Jeremy, Matt and April hostage at the Grill, Stefan and Damon have a serious disagreement about the best course of action, and Elena is again caught between the two brothers. The situation quickly turns violent when Klaus sends one of his hybrids, Dean to stand up to Connor. Caroline is surprised to find Hayley at the Lockwood mansion. Meanwhile, Professor Shane works with Bonnie to help her get past her fear and guilt.	The Vampire Diaries	16	The Killer	4
14	\N	On the island, Damon has an ugly run-in with a Hunter named Vaughn, and realizes he is one of The Five. Stefan confesses his true feelings about the possibility of becoming human again to Elena. When a stunning new piece of information about the cure is suddenly revealed, it changes the stakes for everyone. Jeremy helps Bonnie recognize what is real and what is an illusion, and Shane is comforted by a woman from his past, Caitlin. Back in Mystic Falls, Caroline and Tyler find that their attempt to translate the code on the Hunter’s Sword is futile without help from Klaus, who has his own reasons for solving the puzzle.	The Vampire Diaries	16	Down the Rabbit Hole	4
1	\N	As the fifth season opens, Elena, after a passionate summer with Damon, heads to college nearby with Caroline as her roommate. Plus, a terrifying appearance by Silas.	The Vampire Diaries	16	I Know What You Did Last Summer	5
10	\N	Damon is forced to deal with a part of his past he thought was gone forever when Dr. Wes unleashes a secret weapon to stop him from rescuing Elena. Elena learns about the dark history of Whitmore College. Katherine turns to Matt for help.	The Vampire Diaries	16	Fifty Shades of Grayson	5
18	\N	Stefan and Elena experience unsettling dreams of the life they might have had together. Bonnie has a disturbing encounter with Grams. Enzo searches for a woman he loved decades ago. Bonnie learns that Jeremy is working with Liv. Matt has a terrifying encounter with inhabitants of the Other Side.	The Vampire Diaries	16	Resident Evil	5
6	\N	When Alaric realizes that Jo can’t be compelled, he asks Elena to do some digging into her background. After learning that Enzo has been captured by Tripp, Caroline teams up with Matt and Stefan to rescue him before Tripp learns their true identities. Armed with some new information about her past, Sarah breaks into Tripp’s office and is surprised when she finds Matt there, doing some investigating of his own. Meanwhile, Elena is forced to deal with the consequences of her actions, and Jeremy hits rock bottom, lashing out in a destructive way. Lastly, Damon is determined to take matters into his own hands when he receives some upsetting news.	The Vampire Diaries	16	The More You Ignore Me, The Closer I Get	6
10	\N		Snowpiercer	19	Into the White	2
1	\N	Arriving at Winterfell, Jon and Daenerys struggle to unite a divided North. Jon Snow gets some big news.	Game of Thrones	15	Winterfell	8
5	\N	Stefan takes action to protect Elena. Stefan is hopeful that his plan to get rid of Damon is working. Elena and Jenna are concerned about Jeremy’s relationship with Vicki. Stefan decides to reveal parts of his past to Elena. At a fund-raising car wash, Bonnie is surprised by abilities she didn’t know she possessed, and seeks advice from her grandmother. Finally, Elena hears a disturbing story about the Salvatore family from a stranger.	The Vampire Diaries	16	You're Undead to Me	1
15	\N	Matt and Caroline are surprised by the sudden reappearance of Matt’s mother Kelly. Stefan and Elena are worried about Damon’s new attitude. Damon is asked by Sheriff Forbes to take part in a fund-raising bachelor auction. Alaric discovers shocking secrets from his own past. With help from Jenna and Stefan, Elena is determined to find out everything she can about her birth mother, but the truth may be more than she can handle.	The Vampire Diaries	16	A Few Good Men	1
1	\N	The second season begins with Elena discovering her uncle John's bloody body and learning Jeremy's fate, and Damon realizing that Katherine has returned. Meanwhile, Caroline is taken to the hospital following a car accident, and Tyler's mysterious uncle Mason arrives in town.	The Vampire Diaries	16	The Return	2
13	\N	Johnathan Gilbert’s return to Mystic Falls comes as an unhappy surprise to Elena, Jenna and Damon. Caroline lets Stefan know about her conversation with Tyler, and Stefan does his best to reach out to a confused and conflicted Tyler. Jeremy comforts Bonnie after her disturbing conversation with Jonas... When Jules takes a hostage, the situation quickly escalates into a violent confrontation.	The Vampire Diaries	16	Daddy Issues	2
22	\N	Mystic Falls screens "Gone with The Wind" in the town square, and Damon's memories of Katherine in 1864 mix with the reality of present-day Elena. Stefan pays a steep price after trying to prevent a tragedy, and Sheriff Forbes makes a dangerous mistake while trying to keep everyone safe. Multiple lives hang in the balance as the consequences of the sacrifice ritual play out to a horrifying conclusion.	The Vampire Diaries	16	As I Lay Dying	2
13	\N	Sheriff Forbes delivers some disturbing news to Alaric and Elena about the weapon used in a recent murder. In the Salvatore brothers’ escalating quest to kill Klaus, Stefan turns to Bonnie and Abby, while Damon reaches out to an old acquaintance for help in setting up an elaborate plan. Intent on a plan of his own, Klaus hosts a strange dinner party, where he reveals another story from his family’s violent past until an unexpected guest brings the party to an end. Meanwhile, Caroline is heartbroken when she is unable to stop a tragedy from unfolding.	The Vampire Diaries	16	Bringing Out the Dead	3
2	\N	Elena tries to cope with the extreme highs and lows that are part of becoming a vampire, and Stefan and Damon almost come to blows while arguing about what is best for her. Damon decides to help Elena in his own way and asks her not to tell Stefan. A stranger, Connor Jordan, arrives in town and begins questioning Sheriff Forbes and Mayor Lockwood. Connor’s actions quickly convince Stefan that they are dealing with a dangerous vampire hunter. Jeremy and Matt are surprised to see a girl they used to know, April, has returned to town and is enrolling at Mystic Falls High. At a town gathering, Elena comes close to losing control until Caroline steps in to help her. Finally, Damon confides his feelings to an unexpected friend.	The Vampire Diaries	16	Memorial	4
12	\N	When Rebekah turns down Klaus’ plea to stop Kol and protect Jeremy, Klaus turns to Stefan for help. After an angry confrontation with her father, Mayor Hopkins, over his unconventional approach to ending the violence in Mystic Falls, Bonnie has a frightening run-in with Kol, followed by an unexpected visitor. Klaus complicates the already tense feelings between Stefan and Damon by revealing a bit of Stefan’s personal life, then surprises Damon by asking for personal advice. Elena tells Stefan about her dangerous plan for Jeremy, leaving Stefan in a difficult spot. When the high school’s 1980s Decade Dance is cancelled by Mayor Hopkins, Stefan finds a charming way to make it up to a disappointed Rebekah.	The Vampire Diaries	16	A View To A Kill	4
22	\N	As Graduation Day approaches, Caroline tries to distract Elena by focusing on simple tasks like sending out announcements, but Elena won't be swayed from her new obsession. Sheriff Forbes calls Damon and Stefan to the hospital, where someone has been attacking patients. Still trying to force Katherine to help her, Bonnie refuses to give up on her plan to defeat Silas. As a violent wind storm causes a power outage in Mystic Falls, ghosts suddenly appear - some with good intentions and some bent on revenge.	The Vampire Diaries	16	The Walking Dead	4
11	\N	Katherine recalls the traumatic night in 1490 when she gave birth to a daughter who was immediately taken from her. Meanwhile, Nadia creates a frightening plan to protect her mother; and Caroline indulges in some scandalous behavior.	The Vampire Diaries	16	500 Years of Solitude	5
20	\N	Damon and Caroline suspect Stefan and Elena of keeping a secret while they hide from the travelers, unaware of the dead man out for revenge. Meanwhile Matt, Jeremy and Bonnie help Tyler get rid of Julian.	The Vampire Diaries	16	What Lies Beneath	5
7	\N	 When the past comes back to haunt her, Elena is forced to face her problems head on. After a night out at the annual Whitmore Medical Center Fundraiser, Jo opens up to Alaric about her own tragic past. Meanwhile, Stefan, Matt and Enzo resort to extreme measures when Tripp withholds information about his vampire-killing operation, and Caroline is in a race against the clock when Sheriff Forbes gets caught in the middle of a dangerous plan. Elsewhere, Tyler and Liv grow closer, and Damon stumbles upon a startling clue that renews his hope.	The Vampire Diaries	16	Do You Remember the First Time?	6
17	\N	With the help of Bonnie and Kai, Damon and Elena set forth a plan to rescue Damon's mother Lily, who is trapped in the 1903 prison world. Meanwhile, when Caroline's plan for Stefan backfires, she is left to pick up the pieces. Elsewhere, back at Whitmore College, Enzo and Alaric's attempt to reel Caroline back in doesn't quite go as planned when they realize they're outmaneuvered. Lastly, an unexpected gift from Bonnie leaves Damon shaken to his core.	The Vampire Diaries	16	A Bird in a Gilded Cage	6
5	\N	After realizing the downward spiral he was on, Damon decides he’s going to turn over a new leaf and that his actions moving forward will do right by Elena. Lily prepares for the arrival of a special figure from her past, while Enzo stands by not sure what to expect.\\n\\nElsewhere, at Caroline’s urging, Stefan comes face-to-face with Valerie and learns some upsetting details about her past, while Enzo and Bonnie find themselves at odds when they’re forced to fend off a violent threat. Finally, when Bonnie learns some disturbing information involving the Phoenix stone, she is forced to confront Alaric.	The Vampire Diaries	16	Live Through This	7
8	\N		Snowpiercer	19	The Eternal Engineer	2
4	\N	Lisa falls for the teenaged leader of a militant environmentalist group and tries to impress him by living in Springfield's oldest tree in order to keep it from being cut down.	The Simpsons	18	Lisa the Tree Hugger	12
8	\N	On his birthday, Stefan is surprised by a visit from Lexi, one of his oldest friends. Still upset by the events at the Halloween haunted house, Elena does her best to stay away from Stefan, but Lexi gives her some unsolicited relationship advice. Elena and Jenna are surprised by a change in Jeremy’s behavior. At Damon’s insistence, Caroline tries to get his medallion back from Bonnie. Finally, Damon’s offer to help Sheriff Forbes has sudden and tragic results.	The Vampire Diaries	16	162 Candles	1
18	\N	While Stefan struggles to control his new situation, Elena and Jeremy are surprised by a visit from their uncle, John Gilbert. Alaric has an awkward talk with Elena about Isobel. At a Founder’s Day event, Stefan displays a rare party attitude and Damon’s attempt to find out why Uncle John has returned to town takes an ugly turn. An incident at the party causes trouble between Matt and Tyler... and the relationship between Matt and his mother, Kelly, reaches a new low. Meanwhile, Elena’s effort to comfort Jeremy falls short and he decides to take matters into his own hands.	The Vampire Diaries	16	Under Control	1
5	\N	Tyler learns more about the Lockwood family curse from Mason. Stefan and Damon argue over how to handle Mason. Elena tries to keep Jeremy from becoming more involved with the Lockwood mystery, but Jeremy makes an effort to hang out with Tyler. Mason gives Sheriff Lockwood some startling information, leading to a night of violence, confession and heartbreak.	The Vampire Diaries	16	Kill Or Be Killed	2
18	\N	As the high school prepares to throw a “1960s Decade Dance,” Elena starts receiving disturbing messages from Klaus via an unusual source. Bonnie tries to reassure Jeremy that she is strong enough to help Elena, but a worried Jeremy asks Stefan for advice. Caroline talks Matt into taking her to the dance. Expecting Klaus to show up at the dance, Damon and Alaric attend as chaperones, but Klaus is playing a complicated game that keeps them on edge. Finally, Damon comes up with a new plan of action that shocks and upsets everyone.	The Vampire Diaries	16	The Last Dance	2
8	\N	With help from Elena and Bonnie, Alaric tries to decipher the meaning behind his recent discovery Elena and Rebekah engage in a mean-girl power struggle, until Rebekah finally reveals some of her family's ancient secrets and the violent past she shares with Klaus and Elijah. Damon tries a reckless new approach to make a breakthrough with Stefan, and they're both surprised by an unlikely ally.	The Vampire Diaries	16	Ordinary People	3
21	\N	Klaus acts on his intentions to leave town with Elena, but finds resistance from a surprising new enemy. Bonnie calls on Abby to help her with a difficult spell. As events spiral out of control, Elena is determined to protect Caroline, Damon and Stefan enlist Tyler’s help, while Bonnie and Jeremy take a terrifying risk to make sure her spell is effective. Damon and Stefan have a surprisingly candid conversation about the future.	The Vampire Diaries	16	Before Sunset	3
8	\N	When Stefan confronts Damon with a suspicion about Elena, Damon has no choice but to help Stefan investigate. Searching for answers, Damon and Stefan visit modern day New Orleans to see if they can find anyone who remembers the events of their last visit in 1942, including one of Damon’s former flames, Charlotte. Elena, Caroline and Bonnie share a girls’ night while the Salvatore brothers are out of town, and emotions run high when Elena delivers some shocking news. At Hayley’s urging, Tyler confronts one of Klaus’ hybrids, Kimberly, and the situation quickly escalates into violence. Finally, Damon is faced with a heartbreaking decision.	The Vampire Diaries	16	We’ll Always Have Bourbon Street	4
18	\N	Elena and Rebekah take off in search of Katherine and find themselves in a small town in Pennsylvania, where Elena has a surprising encounter with another old acquaintance -- Elijah. Stefan and Damon are both concerned about Elena’s state of mind and are determined to do what’s best for her, but she makes it clear that helping her will be difficult. Damon is not sure how to react when Stefan reveals his unexpected plan for the future. Meanwhile, in Mystic Falls, Klaus receives Caroline’s reluctant help and comes to a new understanding of Silas’ powers.	The Vampire Diaries	16	American Gothic	4
5	\N	Elena meets a sad and secretive student on campus. Elena and Damon attend the Whitmore Historical Ball dressed as Anne Boleyn and Henry VIII. While there, Elena receives a disturbing message from Dr. Maxfield. Nadia reveals her surprising history to Katherine;. Silas demands that Damon commit an unthinkable act.	The Vampire Diaries	16	Monster's Ball	5
19	\N	Enzo holds Elena, Stefan and Bonnie hostage to uncover the truth about the love of his life. Markos performs a ritual to undo witch's magic.	The Vampire Diaries	16	Man on Fire	5
8	\N	As Caroline and Elena prepare to host Friendsgiving at the dorm, they receive some hopeful news from Alaric and Stefan, who have traveled to Portland to gather some information regarding the Gemini Coven. Tyler is determined to help Liv after she and Luke reveal some disturbing information about their witch lineage and the impending plans their coven has for them. Meanwhile, dinner takes a drastic turn when Jo, who has revealed some painful details about her past, finds herself fighting for her life, leaving Alaric scrambling to help from a distance. Finally, Kai makes a dangerous discovery that brings him one step closer to his release.	The Vampire Diaries	16	Fade Into You	6
18	\N	With their humanity turned off, Stefan and Caroline begin wreaking havoc at Whitmore, leaving Damon to come up with a risky plan involving Lily. After rushing to help Jo treat victims of Stefan and Caroline’s latest killing spree, Elena discovers Jo is pregnant, prompting her to reevaluate her own life as a vampire. Meanwhile, when Sarah boldly turns the tables on an unsuspecting Enzo, he is forced to open up about his tragic past. Lastly, at Scull Bar, a twisted round of karaoke leaves Tyler and Matt in a dangerous situation.	The Vampire Diaries	16	I Never Could Love Like That	6
4	\N	Just as Damon thinks he's gained the upper hand in his fight against Lily, an unexpected turn of events leaves him scrambling for a plan B. Elsewhere, when the fallout of Damon's actions gains the unwanted attention of Mary Louise and Nora, Stefan and Caroline are forced to spend the night distracting the girls at Whitmore College's Heaven & Hell ball. Finally, after suspecting that she's up to something, Enzo sets off on a mission to find out what Valerie is hiding, while a plan set by Alaric and Bonnie leaves their worlds turned upside down.	The Vampire Diaries	16	I Carry Your Heart With Me	7
15	\N	While Stefan and Valerie search for a magical herb that can keep him hidden from Rayna, Damon comes up with his own plan to take her down for good. However, while at The Armory, Bonnie makes a shocking discovery about Rayna that brings Damon’s plan to a screeching halt.\\n\\nElsewhere, a conversation with Caroline leaves Stefan questioning their future together, while Matt decides it may be time to truly take a stand against the vampires of Mystic Falls. Finally, as the season’s middle chapter draws to a close, Damon’s desire to take himself out of the game ramps up as he races to complete unfinished business with Stefan and Bonnie.	The Vampire Diaries	16	I Would for You	7
16	\N	The present-day murders in Mystic Falls remind Damon of a similar crime spree a century earlier. In flashbacks to 1912, Damon recalls a beautiful vampire, Sage, who showed him a whole new way to exist. Sheriff Forbes warns Damon not to get involved in her investigation, but Damon is convinced she’s going after the wrong suspect. Elena and Matt resort to breaking and entering in their search for evidence to prove Dr. Fell is a murderer. For reasons known only to her, Rebekah, becomes interested in locating one of the town’s oldest landmarks. Finally, Elena comes to a new understanding of the path her life has taken, and Damon makes an emotional confession to Stefan.	The Vampire Diaries	16	1912	3
4	\N	Damon goes with Elena and Bonnie to visit Whitmore College, where Professor Shane is taking over the Occult Studies classes formerly taught by Bonnie’s grandmother. At a fraternity costume party, Damon takes advantage of the wild scene to give Elena a lesson in choosing a victim. Rebekah’s attempt to buy Matt’s forgiveness falls flat, but she is intrigued by unexpected news from Klaus. When Stefan questions Klaus about Connor’s motives, Klaus reveals a long-ago encounter with a powerful group of vampire hunters, but it’s Rebekah who delivers the information that stuns Stefan.	The Vampire Diaries	16	The Five	4
16	\N	Elena’s new outlook has everyone concerned, leading Stefan and Damon to agree that going back to the normal routine of high school would be the best thing for her. Caroline is pleasantly surprised when Elena decides to rejoin the cheerleading squad, but her pleasure turns to shock when Elena’s behavior proves dangerous. Not giving up on their search for the cure, Damon and Rebekah work together until his unwanted advice catches her off-guard. Klaus tries to use Hayley to get the information he’s after and makes an intriguing discovery in the process. Meanwhile, a bored Elena throws a wild party and gets into an ugly fight.	The Vampire Diaries	16	Bring It On	4
3	\N	Elena and Katherine both dream that Stefan is in danger and convince Damon to help them find him. But their plans are thwarted by a mysterious woman who seems to know everything about Stefan's past and Damon's disturbing future.	The Vampire Diaries	16	Original Sin	5
13	\N	Caroline convinces Elena and Bonnie to attend Whitmore College's Bitter Ball for broken-hearted students. Bonnie meets a fellow student who appears to be dabbling in witchcraft. Tyler worries about Matt's relationship with Nadia. Damon and Enzo resort to violence to convince Bonnie and Jeremy to help them get revenge, but their plan takes a horrifying turn.	The Vampire Diaries	16	Total Eclipse of the Heart	5
1	\N	After spending the past four months coping with the loss of Damon in an unconventional and potentially dangerous way, Elena has returned to Whitmore College for the start of sophomore year. Unable to move on, Caroline is desperate to find a way to reverse the anti-magic spell the Travelers have put over Mystic Falls and grows frustrated when her calls to Stefan go unanswered. Tyler, who is human once again, has a run-in at a football tailgate that tests his ability to control his anger, while Matt worries that Jeremy is dealing with the loss of Bonnie in a self-destructive way. Alaric, who is struggling to adjust to his new life as a vampire, finds himself in an awkward situation when he meets Jo, a beautiful doctor at the university hospital. Last, while everyone believes Stefan is off tracking a lead to get Damon and Bonnie back, Elena is shocked when she learns the truth of what he has really been up to.	The Vampire Diaries	16	I'll Remember	6
11	\N	More powerful than ever, Kai holds Elena captive while he learns to control his newly acquired magic. At the Salvatore mansion, Liv and Alaric try to prepare Jo for the impending merge ceremony with Kai, but they quickly realize Jo is weaker than they thought. After bringing Sheriff Forbes home from the hospital, Caroline travels with Stefan to North Carolina in search of a cure for her mother's cancer. Meanwhile, Stefan, who has his own intentions for traveling to North Carolina, is caught off guard when Enzo shows up demanding to know what Stefan is hiding. Lastly, when Damon discovers Elena has been kidnapped by Kai, he is forced to rethink his strategy after an unexpected visitor throws a wrench into his plan.	The Vampire Diaries	16	Woke Up With a Monster	6
21	\N	It's Alaric and Jo's wedding day and Elena and Bonnie do their best to help a stressed out Jo with the last minute preparations. After uncovering some life-changing news that Damon has been keeping from him, Stefan takes his brother on a road trip to give him some perspective on his future with Elena. Elsewhere, when Caroline returns to Mystic Falls after dealing with the fallout of her humanity-free rampage, she begins making amends with her friends and comes to a realization about her and Stefan's prospects of being together. Finally, when Bonnie begins having vivid nightmares that Lily is coming after her, she enlists Matt's help in taking Lily down.	The Vampire Diaries	16	I'll Wed You In The Golden Summertime	6
10	\N	After finding himself on the wrong end of Julian's plan to avenge Lily's death, Damon awakens to find himself trapped inside the Phoenix stone, tormented by a traumatic experience from his time in the Civil War and forced to face his darkest demon in order to get out. On the outside, Bonnie is in a race against the clock to get Damon out before the effects of the Phoenix stone take over and leave him changed forever.	The Vampire Diaries	16	Hell Is Other People	7
21	\N	When Damon's risky attempt to save Bonnie takes an unexpected turn, the consequences of his actions forces everyone to band together to help her pull through.\\n\\nMeanwhile, when a new threat leaves Caroline's life in jeopardy, Stefan makes a rash decision that ultimately forces them to face the fallout from their relationship. Elsewhere, Enzo tries to hold it together as he painfully watch Bonnie in the fight of her life, while Matt takes matters into his own hands to save one of his closest friends.	The Vampire Diaries	16	Requiem for a Dream	7
5	\N	Spiraling down a dangerous path of self-destruction, Damon’s latest actions prove he may be beyond the point of return. Unwilling to give up on his brother, Stefan is forced to make a gut-wrenching decision that threatens to change their relationship forever. Elsewhere, Bonnie gets advice from Caroline on how to break through to Enzo, while Matt attempts to decipher a mysterious box of messages that he’s received. Finally, after tragedy strikes close to home, Stefan and the others are forced to remember what matters most to them.	The Vampire Diaries	16	Coming Home Was a Mistake	8
8	\N	Stefan and Damon attend an anger management support group looking for their next victim. Sybil is still alive and teaching a group of high school students who she’ll later use as leverage to get Caroline to locate a historical artifact that can be used against her. Meanwhile, Stefan and Damon continue their commitment to Cade as they test the morals of a young doctor, Tara.	The Vampire Diaries	16	We Have History Together	8
15	\N	A wedding is quickly planned in order for Damon and Stefan to lure a dangerous enemy out into the open. This looming threat puts the fate of Mystic Falls in eminent danger and must be destroyed.	The Vampire Diaries	16	We’re Planning a June Wedding	8
9	\N		Snowpiercer	19	The Show Must Go On	2
20	\N	Acting on a mysterious tip that a plot is brewing against him in New Orleans, Klaus makes a trip to the town he and his family helped build. Klaus’ questions lead him to a reunion with his former protégé, Marcel, a charismatic vampire who has total control over the human and supernatural inhabitants of New Orleans. Determined to help his brother find redemption, Elijah follows Klaus and soon learns that Hayley has also come to the French Quarter searching for clues to her family history, and has fallen into the hands of a powerful witch named Sophie. Meanwhile, in Mystic Falls, Damon and Stefan continue with their plan for Elena, while Katherine reveals a surprising vulnerability to Rebekah and asks her to deliver a message.	The Vampire Diaries	16	The Originals	4
7	\N	Dr. Wes gives Katherine some disturbing news. Jeremy and Bonnie share a glimmer of hope after talking with Amara. Silas fails to keep a promise which causes Damon to turn to Tessa for help with his new plan. Stefan makes a heartbreaking confession to Damon and Elena.	The Vampire Diaries	16	Death and the Maiden	5
15	\N	Nadia recalls her centuries-long search for her mother. Stefan, Caroline and Matt come up with a desperate plan to save Elena's life. Damon baits Tyler into an ugly confrontation and seeks revenge against Dr. Wes. Bonnie learns a terrifying secret that threatens the lives of all her friends.	The Vampire Diaries	16	Gone Girl	5
3	\N	In an attempt to bring some fun back into their lives, Elena persuades Caroline to meet her at the swimming hole where she plans to introduce her to Liam. Tyler, still working on controlling his anger issues, asks Liv for a favor and is surprised when she makes an unexpected confession. Stefan arrives back in Mystic Falls looking for Enzo and is caught off guard when he notices a strange change in Elena. Meanwhile, at the lake, Enzo’s actions cause Matt to make a startling revelation, and Jeremy makes a discovery about the anti-magic spell that could potentially put Elena’s life in danger. Elsewhere, Damon and Bonnie stumble upon clues that lead them to believe they’re not alone.	The Vampire Diaries	16	Welcome to Paradise	6
14	\N	It’s Jeremy’s last day in Mystic Falls and Elena puts on a brave face as they reminisce about their past. Stefan and Caroline find themselves growing closer as they prepare Caroline’s family cabin for her mother to live out her final days. While packing up her office, Sheriff Forbes turns to Damon for help solving one of her remaining open cases involving Elena’s parents. Elsewhere, when a violent confrontation with Enzo leaves Jeremy wondering whether he should leave or not, Matt finds his own life on the line after Enzo lures him and Sarah Salvatore into his dangerous plan. Lastly, Caroline rushes to the hospital after learning her mother has taken a turn for the worse.	The Vampire Diaries	16	Stay	6
2	\N	When an impulsive decision by Damon threatens to unravel a carefully negotiated deal between Stefan and Lily, he has no choice but to make amends with his mother before things spiral further out of control. However, Lily remains one step ahead and carries out a harsh plan that hits Damon where it hurts most.\\n\\nElsewhere, after returning to Whitmore Collage, Alaric turns to Bonnie for help with a mysterious and potentially dangerous artifact he has obtained, while Matt is forced into making a risky life or death decision. Meanwhile, Caroline, who finds herself a pawn in Lily and the heretics' plan for retribution, uncovers a shocking detail about Stefan's past.	The Vampire Diaries	16	Never Let Me Go	7
11	\N	With the traumatic effects of the Phoenix stone taking a toll on his brother, Stefan attempts to help Damon regain his grip on reality, while secretly struggling with his own experience in the stone. Elsewhere, Matt and Bonnie deal with the fallout after Julian and his men take over Mystic Falls, leading Matt to spiral out of control and into trouble with an officer named Penny.\\n\\nMeanwhile, Tyler returns to town for Alaric's baby shower and Caroline makes an upsetting discovery involving Alaric and his future plan for the babies.	The Vampire Diaries	16	Things We Lost in the Fire	7
20	\N	With Bonnie's life at stake and an uphill battle ahead of them, Damon and Enzo lead the charge to save Bonnie before her condition worsens. Stefan reluctantly teams up with Matt for the sake of Bonnie and uncovers the truth behind Matt's anger towards him.\\n\\nElsewhere, determined to help her best friend, Caroline joins Alaric on a mission and quickly realizes how much she's missed her former supernatural lifestyle. Finally, after their plan takes an unexpected turn, Damon makes a fateful decision that will forever change his relationship with Bonnie.	The Vampire Diaries	16	Kill 'Em All	7
10	\N	Sybil enacts revenge on Damon by putting him in a catatonic state. Caroline and Bonnie enter Damon’s mind and run into familiar faces from the past, only to discover Stefan is the key to Damon’s fate. It’s a race against time for the bell as both Sybil and her sister Seline jockey for its control.	The Vampire Diaries	16	Nostalgia's a Bitch	8
5	\N	After a bomb explodes downtown, the army rolls in and takes over. When Joe learns Iris is writing about 'The Streak' and tries unsuccessfully to have the story stopped, Barry decides to have The Flash pay her a visit.	The Flash	17	Plastique	1
8	\N	Barry is thrilled when Oliver, Felicity and Diggle come to Central City to investigate a case involving a deadly boomerang.\\n\\nThe crossover continues on Arrow S03E08 The Brave and the Bold.	The Flash	17	Flash vs. Arrow (I)	1
13	\N	While Barry, Harrison, and Caitlin hunt down Ronnie, who has attacked a man, Joe recruits Cisco to help him learn the truth about who murdered Nora Allen.	The Flash	17	The Nuclear Man	1
16	\N	The Flash learns that Captain Cold and Heat Wave have returned to Central City. This time Snart has brought along his baby sister Lisa to help wreak havoc on the city.	The Flash	17	Rogue Time	1
20	\N	Barry, Caitlin, Cisco and Joe set a trap for Wells. Cisco uses himself as prey which puts him in grave danger. Meanwhile, Eddie makes a decision regarding Iris, which leaves Joe a bit unsettled.	The Flash	17	The Trap	1
23	\N	Wells presents Barry with a life-changing choice. Dr. Martin Stein and Ronnie Raymond return to help the S.T.A.R. Labs team with this final fight.	The Flash	17	Fast Enough	1
7	\N	Grodd returns to Central City and kidnaps Caitlin. Barry and team race to find her before it’s too late. Meanwhile, Cisco plans his first date with the new barista at Jitters, Kendra Saunders and Patty begins to suspect Barry is hiding something from her.	The Flash	17	Gorilla Warfare	2
10	\N	Now that they've grown closer, Barry considers telling Patty that he is The Flash. Meanwhile, Joe and Iris try to get to know Wally, and the team hunts down a meta-human who can slow time itself.	The Flash	17	Potential Energy	2
16	\N	Having arrived in town intent on creating maximum chaos, Trajectory's antics are misinterpreted as having been perpetrated by the Flash himself. Barry thus must quickly! uncover the mystery of who is the girl under the mask — as well as what is driving her mad desire for speed and destruction	The Flash	17	Trajectory	2
5	\N	With Homecoming around the corner, Elena invites Liam to attend a party at the corn maze with her. Instead of attending the homecoming festivities, Caroline is preoccupied after Stefan shows up unexpectedly and needs her help cleaning up a mess created by Enzo. Heeding Elena’s advice to be more social, Alaric reluctantly attends the party, but a devastating accident quickly leaves him and Jo rushing to save lives. Elsewhere, Tyler finds himself in a dangerous position when his werewolf curse is put to the test, and an emotionally embattled Stefan comes clean to Caroline about his intent to move on from Mystic Falls. Lastly, Damon and Bonnie make an important discovery that affects their quest to get back home.	The Vampire Diaries	16	The World Has Turned and Left Me Here	6
15	\N	After assigning tasks to each of her friends, Caroline attempts to deal with her current situation as reality begins to set in around her. While spending the day with Caroline, Elena grows concerned when she starts noticing a strange change in her behavior. Meanwhile, Alaric becomes wary when Kai, who has begun experiencing unexpected consequences from the merge, turns to Jo, desperate for her help. Elsewhere, while Bonnie finds herself in an unfamiliar situation, Matt and Tyler contemplate a major life change. And when Damon offers Caroline advice on how to cope with everything going on around her, it forces him to revisit painful memories involving his own mother.	The Vampire Diaries	16	Let Her Go	6
3	\N	In the aftermath of a clever plan orchestrated by Lily, Damon sets off on a road trip with Bonnie and Alaric in search of leverage they can use against his mother. Meanwhile, Caroline, who is being held hostage by the Heretics, learns some shocking information about Valerie’s past, while Stefan learns a few unexpected details about his own past from Lily. Finally, Alaric turns to Bonnie for her help after coming clean about a secret he’s been keeping.	The Vampire Diaries	16	Age of Innocence	7
13	\N	When complications from her supernatural pregnancy leave Caroline's life hanging in the balance, Stefan and Valerie take extreme measures to try and save her and the babies. Meanwhile, after uncovering a dark secret about Damon, Enzo uses the information to force Damon into helping him track down Rayna Cruz, a ruthless vampire hunter who is on the loose. However, when Damon's actions inadvertently put everyone he loves in Rayna's path, he is forced to make things right before it's too late.	The Vampire Diaries	16	This Woman's Work	7
1	\N	Months after Damon and Enzo mysteriously vanished from the Armory vault, Stefan tirelessly pushes forward with their search, while Bonnie struggles holding onto hope that they will be found. Meanwhile, a dangerous encounter with an unexpected visitor leaves Caroline and Alaric fearing that someone – or something – may be targeting their family. Finally, after following some mysterious clues, Stefan realizes that whatever has a hold of his brother may have a more damaging grip over him than he could have ever imagined.	The Vampire Diaries	16	Hello, Brother	8
11	\N	Cade returns to Mystic Falls and presents Damon and Stefan with additional assignments, each with unthinkable consequences. Even with tension growing in their friendship, Caroline and Matt do their best to protect the town’s residents from Cade’s appetite for their souls. Bonnie and Enzo hit the road on a romantic trip, taking the bell with them in hopes to keep it safe.	The Vampire Diaries	16	You Made a Choice to Be Good	8
6	\N	The Flash faces a new meta-human named Tony, who can turn himself into girded steel at will.	The Flash	17	The Flash is Born	1
9	\N	Barry enjoys the annual tradition of tree trimming and gift exchange with Joe and Iris. He gives Iris a touching gift, but the moment is interrupted by Eddie’s arrival.	The Flash	17	The Man in the Yellow Suit	1
14	\N	Martin and Ronnie are separated, only to realize that they must learn how to rejoin before Eiling hunts them down and kills them... and the Flash. Meanwhile, Joe shows Barry the 3D images from the Nora Allen crime scene, and Barry asks Martin for advice on time travel.	The Flash	17	Fallout	1
21	\N	While Barry tries to find Eddie, a mysterious mind-controlled thief launches attacks on Central City's gold reserves. The team soon discovers that a telepathic gorilla is behind the robberies... and is following Harrison's commands. Meanwhile, Iris confronts Barry, while Harrison prepares to return home.	The Flash	17	Grodd Lives	1
1	\N	Picking up months after the Singularity attacked Central City, Barry is still struggling to forgive himself for Eddie’s death. Concerned about putting his friends in danger, Barry has pushed everyone away and has chosen to protect the city on his own. When a meta-human named Atom Smasher attacks the city, Iris tells Barry that he needs to let his friends help him protect the citizens of Central City. Meanwhile, Cisco helps Joe with his Meta Task Force.	The Flash	17	The Man Who Saved Central City	2
8	\N	Vandal Savage arrives in Central City and sets his sights on Kendra Saunders. After Vandal attacks Kendra and Cisco, they turn to Barry for help. Realizing how dangerous Vandal is, Barry takes Kendra to Star City and asks Oliver and team to hide her until he can figure out how to stop Vandal. However, things quickly go from bad to worse when a man with wings AKA Hawkman shows up and flies off with Kendra. Meanwhile, Harrison develops a serum to make Barry run faster and asks Jay to test it out.\\n\\nThe crossover continues on Arrow S04E08 Legends of Yesterday (II).	The Flash	17	Legends of Today (I)	2
11	\N	When Cisco gets a vibe of Eobard Thawne, Barry and the team don’t believe it. But, after an attack at Mercury Labs, Christina McGee confirms that the Reverse Flash is back. Meanwhile, Iris and Francine share a nice moment that brings Iris closer to her brother, Wally.	The Flash	17	The Reverse-Flash Returns	2
17	\N	After the shocking revelation that Zoom is Jay Garrick, Barry is more determined than ever to get back to Earth-2 to stop Zoom forever. Desperate to find a way to increase his speed, Barry decides to travel back in time and masquerade as his earlier self in order to get his arch-nemesis, Dr. Harrison Wells/Eobard Thawne, to teach him how to run faster. However, things don’t go as planned and Barry is stunned to face familiar foe Hartley Rathaway, as well as old friend Eddie Thawne. Iris makes peace with her past in order to embrace her future.	The Flash	17	Flash Back	2
20	\N	Zoom arrives back on Earth-1 intent on taking over Central City. Barry and Wells come up with a plan to stop Zoom once and for all but it’s extremely dangerous. Unsure if he should take the risk, Barry reaches out to both fathers for advice. Henry is adamantly opposed to Barry risking his life again but Joe thinks he can handle it which puts the two men at odds with each other. Meanwhile, Cisco is shocked when he vibes the Earth-2 villain Rupture, who happens to be his brother Dante’s doppelganger. Rupture came to this Earth seeking justice for Reverb’s death. Iris decides she’s finally ready to open up to Barry about her feelings for him.	The Flash	17	Rupture	2
20	\N	Barry continues to struggle with how he feels about Nora's betrayal. Brie Larvan, Joss Jackam and Peter Merkel return to Central City. Meanwhile, Cisco makes a bold decision.	The Flash	17	Gone Rogue	5
9	\N	Damon finds himself in hot water after he carries out a plan that requires Alaric’s unwilling participation. When Elena shares some hopeful news with Jeremy about Bonnie, she is caught off guard by his reaction. Liv helps Damon and Elena with their plan to get Bonnie back, but when things take an unexpected turn, she’s left with a difficult choice to make. Elsewhere, Matt takes matters into his own hands when Enzo’s actions cross the line, and Kai’s existence continues to be a dangerous threat.	The Vampire Diaries	16	I Alone	6
19	\N	Wrestling with whether or not to tell Elena about the cure, Damon brings up their future together and what life would be like if they weren’t vampires. Meanwhile, it’s all hands on deck when attempts to stop a humanity-free Caroline doesn’t go as planned. Elsewhere, when Bonnie discovers that Damon has betrayed her trust, she takes matters into her own hands, setting off a chain of events that leaves Damon dealing with the fallout. Lastly, after being forced to face his traumatic past, Enzo sets out for answers and is surprised when he learns the truth about the day he was turned into a vampire.	The Vampire Diaries	16	Because	6
7	\N	In order to get through to Lily about Julian's manipulating ways, Stefan and Damon confront their mother with painful memories from their childhood. However, when Lily reveals a dark secret she's been harboring for over 160 years, Stefan and Damon are left questioning everything they've ever known about their family. Determined to prove himself to Lily, Enzo comes face-to-face with Julian and challenges him to a duel, but an unexpected twist threatens to complicate things.\\n\\nElsewhere, Matt finds himself in the middle of a deepening mystery involving the residents of Mystic Falls, and Caroline's world is turned upside down when Valerie reveals some life-changing news to her.	The Vampire Diaries	16	Mommie Dearest	7
17	\N	In the aftermath of his brother's fateful decision, Stefan awakens to find himself thrown into a life or death situation with only his basic instincts to rely on. With time working against him, he sets off on a journey of survival while forced to confront a lifetime of irreversible damage Damon has done to their relationship.\\n\\nMeanwhile, desperate to save his brother, Damon follows an unusual lead he has come across, while Matt sends Valerie to Dallas to enlist Alaric's help in the search for Stefan. Finally, when Rayna discovers the emergence of a new threat, she sets off on her own mission to find Stefan before the others do.	The Vampire Diaries	16	I Went to the Woods	7
4	\N	Tasked with finding a mysterious artifact, Damon’s latest mission takes him to Texas where a violent run-in with Peter Maxwell leads to a surprising revelation. Meanwhile, after gaining the upper hand in their fight to save Damon and Enzo, Stefan and Alaric team up and uncover the origins of the mysterious force they’re up against. Finally, Matt returns to the fray after his past and present collide in an unexpected way.	The Vampire Diaries	16	An Eternity of Misery	8
13	\N	Damon and Alaric come face to face with an old enemy after they obtain a weapon that may be able to destroy Cade. Stefan is held captive by a surprising acquaintance and is forced to confront a dark secret from his past. Meanwhile, Caroline and Matt try to keep Stefan’s violent history from destroying him. Cade focuses his attention on Bonnie and digs deep into her mind.	The Vampire Diaries	16	The Lies Will Catch Up To You	8
11	\N	Dr. Wells' former protégé, Hartley Rathaway, returns to seek revenge on his mentor. Meanwhile, Iris is hired as a cub reporter; Cisco recalls his first day on the job at S.T.A.R. Labs; and Joe asks Eddie for a favor but asks him to keep it a secret from Barry.	The Flash	17	The Sound and the Fury	1
3	\N	When Barry and the team find out Captain Cold has been kidnapped, they form an uneasy alliance with his sister, Lisa. However, Barry feels double-crossed when he finds out Snart is working with his father, Lewis Snart on a heist. Meanwhile, Joe is faced with a difficult decision.	The Flash	17	Family of Rogues	2
13	\N	 Barry, Wells and Cisco journey to Earth-2 to rescue Wells’ daughter, Jesse from Zoom. Barry is stunned when he runs into Earth-2 Iris and Joe, but nothing prepares him for meeting Killer Frost and Deathstorm. Meanwhile, back on Earth-1, Jay has to take over the Flash’s responsibilities when a meta-human nicknamed Geomancer attacks Central City.	The Flash	17	Welcome to Earth-2	2
19	\N	A meta-human with super strength named Griffin Grey mistakes Harry for Earth-1 Harrison Wells and kidnaps him, demanding that Wells cure him from his current condition. Realizing another brilliant Wells could help track Griffin’s location, Barry asks Jesse to help. Meanwhile, Wally corners Joe about The Flash.	The Flash	17	Back to Normal	2
23	\N	After Zoom reveals his true plan, Barry vows to do whatever it takes to stop him.	The Flash	17	The Race of His Life	2
6	\N	When Wally starts having dreams about being Kid Flash, Barry realizes he has to tell Wally, Iris and Joe about what happened to Wally in Flashpoint in order to keep him safe.	The Flash	17	Shade	3
10	\N	Barry is tormented by his vision of the future where Iris is murdered by Savitar. When a criminal named Plunder shows up in Central City, Barry recalls the villain’s presence in his vision of the future and fears that if he catches Plunder, it will cement Iris’ fate. Confused about Barry’s hesitation to stop Plunder, Wally decides to step in as Kid Flash. Caitlin offers Julian a job.	The Flash	17	Borrowing Problems From The Future	3
15	\N	While training with Barry, Wally starts to have visions of Savitar, which he hides from the team. A dangerous secret threatens Barry and Iris’ happiness.	The Flash	17	The Wrath of Savitar	3
1	\N	With Barry in the speed force, Iris, Kid Flash, Joe and Vibe have taken over protecting Central City. However, when a powerful armored villain threatens to level the city if The Flash doesn't appear, Cisco makes a risky decision to break Barry out of the speed force. However, the Barry that comes out isn't the same Barry that went in.	The Flash	17	The Flash Reborn	4
3	\N	Barry and the team are hit by a string of bad luck and realize it is the handiwork of a new meta, Becky nicknamed Hazard, who has the ability to give others bad luck, while cashing in the benefits for herself. Meanwhile, Harry Wells returns to Earth-1 to give Wally a message from Jesse.	The Flash	17	Luck Be a Lady	4
10	\N	As Barry’s trial for the murder of Clifford DeVoe begins, Iris and Joe must decide how far they are willing to go to keep Barry out of prison.	The Flash	17	The Trial of The Flash	4
12	\N	A meta who can shrink anything he touches battles Team Flash. Cisco and Ralph get caught in his crossfire and are shrunk to miniature versions of themselves. Cecile realizes her pregnancy has caused her to have temporary powers and discovers she can hear other people’s thoughts, which unnerves Joe. Meanwhile, Barry meets someone with a mysterious connection to Henry Allen.	The Flash	17	Honey, I Shrunk Team Flash	4
22	\N	Barry faces off with his oldest, and most formidable nemesis, Reverse Flash.	The Flash	17	Legacy	5
16	\N	After shutting off her humanity following the death of her mother, Caroline gives her friends an unexpected ultimatum. Not knowing how to handle the new Caroline, Stefan’s attempt to intervene sets off a dangerous chain of events, leaving him and Elena in a race against the clock. Meanwhile, after seeking answers from Kai about the prison world, Damon’s world is turned upside when he learns some devastating news about his mother Lily. Elsewhere, Enzo finds himself becoming increasingly intrigued by Sarah Salvatore, and Bonnie begins to struggle with the effects of being back in the real world.	The Vampire Diaries	16	The Downward Spiral	6
8	\N	As Julian and Lily throw a party to celebrate Mary Louise and Nora's anniversary, Stefan  and Damon set in motion a risky plan to eliminate a new threat posed by Julian. Meanwhile, following a major revelation uncovered by Valerie, Caroline is forced to face her new reality, even as it threatens to destroy her relationship with Stefan. Finally, determined to do what's best for her family, Lily makes the most difficult decision of her life.	The Vampire Diaries	16	Hold Me, Thrill Me, Kiss Me, Kill Me	7
19	\N	When Enzo’s efforts to protect Bonnie end up putting her life in jeopardy, they learn that Rayna may hold the key to her survival. With time running out and Rayna at the reins, Enzo and Bonnie reluctantly team up with Damon, who is desperate to save Bonnie’s life and to repair their broken friendship.\\n\\nElsewhere, when Stefan travels to Dallas and comes face to face with Alaric, tensions escalate and they are forced to confront the fallout from Stefan’s absence in Caroline’s life. Finally, Enzo learns The Armory’s true motives behind their search for Bonnie.	The Vampire Diaries	16	Somebody That I Used to Know	7
7	\N	Faced with the fallout from his interaction with Cade, Stefan is determined to have one thing go right – Christmas Eve with Caroline. However, when Damon and Sybil crash their Christmas Eve dinner, which had been joined by Alaric, Matt and Peter, things quickly take a dark and twisted turn. Meanwhile, in a series of flashbacks to Stefan’s past, Cade’s attempt to entice him with his mysterious agenda leaves Stefan faced with an unimaginable decision.	The Vampire Diaries	16	The Next Time I Hurt Somebody, It Could Be You	8
7	\N	The Flash goes up against Farooq aka Blackout, a metahuman who can harness electricity.	The Flash	17	Power Outage	1
15	\N	Mark Mardon, having survived his apparent death during the black-matter explosion, returns seeking revenge on Joe for the death of his brother Clyde... and has the same weather-manipulation powers as his deceased sibling.	The Flash	17	Out of Time	1
22	\N	When Harrison activates the particle accelerator, the team has no choice but to evacuate the five metahuman prisoners. Unfortunately, with time running out, Barry has no choice but to turn to Captain Cold for help. Meanwhile, Eddie escapes but has some surprising news for Iris.	The Flash	17	Rogue Air	1
9	\N	When Mark Mardon AKA The Weather Wizard returns to break Leonard Snart AKA Captain Cold and James Jesse AKA The Trickster out of Iron Heights, Barry must stop these rogues from taking over Central City during Christmas. Meanwhile, Joe and Iris meet Wally West.	The Flash	17	Running to Stand Still	2
18	\N	Equipped with the tachyon device, Barry believes he is fast enough to stop Zoom and wants to open the breaches to catch him. Harry strongly advises against that plan but after Barry convinces him, Harry reveals that Cisco has the power to re-open the breach. Meanwhile, Hunter Zoloman’s painful story on Earth-2 is revealed.	The Flash	17	Versus Zoom	2
3	\N	Barry and Team Flash are thrilled to reunite with Earth-2  Wells and Jesse.  Wells  confides to Barry and Caitlin that Jesse has all  the powers of a speedster and has been saving people on his Earth.  He  is concerned about her safety and wants them to talk her out of using  her powers.  Meanwhile, Magenta, a new meta who  can control metal, terrorizes the city.	The Flash	17	Magenta	3
5	\N	Caitlin goes to her mother to help understand the meta-human powers growing inside her. Meanwhile Barry tries to convince Julian to allow him to help investigate a new human meta-attack on Central City.	The Flash	17	Monster	3
12	\N	Barry and the team at S.T.A.R. Labs work together to bring down Clive Yorkin, a criminal meta-human who is methodically killing people by causing them to decompose at an accelerated rate. Joe becomes his next target but it’s Iris who is caught in the crossfire. The Flash mentors Kid Flash and begins to elevate the newer speedster’s training to another level.	The Flash	17	Untouchable	3
14	\N	When Grodd and his army of gorillas bring the battle to Earth-1, The Flash and team must find a way to stop them before they destroy Central City. Gypsy returns to join the fight. Meanwhile, Jesse Quick decides she wants to stay with Wally on Earth-1.	The Flash	17	Attack on Central City	3
21	\N	Barry takes drastic measures to stop Savitar. Meanwhile, H.R. continues to push Tracy Brand to design the trap for Savitar and Killer Frost returns with an interesting proposal.	The Flash	17	Cause and Effect	3
23	\N	With nothing left to lose, Barry takes on Savitar.	The Flash	17	Finish Line	3
9	\N	Amunet kidnaps Caitlin and puts meta-dampener handcuffs on her to keep her from turning into Killer Frost. Amunet tells Caitlin she needs her to perform a tricky medical task and if Caitlin fails, Amunet will kill her. Meanwhile, The Thinker traps The Flash in a speedster-proof prison. With the clock ticking, The Team doesn't have the time or resources to track both Caitlin and Barry so Iris is forced to choose who to save.	The Flash	17	Don't Run	4
14	\N	Barry meets a powerful woman whose abilities could help him in his battle with DeVoe. Meanwhile, after learning that DeVoe is targeting everyone who was on the bus, Ralph decides he doesn't want to be a hero anymore, his only concern is staying alive. Harry offers to help Joe.	The Flash	17	Subject 9	4
21	\N	With DeVoe's Enlightenment device nearly complete, in order to disable it The Flash and his team must put their faith in an unlikely ally – Amunet Black. Meanwhile, Harry hits an all-time low when the "Council of Wells" kicks him out but then Cisco introduces him to the "Council of Harrisons."	The Flash	17	Harry and the Harrisons	4
1	\N	After an unexpected guest from the future, Nora West-Allen, appears at their home, Barry and Iris must figure out how to get her back to the future without disrupting the timeline…even more than she already has. Team Flash must work together to send Nora back, while simultaneously fighting off another villainous meta.	The Flash	17	Nora	5
8	\N	Barry and Team Flash come up with a plan to stop Cicada. However, the plan calls for Barry and Nora to travel back in time to gather some key necessities. However, Barry hesitates, concerned about his daughter seeing certain parts of his life. Meanwhile, Sherloque takes his concerns about Nora to Iris, and Caitlin turns up a key asset in the fight against Cicada.	The Flash	17	What's Past Is Prologue	5
20	\N	As Alaric and Jo reluctantly participate in their bachelor and bachelorette parties, Damon and Elena discuss the ramifications from an impulsive offer that Damon makes. Unsure of what to do, Elena turns to Bonnie and Jo for advice, but is left conflicted when Bonnie raises some unanticipated concerns. When Enzo realizes Lily is on a dangerous downward spiral, he asks Stefan to help intervene before it’s too late. Lastly, fed up with the supernatural threats that plague their town, Matt takes his frustrations out on Tyler, while Alaric considers a life-changing piece of advice.	The Vampire Diaries	16	I'd Leave My Happy Home For You	6
6	\N	After being reunited with her former love Julian, Lily hosts a dinner party to introduce him to Damon and Stefan and to declare peace between her family of Heretics and the residents of Mystic Falls. Damon and Stefan find themselves at an impasse when they realize they have differing views on how to handle Julian's arrival. At the party, Bonnie and Matt uncover a strange mystery involving some unsuspecting residents, while a devastating revelation causes Alaric to reach his breaking point.	The Vampire Diaries	16	Best Served Cold	7
16	\N	In an attempt to make things right with his brother, Damon offers to have Stefan’s scar magically transferred to him, only to discover that doing so may come with some unexpected consequences. With time running out and Rayna closing in on Stefan, Valerie desperately attempts to reason with Damon before it’s too late.\\n\\nElsewhere, after being framed for breaking Rayna out of The Armory, Enzo attempts to clear his name, but not before a violent run-in with Nora forces him to make an upsetting discovery.	The Vampire Diaries	16	Days of Future Past	7
2	\N	After learning that someone from Stefan’s past may be Damon and Enzo’s next target, Stefan, Bonnie and Caroline head to North Carolina. There, Bonnie takes drastic measures in an attempt to break Enzo free of whatever has a hold over him. At the Armory, Alaric and Georgie stumble upon a mysterious symbol that may be related to the supernatural force controlling Damon and Enzo. Finally, Caroline gets an unexpected surprise from Stefan.	The Vampire Diaries	16	Today Will Be Different	8
12	\N	In order to save Stefan’s soul, Damon makes a deal with Cade to retrieve the Maxwell journal. Alaric and Matt refuse to hand the journal over as it may contain the key to destroying Cade. Caroline desperately tries to connect with Stefan before Cade goes through with his plan.	The Vampire Diaries	16	What Are You?	8
16	\N	With the fate of Mystic Falls at stake, Stefan and Damon must fight their greatest enemy for one last battle.	The Vampire Diaries	16	I Was Feeling Epic	8
3	\N	Barry and the team go after the Mist, who possesses toxic gas powers, and they reflect on the night Caitlin's fiancé died. Meanwhile, Henry gets a long-awaited visit from Joe, and Iris and Eddie continue to keep their romance a secret from Joe.	The Flash	17	Things You Can't Outrun	1
18	\N	Felicity and Ray Palmer pay a visit to S.T.A.R. Labs for help getting Ray's ATOM suit to work, and ask Cisco for help. Meanwhile, a young tech expert raises havoc with her insect drones, and Barry asks Ray for help dealing with her.	The Flash	17	All-Star Team Up	1
5	\N	Barry learns a new breacher, Dr. Light, has come through the portal and sets off to capture her. Jay tells Barry that Dr. Light was not a threat on Earth-2 and that Barry can reason with her. However, during a fight with The Flash, she blinds him and drops some shocking news about Zoom. Meanwhile, Barry and Patty go out on a date.	The Flash	17	The Darkness and the Light	2
14	\N	On Earth-2, the team races to find Zoom's lair and asks for help from the most unexpected source. Meanwhile, back on Earth-1, Caitlin rushes to perfect Velocity-9 so that Jay can stop the Geomancer.	The Flash	17	Escape from Earth-2	2
1	\N	Barry is living his dream life – his parents are alive, he’s asked Iris West on a date and he can finally be a normal guy as Central City has another speedster, Kid Flash, running around saving the city. When Barry starts forgetting parts of his old life, the Reverse Flash taunts his nemesis and tells him that there will be serious repercussions for Barry and the ones he loves if he continues to live in this alternate universe. In addition to losing his memories, his powers will also start to fade. When disaster strikes, Barry must decide if he wants to continue to live in this world as Barry Allen or return to his universe as The Flash.	The Flash	17	Flashpoint	3
4	\N	Barry continues to train Jesse and when a new meta human, Mirror Master, appears on the scene he lets her tag along. Mirror Master has teamed up with his old partner, Top, and is looking for Snart to even a score. Jesse is quick to join the chase but defies one of Barry’s orders which results in disastrous consequences.	The Flash	17	The New Rogues	3
11	\N	H.R.'s past catches up with him when a bounty hunter with vibe powers named Gypsy arrives in Central City to bring him back to Earth-19 to stand trial for his crime. It turns out inter-dimensional travel is illegal on their Earth. H.R. surrenders but when Barry and Cisco find out that H.R.’s only hope would be to challenge Gypsy to a fight to the death, they intercede and Cisco offers to fight Gypsy instead.	The Flash	17	Dead or Alive	3
13	\N	When Jesse Quick informs the team that her father has been abducted, Barry, Caitlin, Cisco and Julian voyage to Earth-2 on a rescue mission to save Harry from Gorilla City. As they trek through the forest, Barry and the team are immediately captured and brought to Grodd. Grodd tells them he needs their help to stop Solovar, the leader of Gorilla City, as Solovar wants to invade Earth-1. Meanwhile, back on Earth-1, Jesse and Kid Flash hit the streets to stop a metahuman that can control gravity, with H.R. and Joe guiding them from S.T.A.R. Labs.	The Flash	17	Attack on Gorilla City	3
20	\N	Barry and the team meet Tracy Brand, a scientist, who may be the key to stopping Savitar. Unfortunately, Killer Frost is also after Tracy so Team Flash must battle their old friend, which proves to be particularly difficult for Cisco. Joe and Cecile’s relationship takes a big turn.	The Flash	17	I Know Who You Are	3
22	\N	With only 24 hours left until Savitar murders Iris, Barry struggles to save the woman he loves and makes the choice to use any means necessary to do so. Realizing he has one option left to save her, The Flash turns to Captain Cold for help.	The Flash	17	Infantino Street	3
8	\N	Barry and Iris's wedding brings the gang together, but things go awry when villains from Earth-X attack the ceremony. All of the superheroes band together with help from their super friends like Citizen Cold, The Ray, Felicity Smoak, Iris West and Alex Danvers to take on their most formidable villains yet. Earth's mightiest heroes - Green Arrow, Supergirl, The Flash and White Canary - lead their teams into battle to save the world.\\n\\nThe crossover starts on Supergirl S03E08 Crisis on Earth X (I) and Arrow S06E08 Crisis on Earth X (II). It continues on DC's Legends of Tomorrow S03E08 Crisis on Earth X (IV).	The Flash	17	Crisis on Earth-X (III)	4
22	\N	In the aftermath of Alaric and Jo’s powerful nuptials, things take a dramatic turn when an uninvited guest shows up, leaving Elena in terrible jeopardy. Despite Matt’s advice to leave town to protect herself, a defiant Bonnie takes matters into her own hands after finding herself on the receiving end of a twisted plan. As Stefan and Caroline reach an emotional crossroad in their relationship, a reunion with Liv leaves Tyler faced with a decision that could change his life forever. Meanwhile, Lily's reckless actions cause Stefan to realize the lengths to which his mother will go to reunite with her “family.” Finally, after a devastating chain of events, Damon is forced to make the most difficult decision of his life.	The Vampire Diaries	16	I'm Thinking of You All the While	6
9	\N	With the holidays in full swing, a search for Julian leads Damon and Stefan to a small town outside of Mystic Falls. While managing a holiday toy drive at Whitmore College, Bonnie seeks help from Nora and the two strike up an unlikely friendship.\\n\\nElsewhere, Caroline does her best to navigate her new life as a pregnant vampire, while Alaric grows concerned that the pregnancy is effecting her more than she's letting on. Finally, after finding himself at odds with Damon, Stefan is forced to take matters into his own hands, setting off a tragic chain of events that leaves their lives changed forever.	The Vampire Diaries	16	Cold as Ice	7
18	\N	Determined to capture an escaped vampire named Ambrose, who may be the key to getting Stefan back safely, Damon heads to Memphis with Alaric in tow. However, reluctant to step back into his former vampire hunting ways, Alaric makes his unwillingness to participate clear, while revealing the truth about the past three Damon-less years of his life.\\n\\nMeanwhile, in the psych ward, Bonnie meets a young woman named Virginia, who provides her with some valuable information about why The Armory may be after her. Finally, Enzo takes matters into his own hands when he learns some devastating news from Rayna.	The Vampire Diaries	16	One Way or Another	7
6	\N	When her children become the focus of the Siren’s latest plan, Caroline takes drastic measures to ensure nothing gets in the way of keeping her family safe. In a race against the clock, Stefan pledges to do everything he can to save the twins, while tensions between Alaric and Caroline boil over, leading them to face some harsh realities about the future of their family. Meanwhile, when Enzo finds himself unable to fight off Sybil’s latest move, Stefan dives into his subconscious and along the way, sets off a chain of events that leaves him faced with a life-changing decision.	The Vampire Diaries	16	Detoured on Some Random Backwoods Path to Hell	8
1	\N	Barry discovers his powers and puts them to the test, only when he finds its no longer a test but the real thing when he encounters a certain someone.	The Flash	17	City of Heroes	1
4	\N	The Flash battles Captain Cold after the villain is involved in a robbery and plots to steal the Kahndaq Dynasty Diamond.	The Flash	17	Going Rogue	1
19	\N	Joe and Cisco go to Starling City to ask Quentin Lance for his help investigating the site of Harrison's car accident 15 years ago and determining what really happened. Meanwhile, Eddie is framed for a shooting by a shapeshifing metahuman who can take on the appearance of anyone he touches.	The Flash	17	Who Is Harrison Wells?	1
6	\N	After recent events, Barry decides it’s time to confront Zoom and comes up with a dangerous plan. Caitlin sides with Jay and deems it too dangerous for Barry to engage with the speed demon. However, Iris shows her support and brings forth a surprising ally. We see what Earth-2 Harrison Wells’ life was like before coming through the breech.	The Flash	17	Enter Zoom	2
15	\N	When King Shark escapes from an A.R.G.U.S.holding tank, Lyla and Diggle travel to Central City to warn The Flash. King Shark shows up at the West house and attacks Joe, Iris, Wally and Barry.	The Flash	17	King Shark	2
2	\N	Barry realizes the effects from Flashpoint are much greater than he thought. Meanwhile, Barry meets new co-worker Julian Albert and is surprised by Julian's immediate disdain for him.	The Flash	17	Paradox	3
9	\N	With Alchemy and Savitar still looming threats, Barry is unable to focus on the Christmas holiday, and especially his relationship with Iris. Determined to stop Savitar, Barry goes to Earth-3 to get advice from Jay Garrick. Wally wants to help Barry fight Savitar and reveals that he’s been training with H.R, which doesn’t go over well with Barry. As Cisco faces his first Christmas without his brother Dante, old wounds are reopened.	The Flash	17	The Present	3
18	\N	The Flash fights a villain from Earth-19 called Abra Kadabra, who offers to reveal Savitar's identity in exchange for his release.	The Flash	17	Abra Kadabra	3
19	\N	Barry travels to the future to find out Savitar’s still unknown identity in the hopes of saving Iris.  Upon his arrival in 2024, Barry encounters future versions of his Team Flash friends, who, following the death of Iris, have become very different people, profoundly impacted by their showdown with Savitar.  It will be up to Barry to infuse a sense of hope back into the team, as he proves to be hero his future friends have been waiting for. Meanwhile, back in 2017, the hunt for Killer Frost continues.	The Flash	17	The Once and Future Flash	3
6	\N	When collectors of Native American artifacts are attacked by a meta named Mina Chayton who can bring inanimate objects to life, Barry turns to a surprising ally for help. Determined to crack the identity of The Thinker, Harry enlists Cisco's help to summon the ultimate think tank: "The Council of Wells'," a roundtable of the brightest Harrison Wells' from various Earths.	The Flash	17	When Harry Met Harry...	4
5	\N	Having received an ominous threat from her old boss, Amunet, Caitlin fears that her past time as Killer Frost may be back to haunt her. Felicity comes to Central City to help the girls celebrate Iris's bachelorette party, while Cisco, Joe and the guys take Barry out for a night on the town.	The Flash	17	Girls Night Out	4
15	\N	When a nuclear bomb detonates in downtown Central City, Barry, Jesse Quick and Jay Garrick slow down time by entering Flashtime. As everyone in the city is frozen, the three speedsters push themselves to the breaking point to save the city and everyone in it.	The Flash	17	Enter Flashtime	4
16	\N	Team Flash confront a new bus meta, Matthew aka Melting Pot. He has the ability to swap people’s DNA, so during a battle with Team Flash, he transfers Barry’s super speed to Iris. Now, with a new threat unleashed on Central City, Barry must act as the team leader while Iris takes on the mantle of superhero speedster in order to defeat their new foe.	The Flash	17	Run, Iris, Run	4
2	\N	As Barry helps his daughter, Nora, become a better speedster, he and Team Flash also track down a meta stealing high-tech weapons, only to cross paths with a new foe named Cicada, who is hunting the very same meta with nefarious intent.	The Flash	17	Blocked	5
8	\N	Revolution has finally come. As Layton leads the lower classes forward in armed rebellion, Melanie's house of cards collapses.	Snowpiercer	19	These Are His Revolutions	1
1	\N	After a twisted plan left the life of his girlfriend Elena linked to that of his best friend Bonnie, Damon is forced to navigate his new reality without the love of his life. A newly empowered Bonnie has decided that she will be Damon's moral compass and keeps a close eye on him as he, in turn, cautiously keeps tabs on Alaric, following the loss of his fiancée Jo. Meanwhile, as he waits for Caroline to sort out her emotions, Stefan takes an active role in protecting the town from Lily and her family of Heretics, who have wasted no time wreaking havoc in Mystic Falls.\\n\\nElsewhere, Enzo struggles to find his place in Lily's new life, and is quickly forced to decide where his true loyalties lie. Finally, with the stakes higher than ever, Matt, who has recently completed his deputy training program, teams up with Stefan and Caroline to put a stop to the Heretics, but an unexpected turn of events leaves one of them in a dangerous position.	The Vampire Diaries	16	Day One of Twenty-Two Thousand, Give or Take	7
12	\N	When his experience in the Phoenix stone leads him to do the unthinkable, Damon finds himself without a care in the world, spiraling out of control and under the influence of a dangerous and reckless Julian. Refusing to give up on his brother, Stefan attempts to reason with Damon only to uncover the devastating reason for his descent.\\n\\nElsewhere, Caroline begins having some dangerous side effects as a result of her supernatural pregnancy and is forced to turn to Valerie for help. Meanwhile, Bonnie, Nora and Mary Louise attempt to track down a ruthless vampire hunter named Rayna after they suspect that she has reemerged.	The Vampire Diaries	16	Postcards from the Edge	7
22	\N	Despite their best efforts to help Bonnie through the harrowing predicament she now faces, Damon, Enzo and Caroline realize their options are running out and drastic measures need to be taken. With their only chance of saving their friend lying inside the Armory, Stefan breaks the news to Caroline that they may need help from an unlikely source – her and Alaric’s twin daughters.\\n\\nElsewhere, Enzo keeps Bonnie preoccupied by bringing her back to their cabin but when his plan takes an unexpected turn, it’ll be up to Damon to make the ultimate sacrifice to save his closest friends.	The Vampire Diaries	16	Gods & Monsters	7
9	\N	Stefan and Damon return to Mystic Falls at Sybil’s request as she is still in search of the historical artifact. Bonnie returns from Paris wearing a vile of Enzo’s blood making Caroline, wonder if she will become a vampire. Stefan, Damon, Caroline, Bonnie and Enzo all attend the Miss Mystic Falls pageant where Sybil continues to taunt Damon with memories of Elena.	The Vampire Diaries	16	The Simple Intimacy of the Near Touch	8
2	\N	Barry changes into the Flash when six gunmen storm a university event honoring a scientist, but his heroics don't match up to his expectations. Meanwhile, Iris becomes even more intrigued by the "red streak."	The Flash	17	Fastest Man Alive	1
12	\N	Caitlin takes Barry out to a local karaoke bar to help them both find new loves. Caitlin strikes out but Barry meets a sports reporter and asks her out for a date. Meanwhile, Cisco considers Hartley's dangerous offer; and the team search for Shawna, a meta-human with teleportation powers who just busted her boyfriend out of Iron Heights.	The Flash	17	Crazy for You	1
17	\N	When a villain calling himself the Trickster runs rampant in Central City, Joe and Barry go to Iron Heights to talk with the original Trickster.	The Flash	17	Tricksters	1
4	\N	Barry and the team look for another Firestorm match for Dr. Stein. When the team meets Jefferson "Jax" Jackson, Caitlin has her reservations about whether Jax is the right match for Dr. Stein. Iris surprises Joe while Barry and Patty grow closer.	The Flash	17	The Fury of Firestorm	2
22	\N	After Zoom unleashes an army of Earth-2 meta-humans on Central City, Barry is shaken when he sees their leader is the Black Canary’s Earth-2 doppelganger, the Black Siren. Meanwhile, Wally takes to the streets to help The Flash stop the meta-humans, which worries Joe. Iris and Henry are concerned about Barry taking on Zoom.	The Flash	17	Invincible	2
8	\N	When aliens called the Dominators attack Central City, Barry speeds over to Star City to ask the Green Arrow for help in stopping them. Realizing the battle against the Dominators is bigger than they thought, they track down the Legends of Tomorrow, and Barry and Cisco create a breach to bring back a secret weapon – Supergirl. Once all of the super friends are assembled, they come up with a plan to attack but a shocking secret related to Flashpoint is revealed and suddenly no one is sure who they can trust. Meanwhile, Wally wants to join the battle against the aliens but Iris tells him he’s not ready.\\n\\nThe crossover starts on Supergirl S02E08 Medusa (I). It continues on Arrow S05E08 Invasion! (III) and DC's Legends of Tomorrow S02E07 Invasion! (IV).	The Flash	17	Invasion! (II)	3
17	\N	Barry and team are surprised when Mon-El and Hank Henshaw arrive on their Earth carrying a comatose Supergirl who was whammied by the Music Meister. Unable to wake her up, they turn to Team Flash to save her. However, the Music Meister surprises The Flash and puts him in a similar coma, one that Team Flash can't cure. Kara and Barry wake up without their powers in an alternate reality where life is like a musical and the only way to escape is by following the script, complete with singing and dancing, to the end.  The crossover starts on Supergirl S02E16 Star-Crossed (I).	The Flash	17	Duet (II)	3
4	\N	Cisco is shocked when Gypsy's father, Breacher, shows up on Earth-1. Breacher takes an immediate disliking to Cisco and decides to hunt him. Meanwhile, Barry runs into his old nemesis, Ralph Dibny.	The Flash	17	Elongated Journey Into Night	4
7	\N	Barry comes face to face with DeVoe. Devoe's past is revealed through flashbacks. Meanwhile, Iris puts the final touches on the wedding, which is a week away.	The Flash	17	Therefore I Am	4
13	\N	After hearing that Amunet has struck a deal to buy all of the metahumans in Iron Heights, Barry must decide if he should expose his powers in order to save his cellmates. After a visit from an old friend, Ralph is reminded of his shady past and wonders if he’s really a changed man.	The Flash	17	True Colors	4
20	\N	Barry and Team Flash team up with Gypsy to try to thwart Thinker's plan. Meanwhile, Cisco and Gypsy have a heart to heart talk about their relationship.	The Flash	17	Therefore She Is	4
23	\N	Team Flash gets help from a surprising ally in their battle against DeVoe.	The Flash	17	We Are The Flash	4
7	\N	While Nora grapples with unresolved anger over her father’s disappearance in the future, Barry and Team Flash must stop a powerful new meta, Weather Witch, from killing her own father, Weather Wizard.	The Flash	17	O Come, All Ye Thankful	5
10	\N	While Nora grapples with the revelation that Thawne killed her grandmother, Team Flash must stop the formidable team-up of a newly sprung from jail Weather Witch and Silver Ghost, a new meta-tech villain who can control engines and motorized technology. Meanwhile, Caitlin and Cisco discuss creating a meta-human cure.	The Flash	17	The Flash & The Furious	5
14	\N	In order to lure a vengeful vampire hunter named Rayna Cruz away from his friends in Mystic Falls, Stefan heads to New Orleans, where Valerie has learned of a safe house that can protect him. Once there, he comes face to face with Klaus Mikaelson, who soon becomes suspicious of his old friend's unexpected arrival in his city.\\n\\nMeanwhile, Enzo, who is working on behalf of a mysterious organization called The Armory, approaches Damon and Bonnie with a plan that could protect Stefan from Rayna. Finally, after learning that Alaric has decided to leave for Dallas with the twins immediately, Caroline offers to accompany them on the trip and finds herself contemplating her own future in Mystic Falls.	The Vampire Diaries	16	Moonlight on the Bayou	7
3	\N	As Enzo continues to fight the control over him, Bonnie finds herself at the center of a deadly game and forced to make a heart wrenching decision involving two of the most important people in her life. At the Armory, Alaric researches a mysterious artifact that he hopes will help in their fight to get Damon and Enzo back. Finally, Damon’s downward spiral leads him to Tyler Lockwood who attempts to talk some sense into him before it’s too late.	The Vampire Diaries	16	You Decided That I Was Worth Saving	8
14	\N	Damon and Stefan must join forces against Cade in order to save Elena’s casket. Meanwhile, Caroline and Alaric deal with their daughters’ burgeoning magical powers.	The Vampire Diaries	16	It’s Been a Hell of a Ride	8
10	\N	While Barry strives to become fast enough to defeat Reverse-Flash, Captain Cold returns to Central City with a partner and takes Caitlin hostage to force a confrontation with the Flash.	The Flash	17	Revenge of the Rogues	1
2	\N	Jay Garrick, a mysterious man from Earth-2, appears at S.T.A.R. Labs with a dire warning about an evil speedster named Zoom, who is set on destroying The Flash. Barry and the team must decide if they can trust this stranger even as they face yet another powerful meta-human. Meanwhile, Joe must deal with a determined officer named Patty Spivot who wants to join his meta-human task force.	The Flash	17	Flash of Two Worlds	2
12	\N	Barry teams up with Wells to figure out a way to close the breaches, but they are distracted by a meta-human nicknamed Tar Pit who can transform into liquid asphalt. Iris is concerned for Wally’s safety after she finds out about his drag racing hobby. When he refuses to stop she makes a bold move that puts her in danger.	The Flash	17	Fast Lane	2
21	\N	With Barry gone, the team must figure out a way to handle the return of an old enemy - Girder. Realizing Girder is retracing his steps from his last attack, Iris volunteers to act as bait to trap him in S.T.A.R. Labs. Meanwhile, Barry fights to return to his old life.	The Flash	17	The Runaway Dinosaur	2
7	\N	Caitlin uses her powers to save Barry but as her mother predicted, the effort unleashes her inner Killer Frost. Killer Frost goes on a rampage looking for Dr. Alchemy, kidnapping Julian and battling both The Flash and Vibe. Meanwhile, Joe and H.R. have a heart to heart talk.	The Flash	17	Killer Frost	3
16	\N	Desperate to stop Savitar and save his friends, Barry turns to the Speed Force for answers.  H.R. gives Jesse some advice.	The Flash	17	Into the Speed Force	3
2	\N	Barry has his hands full when he takes on a dangerous meta who can control technology, while also confronting an obstacle in his personal life: the ramifications of abandoning Iris for six months to balance the Speed Force. Meanwhile, Gypsy breaches in for a hot date with Cisco, but she gets annoyed when his work keeps them apart.	The Flash	17	Mixed Signals	4
11	\N	When a familiar villain returns to terrorize Central City, Ralph must rise up to defend the innocent while Barry is detained by his trial. Meanwhile, Barry searches for the strength to keep his optimism alive in the face of his new circumstances.	The Flash	17	The Elongated Knight Rises	4
17	\N	Barry and Ralph take different approaches to finding the remaining bus metas before DeVoe gets to them. However, Ralph's cavalier attitude frustrates Barry and the two clash over what it means to be a hero. Meanwhile, Breacher returns to ask Cisco for a favor.	The Flash	17	Null and Annoyed	4
19	\N	When Barry needs help transporting a dangerous meta, he calls on a new friend for help - Leo Snart AKA Citizen Cold. Meanwhile, Cisco becomes suspicious of Harry.	The Flash	17	Fury Rogue	4
4	\N	Barry and Iris face the ultimate parenting test when Team Flash battles Spin, a savvy millennial armed with meta tech, and a dangerous agenda for their daughter, Nora. Ralph is feeling defeated until an unlikely source issues a challenge to help boost his confidence.	The Flash	17	News Flash	5
6	\N	Caitlin, Barry and Cisco learn something new about Caitlin’s father. Meanwhile, Iris and Sherloque follow a clue about Cicada.	The Flash	17	The Icicle Cometh	5
9	\N	When Barry Allen and Oliver Queen wake up one morning and realize they have swapped bodies with each other, the two set off to find out what disturbed the timeline to cause such a shift. However, things quickly go from bad to worse when they present their case to Team Flash and the gang doesn’t believe them. Barry and Oliver realize they need Supergirl’s help and travel to Smallville on Earth-38 where they end up meeting Kara’s cousin, Clark Kent, and intrepid reporter, Lois Lane.\\n\\nThe crossover continues on Arrow S07E09 Elseworlds (II) and Supergirl S04E09 Elseworlds (III).	The Flash	17	Elseworlds (I)	5
12	\N	When Sherloque wants to use a memory machine on Barry and Nora to help gain access to Grace's memories, Nora panics, fearing her parents will find out the secrets she's been keeping from them. Nora secretly decides to use the machine on her own which ends in disaster after she gets trapped inside Grace's mind. Barry and Iris go in after their daughter and Iris is brokenhearted by what she finds. Meanwhile, Ralph tricks Cisco into going out for a night out on the town.	The Flash	17	Memorabilia	5
13	\N	Barry and Ralph must go undercover as criminals in an illegal black market to purchase a device that could help them stop Cicada. Once inside, Barry and Ralph find their morality tested as they slip deeper into the criminal world, eventually having to choose between committing a crime, or losing the means to defeat one of their greatest foes. Meanwhile, Iris investigates a lead on Cicada's whereabouts and ends up in a dangerous situation.	The Flash	17	Goldfaced	5
14	\N	After Iris lands in serious danger, Nora races to save her mother. Barry puts the finishing touches on the metahuman cure, leaving Cisco with a rare night off so he decides to take Kamilla on a date.	The Flash	17	Cause and XS	5
15	\N	When Gorilla Grodd attacks Central City, Barry and Team Flash find themselves teaming up with an unexpected ally to defeat – King Shark. However, when they hit a snag, they bring in Dr. Tanya Lamden to try to reach the man behind the shark, Shay Lamden.	The Flash	17	King Shark vs. Gorilla Grodd	5
21	\N	Team Flash is on high alert after Cicada II threatens to unleash a dangerous virus that would put all meta-humans at risk.	The Flash	17	The Girl With The Red Lightning	5
1	\N	A dangerously ill Ragnar returns to Kattegat, where his suspected death kicks off a scramble to succeed him. Meanwhile, Lagertha engages in a power struggle with her calculating, former second in command, Kalf. Rollo betrays his heritage and remains in Frankia. Floki pays the price for his brutality against the Christian priest.	Vikings	8	A Good Treason	4
13	\N	Ragnar's fleet is shipwrecked and washes up on the Wessex coast, but without enough survivors to form a credible force, Ragnar and Ivar have a difficult decision to make. Rollo meets his Viking comrades again and can't resist the urge to join Bjorn's voyage, risking his marriage and his new Frankish identity. Ragnar too is taking a risk as he carries Ivar towards the Royal Villa in Wessex – throwing himself and his son upon the mercy of King Ecbert.	Vikings	8	Two Journeys	4
8	\N	The battle for Kattegat begins and, as the two armies line up to fight, the Great Heathen Army must decide between a final plea for peace or all-out war. Floki faces discord among the settlers.	Vikings	8	The Joke	5
20	\N	A new battle for Kattegat is on and only the gods know who will emerge victorious.	Vikings	8	Ragnarok	5
9	\N	In Iceland, Ubbe and Torvi finally meet a mysterious wanderer. Bjorn is forced to re-think who his enemies are when Erik returns from a scouting mission with worrying information. Bjorn will need allies, but he may not be able to convince his old foe, King Harald, to join forces in the face of the new threat. Ivar is reunited with someone close to him.	Vikings	8	Resurrection	6
16	\N	Ubbe and his followers languish on the open sea. Ivar and Hvitserk receive a frosty reception in Kattegat, until a restless Ivar has a revelation.	Vikings	8	The Final Straw	6
6	\N	Lucifer bails on Chloe when he becomes bored with her investigation into a ruthless biker gang murder. However, when he discovers something was stolen during the crime that was very personal to him, he demands that Chloe let him rejoin the case.	Lucifer	9	Favorite Son	1
3	\N	Lucifer and Chloe investigate a gruesome murder after a video of the crime surfaces on social media. When a second video appears, they realize they have a serial killer on their hands. Meanwhile, Lucifer’s mom returns as Charlotte Richards. Also, Amenadiel, struggling with his loss of power, has an appointment with Linda.	Lucifer	9	Sin-Eater	2
13	\N	Lucifer must find the antidote to the Professor's poison before it kills Chloe. He travels to hell to find the Professor's soul and get him to turn over the antidote. While he's there, he is forced to confront his guilt about Uriel's death. Mom heads to hell to get Lucifer back, but Lucifer still feels betrayed by his parents because of something he discovers.	Lucifer	9	A Good Day to Die	2
5	\N	When a food chemist is found dead, Lucifer and Chloe's investigation pits them against an unexpected face - criminal defense attorney Charlotte Richards. Everyone is caught off guard when they see her back in the precinct. As Lucifer tries to understand her return, he makes a shocking discovery that helps solve the case.	Lucifer	9	Welcome back, Charlotte Richards	3
15	\N	When a best-selling novelist is murdered, Lucifer and Chloe discover that her books are based on real people from her past, and must infiltrate her high school reunion in order to catch her killer. Meanwhile, Amenadiel and Linda struggle with making their relationship public.	Lucifer	9	High School Poppycock	3
2	\N	Chloe and Lucifer look into a murder on the set of a reality show. Father Kinley presses forward with a plan. Amenadiel reconsiders his idea of home.	Lucifer	9	Somebody's Been Reading Dante's Inferno	4
2	\N	After spending an eternity in hell, Lucifer returns to the land of the living - but there's something a little different about this handsome devil.	Lucifer	9	Lucifer! Lucifer! Lucifer!	5
5	\N	Mariana starts looking for answers after Tere reveals a long-hidden truth. Juan Carlos wants Mariana out of the house, but Ana has a plan.	Daughter From Another Mother	10	My Family's Not Perfect	1
5	\N	The Mandalorian helps a rookie bounty hunter who is in over his head.	The Mandalorian	11	Chapter 5: The Gunslinger	1
4	\N	The Mandalorian rejoins old allies for a new mission.	The Mandalorian	11	Chapter 12: The Siege	2
6	\N	Jefferson is on the hunt for his father's killer, while Anissa uses her new powers to rectify a wrong after a protest fails. Jennifer grapples with some difficult choices. Elsewhere, Gambi begs for help from Lynn.	Black Lightning	12	Three Sevens: The Book of Thunder	1
7	\N	When Black Lightning and Thunder are attacked by Looker and her clan, they fight to get her to release control over the Sange. Meanwhile, Jennifer and Khalil continue to grow closer.	Black Lightning	12	The Book of Blood: Chapter Three: The Sange	2
1	\N	We find Jefferson Pierce like never before, in the hands of the ASA with his wife Lynn as Agent Odell tightens his grip on the Pierce family, leaving Jennifer abandoned and Freeland without Black Lightning and Thunder. But Anissa secretly defies Odell in her alter ego as Blackbird with the able tactical and technical support of Gambi.	Black Lightning	12	The Book of Occupation: Chapter One: Birth of Blackbird	3
11	\N	Jefferson, Anissa and Jennifer discover that the ASA is now hunting the entire Pierce family. Meanwhile, Lynn  does the unthinkable.	Black Lightning	12	The Book of Markovia: Chapter Two: Lynn's Addiction	3
5	\N		Black Lightning	12	The Book of Ruin: Chapter One	4
4	\N	A long-awaited autopsy report arrives, but suspicions linger. Today, an unlikely target speaks his mind as experts weigh in on persistent mysteries.	Crime Scene: The Vanishing at the Cecil Hotel	14	The Hard Truth	1
5	\N	The Baratheon rivalry ends, driving Catelyn to flee and Littlefinger to act. At King’s Landing, Tyrion’s source alerts him to Joffrey’s defense plan - and a mysterious secret weapon. Theon sails to the Stony Shore to prove he’s worthy to be called Ironborn. At Harrenhal, Arya receives a promise from Jaqen H’ghar, one of the prisoners she saved from the Gold Cloaks. The Night’s Watch arrive at the Fist of the First Men, an ancient ringfort where they hope to stem the wildings' advance.	Game of Thrones	15	The Ghost of Harrenhal	2
4	\N	Trouble brews among the Night's Watch at Craster's. Margaery takes Joffrey out of his comfort zone. Arya meets the leader of the Brotherhood. Varys plots revenge on an old foe. Theon mournfully recalls his missteps. Daenerys deftly orchestrates her exit from Astapor.	Game of Thrones	15	And Now His Watch Is Ended	3
10	\N	Joffrey challenges Tywin. Bran tells a ghost story. In Dragonstone, mercy comes from strange quarters. Daenerys waits to see if she is a conqueror or a liberator.	Game of Thrones	15	Mhysa	3
8	\N	Unexpected visitors arrive in Mole's Town. Littlefinger's motives are questioned. Ramsay tries to prove himself to his father. Tyrion's fate is decided.	Game of Thrones	15	The Mountain and the Viper	4
18	\N	After discovering that Nora is working with Thawne, Barry and Iris disagree about how to handle their daughter in the wake of this shocking news. Team Flash isn't sure they can trust Nora, so they go through her journal to find out exactly how she came to work alongside their greatest nemesis.	The Flash	17	Godspeed	5
5	\N	Cisco's faith in his ability to fill Barry's shoes as Team Leader is upended when he learns of a shocking murder. Meanwhile, Killer Frost trusts no one except herself to hunt down the dangerous Ramsey Rosso.	The Flash	17	Kiss Kiss Breach Breach	6
18	\N	When Godspeed returns, Barry turns to Hartley Rathaway for help. However, things get tense quickly after Barry realizes one of the changes from Crisis is that The Flash and Pied Piper are now enemies. Meanwhile, Iris tries to escape the Mirrorverse.	The Flash	17	Pay the Piper	6
3	\N		The Flash	17	Mother	7
8	\N	Bart tries to impress the school bullies by stealing the head of the Jebediah Springfield statue in the town square, but everyone is outraged by his act of vandalism.	The Simpsons	18	The Telltale Head	1
6	\N	Bart and Todd Flanders decide to enter a miniature golf tournament. Homer becomes confident that Bart will win and makes a bet with Ned that the father of the boy that does not win will have to mow their neighbors lawn in their wife's Sunday dress.	The Simpsons	18	Dead Putting Society	2
15	\N	Homer's long-lost half-brother is the CEO of a car company that's wildly successful... until he hires Homer to help design a car for the average man.	The Simpsons	18	Oh Brother, Where Art Thou?	2
3	\N	When Ned Flanders opens a store for left-handed people, Homer wants him to fail... until he sees the downtrodden Flanders family living in their car.	The Simpsons	18	When Flanders Failed	3
14	\N	Sundays become “Daddy-Daughter Days” when Homer discovers Lisa’s uncanny ability to pick winning football teams.	The Simpsons	18	Lisa the Greek	3
3	\N	After skipping church one Sunday morning, Homer decides to quit church altogether and spend Sundays worshiping in his own way -- with cigars and beer.	The Simpsons	18	Homer the Heretic	4
10	\N	While trying to get Maggie to say her first word, Marge and Homer reminisce about Bart's and Lisa's first words.	The Simpsons	18	Lisa's First Word	4
15	\N	Ralph Wiggum mistakes pity for love when Lisa gives him a Valentine's Day card. After a public humiliation, broken-hearted Ralph gives an unexpectedly moving performance in the school's President's Day pageant.	The Simpsons	18	I Love Lisa	4
4	\N	Mr. Burns pines away for Bobo, his beloved childhood teddy bear and symbol of lost innocence. When the bear turns up in Maggie's possession, the resulting tug of war affects the whole town.	The Simpsons	18	Rosebud	5
13	\N	Fired for selling tainted meat to Homer, Apu tries to make amends to the Simpsons, and Homer joins him in a pilgrimage to Kwik-E-Mart headquarters in India.	The Simpsons	18	Homer and Apu	5
3	\N	After reading the weepy best-seller The Bridges of Madison County, Marge sits down with the family and recalls romantic moments, along with temptations from her bowling instructor Jacques and Homer's coworker Mindy.	The Simpsons	18	Another Simpsons Clip Show	6
14	\N	When Bart is forced to assist Principal Skinner in early-morning astronomy observations, he discovers a giant comet heading towards Springfield. Facing impending doom, the entire town shows up at the Flanders family bomb shelter.	The Simpsons	18	Bart's Comet	6
1	\N	With Mr. Burns shot, Chief Wiggum investigates the crime, and nearly everyone in town has a motive. At the end, it all comes down to the Simpson DNA.	The Simpsons	18	Who Shot Mr. Burns? - Part II	7
9	\N	After Sideshow Bob escapes from prison, the Springfield Air Show is the setting for his ill-fated vendetta against television and Krusty the Clown.	The Simpsons	18	Sideshow Bob's Last Gleaming	7
19	\N	Washed up and plagued by scandal, Troy McClure sees a marriage to Selma as his ticket back to success.	The Simpsons	18	A Fish Called Selma	7
4	\N	Mr. Burns' boorish long-lost son Larry gets the brush-off from Burns, but Homer hatches a plan to reconcile them.	The Simpsons	18	Burns, Baby Burns	8
13	\N	Marge is stressed by the demands of motherhood and the Simpsons get a magical British nanny, who floats down from the sky holding an umbrella.	The Simpsons	18	Simpsoncalifragilisticexpiala(Annoyed Grunt)cious	8
24	\N	Troy McClure presents three Simpsons spinoff spoofs: In "Chief Wiggum, P.I.," Chief Wiggum becomes a New Orleans detective. Next, Grampa Simpson's soul is trapped inside Moe's Love tester machine in "The Love-Matic Grampa." Finally, the Simpson family hosts a '70s-style variety show.	The Simpsons	18	The Simpsons Spin-Off Showcase	8
9	\N	When Marge gets her real estate license, she learns to put a positive spin on the flaws of the houses she’s selling. But when the Flanders buy the Murder House, she realizes she has to tell the truth.	The Simpsons	18	Realty Bites	9
19	\N	When Homer joins the Naval Reserve, a captain takes a liking to him and leaves him in charge of a nuclear submarine.	The Simpsons	18	Simpson Tide	9
4	\N	In "Hell Toupée," Snake is sent to the electric chair, and his hair is transplanted onto Homer. In "The Terror of Tiny Toon," Bart and Lisa become cartoon characters in an episode of Itchy & Scratchy. In "Starship Poopers," a growth spurt casts doubt on Maggie's paternity, and the family goes on the Jerry Springer show.	The Simpsons	18	Treehouse of Horror IX	10
15	\N	A new Canyonero SUV turns timid Marge into an aggressive driver, and her road rage lands her in traffic school. But when a stampede occurs at the zoo, the town looks to Marge to save the day.	The Simpsons	18	Marge Simpson in: "Screaming Yellow Honkers"	10
3	\N	With Lisa's help, Homer uses his vast knowledge of food to become the town's leading restaurant critic. But when he gets petty and vindictive in his criticisms, all the other chefs in town try to kill him.	The Simpsons	18	Guess Who's Coming to Criticize Dinner?	11
13	\N	Homer and Bart befriend a diving horse at a county fair. They turn it into a racehorse with an attitude, whose success runs them afoul of mysterious, tree-dwelling jockeys.	The Simpsons	18	Saddlesore Galactica	11
1	\N	This year's Halloween story sees The Simpsons as "The Munsters" (with everyone except Lisa getting killed), Homer as a wandering spirit on the hunt for a good deed in "G-G-Ghost D-D-Dad," Bart and Lisa as peasants in a fairy tale forest in "Scary Tales Can Come True," and Lisa inadvertently dooming mankind by rescuing a dolphin in "Night of the Dolphin."	The Simpsons	18	Treehouse of Horror XI	12
8	\N	The Simpsons face various Thanksgiving nightmares, including the first Thanksgiving, an A.I. mishap and a dangerous space mission complicated by a sentient cranberry sauce.	The Simpsons	18	Thanksgiving of horror	31
16	\N	With the meta-human cure ready to use, Barry and Team Flash must figure out a way to subdue Cicada long enough to take it. Killer Frost steps in to help with the plan. Meanwhile, Joe eases back into work, and Nora isn’t happy about the way her dad plans to stop Cicada.	The Flash	17	Failure is an Orphan	5
3	\N	Knowing that Crisis is only weeks away, Barry prepares a member of Team Flash for life without him while hunting a terrifying meta-human with an unquenchable thirst. Meanwhile, Ralph uncovers a family secret.	The Flash	17	Dead Man Running	6
13	\N	Feeling overwhelmed with all the changes since Crisis, Barry conducts an experiment that goes awry and puts him directly in Gorilla Grodd’s path. Expecting the worst, Barry is surprised when Grodd asks for his help. Unfortunately for both The Flash and Grodd, things get worse when another villain appears – Solovar. Meanwhile, Iris works with Eva to escape the Mirrorverse.	The Flash	17	Grodd Friended Me	6
2	\N	After switching IQ tests with Martin, Bart is mistaken for a child genius. When he's enrolled in a school for gifted students, a series of embarrassments and mishaps makes him long for his old life.	The Simpsons	18	Bart the Genius	1
12	\N	Krusty the Clown gets busted for robbing the Kwik-E-Mart, with Homer as an eyewitness. Convinced that their idol was wrongly accused, Bart and Lisa investigate the crime.	The Simpsons	18	Krusty Gets Busted	1
11	\N	After eating poisonous blowfish at a sushi restaurant, Homer decides to live life to the fullest in the 24 hours he has left to live.	The Simpsons	18	One Fish, Two Fish, Blowfish, Blue Fish	2
21	\N	Bart, Milhouse, and Martin pool their money to buy the first issue of Radioactive Man, but their investment and their friendship are threatened when they can't agree on who will keep it.	The Simpsons	18	Three Men and a Comic Book	2
9	\N	Homer tries to bond with Bart by building a soapbox racer. On race day, Bart must decide between driving Martin’s aerodynamic racer and disappointing Homer, or driving his own racer and losing to Nelson.	The Simpsons	18	Saturdays of Thunder	3
19	\N	When Santa’s Little Helper needs a life-saving operation, the family tightens their belts to save up the money. Sensing their resentment, the dog runs away from home, only to be adopted by Mr. Burns.	The Simpsons	18	Dog of Death	3
21	\N	When Selma agrees to marry her prison pen pal, Sideshow Bob, only Bart remains suspicious of his motives.	The Simpsons	18	Black Widower	3
7	\N	Mr. Burns is instantly smitten when Marge takes a job at the nuclear power plant.	The Simpsons	18	Marge Gets a Job	4
17	\N	Homer negotiates his union's contract with Mr. Burns, mindful that he needs a dental plan for Lisa's new braces. Burns mistakes Homer's utter ineptitude for strategy and concedes, on the condition that Homer resign as union president.	The Simpsons	18	Last Exit to Springfield	4
1	\N	Through flashbacks, Homer recalls the dizzying rise and fall of his Beatles-esque barbershop quartet. The Be Sharps reunite for one last concert on the roof of Moe's Tavern.	The Simpsons	18	Homer's Barbershop Quartet	5
11	\N	When a cat burglar prowls Springfield, Homer forms a citizens' watch group that winds up breaking more laws than they protect. When the cat burglar sets his sights on the world's biggest cubic zirconia, a clue comes from an unexpected source.	The Simpsons	18	Homer the Vigilante	5
20	\N	Playing hooky, Bart sneaks onto the Quimby Compound and is the only witness when Mayor Quimby's ne'er-do-well nephew Freddy allegedly assaults a snooty French butler. But if he comes forward, he will be punished for truancy.	The Simpsons	18	The Boy Who Knew Too Much	5
8	\N	When she nearly flunks gym class, Lisa is forced to take up a sport. She's a natural at hockey, but things get complicated when her team faces off against Bart's. In a tense moment on the ice, sibling rivalry melts into sibling loyalty.	The Simpsons	18	Lisa on Ice	6
19	\N	A fortune teller foresees Lisa's future marriage to an upper-crust Harvard classmate. After a series of embarrassing incidents, Lisa comes to realize that even though her family may not be classy, she loves them the way they are.	The Simpsons	18	Lisa's Wedding	6
4	\N	Bart sells his soul to Milhouse for five dollars, but soon regrets his decision. Meanwhile, Moe turns the Tavern into a family-friendly restaurant.	The Simpsons	18	Bart Sells His Soul	7
12	\N	Homer catches Mr. Burns in an ether-induced haze and asks for $500 for his bowling team. When Burns' head clears, he demands to join the team. Meanwhile, Bart's inflammatory T-shirt provokes Principal Skinner to require school uniforms.	The Simpsons	18	Team Homer	7
23	\N	When Mayor Quimby uses immigrants as a political scapegoat, the Simpsons discover that Apu is an illegal immigrant.	The Simpsons	18	Much Apu About Nothing	7
8	\N	A hurricane destroys the Flanders' home and they have to move into the church basement. The people of Springfield gather to rebuild their house, but when Ned sees the poor workmanship, he has a complete breakdown.	The Simpsons	18	Hurricane Neddy	8
18	\N	When Prohibition is revived in Springfield, Homer and Bart supply the town with alcohol.	The Simpsons	18	Homer vs. the Eighteenth Amendment	8
3	\N	After Lisa’s saxophone is destroyed, the Simpsons reminisce about how she originally got the instrument. On the hottest day of the year, Homer must decide whether to buy an air conditioner or replace Lisa’s sax.	The Simpsons	18	Lisa's Sax	9
13	\N	A cult lures in most of Springfield to toil for “The Leader.” After Marge escapes and has the family deprogrammed, Homer exposes the man behind the spaceship.	The Simpsons	18	The Joy of Sect	9
24	\N	Bart’s latest stunt thwarts Lisa’s plan to attend a museum exhibit. When she tries to go alone and takes the wrong bus, Homer sets out to find her.	The Simpsons	18	Lost Our Lisa	9
9	\N	After a riot at a sci-fi convention, Mayor Quimby hires Homer as his bodyguard, and Homer witnesses the rampant corruption in town politics. When Homer takes a stand, he runs afoul of the Springfield mafia.	The Simpsons	18	Mayored to the Mob	10
10	\N	When clean-living Ned Flanders wants to experience a new side of life, Homer takes him to Las Vegas. After a drunken binge, they marry a pair of cocktail waitresses.	The Simpsons	18	Viva Ned Flanders	10
18	\N	When Reverend Lovejoy subjects the congregation to an extended Bible reading, the Simpsons fall asleep and have dreams based on Bible stories.	The Simpsons	18	Simpsons Bible Stories	10
5	\N	Fleeing from a duel, Homer takes his family to live on a farm. There he discovers that by mixing tomatoes, tobacco and radioactivity from the nuclear plant, he can create a dangerously delicious new substance.	The Simpsons	18	E-I-E-I-(Annoyed Grunt)	11
19	\N	When Icicle returns to enact the next phase of his devious plan, Caitlin and her mother, Dr. Carla Tannhauser, must resolve their long-combative relationship to defeat the icy monster. After Barry makes a big decision about their family without consulting her, Iris decides to take matters into her own hands.	The Flash	17	Snow Pack	5
6	\N	Barry turns his attention to prepping Elongated Man for life after Crisis and without The Flash, but Ralph ultimately teaches Barry a lesson. Meanwhile, Cecile faces her own moment of self-discovery while helping a recuperated Chester P. Runk reclaim his identity.	The Flash	17	License to Elongate	6
17	\N	After recent events, Barry takes a closer look at his life with Iris. Eva makes a bold move.	The Flash	17	Liberation	6
2	\N		The Flash	17	The Speed of Thought	7
7	\N	Homer buys an RV and the family takes off on an ill-fated camping trip.	The Simpsons	18	The Call of the Simpsons	1
4	\N	Bart catches a three-eyed fish in a river downstream of the Nuclear Power Plant. This causes the plant to become inspected, and in order to prevent it from being shut down, Mr. Burns decides to run for governor. After a hard campaign which sees Burns rise from being universally despised to running neck and neck with popular incumbent Mary Bailey, it is decided that Burns will have dinner with a random employee the night before the election. Homer is chosen, much to Marge's chagrin.	The Simpsons	18	Two Cars in Every Garage and Three Eyes on Every Fish	2
16	\N	After a series of destructive acts, Homer decides that Santa's Little Helper must go unless he passes obedience school. As the dog's last hours with the family approach, Bart must find a way to get through to him.	The Simpsons	18	Bart's Dog Gets an F	2
5	\N	Homer averts a meltdown through sheer dumb luck. When he’s invited to the Shelbyville Nuclear Power Plant to give a pep talk, he faces another potential meltdown and again “pulls a Homer.”	The Simpsons	18	Homer Defined	3
15	\N	Marge has a nervous breakdown and goes on a vacation alone, leaving Bart and Lisa with Patty and Selma, and Maggie with Homer.	The Simpsons	18	Homer Alone	3
4	\N	Homer enters Lisa into the Little Miss Springfield Pageant to help her feel better about her looks. But when she must choose between the title and her integrity, she realizes that confidence comes from within.	The Simpsons	18	Lisa the Beauty Queen	4
16	\N	After a DUI, Homer swears off beer for a month. Meanwhile, Bart and Lisa's sibling rivalry plays out in the school science fair.	The Simpsons	18	Duffless	4
3	\N	Burns discovers that Homer is grossly unqualified to be a nuclear safety inspector, so Homer enrolls at Springfield University to study nuclear physics. While there, Homer befriends three nerds and instigates a prank that gets them expelled.	The Simpsons	18	Homer Goes to College	5
12	\N	Working as Krusty the Clown's assistant, Bart accidentally steals the limelight by blurting an instant catchphrase: "I didn't do it." But when he tries to capitalize on his fifteen minutes of fame, the fans are fickle.	The Simpsons	18	Bart Gets Famous	5
22	\N	Homer teaches an adult education class on successful marriage, but his students show little interest until he starts telling them juicy details of his marriage to Marge. Furious, Marge kicks Homer out.	The Simpsons	18	Secrets of a Successful Marriage	5
10	\N	Grandpa Simpson's miracle elixir reinvigorates Homer and Marge's sex life. When father and son embark on an old-fashioned medicine show to sell the love tonic, they rake in the money, but eventually old resentments bubble up between them.	The Simpsons	18	Grampa vs. Sexual Inadequacy	6
20	\N	When Santa's Little Helper sires a litter of puppies, Mr. Burns adopts them, secretly scheming to use their pelts to make a fur tuxedo. When Bart and Lisa confront Mr. Burns, he relents and turns the puppies into racing dogs instead.	The Simpsons	18	Two Dozen and One Greyhounds	6
13	\N	Homer resents being upstaged when former president George Bush moves into the neighborhood. After Bush spanks Bart, an all-out prank war ensues.	The Simpsons	18	Two Bad Neighbors	7
22	\N	When a fellow veteran dies, Grandpa Simpson and Mr. Burns fight for buried WWII treasure as the only surviving members of their battalion.	The Simpsons	18	Raging Abe Simpson and His Grumbling Grandson in "The Curse of the Flying Hellfish"	7
7	\N	Lisa develops a crush on Nelson and tries to change him into a better person. Meanwhile, Homer finds an autodialer and starts a telemarketing scam.	The Simpsons	18	Lisa's Date with Density	8
17	\N	Lisa has a stellar reputation as a babysitter, but when Homer and Marge leave her in charge of Bart and Maggie, everything starts going wrong.	The Simpsons	18	My Sister, My Sitter	8
2	\N	Unmasked as an impostor, Principal Skinner flees to Capital City to reclaim his former life as a shiftless good-for-nothing. The people of Springfield gain a newfound appreciation for him and form a plan to bring him back.	The Simpsons	18	The Principal and the Pauper	9
12	\N	When the carnival comes to town, Homer and Bart wind up working the ring toss. A father-son team of grifters shows them the downside of the “carny code,” but the Simpsons beat them at their own game.	The Simpsons	18	Bart Carny	9
22	\N	Homer feuds with the Springfield garbage men and decides to run for Sanitation Commissioner. After winning the election with a sleazy campaign, Homer can’t keep the extravagant promises he made to the town.	The Simpsons	18	Trash of the Titans	9
6	\N	In a quest to learn Homer's middle name, Homer and Grandpa travel to his mother's old commune, where Homer embraces the hippie life.	The Simpsons	18	D'oh-in' in the Wind	10
19	\N	Homer's failed do-it-yourself project gets mistaken for "outsider art." Suddenly in the limelight, Homer must come up with new "works" to impress the art world.	The Simpsons	18	Mom and Pop Art	10
7	\N	Due to overuse of fertility medication, Apu and wife Manjula give birth to octuplets. Desperate for money, Apu loans the babies to an unscrupulous carny promoter, then needs Homer's help to get them back.	The Simpsons	18	Eight Misbehavin'	11
16	\N	Plastic surgery gives Moe the bartender a handsome new face and a whole new life as a soap opera star.	The Simpsons	18	Pygmoelian	11
5	\N	When the Simpsons once again have financial problems, Mr. Burns pays Homer to play pranks on others and humiliate himself in public. Meanwhile, Smithers creates a Malibu Stacy-themed musical.	The Simpsons	18	Homer vs. Dignity	12
15	\N	Homer becomes a Good Samaritan after discovering the simple joys of helping people in need–which is put to the test when he goes on a hunger strike after the owner of the Springfield Isotopes attempts to discredit him when Homer stumbles on his plot to discreetly move the team to Albuquerque, New Mexico.	The Simpsons	18	Hungry, Hungry Homer	12
17	\N	Team Flash finds out that a suburban mom named Vickie Bolen is in danger and they race to save her. Upon meeting her, they discover she’s a meta-human who is hiding her abilities from her family. Barry encourages Vickie to share her secret with her family, which makes Nora realize she needs to come clean with her parents about Thawne.	The Flash	17	Time Bomb	5
4	\N	Barry's efforts to prepare Cisco for Crisis are derailed when Cisco schemes to save Barry's life instead. Meanwhile, Ramsey Rosso uses his deadly new abilities to save his own life, while sacrificing his humanity in the process.	The Flash	17	There Will Be Blood	6
14	\N	Kid Flash returns to Central City with a Zen attitude and new tricks up his sleeve. While thrilled to see his family again, Wally confides to Barry that he returned because he thinks there is something wrong with the speed force. Meanwhile, Cisco returns from his fact-finding mission across Earth-Prime.	The Flash	17	Death of the Speed Force	6
5	\N		The Flash	17	Fear Me	7
10	\N	Bart puts his new spy camera to use when Homer gets rowdy at a bachelor party, and the incriminating photo gets distributed all over town.	The Simpsons	18	Homer's Night Out	1
10	\N	After Mr. Burns hits Bart with his car, ambulance-chasing attorney Lionel Hutz persuades Homer and Marge to sue for a million dollars.	The Simpsons	18	Bart Gets Hit by a Car	2
19	\N	With Miss Hoover out sick, a substitute teacher takes over the class and becomes an inspiring role model for Lisa.	The Simpsons	18	Lisa's Substitute	2
8	\N	Overcompensating for his neglect, Homer buys Lisa a pony; the high cost of maintaining the animal forces him to work the graveyard shift at the Kwik-E-Mart.	The Simpsons	18	Lisa's Pony	3
18	\N	After a career aptitude test pegs Lisa as a homemaker and Bart as a police officer, she becomes a rebel and he becomes a hall monitor. When Lisa’s subversive behavior goes too far, Bart steps in.	The Simpsons	18	Separate Vocations	3
23	\N	Everything’s coming up Milhouse when Bart’s best friend falls in love with the new girl at school. Jealous, Bart snitches to Milhouse’s father and the lovebirds are separated.	The Simpsons	18	Bart's Friend Falls in Love	3
9	\N	Homer starts a thriving snow-plowing business, but cutthroat competition arrives when Barney sets up shop as the "Plow King." When an avalanche buries Barney, Homer realizes the rivalry has gone too far.	The Simpsons	18	Mr. Plow	4
14	\N	When Homer neglects Bart once too often, Bart goes to the Big Brother program to get a new father figure. Stung, Homer replaces Bart with a little brother.	The Simpsons	18	Brother from the Same Planet	4
22	\N	An advertising blitz for "Gabbo" spells trouble for Krusty: his show gets canceled when the new ventriloquist act gets higher ratings. Bart and Lisa enlist Krusty's Hollywood pals for a comeback special.	The Simpsons	18	Krusty Gets Kancelled	4
10	\N	When gambling is legalized in Springfield, Mr. Burns opens an extravagant casino on the waterfront. Meanwhile, Bart opens a casino in his treehouse. Burns becomes a germ-phobic recluse and Homer must tear Marge away from the slot machines.	The Simpsons	18	$pringfield	5
1	\N	Stuck in his room with a broken leg, Bart hears a high-pitched scream. When he looks through his telescope, he sees a guilty Ned Flanders burying the evidence.	The Simpsons	18	Bart of Darkness	6
12	\N	Homer joins the secret society of the Stonecutters and is suddenly exalted when the brethren discover his birthmark. The ancient order is shaken to the core by the ineptitude of its new Chosen One.	The Simpsons	18	Homer the Great	6
22	\N	Lisa is reunited with her idol, Bleeding Gums Murphy, but their time together is short-lived. When the jazz legend passes away, a heartbroken Lisa wants to buy his rare album for $500 and play it on the local jazz station as a tribute.	The Simpsons	18	'Round Springfield	6
8	\N	Homer discovers that his mother is still alive, a former radical who is a fugitive from the law. When her old nemesis Burns spots her and tips off the FBI, she is forced to return to the underground.	The Simpsons	18	Mother Simpson	7
18	\N	Bart meets the original animator who created Itchy, penniless some 70 years after the studio stole his idea. When Bart helps him sue for restitution, he unwittingly bankrupts Itchy & Scratchy.	The Simpsons	18	The Day the Violence Died	7
3	\N	When Moe sees that Homer can absorb massive blows to the head, he turns him into a prizefighter and sets up a match with heavyweight champion Drederick Tatum.	The Simpsons	18	The Homer They Fall	8
14	\N	In an attempt to boost ratings, the Itchy and Scratchy Show adds a new "in-your-face" character voiced by Homer.	The Simpsons	18	The Itchy & Scratchy & Poochie Show	8
23	\N	A hardworking new employee at the power plant is consumed with resentment at Homer's undeserved success.	The Simpsons	18	Homer's Enemy	8
7	\N	Trying to escape his arranged marriage, Apu asks Marge to pose as his wife during his mother’s visit. When the ruse fails, Homer makes a last-ditch attempt to intervene, but Apu is smitten with his new bride Manjula.	The Simpsons	18	The Two Mrs. Nahasapeemapetilons	9
17	\N	Lisa struggles with solving a simple puzzle and fears that the "Simpson gene” is suddenly wiping out her intelligence. Homer stages a family reunion in hopes of introducing Lisa to some Simpsons she can respect.	The Simpsons	18	Lisa the Simpson	9
2	\N	A midlife crisis prompts Homer to quit his job and become an inventor.	The Simpsons	18	The Wizard of Evergreen Terrace	10
14	\N	Apu is making the husbands of Springfield look bad with his extravagent Valentine's Day efforts for Manjula. When the men try to sabotage Apu's grand gesture, they accidentally wind up benefiting from it.	The Simpsons	18	I'm with Cupid	10
1	\N	Homer befriends Mel Gibson just as Mel is completing a remake of Mr. Smith Goes To Washington. Homer convinces Mel to make the film more violent, with disastrous results.	The Simpsons	18	Beyond Blunderdome	11
11	\N	Homer gets a bucket stuck on his head, and when it is removed the town is convinced that Bart has the powers of a faith healer. Then mobster Fat Tony tries to turn the boy's spiritual abilities into more sinister directions.	The Simpsons	18	Faith Off	11
22	\N	In this satire of VH1's "Behind The Music," we learn the secrets of the Simpsons' rise, fall, and ultimate success.	The Simpsons	18	Behind the Laughter	11
10	\N	Marge tries to rehabilitate a convict with remarkable artistic talent. Meanwhile, Homer uses a trash can to fix people's spines.	The Simpsons	18	Pokey Mom	12
17	\N	When Maggie goes to preschool, Marge decides to get a job to pass the time and ends up working at an upscale weed dispensary; Homer decides to open his own dispensary that mimics a sketchy drug deal, putting their two businesses at odds.	The Simpsons	18	Highway to Well	31
1	\N	While Barry and Iris deal with the heartbreaking loss of their daughter, Nora, the team faces their greatest threat yet — one that threatens to destroy all of Central City. Meanwhile, Killer Frost has a brush with death that results in an unexpected new dynamic that will change her relationship with Caitlin forever.	The Flash	17	Into The Void	6
11	\N	Barry and Iris plan a romantic dinner for Valentine's Day but their evening is interrupted by an old foe - Amunet; Frost gets into the holiday spirit and attempts to help Allegra reconnect with an old love.	The Flash	17	Love Is a Battlefield	6
1	\N	When his Christmas bonus is cancelled, Homer becomes a department-store Santa--and then bets his meager earnings at the track. When all seems lost, Homer and Bart save Christmas by adopting the losing greyhound, Santa's Little Helper.	The Simpsons	18	Simpsons Roasting on an Open Fire	1
11	\N	Bart is sent as a foreign exchange student to France, where he is enslaved by corrupt winemakers. Meanwhile, the Simpson family hosts an Albanian student who takes a surprising interest in the workings of the nuclear power plant.	The Simpsons	18	The Crepes of Wrath	1
5	\N	Homer fires up the crowd at a Springfield Isotopes baseball game and is chosen to be the team's new mascot. He immediately becomes a popular attraction and the Isotopes start a winning streak. As a result, Homer is promoted to a team in Capital City, the Capital City Capitals.	The Simpsons	18	Dancin' Homer	2
14	\N	When Marge begs Homer to find Selma a husband, he sets her up with Principal Skinner... who falls in love with Patty instead.	The Simpsons	18	Principal Charming	2
2	\N	Lisa’s patriotic essay wins the family a trip to Washington, D.C. -- but the corruption she sees there inspires her to write a new and very different essay.	The Simpsons	18	Mr. Lisa Goes to Washington	3
16	\N	Bart discovers his teacher’s personal ad and invents a fictional suitor to string her along. When Mrs. Krabappel falls madly in love with “Woodrow,” Bart’s conscience starts to bother him.	The Simpsons	18	Bart the Lover	3
5	\N	In "Clown Without Pity," Bart's Krusty doll is determined to murder Homer. In "King Homer," Homer plays King Kong to Marge's Fay Wray. Finally, in "Dial Z for Zombies," Bart finds a book of witchcraft and accidentally brings Springfield's dead to life.	The Simpsons	18	Treehouse of Horror III	4
12	\N	When Springfield gets a sudden windfall, a charismatic traveling salesman convinces the town to build a monorail.	The Simpsons	18	Marge vs. the Monorail	4
8	\N	After a reckless Squishee bender with Milhouse, Bart wakes to the shocking realization that he joined the Junior Campers. Lured by pocketknives and knot-tying lessons, Bart assimilates into the group but then must face the father-son rafting trip.	The Simpsons	18	Boy-Scoutz 'n the Hood	5
18	\N	The childless Mr. Burns selects Bart as his heir and begins grooming him for his new role. As a test of loyalty, Mr. Burns orders Bart to fire Homer.	The Simpsons	18	Burns' Heir	5
6	\N	In "The Shinning," Homer becomes groundskeeper of Mr. Burns' isolated mountain mansion. Next, in "Time and Punishment," Homer tries to fix the toaster and winds up traveling through time. In "Nightmare Cafeteria," Principal Skinner finds an ingenious way to reduce overcrowding in the detention room and deal with cafeteria budget cuts.	The Simpsons	18	Treehouse of Horror V	6
16	\N	After Bart's prank phone call to Australia goes awry, the Simpsons must fly out to the land down under and apologize to the Australian people. When they discover Bart's penalty will be a kick in the pants, international relations deteriorate.	The Simpsons	18	Bart vs. Australia	6
25	\N	In Part One of this two-part suspense story, Mr. Burns' evil schemes go too far. When Burns winds up shot, everyone is a suspect.	The Simpsons	18	Who Shot Mr. Burns? - Part I	6
10	\N	Troy McClure hosts a behind-the-scenes look at the show, including clips of the series' beginnings as filler on "The Tracy Ullman Show," Simpsons trivia questions, and unaired scenes from popular episodes.	The Simpsons	18	The Simpsons 138th Episode Spectacular	7
20	\N	Bart creates a fake driver's license for himself and uses it to go on a spring break road trip with Milhouse, Nelson, and Martin. Meanwhile, Homer and Lisa bond after spending some quality time together at work.	The Simpsons	18	Bart on the Road	7
5	\N	After trespassing and damaging property at a mysterious old house, Bart is required to work there as a punishment... but it turns out to be a burlesque house.	The Simpsons	18	Bart After Dark	8
15	\N	The Simpsons befriend a shop owner, but when Homer discovers the man is gay, he worries about his influence on Bart.	The Simpsons	18	Homer's Phobia	8
25	\N	When Bart is sent to military school after playing a prank on the town, Lisa decides to join him... as the school's only girl cadet.	The Simpsons	18	The Secret War of Lisa Simpson	8
10	\N	After accidentally ruining the family’s Christmas tree and presents, Bart buries the evidence and claims a burglar stole everything. When Kent Brockman does a human interest story on the family’s tragic loss, the townspeople shower the family with generosity… until the truth comes out.	The Simpsons	18	Miracle on Evergreen Terrace	9
20	\N	Facing an IRS audit, Homer agrees to help the feds bust Mr. Burns for a missing trillion-dollar bill. When Burns makes an anti-government stand, Homer flees with him to Cuba.	The Simpsons	18	The Trouble with Trillions	9
5	\N	After a chance encounter with Hollywood celebrities secretly living in Springfield, Homer becomes their friend and gofer... until he spills the beans to the gang at Moe's.	The Simpsons	18	When You Dish Upon a Star	10
16	\N	Indebted from a mishap at the Smithsonian, Homer lets a cell phone company put a transmitter in the house. Forced to share a room with Bart, Lisa resents Homer until a New Age experience gives her empathy.	The Simpsons	18	Make Room for Lisa	10
2	\N	When Bart commits an extremely destructive prank, he is given Focusyn, a pill to help him concentrate in school. At first the results are impressive, and then Bart starts believing in a conspiracy involving spy satellites and major league baseball.	The Simpsons	18	Brother's Little Helper	11
12	\N	Worried about his health, Mr. Burns visits the Mayo Clinic. He lets Homer housesit his mansion, which leads of course to an offshore knife fight and an attack by Chinese pirates.	The Simpsons	18	The Mansion Family	11
21	\N	When Otto dumps his bride at the altar, she goes to live with the Simpsons - and the family comes to believe that Marge has lost her mind.	The Simpsons	18	It's a Mad, Mad, Mad, Mad Marge	11
8	\N	A snowstorm traps the students of Springfield Elementary inside, with them overthrowing Principal Skinner when he uses his Army skills to control them. Meanwhile, Homer tries to rescue the children–using Flanders' car.	The Simpsons	18	Skinner's Sense of Snow	12
2	\N	Faced with the news of his impending death, Barry's resiliency suffers as he struggles to fight fate. Meanwhile, Cecile's career as a D.A. conflicts with her identity when she crosses paths with a villainous meta-human.	The Flash	17	A Flash of the Lightning	6
19	\N	Barry considers a risky plan to save Iris from the Mirrorverse. Ralph attempts to stop Sue from making a grave mistake that could destroy her life.	The Flash	17	Success Is Assured	6
5	\N	Fed up with Nelson's bullying, the kids from Springfield Elementary decide to teach him a lesson. With advice from Grandpa, Bart leads them into battle.	The Simpsons	18	Bart the General	1
2	\N	Homer uses his medical insurance to buy Dimoxinil, a miracle hair-growth formula. After growing luxurious locks, he's given a promotion which allows him to hire a secretary named Karl and makes grand promises to his family at home.	The Simpsons	18	Simpson and Delilah	2
8	\N	The Simpsons go to a Monster truck rally that features famous daredevil Lance Murdock. Bart immediately becomes enamored and decides that he wants to become a daredevil as well. His first stunt ends in injury, but to gain the respect of his friends, he promises a far more impressive feat to them: to jump the Springfield Gorge.	The Simpsons	18	Bart the Daredevil	2
18	\N	Marge rediscovers her interest in art and takes up painting. When Mr. Burns hires her to paint his official portrait, Marge tries but fails to find his "inner beauty."	The Simpsons	18	Brush with Greatness	2
6	\N	"Like Father, Like Clown" is the sixth episode of The Simpsons' third season. It originally aired on the Fox network in the United States on October 24, 1991. In the episode, after recalling a traumatic memory, Krusty the Clown reveals to the Simpson family that he is of Jewish heritage, and that his father, Rabbi Hyman Krustofski, disowned him for pursuing a career in comedy. Krusty is emotionally upset and Bart and Lisa decide to try to reunite Krusty with his long-estranged father.	The Simpsons	18	Like Father, Like Clown	3
12	\N	Homer and Marge recount their early years, when the couple faced a shotgun wedding and Homer’s poor career prospects.	The Simpsons	18	I Married Marge	3
24	\N	Homer’s half-brother Herb Powell returns, his finances in ruin from his last encounter with Homer. With a little help from the family, he invents a product that’s sure to turn his life around.	The Simpsons	18	Brother, Can You Spare Two Dimes?	3
13	\N	After seeing Aunt Gladys die alone, Aunt Selma wants to get married and have a baby... until she spends a day babysitting Bart and Lisa at Duff Gardens.	The Simpsons	18	Selma's Choice	4
5	\N	In "The Devil and Homer Simpson," Homer sells his soul for a doughnut. Next, in the Twilight Zone spoof "Terror at 5 1/2 Feet," everyone doubts Bart's sanity when he's the only one to see a gremlin sabotaging the school bus. In "Bart Simpson's Dracula," the family turns into vampires, and Lisa sends Homer to the Burns mansion in an attempt to kill the head vampire.	The Simpsons	18	Treehouse of Horror IV	5
14	\N	Lisa is shocked to find that her new Malibu Stacy doll reinforces negative stereotypes of women. With Smithers' help, Lisa tracks down the original creator of Malibu Stacy and convinces her to market a new doll that's a better role model for girls.	The Simpsons	18	Lisa vs. Malibu Stacy	5
21	\N	Mr. Burns and Grandpa Simpson compete for the affections of Marge's mother. The more dashing suitor prevails, but in a scene straight out of The Graduate, Grandpa crashes the wedding just before Mrs. Bouvier becomes Mrs. Burns.	The Simpsons	18	Lady Bouvier's Lover	5
9	\N	When Homer gropes for a gummy candy stuck to the babysitter's pants, she mistakes his intentions and turns the town against him.	The Simpsons	18	Homer Badman	6
18	\N	Springfield plays host to a film festival. Among the contenders for best film: Barney presents "Pukahontas," a haunting meditation on his alcoholism; Mr. Burns commissions the fawning biography "A Burns for All Seasons"; and Hans Moleman exploits misfortune with "Man Getting Hit by Football."	The Simpsons	18	A Star Is Burns	6
2	\N	Bart longs to play "Fallout Boy" in the new Radioactive Man movie, but the Van Houtens thrust Milhouse into the spotlight. Meanwhile, the town of Springfield sees an opportunity for profit.	The Simpsons	18	Radioactive Man	7
11	\N	Nabbed for shoplifting, Bart manages to keep it a secret from the family... until it's time to have the family Christmas photo taken at the Try-N-Save.	The Simpsons	18	Marge Be Not Proud	7
21	\N	Bart and Milhouse wonder if anything interesting happens to the citizens of Springfield, which leads to a series of interconnected vignettes.	The Simpsons	18	22 Short Films About Springfield	7
6	\N	Kirk and Luann Van Houten are getting a divorce. Homer is confident that it will never happen to him, but Kirk tells him how quickly things can change.	The Simpsons	18	A Milhouse Divided	8
16	\N	When Sideshow Bob is released from prison, his brother Cecil puts him in charge of building Springfield's new hydroelectric dam.	The Simpsons	18	Brother from Another Series	8
1	\N	Designated driver Barney absconds to Manhattan in Homer's car and leaves it there. But when the family journeys to the Big Apple to retrieve their property, Homer discovers his car has been booted.	The Simpsons	18	The City of New York vs. Homer Simpson	9
11	\N	Homer rents a Clint Eastwood movie and is dismayed to find it's a musical. Using clips from past episodes, the rest of the family reminds him about the many times he and other members of the family and town have broken into song and dance.	The Simpsons	18	All Singing, All Dancing	9
21	\N	Lisa becomes the anchor of a kids’ news program but is upstaged by Bart’s treacly human interest stories. At home, Homer corrupts a helper monkey.	The Simpsons	18	Girly Edition	9
7	\N	Stuck at home with a cold, Lisa gets addicted to a video game and neglects her homework. Her A+++ on a test wins the school a grant, but when she confesses that she cheated, Skinner covers it up. Meanwhile, Homer raises a lobster.	The Simpsons	18	Lisa Gets an "A"	10
20	\N	When Bart ruins Springfield's chance to host the Olympics, the kids are sentenced to community service work at the retirement home. To help the residents recapture their youth, Bart takes them on an ill-fated boat ride.	The Simpsons	18	The Old Man and the "C" Student	10
6	\N	Homer bowls a perfect 300 game, then concludes that the greatest accomplishment of his life is behind him. He reconnects with the world by bonding with baby Maggie.	The Simpsons	18	Hello Gutter, Hello Fadder	11
17	\N	We see a possible future in which Bart is a grown-up slacker, living with Ralph Wiggum, while Lisa is no less than President of the United States.	The Simpsons	18	Bart to the Future	11
7	\N	As Barry Allen stands on the threshold of his impending death in Crisis, his convictions are tested when the monstrous Dr. Ramsey Rosso infects The Flash with a mysterious, hallucinogenic contagion. Meanwhile, reporter Iris West-Allen uncovers a vast conspiracy.	The Flash	17	The Last Temptation of Barry Allen, Pt. 1	6
12	\N	After months of searching for Sue Dearbon, Ralph  gets a lead on her whereabouts and finally comes face to face with his missing client. However, Sue refuses to return home to her family, and instead, takes Ralph on a daring adventure. Iris faces a new challenge while Barry considers a potentially dangerous request from a trusted source.	The Flash	17	A Girl Named Sue	6
4	\N		The Flash	17	Central City Strong	7
9	\N	Homer gives Marge a bowling ball for her birthday, and his self-serving gift backfires: she starts taking lessons from a suave French bowling instructor. When the lessons take a romantic turn, Marge faces temptation.	The Simpsons	18	Life on the Fast Lane	1
7	\N	Lisa makes a table centerpiece for the Thanksgiving dinner, which Bart accidentally destroys. After he is sent to his room by his parents, Bart angrily runs away from home and experiences a very different kind of Thanksgiving holiday.	The Simpsons	18	Bart vs. Thanksgiving	2
17	\N	When Grandpa's new girlfriend at the Springfield Retirement Castle dies, he inherits her savings and must decide the best way to spend his windfall.	The Simpsons	18	Old Money	2
4	\N	Bart becomes an errand boy for the Springfield Mafia. When Principal Skinner disappears, Fat Tony points the finger at Bart.	The Simpsons	18	Bart the Murderer	3
13	\N	Bart plays practical jokes with a radio microphone, and his hoax tests the limits of the town’s kindness.	The Simpsons	18	Radio Bart	3
2	\N	Feeling underappreciated at home, Marge takes up acting and channels her pent-up rage as Blanche DuBois in a community production. Meanwhile, Maggie leads a revolt at the Ayn Rand School for Tots.	The Simpsons	18	A Streetcar Named Marge	4
20	\N	Lisa takes a stand against Springfield's annual snake-bashing festival.	The Simpsons	18	Whacking Day	4
7	\N	Bart heckles the guru at a self-help seminar, and the man presents him to the audience as a role model for their "inner child." But when the whole town tries to "be like Bart," things start to fall apart.	The Simpsons	18	Bart's Inner Child	5
17	\N	Bart wins a wacky radio contest and forgoes the cash to claim the gag prize instead: an elephant.	The Simpsons	18	Bart Gets an Elephant	5
5	\N	Backed by a cabal of Republicans and the talk radio blowhard Birch Barlow, Sideshow Bob runs for mayor of Springfield. When new mayor Bob decides to build a freeway right through the Simpson's' home, Bart and Lisa set out to prove the election was rigged.	The Simpsons	18	Sideshow Bob Roberts	6
13	\N	The story of Maggie's birth is told in flashbacks: after Homer quits the Springfield Nuclear Power Plant to pursue his dream of working at a bowling alley, Marge reveals that she is pregnant.	The Simpsons	18	And Maggie Makes Three	6
23	\N	After Marge helps catch a petty criminal, the adrenaline rush inspires her to join the Springfield Police Department. Marge experiences feelings of power and authority that she's never known before, but police corruption makes her question her newfound calling.	The Simpsons	18	The Springfield Connection	6
6	\N	In "Attack of the 50 Foot Eyesores," strange atmospheric conditions bring giant advertising statues to life. In "Nightmare on Evergreen Terrace," Groundskeeper Willie is killed in a freak accident and seeks revenge in the childrens' dreams. In the final segment, Homer steps through a secret portal and becomes three-dimensional.	The Simpsons	18	Treehouse of Horror VI	7
16	\N	While researching into Jebediah Springfield's past for an essay, Lisa discovers that the town founder wasn't the hero that everyone thinks he was.	The Simpsons	18	Lisa the Iconoclast	7
1	\N	In "The Thing and I," Bart discovers his evil Siamese twin in the attic. In "The Genesis Tub," Lisa's science experiment becomes a quickly-developing micro-universe, where she is thought of as God and Bart is the devil. In "Citizen Kang," aliens replace Clinton and Dole just in time for the election.	The Simpsons	18	Treehouse of Horror VII	8
11	\N	Marge's new pretzel franchise is failing until Homer strikes a deal with Fat Tony, Springfield's local mobster.	The Simpsons	18	The Twisted World of Marge Simpson	8
21	\N	Financially ruined, Mr. Burns turns to Lisa for help in building a recycling business. Lisa believes he's changed, but his new business venture takes a shocking new direction.	The Simpsons	18	The Old Man and the Lisa	8
6	\N	When Homer becomes the coach of a peewee football team, he replaces star quarterback Nelson with the less talented Bart. Facing his teammates’ scorn, Bart looks for a way out but finds a better way to show his team spirit.	The Simpsons	18	Bart Star	9
18	\N	At Marge’s insistence, Bart has a “play date” with Ralph. Bart suddenly sees the upside of this friendship when he discovers Chief Wiggum’s “master key” and goes to explore Springfield’s abandoned prison.	The Simpsons	18	This Little Wiggy	9
3	\N	Under Nelson's bad influence, Bart shoots a bird with a BB gun. Stricken with remorse, he tries to nurture the eggs from the bird's nest, which hatch into a species of lizard outlawed in Springfield.	The Simpsons	18	Bart the Mother	10
13	\N	A new TV series features a suave and debonair character named Homer Simpson. Homer capitalizes on his new namesake, until the character is rewritten to be a bumbling fool. Trying to recapture the positive attention he enjoyed, Homer changes his name to "Max Power."	The Simpsons	18	Homer to the Max	10
23	\N	After their bank account is drained at a cyber-cafe, the Simpsons go on a disastrous low-budget trip to Japan, where they wind up as contestants on a humiliating game show.	The Simpsons	18	Thirty Minutes Over Tokyo	10
10	\N	When Marge leaves the house to recuperate from a skating injury, everything goes to hell - until Lisa convinces Homer and Bart they have leprosy.	The Simpsons	18	Little Big Mom	11
20	\N	Lisa enters a tap dancing academy, where the teacher is a child star who never quite grew up. Meanwhile, Homer gets laser eye surgery.	The Simpsons	18	Last Tap Dance in Springfield	11
7	\N	Homer and Bart become father–son con artists (after Bart is given money out of pity when Homer decided to not take him home), but soon find that they are the ones being had.	The Simpsons	18	The Great Money Caper	12
21	\N	When Homer refuses to pay a five dollar airport tax to fly to Delaware, the family is forced to ride in a livestock car of a train instead. There they meet a singing hobo who tells three tall tales:  Homer as Paul Bunyan.  Lisa as Connie Appleseed, a parody of Johnny Appleseed.  Bart as Tom Sawyer with Nelson as Huckleberry Finn.	The Simpsons	18	Simpsons Tall Tales	12
9	\N	Pariah enlists Black Lightning to help stop the Anti-Monitor after Flash-90 shares what he learned from his battle in ‘Elseworlds.’ With the help of Black Lightning, Barry, Cisco and Killer Frost come up with a plan that could save them all. Meanwhile, Iris has a heart-to-heart with Ryan Choi, while Oliver and Diggle return to an old familiar stomping ground.\\n\\nThis crossover begins with Supergirl S05E09 and Batwoman S01E09, and continues on Arrow S08E08 and Legends of Tomorrow's special episode.	The Flash	17	Crisis on Infinite Earths: Part Three (III)	6
15	\N	The Flash takes on a dangerous new meta named Sunshine. Cisco sets out to help Nash	The Flash	17	The Exorcism of Nash Wells	6
3	\N	Homer is fired for nearly causing a meltdown at the nuclear plant. When he finds a new calling as a public safety advocate, he finds himself facing off against Mr. Burns.	The Simpsons	18	Homer's Odyssey	1
1	\N	Bart fails four consecutive history exams and the school psychiatrist recommends that Bart repeat the fourth grade.	The Simpsons	18	Bart Gets an F	2
9	\N	Maggie attacks Homer with a mallet after seeing it on Itchy & Scratchy. Marge begins a protest outside the production offices, demanding the show be retooled to prevent further violence.	The Simpsons	18	Itchy & Scratchy & Marge	2
20	\N	At a lakeside retreat for married couples, Marge is determined to fix her marriage with Homer, but Homer is more determined to catch General Sherman, the freakishly large catfish that lives in the lake.	The Simpsons	18	The War of the Simpsons	2
10	\N	Moe steals the drink recipe Homer invented, and the rechristened “Flaming Moe” turns his tavern into a hotspot. When a national franchise wants to buy the recipe, Homer wants revenge.	The Simpsons	18	Flaming Moe's	3
20	\N	Homer becomes the manager of a beautiful country music singer, whose attentions drive a wedge between Marge and Homer.	The Simpsons	18	Colonel Homer	3
6	\N	When Bart's misdeeds at school and at home reach new extremes, Homer puts his foot down and imposes the ultimate punishment: Bart is forbidden to go see the new Itchy & Scratchy movie.	The Simpsons	18	Itchy and Scratchy: The Movie	4
21	\N	Overwhelmed by her family's demands during a flu epidemic, Marge accidentally shoplifts at the Kwik-E-Mart and winds up in prison.	The Simpsons	18	Marge in Chains	4
9	\N	Homer struggles with his attraction to new coworker Mindy, a beautiful engineer whose love for doughnuts is equal to his own.	The Simpsons	18	The Last Temptation of Homer	5
19	\N	When Bart gets Principal Skinner fired, Ned Flanders is brought in to act as principal. Skinner befriends his former nemesis and the pair look for a way to get Skinner reinstated.	The Simpsons	18	Sweet Seymour Skinner's Baadasssss Song	5
7	\N	Smitten with Reverend Lovejoy's daughter Jessica, Bart tries to reform to win her heart -- but what she really wants is a bad boy. When she steals the church collection plate, Bart finds he's in over his head.	The Simpsons	18	Bart's Girlfriend	6
17	\N	Homer must turn to his sisters-in-law for a loan. Relishing Homer's degradation, Patty and Selma make him their slave. But when the sisters are caught smoking on the job, Homer reluctantly covers for them, saving their jobs. Meanwhile, Bart is late to sign up for a gym class and must take the only class still open -- ballet.	The Simpsons	18	Homer vs. Patty & Selma	6
3	\N	When Homer and Marge are found to be unfit parents, the kids are placed with the Flanders family. Reluctant participants in the Flanderses' wholesome family activities, Bart and Lisa become the targets of an emergency baptism.	The Simpsons	18	Home Sweet Homediddly-Dum-Doodily	7
14	\N	A chance encounter with a former classmate yields an invitation to the Springfield Country Club, where Marge tries to parlay a bargain basement Chanel suit into elevated social status for her family.	The Simpsons	18	Scenes from the Class Struggle in Springfield	7
24	\N	To show his kids how hip he is, Homer takes Bart and Lisa to a music festival, where he earns himself a place in the sideshow by catching a cannonball with his belly.	The Simpsons	18	Homerpalooza	7
9	\N	After eating a dish laced with potent peppers during the chili cookoff, Homer has hallucinations where a mystical coyote urges him to find his soulmate.	The Simpsons	18	El Viaje Misterioso de Nuestro Jomer (The Mysterious Voyage of Homer)	8
19	\N	Bart discovers Principal Skinner and Mrs. Krabappel kissing, and it's not long before the whole town knows of their secret affair.	The Simpsons	18	Grade School Confidential	8
4	\N	In “The Homega Man,” Homer faces a post-apocalyptic Springfield. Next, Bart attempts to become Superfly in "Fly vs. Fly." In “Easy-Bake Coven,” amidst a witch hunt in 1649, Marge and her sisters invent trick-or-treating.	The Simpsons	18	Treehouse of Horror VIII	9
14	\N	When Otto drives the school bus off a bridge, the kids wind up on a deserted island, fending for themselves in a “Lord of the Flies” parody. Back in Springfield, Homer takes on Bill Gates.	The Simpsons	18	Das Bus	9
23	\N	After Rainier Wolfcastle helps Homer get in shape, Homer accepts a challenge to climb the Murderhorn, the tallest mountain in Springfield.	The Simpsons	18	King of the Hill	9
8	\N	When Grandpa needs a new kidney, Homer agrees to donate one, but then chickens out.	The Simpsons	18	Homer Simpson in: "Kidney Trouble"	10
17	\N	After beating Homer in a steak-eating competition, a trucker dies; Homer and Bart take over his rig to complete his shipment.	The Simpsons	18	Maximum Homerdrive	10
4	\N	In "I Know What You Diddily-Iddly-Did" the SImpsons fear they have killed Ned Flanders. "Desperately Xeeking Xena" satirizes superheroes of yore with "Stretch Dude" Bart and "Clobber Girl" Lisa. And "Life's A Glitch, Then You Die" depicts the upcoming horror of Y2K.	The Simpsons	18	Treehouse of Horror X	11
14	\N	Ned's wife Maude is inadvertently killed by a T-shirt accident at an auto race. Homer and his family try to help Ned cope.	The Simpsons	18	Alone Again, Natura-Diddily	11
2	\N	While calling Animal Control over a badger taking residence in Santa's Little Helper's doghouse, Homer discovers that Springfield has two different area codes–and ends up leading a revolt that splits the town in two.	The Simpsons	18	A Tale of Two Springfields	12
12	\N	While making funeral arrangements for Grampa's future, the funeral planner pitches the idea of a mausoleum that uses the same amount of cement as a full-sized tennis court. This prompts Homer to instead build a tennis court in his backyard, initially mistaking the sport for "Foxy Boxing". The tennis court makes Marge and Homer popular in town, but it turns out that this is only because Homer's inferior tennis ability makes them an easy target. Bart on the other hand, shines as a natural.	The Simpsons	18	Tennis the Menace	12
8	\N	With The Flash freshly infected by the monstrous Bloodwork, Iris and Cisco battle to help Barry take control of himself before he’s lost forever to Ramsey’s influence. Meanwhile, the rest of Team Flash fight to reclaim control of Central City from Bloodwork’s growing army.	The Flash	17	The Last Temptation of Barry Allen, Pt. 2	6
16	\N	After Black Hole hires Rag Doll to kill Joe, Singh suggests he go into Witness Protection but Joe refuses to stop investigating Carver.  While investigating Carver with Cisco, Ralph runs into Sue. Iris becomes suspicious of Eva.	The Flash	17	So Long and Goodnight	6
4	\N	After an embarrassing experience at the company picnic, Homer pawns the TV and uses the proceeds to take the family to therapy sessions.	The Simpsons	18	There's No Disgrace Like Home	1
13	\N	While Homer takes Marge out for a night on the town, the kids spot their babysitter on America's Most Armed and Dangerous.	The Simpsons	18	Some Enchanted Evening	1
12	\N	When the TV breaks, Marge and Homer entertain the kids with the story of how they first met.	The Simpsons	18	The Way We Was	2
1	\N	Mistakenly committed to a mental hospital, Homer meets a tall, stocky white man who claims to be Michael Jackson.	The Simpsons	18	Stark Raving Dad	3
7	\N	In the first story, the family buys a cursed monkey paw in Morocco, and their three wishes turn out badly. In a Twilight Zone parody, Bart is the fearsome “monster” who can read the townspeople’s thoughts. In the final story, Mr. Burns steals Homer’s brain for a giant robot he’s building.	The Simpsons	18	Treehouse of Horror II	3
17	\N	With a million dollars on the line, Mr. Burns hires ringers for the upcoming baseball game against the Shelbyville Nuclear Power Plant. But as misfortunes fell the pros, with bases loaded and the score tied in the ninth inning, Homer is sent to bat.	The Simpsons	18	Homer at the Bat	3
1	\N	When Bart and Lisa arrive at Kamp Krusty, they find the summer camp is more like a prison camp. When Krusty doesn't show up to set things straight, the kids seize control and take their case to the media.	The Simpsons	18	Kamp Krusty	4
11	\N	Homer's doughnut-clogged heart needs a triple bypass operation, but Dr. Hibbert's fee is $40,000... so Homer takes his chances with Dr. Nick Riviera, who'll do any operation for $129.	The Simpsons	18	Homer's Triple Bypass	4
18	\N	An April Fools' Day prank provides the jumping-off point for Simpson family flashbacks.	The Simpsons	18	So It's Come to This: A Simpsons Clip Show	4
2	\N	When Bart receives death threats from newly paroled Sideshow Bob, the family goes into the Witness Relocation Program and starts a new life on a houseboat on Terror Lake.	The Simpsons	18	Cape Feare	5
15	\N	Dejected by a lack of recognition at work, Homer makes a crank call to NASA and winds up being chosen to ride into space with astronauts.	The Simpsons	18	Deep Space Homer	5
2	\N	Lisa feels threatened when a new girl moves to Springfield: Allison is smart, pretty, a great saxophone player and a crack diorama builder. Lisa tries to befriend her new rival, but she's consumed with envy and competitiveness.	The Simpsons	18	Lisa's Rival	6
11	\N	When they try to go on vacation, the family discovers Marge's debilitating fear of flying. Marge consults a psychoanalyst to find the source of her baffling fear.	The Simpsons	18	Fear of Flying	6
21	\N	A teachers' strike forces the Board of Education to enlist PTA members as substitute teachers. Realizing he preferred the old regime, Bart locks Skinner and Mrs. Krabappel in a room together until they can agree on the contract.	The Simpsons	18	The PTA Disbands	6
5	\N	After visiting a local petting zoo, Lisa becomes a vegetarian and faces ridicule from family and friends. When she lashes out and ruins Homer's barbecue, she learns a lesson in tolerance.	The Simpsons	18	Lisa the Vegetarian	7
15	\N	In a scheme to get Krusty's autograph, Bart sends him a check. When Krusty's offshore holding corporation endorses the check, his illegal tax shelter is exposed. In despair after the government auctions off his possessions, Krusty fakes his own death.	The Simpsons	18	Bart the Fink	7
25	\N	On a family vacation, Lisa tries on a new identity to fit in with the other kids at the beach. Jealous, Bart reveals her true nerdiness to the group.	The Simpsons	18	Summer of 4 Ft. 2	7
10	\N	Homer witnesses something out of this world in Springfield woods, but no one believes him -- not even FBI agents Fox Mulder and Dana Scully, who come to investigate the incident.	The Simpsons	18	The Springfield Files	8
20	\N	When Bart can't pay the credit card bill for his expensive new purebred dog, the repo men unwittingly take Santa's Little Helper.	The Simpsons	18	The Canine Mutiny	8
5	\N	Alarmed by a soccer riot, Homer buys a handgun. His reckless behavior drives Marge and the kids out of the house, and even his new gun club buddies desert him.	The Simpsons	18	The Cartridge Family	9
15	\N	Krusty bombs at a charity comedy event and feels like a tired old hack. With the Simpsons’ support, Krusty takes his act in a fresh new direction… but in the end, his true nature asserts itself.	The Simpsons	18	The Last Temptation of Krust	9
25	\N	Homer and Marge try to spice up their love life and are caught baring it all in public. Bart and Lisa discover an alternate ending to Casablanca.	The Simpsons	18	Natural Born Kissers	9
12	\N	Homer and his friends charter a bus to the Super Bowl, only to find that their tickets are fake. Misadventures ensue.	The Simpsons	18	Sunday, Cruddy Sunday	10
22	\N	Mayor Quimby flees Springfield, leaving the town chapter of Mensa in charge. As the group's new power goes to their heads, they take their utopian plans too far and the townspeople revolt.	The Simpsons	18	They Saved Lisa's Brain	10
9	\N	In this Christmas-themed episode, the students of Springfield Elementary are unwittingly used as a focus group to test new toys. The product of their labors, a cuddly doll named Funzo, is a lot more sinister than he appears.	The Simpsons	18	Grift of the Magi	11
19	\N	After a terrible bout with insomnia, Homer takes the family to Florida during spring break. There, they kill a beloved alligator and are sentenced to a chain gang.	The Simpsons	18	Kill the Alligator and Run	11
11	\N	Bart and Milhouse are banned from The Android Dungeon after stopping Comic Book Guy from buying a box of priceless Star Wars memorabilia for $5, but are hired as his replacements when Comic Book Guy has a heart attack and is advised to leave his job in order to make friends.	The Simpsons	18	Worst Episode Ever	12
13	\N	Lisa decides to do an essay on Professor Frink just as the scientist invents a new cryptocurrency. When this makes him the richest man in Springfield, Mr. Burns sees red and he starts plotting against Frink in order to restore his former status, while Frink learns who his real friends are.	The Simpsons	18	Frinkcoin	31
15	\N	When Homer fails to give money he promised over the phone, he is forced by PBS stars to flee the country. He becomes a missionary on a small tropical island, where he introduces the natives to casino gambling.	The Simpsons	18	Missionary: Impossible	11
3	\N	Krusty takes parenting lessons from Homer when, during an outdoor book fair, a girl tells Krusty that she is his long-lost daughter from a one-night stand with a female soldier who fought during the first Gulf War.	The Simpsons	18	Insane Clown Poppy	12
13	\N	Krusty announces his retirement due to interference from network executives and the growing popularity of the big-money game show "Me Wantee", but when Krusty reveals to Sideshow Bob that all of the episodes featuring him have been erased, Sideshow Bob uses Krusty's biggest fan (Bart) to murder him during Krusty's farewell show.	The Simpsons	18	Day of the Jackanapes	12
17	\N	When the Simpsons run out of food thanks to a bag boy strike (caused by Homer), the family finds an old box of animal crackers with a sweepstakes that sends The Simpsons to Africa.	The Simpsons	18	Simpson Safari	12
5	\N	After tricking Marge into thinking an advertising spokesman is coming to visit her, Homer takes Marge and the rest of the family to a restaurant. A hypnotist uses his powers on Homer, and makes him remember a horrific childhood incident where Homer found a dead body in a ravine. The Simpson family decides to investigate this and find out where the body came from.	The Simpsons	18	The Blunder Years	13
18	\N	Inspired by a cartoonist who speaks at the school as part of a career day assembly, Bart creates a comic book series based on Homer and his anger problems, which turns into a popular Internet cartoon series called Angry Dad. Homer finds out about this and is at first outraged, but after talking to his family, he decides to try to become a less angry person.	The Simpsons	18	I Am Furious (Yellow)	13
4	\N	Thinking Homer does not find her attractive anymore, Marge decides to get liposuction, but instead receives breast implants. She becomes adored by many of the men in Springfield, and becomes a spokesmodel for trade shows. Meanwhile, Bart and Milhouse try to imitate a stunt they saw on an episode of Batman that guest stars Krusty the Clown. When the stunt ends badly, media watchdog groups blame Krusty, forcing the clown to make his show more safety-conscious and less fun.	The Simpsons	18	Large Marge	14
14	\N	An air traffic route is redirected so that airplanes start flying directly over the Simpsons' house. The noise starts to disrupt their lives and, desperate for a solution, the family turns to their Congressman. However, he dies of a heart attack, so they ask Krusty the Clown to run for Congress so that he can help them. Krusty is successful in his campaign, but finds that his air traffic bill is ignored by the veteran Congressmen. He soon becomes disillusioned with the system, so the Simpsons, with guidance from Walter Mondale, help him out by blackmailing one of his opponents and attaching the bill to a more popular one. The bill passes, and the air traffic is re-routed.	The Simpsons	18	Mr. Spritz Goes to Washington	14
1	\N	"Reaper Madness" - Death becomes Homer and our hero must learn to reap what he sows (and pull a fast one on the almighty). "Frinkenstein" - Soon to be Nobel-prize winning Professor Frink reanimates his father for some gruesome body parts-swapping. "Stop the World, I Want to Goof Off" - A parody of Clockstoppers, starring Bart and Milhouse.	The Simpsons	18	Treehouse of Horror XIV	15
12	\N	Bart finds a friend in his own sister Lisa after Milhouse moves away to Capitol City to live with his divorced mom. Meanwhile Homer goes into panhandling to buy anniversary gifts for Marge. Later on Milhouse returns and Bart goes back being friends with him.	The Simpsons	18	Milhouse Doesn't Live Here Anymore	15
22	\N	Mr. Burns buys out Springfield's media outlets after a newspaper mistakenly reports his death, and Lisa's homemade newspaper is next on his list.	The Simpsons	18	Fraudcast News	15
10	\N	Springfield legalizes same-sex marriage to increase tourism. After becoming a minister, Homer starts to wed people to make money. Meanwhile, Marge's sister Patty comes out as a lesbian and reveals that she is going to marry a woman named Veronica.	The Simpsons	18	There's Something About Marrying	16
20	\N	Flanders rents a room to two college girls who, without his knowledge, use the spare room to broadcast live softcore pornographic web videos of themselves. Upset that no one in town told him this (and that Homer was the one who told everyone), Ned moves to the seemingly perfect town of Humbleton, Pennsylvania, while a brash coach moves into Flanders' house and begins harassing Homer the same way Homer harassed Ned.	The Simpsons	18	Home Away from Homer	16
9	\N	The Simpsons re-enact the Nativity; a World War II tale stars Grampa, Mr. Burns and Santa; a musical features "The Nutcracker Suite."	The Simpsons	18	Simpsons Christmas Stories	17
19	\N	The family attends "Stab-A-Lot: The Itchy and Scratchy Musical." The musical's director is a graduate of Springfield Elementary and Principal Skinner puts his foot in mouth when he makes sexist comments about her education and that of women in general. He tries to make the situation better, but only buries himself deeper and deeper until he is fired and replaced by Women's Educational Expert Melanie Upfoot. The first thing she does is split the school into girls and the boys. Lisa dislikes the way girls are being taught math and she ventures over to the boy's side of the school in search of a challenge. Disguising herself as Jake Boyman she starts attending the boy's school but while she finds the math problems more interesting, it is being a boy that is a greater challenge.	The Simpsons	18	Girls Just Want to Have Sums	17
6	\N	Lisa aides Moe in discovering his inner-poet and he gains swift popularity and recognition from a group of successful American authors, when Lisa helps to get his poetry published. However, Lisa is crushed, when Moe enjoys his newfound success with literary giants and fails to credit Lisa for her assistance in his poetry.	The Simpsons	18	Moe'N'a Lisa	18
16	\N	When the fireproof safe (which was bought after one too many house fires) explodes, Homer and Marge try to recreate the photos, but when one of them uncovers a scandal in the background, Homer decides to join the world of paparazzi - forgetting what happened the last time he had a job that dealt in revealing other people's flaws to the public (in "Guess Who's Coming to Criticize Dinner?")	The Simpsons	18	Homerazzi	18
7	\N	Marge starts up a new women-only gym in Springfield and Homer frets about losing her after she becomes a highly successful businesswoman. Meanwhile, Coolsville, a new comic book shop, opens up in Springfield and puts Comic Book Guy out of business.	The Simpsons	18	Husbands and Knives	19
15	\N	Lisa enrolls in a ballet class and develops an addiction to secondhand smoke after being exposed to it by her smoking ballet classmates. Meanwhile, Homer lets Bart in on his secret beef jerky manufacturing operation.	The Simpsons	18	Smoke on the Daughter	19
14	\N	A music producer selects Bart, Nelson, Milhouse and Ralph to be members of the next hit boy band, who record subliminal songs about joining the Navy.	The Simpsons	18	New Kids on the Blecch	12
18	\N	Homer's rush to the hospital to reattach his thumb, Lisa's rush to school to win the science fair, and Bart's run-in with an illegal fireworks scheme are interconnected in a parody of Go and Run Lola Run.	The Simpsons	18	Trilogy of Error	12
14	\N	When Homer gets a notice from the library that he has a book of classic tales that is years overdue, he finds it on the shelf and reads three stories: The Odyssey (where Homer and his bar buddies try to get home after fighting the Trojans), Joan of Arc (where Lisa leads the French against the English with the help of God), and Hamlet (where Bart tries to kill Moe after Moe kills Homer in order to marry Marge).	The Simpsons	18	Tales from the Public Domain	13
21	\N	While faced with community service for abusing an endangered insect, Homer begins assisting an elderly woman named Mrs. Bellamy. One night, Mrs. Bellamy is murdered, and Homer and Marge are accused of committing the crime.	The Simpsons	18	The Frying Game	13
9	\N	Marge gets mugged and becomes so traumatized that she develops Agoraphobia. She hides in the basement. Having little else to do, she decides to exercise with a weight set Homer bought from Rainier Wolfcastle's garage sale. She becomes so strong and confident that she is able to leave the basement. She continues working out and decides to start taking steroids so she can enter a bodybuilding competition. One night at Moe's Tavern she loses her temper and starts destroying the bar and fighting all of the patrons. Homer confronts Marge and says he misses the sweet woman that he married. Marge, horrified at what she has done, apologizes and decides to stop working out.	The Simpsons	18	The Strong Arms of the Ma	14
20	\N	Homer becomes obsessed with using new gadgets in his car. One day, he becomes distracted and drives off a pier, losing his driver's license. Unable to use a car, Homer starts to learn the joys of walking. Meanwhile, Marge shoulders the burden of Homer's driving duties and becomes stressed out. One day, as Homer sings about the virtues of walking, Marge accidentally runs him over with her car. Later, as Homer recuperates from the accident, he begins to suspect that Marge is trying to hurt him. They fight and go to see a marriage counselor. The counselor advises Homer to perform one completely unselfish gesture to win Marge back. Homer holds a party with all of her friends and a surprised Marge tells Homer that she loves him.	The Simpsons	18	Brake My Wife, Please	14
7	\N	Homer realizes how selfish he is after he spends all the family's Christmas money on a present for himself. He becomes the nicest guy in town, making Ned Flanders jealous.	The Simpsons	18	'Tis the Fifteenth Season	15
18	\N	After a ruined movie night, thanks to Bart and Lisa, Homer and Marge take a vacation away from them, but decide to go to Miami instead of going to see an uncle. When Bart and Lisa catch wind of their parents' secret plan, Bart steals Rod's credit card (just like Homer stole Ned's) and go after them.	The Simpsons	18	Catch 'Em If You Can	15
6	\N	Homer, Grampa, Apu and Flanders travel to Canada to buy sorely needed prescription drugs with fake Canadian health-care cards.	The Simpsons	18	Midnight Rx	16
15	\N	Through Professor Frink's future machine, Bart and Lisa see their lives in the year 2013, where Bart steals Lisa's chances at going to an Ivy League school in order to impress a skater girl named Jenda while Homer (now separated from Marge and living in an underwater apartment) fights Krusty the Clown after Marge begins dating him.	The Simpsons	18	Future-Drama	16
4	\N	Bart ends up in a coma after attempting to jump from the roof to the swimming pool at Spinster Arms Apartments, while attending a hunting party at Burns Manor, Homer panics and believes the prey is the hunting party, and after losing a Halloween costume contest to Dr Hibbert as Dracula, a real witch puts a spell on the people of Springfield.	The Simpsons	18	Treehouse of Horror XVI	17
15	\N	Homer is stoked for a party, where Lenny shows off his new plasma screen HD TV. Three days later and Homer still hasn’t left Lenny’s apartment. Lenny eventually gets him to leave and Marge enters them in a contest where they can win a plasma TV of their own. They don’t win, but 3rd place gets them a tour of the FOX studios, where Homer learns about a wife-swapping show where he can win enough money to buy his own plasma TV. Marge agrees to appear and they exchange wives with the Heathbar family. Charles Heathbar winds up falling in love with Marge (who is giving him what he needs), while his real wife Verity finds Homer detestable.	The Simpsons	18	Homer Simpson, This Is Your Wife	17
2	\N	When Bart has problems with acting out, Marge and Homer take him to a child psychiatrist, who suggests that Bart should taking up drumming. Bart turns out to be a natural with the drums and much to the chagrin of Lisa; Bart is approached by jazz musicians, who want him in their band. Meanwhile, Lisa turns to rescuing animals as a way to deal with her jealousy and depression, over not being a member of a jazz band herself.	The Simpsons	18	Jazzy and the Pussycats	18
13	\N	Eccentric documentary filmmaker Declan Desmond returns with his new film "Growing up Springfield" in which various characters in The Simpsons are interviewed. Homer and family pretend to be rich on the documentary, until Mr. Burns catches them in his summer home.	The Simpsons	18	Springfield Up	18
2	\N	After a freak accident, Homer becomes an opera singer and finds himself star of the Springfield Opera. Soon he becomes mobbed by fans and gains himself a female stalker.	The Simpsons	18	The Homer of Seville	19
11	\N	After discovering Marge's diploma, Homer recounts the story of how he gave up his dreams of being a musician so Marge could attend Springfield University. However, after she became attracted to one of her professors Homer started focusing his emotions into music and formed the first grunge band called Sadgasm.	The Simpsons	18	That '90s Show	19
2	\N	Bart lands himself in trouble when he steals a mobile phone from Denis Leary and subsequently uses it to land the actor a comical film role. The troublemaker then leads his family to the ancient ruins of Machu Picchu after Marge confiscates the device and decides to use its GPS technology to track her son.	The Simpsons	18	Lost Verizon	20
10	\N	Homer is jealous when old classmate Vance Connor is inducted into the Springfield Walk of Fame. Lenny and Carl confess they fixed the result in favor of Principal Dondelinger - leading the hapless father to speculate on how his life would have changed had he won the ballot.	The Simpsons	18	Take My Life, Please	20
9	\N	The rebel forces are on their heels when a dangerous foe joins them. A plan is hatched to take the train, but it may destroy them all.	Snowpiercer	19	The Train Demanded Blood	1
19	\N	After finding a sketchbook belonging to his late wife Maude, Ned Flanders opens a Bible-themed amusement park to honor her memory.	The Simpsons	18	I'm Goin' to Praiseland	12
9	\N	While working as a human guinea pig (to pay off the family's lost savings after making a bad investment), Homer discovers the root cause of his subnormal intelligence: a crayon that was lodged in his brain ever since he was a boy. He decides to have it removed to increase his IQ, but discovers that being smart does not necessarily equal being happy.	The Simpsons	18	HOMЯ	12
1	\N	In the twelfth Treehouse of Horror episode:\\n\\nHex and the City – While on a day trip through Ethnictown, Homer's bumbling catches the ire of a gypsy, who curses Homer's family and friends into receiving nothing but bad luck.\\n\\nHouse of Whacks – in this mixed parody of Demon Seed and 2001: A Space Odyssey, Marge buys an automated house and customizes it with the Pierce Brosnan personality, who falls for Marge and attempts to murder Homer.\\n\\nWiz Kids – In this Harry Potter parody, Bart and Lisa go to a school for wizards, and Lord Montemort (Mr. Burns) uses Bart to capture Lisa's magic.\\n\\nGuest star: Pierce Brosnan and Matthew Perry.[20]	The Simpsons	18	Treehouse of Horror XII	13
11	\N	Bart befriends Rainer Wolfcastle's daughter Greta. She has a crush on Bart, but he does not seem to realize it and eventually stops seeing her. Seeking revenge, Greta begins dating Bart's best friend Milhouse, which causes Bart to start missing her. She leaves for Toronto with her father, and Bart convinces his family to follow them there.	The Simpsons	18	The Bart Wants What It Wants	13
22	\N	Homer starts a security company with Lenny and Carl after the police are ineffective during a blackout, and eventually Mayor Quimby decides to have them replace the police. Homer finds that he excels at the job, but then he runs afoul of mob boss Fat Tony, who threatens Homer with death unless he leaves town.	The Simpsons	18	Poppa's Got a Brand New Badge	13
10	\N	Homer becomes depressed when he sees that Ned Flanders seems to be better off than him. To remedy this, he begins to pray constantly. Meanwhile, the Simpsons discover that tree roots have clogged up their plumbing. The house becomes too run down to live in, and Homer prays for a solution. Homer is injured while attending church; he sues Reverend Lovejoy and is awarded the deed to the church. He throws a huge house-warming party, in which all of the partiers drink and engage in sinful activities. It suddenly starts raining and the town begins to flood. The townspeople flee to the roof of the church. Homer tries praying again but the flood keeps rising. Reverend Lovejoy returns in a helicopter and leads everyone in prayer, asking God to forgive them, and the rain stops.	The Simpsons	18	Pray Anything	14
19	\N	The Simpson family's dog Santa's Little Helper fails to save Homer from a treehouse when it is on fire. Consequently, Homer declares him a coward and disowns him. One day, a photographer finds Santa's Little Helper playing with a Duff Beer can and takes a picture. The picture becomes popular and SLH becomes the new mascot for Duff Beer while the old mascot, Duffman, is fired. Homer earns a lot of money but SLH's original owner shows up, claiming that the dog is rightfully his. Bart fears that he will never see Santa's Little Helper again. The Simpsons conceive a plan to get Duffman rehired as Duff's mascot by showing what a coward Santa's Little Helper is. At a Duff-sponsored beach event, Homer pretends to be drowning (while floating on a keg of beer) but is attacked by a shark. The shark bites the beer keg and becomes drunk, and wins over the crowd on the beach. The shark is named the new mascot of Duff Beer and Santa's Little Helper returns to the Simpson family.	The Simpsons	18	Old Yeller-Belly	14
9	\N	Homer builds a battle robot to win Bart's respect, and places it in a tournament against other robots. What Bart does not know, though, is that the robot is actually Homer in costume. Meanwhile, Snowball II dies and Lisa tries to find a replacement cat.	The Simpsons	18	I, (Annoyed Grunt)-Bot	15
19	\N	Homer becomes "Pie Man", a masked vigilante who delivers a pie in the face of justice to evildoers. However, after attacking Mr. Burns, Burns hires him as a personal hitman, until Homer is ordered to attack the Dalai Lama.	The Simpsons	18	Simple Simpson	15
7	\N	When Marge discovers Homer has remortgaged the house to help Moe's bar, she takes over as landlady. Little does Homer know, Moe and Marge are a match made in pub heaven.	The Simpsons	18	Mommie Beerest	16
17	\N	When Bart endangers his health by bingeing on vending-machine food, the Simpsons turn their home into a hostel in order to afford sending him to a forced starvation facility.	The Simpsons	18	The Heartbroke Kid	16
6	\N	Homer becomes Springfield's safety guru and before long he's challenging Mayor Quimby for office. Until, that is, there's an embarrassing mishap with his costume.	The Simpsons	18	See Homer Run	17
16	\N	Homer spearheads the effort to get pro-football to bring a new franchise to Springfield. The football commissioner, on his way to officially award the franchise, stops at the Simpson house where Grandpa (mistaking him for a burglar) attacks him. Springfield loses out and Abe becomes the town’s pariah. After trying and failing assisted suicide, Abe decides to live his life without fear and when the town decides to reuse their football stadium as a bullfighting ring, he volunteers to be the toreador. Ever the activist, granddaughter Lisa protests his new profession.	The Simpsons	18	Million Dollar Abie	17
3	\N	After buying Homer a collection of handyman's books, Marge becomes a handywoman, but uses Homer since no one in town is thrilled over the idea of a female carpenter. Meanwhile, Bart finds out that Principal Skinner has a peanut allergy and uses a peanut on a stick to torture Skinner, but the joke is on Bart when Skinner discovers that Bart is allergic to shrimp.	The Simpsons	18	Please Homer, Don't Hammer 'Em	18
12	\N	After saving Springfield from burning down in city-wide fire, Mayor Quimby awards Bart with a driver’s license. During Bart’s travels to a nearby town, he develops a serious relationship with a teenage girl. Meanwhile, during a presentation at school, Lisa lies about her Native American heritage and when everyone believes her, the lies result in some escalating problems for her.	The Simpsons	18	Little Big Girl	18
22	\N	When Homer buys the 1,000,000th ice-cream cone at a local shop, he ends up on Kent Brockman's news program. When Brockman swears on live TV after coffee is spilled in his lap, Ned Flanders leads a crusade to clean up Springfield's airwaves, starting with getting Brockman fired. Then Homer once again saves the day.	The Simpsons	18	You Kent Always Say What You Want	18
9	\N	Homer wakes up to find himself outdoors and covered in snow, without memory of the night before. When he arrives home, he finds everyone missing. Seeking help from Moe and Professor Frink, Homer tries to piece together his memory to find out what happened to him the night before.	The Simpsons	18	Eternal Moonshine of the Simpson Mind	19
20	\N	Lisa outshines Krusty as his new assistant and steals the spotlight from him, earning her own TV show. Meanwhile, Homer and Bart spend some quality time together with their new coin collecting hobby.	The Simpsons	18	All About Lisa	19
16	\N	When Lisa becomes the target of a female bully, Lisa discovers a scientific reason as to why bullies pick on nerds. Meanwhile, Homer goes into the baby-proofing business, which is threatening the businesses of pediatricians and greeting card salesmen.	The Simpsons	18	Bye, Bye, Nerdie	12
10	\N	Homer develops a snoring problem, so Marge decides to spend a night with her sisters Patty and Selma. After a night of drinking, Marge sees a news report about her ex-prom date Artie Ziff, who is now very wealthy, and decides to send him an e-mail. Artie is still obsessed with Marge, so he offers the Simpsons $1 million in exchange for Marge spending a weekend with him.	The Simpsons	18	Half-Decent Proposal	13
2	\N	A drunken Homer appears on the show Taxicab Conversations and rants about how awful his life as a husband and father is. Although his family is at first outraged, they realise that they do somewhat burden him and decide to make up for it by sending him to a Rock 'n Roll Fantasy Camp where he mingles with rock stars, including Mick Jagger and Keith Richards. The rock stars ask Homer to help out at a concert and, expecting that he will be allowed to perform, he accepts. Actually, they want him to test the microphones; however, a humiliated Homer grabs a guitar and starts playing.	The Simpsons	18	How I Spent My Strummer Vacation	14
12	\N	Lisa competes at a spelling bee and earns the right to compete in the Spell-lympics, becoming the pride of the town. The host of the show George Plimpton, asks her to intentionally lose so that a more popular boy can win. Lisa refuses and continues to compete, but accidentally misspells a word and loses. Meanwhile, Homer tours with a group obsessed with eating Krusty Burger's latest sandwich.	The Simpsons	18	I'm Spelling as Fast as I Can	14
22	\N	Moe Szyslak becomes lonely and decides to commit suicide by jumping off a bridge. However, he inadvertently saves Maggie Simpson when she is sent flying from the Simpsons' car window and into his arms. He starts playing with Maggie and becomes attached to her, telling her the story of The Godfather. Homer and Marge become upset about how much time Moe is spending with Maggie and forbid him from seeing her again. One night, Maggie wakes up and hears Fat Tony and the Springfield Mafia outside the house and decides to follow them. When Homer and Marge find her missing, they automatically assume that Moe kidnapped her. When Moe is told that Maggie is missing, his request to help find her is granted by Homer. Maggie follows the mobsters to Luigi's restaurant, where Fat Tony's gang gets into a gun battle with a rival family. Homer, Marge and Moe track Maggie down and Moe decides to go inside and save Maggie. After Moe saves Maggie's life, Homer allows the two to spend more time together.	The Simpsons	18	Moe Baby Blues	14
10	\N	Marge writes a romance novel with characters based on Homer and Ned Flanders that becomes a hit. Meanwhile, Homer gets fired from the power plant again and becomes an ambulance driver.	The Simpsons	18	Diatribe of a Mad Housewife	15
20	\N	Homer and Marge recall the story of their first kiss at a summer camp when they were children—an event which was not all happy, as Homer (unwillingly) betrayed Marge by standing her up on their second date.	The Simpsons	18	The Way We Weren't	15
8	\N	Homer's impromptu dance at a carnival leads to a job choreographing victory dances for sports stars Tom Brady, Warren Sapp, Michelle Kwan, Yao Ming and LeBron James.	The Simpsons	18	Homer and Ned's Hail Mary Pass	16
18	\N	Lisa agrees to enter a Krusty-sponsored "Li'l Starmaker" competition and panics when another contestant (guest voice Fantasia Barrino) outperforms her.	The Simpsons	18	A Star Is Torn	16
7	\N	Marge is shunned after Homer has an altercation with the Easter Bunny at the mayor's egg hunt. A lonely Marge joins a women's group who plan to steal $1 million from Mr Burns.	The Simpsons	18	The Last of the Red Hat Mamas	17
17	\N	At the power plant a movie is shown where the workers endorse outsourcing and Mr. Burns announces that he is closing the plant and moving the work to India. Homer is the only union employee left on the payroll and he is sent to India to train the replacement workers, when he succeeds beyond expectations, he is given total control of the plant and declares himself a god. Meanwhile, Selma & Patty take Bart and Lisa to their MacGyver convention. When they discover Richard Dean Anderson doesn’t like MacGyver and much as they do, they kidnap him in retaliation. Anderson escapes only to enjoy the thrill and he turns himself back in so that he can escape again. When it happens over and over again, soon Patty and Selma are the ones who need a means of escape.	The Simpsons	18	Kiss Kiss, Bang Bangalore	17
4	\N	Three more scary tales are offered up in this 17th edition of the Treehouse of Horror.Married to the Blob: After eating mysterious green goo from a meteorite, Homer grows to massive proportions while he eats everything in sight.You Gotta Know When to Golem: Bart takes control of Golem of Jewish folklore, and forces the ancient statue to do his bidding by writing instructions on scrolls and placing them into the Golem's mouth.The Day the Earth Looked Stupid: Taking place in 1938 Springfield, the townspeople react to Orson Welles’ famous War of the Worlds radio broadcast. However, they pay no attention when Kang and Kodos actually do invade the town.	The Simpsons	18	Treehouse of Horror XVII	18
14	\N	Principal Skinner decides to allow Lisa to tutor Cletus's kids instead of them enrolling into Springfield Elementary, but they end up on Krusty's show as a Musical Act; Bart sees a psychiatrist after pretending that he's possessed by a ghost in an an attempt get free food from the cafeteria.	The Simpsons	18	Yokel Chords	18
1	\N	After Homer saves Mr. Burns' life he is rewarded with a trip in Mr. Burns' private plane. A depressed Homer realizes he will never again receive a chance to fly in a luxurious private jet and Marge hires Homer a life coach to help get him out of his rut.	The Simpsons	18	He Loves to Fly and He D'ohs	19
13	\N	Bart teams up with a new kid at school, Donny, to pull some pranks, but when the hijinks go haywire, Groundskeeper Willie tips Bart off to the fact that there might be a rat amongst his friends. Meanwhile, Homer becomes attached to a loaner vehicle while his is in the shop being repaired.	The Simpsons	18	The Debarted	19
1	\N	Bounty hunter Ned is forced to scrap his partnership with Homer when the hapless layabout skips bail, and Marge mistakenly takes a job at an erotic bakery.	The Simpsons	18	Sex, Pies and Idiot Scrapes	20
13	\N	Lisa infiltrates a convent in order to steal back Maggie who was accidentally taken in by nuns. While in the convent, Lisa uncovers a series of cryptic clues leading to a hidden jewel in Springfield. With help from resident history buffs Principal Skinner and Comic Book Guy, Lisa sets off to find the coveted prize. But Springfield's Freemasons are also hot on the trail of the jewel, and Lisa must race against them to find the jewel and rescue Maggie.	The Simpsons	18	Gone Maggie Gone	20
2	\N	At a museum exhibit of Ancient Rome, Marge and Homer get into an argument about Homer's lack of ambition. They then imagine a Roman version of what would happen if Homer was more career-driven.	The Simpsons	18	I, Carumbus	32
9	\N	A jaw injury from colliding with a new town statue turns Homer into a better listener while recuperating with his jaws wired shut, but once the wires come off, Homer does not go back to being loud and obnoxious and Marge becomes starved for thrills.	The Simpsons	18	Jaws Wired Shut	13
19	\N	Homer and Marge discover that Apu is having an affair with the Squishee delivery lady at the Kwik-E-Mart. They decide to keep Apu's wife Manjula from finding out about it. However, she eventually learns of Apu's affair by watching store security tapes. She throws Apu out of the house and decides to file for divorce, but soon realizes that she misses him.	The Simpsons	18	The Sweetest Apu	13
7	\N	Ms. Edna Krabappel begins to lose faith in her relationship with Principal Skinner and becomes depressed. Bart wants to cheer her up and decides to nominate her for the Teacher of the Year Award. Ms. Krabappel and the Simpsons are given a free trip to Epcot Center in Orlando, Florida. Skinner decides that he needs to do something to win Edna back, so he follows them there. He tries to sabotage Edna's chances of winning the award, in hopes that she will become so depressed that she will come back to him. However, he has a change of heart and proposes to her.	The Simpsons	18	Special Edna	14
17	\N	After yet another Homer and Marge fight, Homer ends up sharing a condo with two homosexuals - who don't exactly think Homer is straight.	The Simpsons	18	Three Gays of the Condo	14
5	\N	Homer is humiliated when he appears on the news running from a bear that nearly attacks him at the city dump. After Grampa scolds him, he swears to fight the bear himself.	The Simpsons	18	The Fat and the Furriest	15
15	\N	Homer and Marge's bond becomes stronger when they both get drunk on wine, but soon the bond unravels when Homer blames Marge for crashing the car and Marge gets sent to rehab. Meanwhile, Bart and Lisa complain to Randall Curtis (a George Lucas-esque science fiction movie director) about his latest film.	The Simpsons	18	Co-Dependent's Day	15
3	\N	Marge finds Nelson and acts as a mother figure towards him due to her children's loss of interest in her. Meanwhile, Lisa gets teased about her big butt, and becomes obsessed with her weight.	The Simpsons	18	Sleeping with the Enemy	16
12	\N	Selma has a severe hot flash while giving Mr. Burns his driving test. Dr. Hibbert explains that Selma is experiencing the onset of menopause. Selma, decides she wants a baby rather than grow old alone. Adoption is suggested, but the Springfield orphanage is empty. Lisa suggests adopting a baby girl from China - but when the Chinese government only allows married couples to adopt, Selma writes down Homer's name as her husband.	The Simpsons	18	Goo Goo Gai Pan	16
2	\N	After the family successfully protest against a stamp museum being built next to their house, a cemetery is built near the Simpson house instead, making the normally unflappable Lisa realize that someone as smart as her can be afraid of something.	The Simpsons	18	The Girl Who Slept Too Little	17
12	\N	Mr. Krupt is the school’s new gym teacher and introduces Bart and the kids to “BOMBARDMENT!” Bart’s attempt to get back at the new gym teacher results in the destruction of Groundskeeper Willie’s shack and the family takes him in. Lisa decides to make Willie the focus of her science fair project and tries to turn him into a “proper gentleman” with surprising results. Meanwhile, Homer has ruined his last pair of blue pants and attempts to generate interest in them so the manufacturer will start making them again.	The Simpsons	18	My Fair Laddy	17
22	\N	When Homer hears that the Isotopes are on a winning streak, he takes the family to the game. The first baseman’s game is going bad, caused by his sexy singing wife Tabitha embarrassing him during the game’s national anthem. Buck Mitchell sees Marge and Homer’s kiss on the game’s Kiss-Cam and comes to them for marital advice. They start working with the couple and Buck’s baseball career turns around, but it and the Simpson marriage goes awry again when Buck catches Homer giving Tabitha a neck massage. While Marge and Homer try keeping their marriage together they also try to get Buck and Tabitha back together.	The Simpsons	18	Marge and Homer Turn a Couple Play	17
10	\N	Homer surprises Marge with a visit to her favorite childhood vacation spot: an island called Barnacle Bay. But when the family arrives, they are shocked to discover Barnacle Bay’s tourism and economy has been decimated by the disappearance of the local delicacy, the “Yum-Yum” fish. After causing some major damage to the boardwalk, Homer is forced to join a fishing crew to work off his debt and a parody of The Perfect Storm ensues.	The Simpsons	18	The Wife Aquatic	18
20	\N	Homer unwittingly drags the family into a cornfield maze after attempting to leave a boring Harvest fest that Marge brought them to. When everyone except Homer escapes, Santa's Little Helper rescues him and becomes the town hero. So the Simpsons enroll him in Police Dog Academy where he's teamed with Lou.	The Simpsons	18	Stop! Or My Dog Will Shoot!	18
8	\N	Sideshow Bob returns, this time with his entire family, and sets in motion a complex diabolical scheme to finally kill Bart.	The Simpsons	18	Funeral for a Fiend	19
18	\N	Lisa makes a documentary of her own family for a school project, and the film is so impressive that Superintendent Chalmers and Principal Skinner push her to enter the documentary in the Sundance Film Festival.	The Simpsons	18	Any Given Sundance	19
7	\N	Lisa struggles to become the proud owner of a Mypod, and Homer believes Bart's new Middle-Eastern friend Bashir is involved in a terrorist plot to destroy the Springfield Mall.	The Simpsons	18	Mypods and Boomsticks	20
18	\N	Bart and Lisa start struggling in their academic and social lives at school and Homer starts monitoring them and forcing them to do better. Meanwhile, Marge discovers a sauna in the basement.	The Simpsons	18	Father Knows Worst	20
9	\N	Grampa is sitting on a bench waiting for his family when a thoughtful-looking man named Marshall Goldman approaches him and asks to hear about his life. Grampa tells Goldman about the time he was on a World War II battleship, which was hit by an enemy torpedo, and Goldman, a human-interest columnist, publishes it in The Springfield Shopper. Later, Grampa meets Mitch Albom and shares another story with Goldman for a follow-up article. Homer becomes jealous of Grampa's newfound fame and seeks a surrogate father. But when Homer discovers a draft of Goldman's third story, he must race to find Grampa before it is published and his life is changed forever.	The Simpsons	18	Thursdays with Abie	21
20	\N	Bart gets in trouble on Grandparents Day at school and is forced to hang out with Skinner's mother as punishment. After spending time with various grandmas in the neighborhood, he learns the benefits of hanging out with the elderly, but eventually recognizes the dangers of taking advantage of them. Meanwhile, Peekimon Get has taken over the town of Springfield.	The Simpsons	18	Looking for Mr. Goodbart	28
2	\N	Bart gets in trouble for joyriding in a police car, but feels confident he will be let off by Judge Snyder. However, Snyder goes on vacation before ruling his verdict and is replaced with a coldhearted judge named Constance Harm. She accuses Homer of being a negligent father and sentences him to be tethered to Bart. The two are against it at first but later start to bond. Marge however is unable to take anymore of it and slices the tether off of them both. Homer and Marge then go after Judge Harm only to end up sinking her houseboat. Eventually Bart decides to take punishment and is about to be sentenced to 5 year in juvenile hall, only though Judge Snyder returns and dismisses Harm.\\n\\nGuest star: Jane Kaczmarek and Jess Harnell.[21]	The Simpsons	18	The Parent Rap	13
6	\N	After Homer and Bart's model rocket damages the church, Mr. Burns makes a deal to commercialize the church in return for paying for the damages. Lisa becomes disgusted at what the church has become, so she decides to find a new religion suitable for her. She eventually converts to Buddhism, causing Marge to fear for Lisa's soul.	The Simpsons	18	She of Little Faith	13
15	\N	When Homer gets the family's telephone service cut off for refusing to pay for calls made to Rio de Janeiro, Brazil, Lisa confesses that she was the one who called Rio after sponsoring an orphan who goes missing. She convinces the family to travel to Brazil to look for him. However, once there, they have no luck finding him, and Homer is kidnapped.	The Simpsons	18	Blame It on Lisa	13
3	\N	The Simpsons buy a satellite television, which Bart spends so much time watching that he does not study for an important achievement test. He scores so low that Principal Skinner demotes him to third grade, while Lisa does so well that she is moved up to third grade. The two are placed in the same class and become rivals. During a trip to Capital City, they get separated from their class and are forced to help each other in order to find their classmates.	The Simpsons	18	Bart vs. Lisa vs. the Third Grade	14
13	\N	During the annual Jellyfish Festival, Ned Flanders realizes that he is lonely and becomes depressed. One night, he meets a beautiful woman, who asks him out on a date. He soon learns that the woman is Sara Sloan, a famous actress. Sloan is charmed by Flanders' wholesomeness, and they continue to date to the point at which she asks that he move to Hollywood. Flanders, worried that Hollywood would conflict with his conservative Christian values, refuses, so Sloan instead decides to stay in Springfield. However, their relationship does not work out, due to his insistence on marriage.	The Simpsons	18	A Star Is Born-Again	14
3	\N	In this loose parody of the musical/movie Evita, Lisa is elected Student Body president, but is unaware that the school staff is using her for their own devices and as a scapegoat if something goes wrong.	The Simpsons	18	The President Wore Pearls	15
14	\N	The Simpsons go on a late-night attic search after Bart and Lisa (who are freaked out over a horror movie Homer let them watch) begin hearing voices -- and find Marge's ex-prom date Artie Ziff, who's on the run for cheating the shareholders of his company.	The Simpsons	18	The Ziff Who Came to Dinner	15
2	\N	Marge gets her kitchen remodeled and the dishes she makes inside it get rave reviews. The suggestion of Ned Flanders leads her to enter a cooking contest. However, Marge realizes the competition is harder than it seems. Meanwhile, Bart finds Homer's vintage Playdude magazines and decides to adopt the lifestyle he sees within the articles.	The Simpsons	18	All's Fair in Oven War	16
13	\N	When Marge starts economising, Homer thinks he's being left out of the family's important financial decisions, so splashes out on an expensive camper van and sets up camp on the driveway.	The Simpsons	18	Mobile Homer	16
1	\N	After Homer gets into trouble over his football gambling debts, he allows the Springfield Mafia to shoot a "snuggle film" in the house without Marge's permission. When she and the kids return home from a trip to "Santa's Village" and find production still going on, a furious Marge leaves for the beach and encounters a marine biologist named Caleb Thorn who has dedicated his life to saving manatees.	The Simpsons	18	The Bonfire of the Manatees	17
10	\N	Mail from forty years earlier is discovered, and a letter from Homer Simpson's mother's old boyfriend states that he is Homer's true father. Homer sets out to find his supposed new father, leaving Abe behind.	The Simpsons	18	Homer's Paternity Coot	17
20	\N	Marge goes on a cleaning frenzy before the housekeeper she’s won the services of comes to the house. One spot remains and she mixes a number of toxic cleaners together to tackle the job. The noxious mixture knocks her out and she wakes up suffering from amnesia. Marge is taken home and the family tries to bring back her memory. She starts to get back memories of her children and other insignificant things, but when it comes to remembering her husband, nothing he does seems to jog her memory. When he can’t get her to remember him, he tries to win her all over again, especially after Patty and Selma get her back out on the dating scene.	The Simpsons	18	Regarding Margie	17
7	\N	After Homer is fired from the power plant, he buys an ice-cream truck and sells ice-cream. His successful business yields an abundance of discarded popsicle sticks and Marge finds another calling in life, as she uses the leftover sticks to create popular life-size statues of various citizens from Springfield.	The Simpsons	18	Ice Cream of Margie (With the Light Blue Hair)	18
17	\N	Marge becomes a spectacle during a PTA meeting for not having an e-mail address, and she decides to take a chance on using the Internet. Amazed and delighted by all the Internet has to offer, Marge decides to join a popular role-playing fantasy game named "Earthland Realms." To Marge's dismay, the game has her interacting with practically the whole town of Springfield, including Bart, who happens to be the game's most feared and destructive player. Meanwhile, Homer saves Lisa's soccer game from cancellation after he volunteers to take the place of a referee who recently quit. However, Homer's refereeing skills only exasperate Lisa, and her competitive streak gets the best of her.	The Simpsons	18	Marge Gamer	18
5	\N	The 18th installment of the Treehouse of Horror series. Mr. and Mrs. Simpson A parody of the 2005 film Mr. and Mrs. Smith, featuring Marge and Homer as the title characters. E.T. Go Home Bart and Lisa help Kodos return to his home planet, but Kodos uses their assistance to secretly plan something sinister. Heck House Flanders decides to scare Bart, Lisa, and their friends straight after they go too far with their pranks.	The Simpsons	18	Treehouse of Horror XVIII	19
14	\N	Marge hires an investigative television show to follow Homer around after she suspects him of cheating on his diet. Meanwhile, one of Bart and Lisa's pranks on Martin Prince goes wrong and they become burdened with guilt after assuming they are responsible for Martin's accidental death.	The Simpsons	18	Dial 'N' for Nerder	19
4	\N	Springfield is the setting for parodies of Charlie Brown, It's the Great Pumpkin and Michael Bay's Transformers as Homer's vote on election day is misread by a renegade machine.	The Simpsons	18	Treehouse of Horror XIX	20
3	\N	Moe becomes depressed and decides to return to bartending school so he can re-evaluate himself. He meets an old teacher, who suggests that Moe try improving his bar, which might make him happier. Moe takes the advice, and turns his bar into a trendy nightclub, which does not sit well with his regular customers Homer, Lenny, Carl, and Barney.	The Simpsons	18	Homer the Moe	13
7	\N	A social worker is assigned to make the Simpson family functional after they get arrested for fighting while playing Monopoly. He helps them learn how to work together and function as a family. The moment is ruined when, Ginger and Amber, the barmaids who married Homer and Flanders while they were drunk in "Viva Ned Flanders", arrive at the Simpsons' home, which outrages Marge.	The Simpsons	18	Brawl in the Family	13
16	\N	Homer is prescribed medicinal marijuana after getting pecked in the eyes by a murder of crows. While his family and friends worry about the drug altering his personality, Homer becomes Mr. Burns's vice president after cracking up at Burns's antiquated jokes.	The Simpsons	18	Weekend at Burnsie's	13
5	\N	The Simpson family has to find temporary residence while their house is fumigated for termites. When they run out of options, they decide to become contestants on a reality show where families live in the manner that people did in 1895. The family is initially miserable, but slowly adapt to their new life, which causes the show to lose ratings. The producers decide to try to boost viewers by dumping the house in a river and forcing the family to survive in the wilderness. However, the Simpsons find a bunch of rejects from other reality shows and they attack the producers.	The Simpsons	18	Helter Shelter	14
15	\N	Homer decides to try for a promotion at Springfield Nuclear Power Plant and suggests several ideas to Mr. Burns, all of which are rejected. One night, Homer overhears Burns admit that the plant's real owner is a canary to protect Burns from responsibility for any wrongdoing by the power plant. Homer releases the bird and tells Burns that nuclear inspectors have arrived for a surprise inspection. Burns, desperate to find a scapegoat, names Homer the new owner. As his first act, Homer fires Burns and takes control of the Plant. However, he finds that his work life as a CEO is conflicting with his family life. Homer decides to return to his old job and gives ownership back to Burns.	The Simpsons	18	C.E. D'oh	14
2	\N	Homer's mother returns, and after being cleared of all charges, is re-imprisoned on a technicality.	The Simpsons	18	My Mother the Carjacker	15
11	\N	When the local library proves to be useless for the kids' class project, Marge tells Milhouse, Bart, and Lisa three Simpsons-style historical accounts: Henry VIII's (Homer's) attempts at siring a son, Lewis and Clark (Lenny and Carl) exploring the USA's wilderness with Sacagawea (Lisa), and Salieri (Lisa again) out to ruin piano-playing virtuoso Mozart (Bart).	The Simpsons	18	Margical History Tour	15
21	\N	After receiving an injection from Dr. Hibbert, Bart becomes temporarily deaf, which makes him impervious to being bullied, until he accidentally moons the American flag during a donkey basketball game, prompting everyone in town to accuse the Simpsons of being unpatriotic under the new "Government Knows Best" Act.	The Simpsons	18	Bart-Mangled Banner	15
9	\N	Bart fakes his own kidnapping to get out of being punished for going to a rap concert, but the ruse goes too far when Milhouse's father is implicated as the kidnapper and Chief Wiggum sees this as an opportunity to make a name for himself as a competent police officer.	The Simpsons	18	Pranksta Rap	16
19	\N	Homer sees a movie about the end of the world and fears the same thing will happen in real life after seeing a chain of random occurrences (celebrities ["stars"] falling from the sky, raining blood, a man in a realistic devil costume) and doing a complicated math equation that predicts the end will come on May 18th, but when the end does not come, Homer discovers a flaw in the equation and ends up in Heaven where he meets God and learns that God is planning The Rapture.	The Simpsons	18	Thank God It's Doomsday	16
8	\N	Homer brings the whole family along when he is sent to Italy to pick up a new sports car for Mr. Burns, when they find themselves in a small town that Sideshow Bob has become the mayor of.	The Simpsons	18	The Italian Bob	17
18	\N	As the family waits for their food at “The Frying Dutchman,” they pass the time by telling stories. Lisa tells about the Mayflower’s journey to America, where Marge and her kids are Pilgrims and they are joined by a knave named Homer who joins their family to escape the authorities. Bart recounts the story of Mutiny on the Bounty featuring Skinner as Captain Bligh and Bart as Mr. Christian. Homer tells the tale of the maiden voyage of a cruise ship in the 1970s featuring of a ship that can’t flip over, which of course it does and the attempts of the survivors to get out of the ship alive.	The Simpsons	18	The Wettest Stories Ever Told	17
5	\N	Bart pre-enlists in the Army and when Homer goes to the Recruitment Center to clear up the mess, he is tricked into enlisting in the Army himself. Upon completion of basic training, Homer is assigned to lead some troops against a disgruntled Army Colonel in a war games simulation.	The Simpsons	18	G.I. (Annoyed Grunt)	18
15	\N	When Homer accidentally declares bankruptcy, Grandpa ends up leaving the Springfield Retirement Castle and falls in love with Selma; Bart and Lisa con a delivery man out of cardboard boxes.	The Simpsons	18	Rome-Old and Juli-Eh	18
3	\N	Homer starts working in the towing business, but gets into some trouble when the town sets up Homer to look like he is towing on a rival's turf after he becomes greedy with power. Meanwhile, Marge signs up for a counseling program that teaches parents how to raise young children to become independent, but the program works a little too well on Maggie.	The Simpsons	18	Midnight Towboy	19
10	\N	In an effort to raise money with a bond issue Mayor Quimby moves up election day, making Springfield's primary election the first in the nation causing the media, candidates and political pundits to descend in the city.	The Simpsons	18	E. Pluribus Wiggum	19
19	\N	After Mona, Homer's mother, passes away unexpectedly, Homer feels guilty for not getting the chance to tell her how much he really loved her.	The Simpsons	18	Mona Leaves-a	19
9	\N	Lisa lets her imagination run wild when she makes a new friend and they create a magical kingdom together called Equalia, complete with characters and plotlines. But they find themselves facing a nightmare when the boundaries between reality and fantasy are blurred. With the voice of Emily Blunt.	The Simpsons	18	Lisa the Drama Queen	20
19	\N	When Marge learns Springfield Elementary is the worst school in the state, she and Homer rent an apartment in the upscale Waverly Hills school district so Bart and Lisa can attend a better school. Meanwhile, Homer moves into the rented Waverly Hills apartment and gets used to the bachelor lifestyle.	The Simpsons	18	Waverly Hills, 9-0-2-1-D'oh	20
5	\N	Homer is tempted by a British femme fatale while Marge and the kids are on a seaside vacation.	The Simpsons	18	The 7 Beer Itch	32
4	\N	Homer becomes a fortune cookie writer for a Chinatown restaurant. Mr. Burns reads one of Homer's fortunes, which says that the reader will find love before Flag Day is over. Burns goes searching for love and meets Gloria, a meter maid, and asks her out. Gloria reluctantly agrees, and Burns recruits Homer to help him look young and hip to his new girlfriend.	The Simpsons	18	A Hunka Hunka Burns in Love	13
8	\N	Springfield is officially declared the World's Fattest Town after an attempt to break a world record lands everyone on top of a truck scale. Out of embarrassment and disgust, Marge goes on a crusade against the local sugar corporation. However, when sugar is banned, Homer, Bart, Mr. Burns and Apu start bootlegging sugar.	The Simpsons	18	Sweets and Sour Marge	13
17	\N	In this clip show episode, Homer is honored at a Friars' Club Roast. A number of characters show up to roast him, but the celebrating is interrupted by Kang and Kodos, who say that humanity will be judged based on Homer's experiences.	The Simpsons	18	Gump Roast	13
6	\N	The Simpson family win a free spa weekend, and Homer is nearly killed when a mysterious figure locks him in a sauna. Chief Wiggum decides to hire someone who can think like a murderer in order to find one. Bart's mortal enemy Sideshow Bob is sent to live with the Simpsons so he can help find Homer's attempted killer. Bob and Homer track down the attempted murderer and discover that it is Frank Grimes, Jr., the son of a man that Homer drove to insanity (in the season eight episode "Homer's Enemy"). After Grimes is arrested, Bob tries to kill Bart, but he finds that he has "grown accustomed to [his] face" and cannot harm him.	The Simpsons	18	The Great Louse Detective	14
16	\N	A snobby British filmmaker named Declan Desmond begins making a documentary about student life at Springfield Elementary School. When introduced to Lisa, he tells her that she has too many goals and suggests that she pick one career. Lisa focuses on astronomy, but cannot watch the stars because of light pollution. She convinces Mayor Quimby to decrease the light's intensity during the night, which only results in an increase in the crime rate. Quimby bows to public pressure and switches the lights back on permanently. Lisa overloads the generators at the Power Plant, causing a power outage, and is able to watch a meteor shower undisturbed by light.	The Simpsons	18	'Scuse Me While I Miss the Sky	14
4	\N	After making over $3000 from his own museum featuring a $1000 bill, Bart takes the family to London (on the suggestion of Grampa), where Homer is arrested for treason after crashing into the Queen.	The Simpsons	18	The Regina Monologues	15
13	\N	When Maggie does better than Lisa on an IQ test, Lisa becomes upset over no longer being the smart one and tries to lead Maggie astray.	The Simpsons	18	Smart and Smarter	15
1	\N	Ned Flanders' head injury gives him the power to predict others' deaths, Bart and Lisa play detective when a string of Victorian-era prostitutes are murdered by Jack the Ripper, and the Simpsons go on a fantastic voyage inside Mr. Burns' body to save Maggie.	The Simpsons	18	Treehouse of Horror XV	16
11	\N	Lisa does what every little sister has dreamed of - she gets a restraining order put on her big brother. Bart is forced to live in the back garden, but soon realises the joy of communing with nature.	The Simpsons	18	On a Clear Day I Can't See My Sister	16
21	\N	Bart gets expelled from school and transfers to a Catholic school, where a hip priest named Father Sean tries to convert Bart and Homer to Catholicism, which worries Marge when she believes that Catholics do not go to the same heaven as Protestants and discovers that Catholic women do not use birth control.	The Simpsons	18	The Father, the Son and the Holy Guest Star	16
11	\N	After Bart steals a key from Principal Skinner's office and gets himself into hot water, Marge and Homer send him to a behavior modification camp.	The Simpsons	18	We're on the Road to D'ohwhere	17
21	\N	Working through their checklists of things to do before summer ends, Lisa gets the family to go a museum. At the Springfield Museum of Natural History there is an exhibit Lisa is excited to see on Women’s History turns into an exhibit on the history of weapons, which excites Homer and Bart. When Flanders sees the exhibit of evolution and another that mocks creationism, he raises an alarm. Reverend Lovejoy gets Skinner to have creationism taught in school. Lisa is the only one who holds onto the scientific theory. She brings the topic up at the town meeting and the town votes to teach only one theory, creationism. Lisa decides to hold her own class on evolution, until she is arrested. The ACLU gives her a lawyer who is up against a slick Southern lawyer, but ultimately it’s a family member that is a key to her defense.	The Simpsons	18	The Monkey Suit	17
8	\N	After being forced to attend Nelson’s birthday party, Bart becomes best friends with the schoolyard bully. Meanwhile, Homer develops a big interest with one of Lisa’s fantasy books.	The Simpsons	18	The Haw-Hawed Couple	18
18	\N	Bart becomes a hometown hero when he makes the game-winning catch at his Little League game, sending the Springfield Isotots to the championship for the very first time. Meanwhile, Homer runs into some luck, when a customer misunderstands Homer's excuses for a sales pitch after falling asleep in a department store's display bed. The impressed store owner hires Homer as a salesman.	The Simpsons	18	The Boys of Bummer	18
4	\N	During a bank robbery, Marge convinces Dwight, the bank robber, to turn himself in with the assurance that she will visit him once in jail. Marge never makes good on her promise and things get interesting when Dwight escapes from jail and comes looking for Marge.	The Simpsons	18	I Don't Wanna Know Why the Caged Bird Sings	19
17	\N	Bart joins the 4-H club and falls in love with a cow named Lou, but when he finds out that Lou is destined for the slaughterhouse Bart gives the cow to Mary, a fellow 4-H member, and her father mistakes the cow for a dowry. Homer and Marge come to the rescue to try and free Bart from his marriage agreement.	The Simpsons	18	Apocalypse Cow	19
6	\N	Lisa learns she is good at crossword puzzles and enters a city-wide contest. Homer discovers he has a flair for letting loved ones down so he opens Sweet Conclusions Break-Up Service, but lands himself in trouble with his daughter when he places a bet against her in the competition.	The Simpsons	18	Homer and Lisa Exchange Cross Words	20
16	\N	Moe once again searches for love and falls for a woman named Maya over the Internet. However, when Moe meets Maya face-to-face, he discovers it's more like face-to-knee, as Maya is only three feet tall.	The Simpsons	18	Eeny Teeny Maya, Moe	20
5	\N	Marge and a group called the "Charity Chicks" pose for a calendar in hopes of raising money for charity, but Marge becomes the talk of the town thanks to her racy poses. Meanwhile, Carl is chosen as the newest supervisor at the nuclear power plant, and hires Homer to be his personal assistant.	The Simpsons	18	The Devil Wears Nada	21
8	\N	As future Lisa writes her college application essay for Harvard, she recalls past disappointing birthdays that helped shape her.	The Simpsons	18	Mr. Lisa's Opus	29
12	\N	While running away from a vicious dog, Bart meets Buck McCoy, a former Western film star. Bart begins hanging out with him and starts to idolize him. Bart wants to help McCoy stage a comeback, so he convinces all of the kids in town to become interested in the Wild West. McCoy appears on the Krusty the Clown Show, but the comeback flops when Buck begins drinking again and injures Krusty the Clown.	The Simpsons	18	The Lastest Gun in the West	13
20	\N	Lisa tries to fit in with two college students by lying about her age. She finds that the college atmosphere is perfect for her, but her lie is soon discovered and she is shunned by her fellow elementary school students. Meanwhile, Bart is diagnosed with a weakened immune system after getting bitten by a Chinese mosquito and must live in a plastic, germ-free bubble.	The Simpsons	18	Little Girl in the Big Ten	13
8	\N	Homer disappoints Lisa on her birthday when he gives her a thoughtless present. He realizes that he knows little about her and decides to hire private detective Dexter Colt to spy on her. Colt compiles a report, the information from which helps Homer bond with his daughter. However, Colt soon demands to be paid $1000, which Homer refuses. In retaliation, Colt vandalises an animal research lab and steals all the animals, leaving behind several clues that implicate Lisa. Homer and Lisa go on the run as fugitives and end up at a circus, where they meet Colt. He tries to kill Homer, but Lisa saves him. Later, Colt is arrested and Lisa exonerated. She finally receives the present she wanted from Homer.	The Simpsons	18	The Dad Who Knew Too Little	14
18	\N	When challenged to think up a new Christmas carol, Homer instead writes a song about how much he hates Ned Flanders. The song becomes such a hit that the Simpsons become sick of hearing it and take a trip to a dude ranch. Lisa develops affections for a local boy named Luke but becomes jealous when he hears him talking to a girl named Clara on the telephone. One night, she meets Clara and gives her the wrong directions, leading her to become lost. After Lisa discovers that Clara is actually Luke's sister, she rushes to find her. She saves Clara, and decides to tell Luke what happened, but he is offended and dumps her. Meanwhile, Bart and Homer decide to help a tribe of Native Americans who want a beaver dam removed so they can reclaim their land.	The Simpsons	18	Dude, Where's My Ranch?	14
6	\N	Krusty discovers that he never had a bar mitzvah as a child. He quits his show to have it as an adult, with the help of his father, Rabbi Krustofski. Meanwhile, Homer hosts a late-night talk show a la "Politically Incorrect with Bill Maher" as a replacement for Krusty's show.	The Simpsons	18	Today I Am a Clown	15
16	\N	Bart gets sent to juvenile hall after fooling everyone that there was a marriage concerning him. He encounters a dangerous girl there... He flees with Gina, but then the two are caught by Wiggum.	The Simpsons	18	The Wandering Juvie	15
4	\N	Marge meets up with a former high-school pal who is now a famous news anchor, and she wonders if she made the right life choice.	The Simpsons	18	She Used to Be My Girl	16
14	\N	After Shelbyville accuses Springfield of being hicks, Marge convinces the townspeople to fund a Frank Gehry-designed concert hall, which is then converted to a prison when the concert hall goes bankrupt on opening night. Meanwhile, Bart and Lisa investigate Snowball II's recent weight gain.	The Simpsons	18	The Seven-Beer Snitch	16
3	\N	Never one to miss the opportunity to make a quick buck, Homer cashes in on Maggie's bout of chicken pox. He decides to host a Pox Party and charges parents to infect their children.	The Simpsons	18	Milhouse of Sand and Fog	17
13	\N	The family is on a nature walk through “Carl’s Dad Caverns,” when Homer tries to get a piece from a stalactite. This results in the family falling through the cave floor and winds up with Homer getting stuck in the ceiling of one of the lower chambers of the cave. Marge, Bart and Maggie go off to find help, while Lisa stays behind and tells her father a story to pass the time. Her story involves running from a bighorn sheep and into Mr. Burn’s mansion. The pair evades the tenacious sheep by finding refuge in the mansion’s attic, where Mr. Burns tells her the story of how he came to work at Moe’s Tavern by losing a scavenger hunt with a rich Texan. While there he learned (and tells to Lisa) the tale of the Moe’s treasure. The stories within stories culminate in the fate of the treasure being determined in the cave.	The Simpsons	18	The Seemingly Never-Ending Story	17
1	\N	At school, Lisa befriends a boy named Michael, who happens to be the son of mob boss, Fat Tony. Fat Tony is put out of commission by a rival family, and Homer and Bart get involved with the mob, when Michael, who is nothing like his father, is not interested in the “family business.”	The Simpsons	18	The Mook, the Chef, the Wife and Her Homer	18
11	\N	In an effort to stop Homer from taking revenge on the Rich Texan for cutting him off on the highway, Marge, Lisa and Bart offer up three cautionary tales of revenge. The Count of Monte Fatso: A parody of the book and film The Count of Monte Cristo, in which Homer is cast as the Count. Revenge of the Geeks: Using a futuristic device called the “Get-back-inator,” Milhouse takes revenge on the Springfield Elementary bullies. Bartman Begins: A parody of the Batman origin story, in which Bart is cast in the title role.	The Simpsons	18	Revenge is a Dish Best Served Three Times	18
21	\N	When finding out Jimbo, Dolph, and Kearney plan on sabotaging Springfield Elementary School's annual bake sale by releasing the "ultimate stinkbomb" (a rotten yogurt cup from Springfield's Nuclear Power Plant), Bart and Lisa enlist the help of Jack Bauer and Chloe O'Brian. Meanwhile, Marge attempts to make the perfect cake, so she can win the bake sale.	The Simpsons	18	24 Minutes	18
12	\N	After being stranded in a Tunnel of Love ride at a carnival, Homer, Marge and Bart pass the time by sharing some of the greatest love stories of all time.	The Simpsons	18	Love, Springfieldian Style	19
3	\N	An irreverent take on the Prince and the Pauper. Bart enthusiastically trades lives with a wealthy lookalike after landing himself in trouble for triggering a rampage of vacuum cleaners, but finds the lavish lifestyle too much when he becomes the target of all his new friends' pranks.	The Simpsons	18	Double, Double, Boy in Trouble	20
11	\N	Bart gets a perfect score on a practice test for a national achievement test, which not only rattles Lisa, but it means Bart gets to attend a special party instead of having to take the actual test. Meanwhile, Homer must avoid injuring himself for an entire afternoon after failing to pay his insurance.	The Simpsons	18	How the Test Was Won	20
21	\N	When nearby Ogdenville’s economy crumbles due to tainted barley discovered in Krusty’s veggie burgers, the unemployed workers of Ogdenville flock to Springfield. After Mayor Quimby closes Springfield’s borders and enlists private citizens to help patrol them, Homer organizes a border patrol group.	The Simpsons	18	Coming to Homerica	20
6	\N	Grampa Simpson is accused of a crime; Kent Brockman questions his career.	The Simpsons	18	Podcast News	32
13	\N	Grampa falls in love with Zelda, a woman who has an interest in men who can drive. He decides to get his driver's license back, but is ignorant to Homer and Marge's concerns that she is only using him for his car.	The Simpsons	18	The Old Man and the Key	13
1	\N	The 13th Treehouse of Horror episode, consisting of three self-contained segments.\\n\\nSend in the Clones – Homer buys a hammock that can produce clones of himself. He creates numerous clones to help him around the house, but they soon overrun Springfield.\\n\\nThe Fright to Creep and Scare Harms – Lisa petitions the town to get rid of their firearms after discovering the gravestone of a young man named William Bonney who died from gun violence. However, Lisa soon discovers that William Bonney is the real name of Western outlaw Billy the Kid, whose ghost, along with the ghosts of other infamous criminals, takes over the defenseless town.\\n\\nThe Island of Dr. Hibbert – Dr. Hibbert invites the citizens of Springfield to his island resort, where he turns them into animals.	The Simpsons	18	Treehouse of Horror XIII	14
11	\N	Bart learns that he was once a child actor in commercials and that all the money earned was spent by Homer. In retaliation, Bart petitions the court to have himself legally emancipated from his parents and moves out of the Simpson house. Bart is initially miserable in his new apartment, but discovers that skateboarder Tony Hawk lives on one of the floors above. He and Hawk become friends, and Bart is content with his new life. Homer apologizes to Bart and requests that he return home. Bart accepts the apology, but tells his family that he is going on tour with Hawk. At an event, Homer speaks to Bart and finally promises Bart that he will never treat him badly again.	The Simpsons	18	Barting Over	14
21	\N	After destroying Flanders' shrine to The Beatles, Bart and Milhouse are punished by being put in community groups. Bart joins the Pre-Teen Braves along with Ralph Wiggum, Nelson Muntz and Database. Led by Marge, they start engaging in community activities. However, they soon become rivals with The Cavalry Kids, led by Milhouse. The two groups try to outdo each other and become involved in a contest to sell the most candy. The Cavalry Kids win the prize of singing the national anthem at a baseball game. However, the Pre-Teen Braves pretend to be The Cavalry Kids and sing their own version of the national anthem. As the crowd becomes enraged, the real Cavalry Kids arrive and a massive stadium-wide brawl erupts. Marge becomes upset, and the fighting ends when an image of her crying is shown on the JumboTron.	The Simpsons	18	The Bart of War	14
8	\N	When a group of singles, seniors, childless couples, teens and gays band together to protest having to accommodate families (including paying property taxes used to teach children they do not have) after a riot at a children's concert, Marge takes up the cause for the families, with some help from Bart and Lisa.	The Simpsons	18	Marge vs. Singles, Seniors, Childless Couples and Teens, and Gays	15
17	\N	After hearing that Skinner is getting cold feet about their wedding, Edna leaves Skinner at the altar and, after sending back one marriage gift, hooks up with Comic Book Guy. Meanwhile, Homer and Marge have an argument about if their marriage is still solid or not.	The Simpsons	18	My Big Fat Geek Wedding	15
5	\N	When Bart writes slogans on T-shirts, he catches the attention of Goose Gladwell, a gag-gift entrepreneur, and soon becomes a T-shirt mogul; Homer feels he no longer has a place in the family when Bart becomes the breadwinner.	The Simpsons	18	Fat Man and Little Boy	16
16	\N	The Simpsons' roof springs a leak when the perfect storm hits Springfield. And when Marge asks what type of father can't keep a roof over his family's head, Homer tries to fix things up, but falls through the roof. Sick of being unwanted, Homer befriends a man who works as a roofer. However, no one else can see him and Homer's insistence that the roofer does exist prompts everyone to think he has gone crazy.	The Simpsons	18	Don't Fear the Roofer	16
5	\N	When Bart decides to spend a bit of time with Marge, it's not long before he's buying tea sets and singing duets. Has he turned into a mummy's boy?	The Simpsons	18	Marge's Son Poisoning	17
14	\N	The family is at a church fund-raiser, where Homer tries to ensure his rubber duck onto victory, but Flanders wins the big prize, which he doesn’t want and gives it to Marge. In return Marge agrees to watch Rod and Todd while Ned is attending a left-handed convention. While Marge is spending all her time with the Rod and Todd and trying to let them learn how to be boys; Homer takes Bart and Lisa to a home for former celebrity animals and a monkey kidnaps Bart. Marge’s ability to be a mother comes into question when Ned discovers what she is doing with his boys and the local news covers Bart’s current predicament.	The Simpsons	18	Bart Has Two Mommies	17
9	\N	At Christmas time, Marge opens up her home to the jobless Gil. But problems arise when Gil overstays his welcome and Marge can’t bring herself to kick Gil out of the house.	The Simpsons	18	Kill Gil, Volumes I & II	18
19	\N	Maggie goes on a path of destruction in the Simpsons home after Marge follows advice in a parenting magazine and throws away her pacifier. Marge finally gives in and sends Homer to get Maggie a new pacifier, but when he cant find the right brand, Maggie comes up with her own substitute an especially squeaky dog toy. Homer cant sleep through the toys incessant squeaking and is driven to take sleeping pills, which turn him into a sleepwalker with a penchant for mischief. When one of Homers sleepwalking schemes leaves the entire Springfield Fire Department debilitated in the hospital, Homer and some of his fellow Springfieldians become volunteer firefighters. They extinguish several fires and are rewarded with gifts, but when the gifts stop coming, they seek other forms of compensation for their heroic acts.	The Simpsons	18	Crook and Ladder	18
6	\N	After Milhouse's parents are lost at sea and assumed dead, he is forced to toughen up. His new confidence and personality help him become cooler than Bart. Meanwhile, Homer gets into trouble with Marge, when he can't remember her eye color.	The Simpsons	18	Little Orphan Millie	19
16	\N	When Mayor Quimby realizes the city of Springfield has gone broke, Lisa goes through the town's financial records and discovers millions in uncollected city taxes; Marge reluctantly allows a fugitive to stay with the family.	The Simpsons	18	Papa Don't Leech	19
5	\N	Homer and Marge remember the ups and downs of their marriage through a series of flashbacks, including the time they each began flirting with guests at a glamorous party - a situation that led to a food fight and an unexpected swim in the pool.	The Simpsons	18	Dangerous Curves	20
15	\N	After Marge and Homer's marriage turns out to be invalid, they decide to re-do their vows. But when Homer goes missing, Bart and Lisa smell something funny and investigate his disappearance.	The Simpsons	18	Wedding for Disaster	20
16	\N	Homer and Marge follow Moe after the bar closes early and discover him and his father fighting. The Simpsons, after finding out that Moe has been excommunicated from his family for years, attempt to bring them back together.	The Simpsons	18	King Leer	29
8	\N	Mr Burns wins a professional basketball team in a poker game at the annual billionaire's retreat. He decides to build a state-of-the-art facility in an attempt to lure fans, but the stadium site is on the last remaining bee colony in Springfield - prompting Lisa to lead a protest.	The Simpsons	18	The Burns and the Bees	20
17	\N	Bart falls in love with a charitable girl named Jenny, prompting Bart to behave in order to date her. Meanwhile, Lisa becomes depressed when she writes a report on Springfield's future.	The Simpsons	18	The Good, the Sad and the Drugly	20
2	\N	The fourth grade students of Springfield Elementary School decide to spike Ms. Krabappel's coffee in order to teach her a lesson after she takes away their cell phones. She is fired by Principal Skinner, who hires a new teacher named Zachary Vaughn. Although Vaughn is a hip young teacher who impresses the students, Bart is plagued by guilt and tries to get Ms. Krabappel hired back.	The Simpsons	18	Bart Gets a 'Z'	21
10	\N	Krusty grudgingly adds a pretty, singing cohost named Princess Penelope to his show in order to attract more female viewers. Girls love her, and ratings improve, but Bart and Milhouse want to get the show back to the way it was. The situation gets more complicated when Krusty and Penelope fall in love and decide to get married. Meanwhile, Homer, Lenny, and Carl consider working at a competing nuclear plant when Mr. Burns cuts off their daily doughnut service.	The Simpsons	18	Once Upon a Time in Springfield	21
20	\N	A bomb squad mistakenly blows up Homer's unattended gym bag, releasing radiation into the city and authorities react by suspending civil liberties. Wiggum and his men install surveillance cameras around Springfield and round up suspected terrorists, including groundskeeper Willie, but when monitoring the nonstop flow of video imagery proves to be too much, Wiggum enlists concerned citizens to help keep the city safe. Meanwhile, Lisa becomes fed up with being blonde, so she dyes her hair a dark color.	The Simpsons	18	To Surveil with Love	21
10	\N	Marge reconnects with a close group of mothers she used to be friends with; Bart tries to break up their group when his playdates stop being fun.	The Simpsons	18	Moms I'd Like to Forget	22
20	\N	After Homer discovers a genius talent for styling hair and opens his own salon, he becomes Springfield’s most in-demand hair stylist. But having to listen to women’s problems and gossip all day long leads Homer to believe his gift may actually be a curse. Meanwhile, when Milhouse decides to live each day to the fullest, he comes out of his shell and professes his love for Lisa, only to have his heart broken. Milhouse then catches the eye of popular fifth-grader Taffy, causing Lisa to make a bold move.	The Simpsons	18	Homer Scissorhands	22
8	\N	Krusty the Clown becomes depressed after getting fired from his television show for being unpopular with children. The Simpson family encourages him to make a comeback, suggesting that he seek help from an agent they met earlier at a television museum. This agent turns out to be Annie Dubinsky, who was Krusty's first agent and former girlfriend.	The Simpsons	18	The Ten-Per-Cent Solution	23
18	\N	When Bart supervises Jimbo's girlfriend at a movie, she develops a crush on him; Homer is persuaded to buy a state-of-the-art treadmill with a television, and he becomes obsessed with watching it from the treadmill, but not actually working out.	The Simpsons	18	Beware My Cheating Bart	23
6	\N	Homer wins a MyPad at the school auction and Steve Mobbs, who is now in heaven, talks to Homer through it. Homer goes into a funk when he breaks the myPad, until Ned Flanders discovers a miracle tree in the Simpsons' back garden.	The Simpsons	18	A Tree Grows in Springfield	24
16	\N	Springfield's Easter is ruined by a prank and all fingers point to Bart. It is up to Lisa to save her brother, in a student court presided over by Attorney General Janet Reno. Meanwhile, inspired by an old comic book, Mr. Burns becomes an ineffectual superhero—fruit bat man.	The Simpsons	18	Dark Knight Court	24
6	\N	Lisa discovers her new best friend is a Republican who is opposing her in the class election.	The Simpsons	18	The Kid Is All Right	25
14	\N	When Retirement Castle is closed, Marge asks Grampa and two other octogenarians to move in; Nelson befriends Bart after Bart defends him.	The Simpsons	18	The Winter of His Content	25
3	\N	Marge opens a sandwich franchise store after her sandwiches become a huge hit at Springfield Elementary. But running day-to-day at the store proves challenging, especially when the same franchise opens another location across the street.	The Simpsons	18	Super Franchise Me	26
12	\N	When inventor Elon Musk lands in Springfield, he and Homer become fast friends and revolutionize the town's nuclear plant. But when Musk goes overboard and Mr. Burns wants him removed, Homer must figure out a way to break up with him.	The Simpsons	18	The Musk Who Fell to Earth	26
20	\N	The Simpsons learn about Grampa’s days in the Air Force, and Bart takes up smoking to impress Milhouse’s Dutch cousin, Annika.	The Simpsons	18	Let's Go Fly a Coot	26
7	\N	When Homer loses $5,000 at a poker game with Broadway legend Laney Fontaine, the only way he is able to settle the bet is if he loans Lisa to Laney for a month. Then, Laney turns Lisa into a show biz kid and Marge and Homer fear they made a mistake letting her go. So they head to New York to get her back.	The Simpsons	18	Lisa with an 'S'	27
16	\N	Not feeling unique, Lisa signs up for the Mars One Space Colony – to Marge’s dismay. Then, Marge hires Bart to go through the tryout process with Lisa to make her want to quit.	The Simpsons	18	The Marge-ian Chronicles	27
4	\N	Better late than never, The Hunger Games come to Springfield!	The Simpsons	18	Treehouse of Horror XXVII	28
12	\N	Mr. Burns tries to relive his glory days and crosses paths with a mysterious music mogul. After being conned by him and reduced to bankruptcy, Mr. Burns seeks revenge on the Music Producer with the help of Homer, Bart, rapper Jazzy James and the mogul's ex-wife, Praline. Also, Lisa is courted by the richest kid in town, Smithers begins a perilous journey and Marge opens an obscure boutique store.	The Simpsons	18	The Great Phatsby Part 1	28
22	\N		The Simpsons	18	Dogtown	28
14	\N	Everybody is now horrified of clowns after Bart's prank using clown masks, which also causes  Krusty to lose his job. He attempts a comeback as a dramatic actor in the play "The Salesman's Bad Day", with Llewellyn Sinclair as his director.	The Simpsons	18	Fears of a Clown	29
19	\N	Homer gets Flanders a job at the plant, and he soon learns that no good deed goes unpunished when Flanders starts to insist on carpools and demands more from Homer's work performance. Meanwhile, Marge feels as though their marriage has lost its spark.	The Simpsons	18	Left Behind	29
2	\N	Marge and Homer's marriage is tested when they travel to a tropical island to compete for a million dollars on Marge's favorite reality competition show.	The Simpsons	18	Heartbreak Hotel	30
14	\N	The Simpsons travel to Ireland so that Grampa can have a final drink at O'Flanagan's Pub - an old watering hole of his. But when the small town of Dunkilderry isn't quite what Grampa remembers it as, and O'Flanagans has become a rundown and empty pub, he and Homer decide to buy it and fix it up.	The Simpsons	18	In the Name of the Grandfather	20
1	\N	Homer gets the lead in a movie about a superhero who can take on the powers of every superhero in any comic book he touches. To whip Homer into superhero shape, the studio hires a celebrity fitness trainer.	The Simpsons	18	Homer the Whopper	21
4	\N	Dial "M" for Murder or Press "#" to Return to Main Menu- Lisa is forced into a Hitchcockian murder scheme by Bart.\\n\\nDon't Have a Cow, Mankind- Springfield is once again overrun by zombies, thanks to Krusty Burger's latest sandwich.\\n\\nThere's No Business Like Moe Business- In a Sweeney Todd spoof, Moe bleeds Homer dry to create the perfect microbrewed great beer.	The Simpsons	18	Treehouse of Horror XX	21
14	\N	When Bart fails to turn in his homework, Mrs. Krabappel sends a letter home about Bart's behaviour. Despite Bart's best efforts to intercept it, Homer reads the letter, and he and Marge visit Principal Skinner for a parent-teacher conference. Furious, Homer punishes him, but Marge takes a more sympathetic approach. When Bart realizes he can pit Homer and Marge against each other to his benefit, his scheming reaches new heights.	The Simpsons	18	Postcards from the Wedge	21
1	\N	Marge sends Lisa to a performing arts camp, where counselors and fellow campers inspire her to embrace her creative side; upon returning to Springfield, Lisa grows restless with her boring suburban lifestyle.	The Simpsons	18	Elementary School Musical	22
11	\N	When Smithers transforms Moe's pub into a refined and trendy lounge, the establishment becomes Springfield's local gay hangout; Principal Skinner falls for the new, free-spirited music teacher (Kristen Wiig).	The Simpsons	18	Flaming Moe	22
21	\N	When the Simpsons discover a collection of keys to every door in Springfield, Lisa stumbles upon an eerie hidden classroom beneath Springfield Elementary School. When she shares her discovery with Principal Skinner, the secret room mysteriously disappears and he takes the only key away. A determined Lisa uses her detective skills to lead her back to the room to solve an old school mystery.	The Simpsons	18	500 Keys	22
9	\N	In this futuristic holiday episode, Bart is a deadbeat dad living in Springfield Elementary (which is now an apartment complex instead of a school) with Principal Skinner as his landlord. Meanwhile, a pregnant Maggie goes into labor during a family dinner.	The Simpsons	18	Holidays of Future Passed	23
21	\N	When word gets out that Edna and Ned have secretly wed, Marge offers to throw them a party, but bringing folks together makes them all realize that no marriage is perfect. Meanwhile, Edna tries to help Ned's children become more socially acceptable. Watch the credits... there's a treat!	The Simpsons	18	Ned 'n' Edna's Blend	23
9	\N	Homer joins the "Springfield Preppers," an off-the-grid survivalist group whose leader has set up a top-secret retreat outside of town to prepare for the end of the world.	The Simpsons	18	Homer Goes to Prep School	24
19	\N	Moe is flying high after venture capitalists take a shine to his homemade whiskey, while Grampa, after injuring himself babysitting Bart, decides he'd rather be looked after by his grandson than be at the nursing home. Also, Lisa voices her displeasure at a hologram of music legend Bleeding Gums Murphy, and Sonny Rollins (as himself) shows up to ask her to stop all that jazz about boycotting a record label.	The Simpsons	18	Whiskey Business	24
3	\N	Kent Brockman has decided that local news has been a real mistake and a terrible career move for him.	The Simpsons	18	Four Regrettings and a Funeral	25
9	\N	Homer becomes annoyed with movie theaters, so Bart teaches him how to download movies illegally. Homer is delighted with his discovery of free movies until he's caught for piracy. Deputy Director Gratman, the FBI's anti-piracy boss, is tasked with hunting down Homer, who stands accused of illegally downloading a film.	The Simpsons	18	Steal This Episode	25
15	\N	After Lisa's new pet guinea pig destroys the Simpsons' living room art, Marge finds a beautiful painting at the Van Houten's yard sale, which Homer snaps up for 20 bucks	The Simpsons	18	The War of Art	25
1	\N	A Springfield resident dies, Krusty retires after he's offended by a comedy cable channel roast of him, and Lisa tries to protect Homer from getting hurt.	The Simpsons	18	Clown in the Dumps	26
15	\N	Homer is put in charge of keeping Princess Kemi out of trouble while her father, a Nigerian king, works out a uranium deal with Mr. Burns.	The Simpsons	18	The Princess Guide	26
22	\N	When a modernized Springfield Elementary has a technical meltdown, Lisa transforms it into a Waldorf school. Meanwhile, Groundskeeper Willie becomes the coach of the mathletes.	The Simpsons	18	Mathlete's Feat	26
5	\N	In the annual fright fest Halloween episode, Sideshow Bob finally kills Bart, only to reanimate him; Homer wakes up with short-term memory loss; and Lisa, Bart, and Milhouse get super powers from radiation.	The Simpsons	18	Treehouse of Horror XXVI	27
14	\N	After Bart accidentally sends a sweet homeless woman's cart into the river, he allows her to live in his closet for a small fee. When Lisa discovers that the woman is an incredible folk singer, she offers her own closet and plans a concert, only to be disappointed by Hettie's surprising substance abuse and violent nature. Meanwhile Homer tries to prove he's handy, but accidentally traps the cat in the walls of the house.	The Simpsons	18	Gal of Constant Sorrow	27
21	\N	After butchering a speech in front of all of his friends at work, Homer turns to improv comedy to gain back his confidence in his public speaking skills.  Meanwhile, Marge decides to rebuild Bart’s lackluster treehouse, but tensions rise when Bart questions her building skills. Also, in the episode’s last three minutes, Homer  appears LIVE for the first time on television (both for East and West Coast broadcasts) to answer fan questions.	The Simpsons	18	Simprovised	27
9	\N	A workplace accident leaves Homer in a cast, and in a position to sue Mr. Burns. This leaves Marge unfulfilled, so she turns to an unexpected source for romance. Meanwhile, Lisa is made "Bus Monitor" and tries to keep the peace.	The Simpsons	18	The Last Traction Hero	28
18	\N	Marge turns to a series of parenting experts for advice when she becomes worried that Bart is destined for failure; Homer decides to open a trophy store; Grampa gives Bart a watch coveted by Homer.	The Simpsons	18	A Father's Watch	28
6	\N	Frustrated with the local government, Marge decides to run for Mayor. To win public support, she begins making Homer the butt of her jokes.	The Simpsons	18	The Old Blue Mayor She Ain't What She Used To Be	29
7	\N	Bart becomes a voice-over actor; Comic Book Guy is humiliated at Comic-Con; Lisa is set up for a fall.	The Simpsons	18	Three Dreams Denied	32
20	\N	Marge and Lisa visit the nail salon where they engage in a spirited debate as to whether a woman can be smart, powerful and beautiful all at the same time and spin four tales of famous women featuring famous Springfield faces: Selma as Queen Elizabeth I, Lisa as Snow White, Marge as Lady Macbeth and Maggie as Howard Roark, the idealistic architect protagonist from Ayn Rand’s The Fountainhead.	The Simpsons	18	Four Great Women and a Manicure	20
6	\N	Principal Skinner is getting fed up with Bart's pranks, so he informs Bart that he is not the best prankster after all. A former student named Andy Hamilton is hailed as the best prankster, and Bart sets out on a mission to track Andy down. However, when Bart finds out that Andy is a 19-year-old still in his pranking days, they become fast friends.	The Simpsons	18	Pranks and Greens	21
16	\N	The Simpsons family vacation in Israel with Ned Flanders, but Homer does not appreciate any of the culture—until an Israeli tour guide named Jakob shows him around and, in a severe state of dehydration, Homer believes he is the Messiah.	The Simpsons	18	The Greatest Story Ever D'ohed	21
3	\N	Lisa starts coaching Bart's Little League team; Marge and Bart spend the day at an amusement park, where former MLB manager Mike Scioscia gives Bart advice.	The Simpsons	18	MoneyBART	22
12	\N	When Homer insists Bart must earn the new dirt bike he wants, Bart comes up with a scheme; James Lipton interviews a TV cast.	The Simpsons	18	Homer the Father	22
22	\N	Feeling guilty for getting Mrs. Krabappel suspended after one of his school pranks, Bart helps her escape detention, and Ned Flanders winds up saving her life in the process.\\n\\nWhen Edna and Ned start dating, he is surprised to learn she's been with many of Springfield's men, including Homer and Aerosmith drummer Joey Kramer.	The Simpsons	18	The Ned-Liest Catch	22
11	\N	Lisa creates her own social networking service, SpringFace, and subsequently makes everyone addicted to the internet. Meanwhile, Patty and Selma challenge the Winklevoss twins at the 2012 Summer Olympics.	The Simpsons	18	The D'oh-cial Network	23
20	\N	Homer embarrasses Marge at the movies during a film featuring superspy Stradivarius Cain, and his apologies fall on deaf ears. In an effort to become a better husband, he seeks help from someone he believes to be the real Stradivarius Cain.	The Simpsons	18	The Spy Who Learned Me	23
8	\N	Grampa has to move into the Simpsons house following a fire at the retirement home, and on moving day, Homer 'throws his back out' and 'rests' at home. He later finds an advert for a video game, Villageville on his myPad, and starts playing. During that time, Homer loses Santa's Little Helper. When the family find him, Homer doesn't seem to care because he's "not a dog person". Grampa later tells the rest of the family the story of Homer's childhood companion, pet dog Bongo.	The Simpsons	18	To Cur, with Love	24
18	\N	Homer is recruited to be a deacon by the cutting-edge new pastor. The dry cleaner mistakenly switches Marge's wedding dress for one of Krusty's costumes.	The Simpsons	18	Pulpit Friction	24
4	\N	Marge encourages Homer to cross an item off an old to-do list by inviting an old pen pal to visit; Lisa institutes an honor code at school.	The Simpsons	18	YOLO	25
10	\N	When Comic Book Guy meets a woman writing an autobiographical manga, he seeks Homer's advice on dating.	The Simpsons	18	Married to the Blob	25
20	\N	Homer wakes up in a Springfield where everyone and everything is made out of Legos, and he must figure his way out before he gets stuck in the plastic world forever.	The Simpsons	18	Brick Like Me	25
6	\N	The Planet Express crew come to present-day Springfield to prevent the Simpsons from destroying the future.	The Simpsons	18	Simpsorama	26
16	\N	Chief Wiggum is mistakenly delivered a military jet pack, which he gleefully accepts and uses in order to fight crime. But when the jet pack crashes into the church, the congregation, led by Marge, must resort to gambling and counting cards in order to collect money to repair the church.	The Simpsons	18	Sky Police	26
10	\N	After a photo Marge posts on social media gets Homer fired, he returns to the best job he ever had, a dishwasher at a Greek restaurant. This same post inspires Lisa to code an app that predicts the real-life consequences of anything you post online, only to create sentient artificial intelligence.	The Simpsons	18	The Girl Code	27
18	\N	After getting into an argument, Marge takes Lisa on a touristy trip to Capital City, where, after attending a musical, they meet the show’s star who reminds Lisa how lucky she is to have such a great mom. Meanwhile, Bart is frustrated that everyone expects his pranks, so he teams up with Maggie to trick people.	The Simpsons	18	How Lisa Got Her Marge Back	27
6	\N	Homer gets roped into coaching the kids' lacrosse team with Milhouse's dad, Kirk, who is in desperate need of a friend. When Kirk gets too clingy, Homer vents about how much of a loser he is. Kirk overhears his rant and disappears, right when the team needs him most: the championship game.	The Simpsons	18	There Will Be Buds	28
19	\N	Disappointed in Yale, Mr. Burns decides to start his own for-profit university and Homer is hired as a professor	The Simpsons	18	The Caper Chase	28
7	\N	Homer and the guys try helping Moe cheer up by getting their old bowling team back together again, but they soon face a team of arrogant millionaires.	The Simpsons	18	Singin' in the Lane	29
17	\N	When the Simpsons' flight to Gainesville gets re-routed to New Orleans, Lisa is forced to face her failures, and regain her confidence as a jazz musician. Meanwhile, Bart is intrigued by the voodoo in Louisiana, and Homer is intrigued by the drinking.	The Simpsons	18	Lisa Gets the Blues	29
5	\N	A self-driving car company comes to Springfield, poaching all of the power plant employees with their fun work environment.	The Simpsons	18	Baby You Can't Drive My Car	30
6	\N	On a mission to play hardcore pranks, Bart, Nelson and Milhouse get Moe a mail-order bride on the Dark Web.	The Simpsons	18	From Russia Without Love	30
14	\N	Krusty reveals the untold story of his past in his movie "The Sands of Space". While working as personal assistants on the movie, Bart and Lisa learn about the early years of their parents' relationship.	The Simpsons	18	The Clown Stays in the Picture	30
16	\N	When a romantic night ends in injury, Marge recovers by taking up kite boarding while Homer bonds with his hallucinated hernia; Lisa attempts to fix her parents' strained relationship by seeking advice from an unlikely source.	The Simpsons	18	I Want You (She's So Heavy)	30
23	\N	Marge starts a business selling healing crystals to the naive mothers of Springfield when Homer’s work cuts children’s health-care benefits, leading Marge to use the crystals as a cheaper solution for Bart’s ADD.	The Simpsons	18	Crystal Blue-Haired Persuasion	30
12	\N	When the adjustable rate on the Simpson couple's mortgage resets at more than the pair can afford, they must sell their house. Good Samaritan Ned Flanders buys the house and rents it out to them at an affordable rate. But Homer pushes his luck too far when he takes advantage of Ned's generous landlord duties.	The Simpsons	18	No Loan Again, Naturally	20
12	\N	Homer takes Marge out for a romantic evening of ice skating and hand-holding, but upon entering the rink, they encounter a curling team practising. Marge and Homer take to the ice and discover their love for the sport, and soon after, join the curling team and compete with them in the Olympic trials. Team Springfield claims the win and moves on to the 2010 Vancouver Games where Bob Costas covers the action. Meanwhile, sleazy vendors introduce Lisa to the world of collecting Olympic pins, and before long, Lisa is hopelessly addicted.	The Simpsons	18	Boy Meets Curl	21
21	\N	As Mother's Day approaches, Moe narrates an episode in which he writes a letter to Homer, Apu and Reverend Lovejoy, who are vacationing with their children, and threatens to run away with one of their wives. While the trio tries to determine whose wife Moe is referring to, Homer, Lovejoy and Apu flashback to the intimate moments they initially ignored between Moe and Marge, Manjula and Helen Lovejoy. But when the boys return from their trip, they're in for the surprise of their lives.	The Simpsons	18	Moe Letter Blues	21
6	\N	After learning that he is suffering from multiple illnesses and has only a few weeks to live, Mr. Burns becomes distraught by the town’s less-than-sensitive reaction to his announcement.\\n\\nFollowing an unexpected turn of events, Bart finds Mr. Burns weak and vulnerable in the wilderness and secretly takes him into the Simpsons’ home.\\n\\nBut when Homer and Marge learn about their new houseguest, they decide it’s payback time, and Lisa, determined to stand up for Mr. Burns, learns that old habits die hard.	The Simpsons	18	The Fool Monty	22
16	\N	The town is abuzz when Cheech and Chong announce a Springfield stop on their much-anticipated reunion tour. But when Cheech and Chong take the stage in front of their loyal fans, the jokes were just not the same for Chong, so Homer steps in and delivers all the punchlines by heart. Impressed, Cheech invites Homer to go on tour with him as new duo “Cheech and Chunk” while Chong forms a more progressive comedic team, “Teach and Chong,” with Principal Skinner. \\n\\nWhile Homer is on tour, Marge attempts to help the neighborhood cat lady and change her hoarder ways, but turns into a hoarder herself in the process, and Homer realizes that life on the road is not all high times and slapstick humor	The Simpsons	18	A Midsummer's Nice Dream	22
4	\N	Bart’s science fair project, a mechanical baby seal, outshines Lisa’s brainy asteroid model and quickly becomes a popular pet among the retirement home patrons. Meanwhile, Homer’s new and eager assistant Roz, steals Homer’s job, forcing him to team up with Flanders to reveal her true colors and evil past.	The Simpsons	18	Replaceable You	23
14	\N	The Simpsons are evicted from Springfield and join an off-the-grid community outside of town.\\n\\nBut when Homer and Marge try to sneak back into Springfield, they are welcomed with hostility from their former friends and neighbors and begin to appreciate their new and more accepting home.	The Simpsons	18	At Long Last Leave	23
2	\N	A black hole threatens to swallow Springfield, Homer tries to find the source of paranormal activity, and a "Back to the Future" parody in which Bart keeps Marge from marrying Homer.	The Simpsons	18	Treehouse of Horror XXIII	24
12	\N	Bart's dream girl, Mary Spuckler, comes to town, but his failure to pay her enough attention is having a negative impact on their relationship. Meanwhile, Homer once again runs afoul of Marge and lands in the doghouse.	The Simpsons	18	Love Is a Many-Splintered Thing	24
22	\N	When Marge tries to buy Homer snack cakes for their anniversary, she winds up meeting a married man who shares a common love of British Television. Ignorant of all, Homer attempts to secretly construct a romantic anniversary train in the Simpsons back yard.	The Simpsons	18	Dangers on a Train	24
11	\N	When Marge tries Homer's new high-tech glasses on, he learns she's seeing a marriage counselor; Bart refuses to buy Nelson a Valentine's Day card.	The Simpsons	18	Specs and the City	25
21	\N	Marge swears off befriending any more couples when Homer offends their charming new British neighbors, but when Lisa declares that she, too, doesn’t need friends, Marge reconsiders.	The Simpsons	18	Pay Pal	25
7	\N	Bart schemes to bring down his new teacher, Mr. Lassen, who is a terrible bully. Meanwhile, The Simpsons go to Burning Man.	The Simpsons	18	Blazed and Confused	26
17	\N	When Duffman (guest voice Stacy Keach) undergoes hip replacement surgery and retires, the company sets up a reality show competition to find his replacement. Homer wins the competition, and because the job requires him to stay sober, he learns that beer isn't as necessary as he thought to have a good time.	The Simpsons	18	Waiting For Duffman	26
2	\N	Scotty Boom, a Chew Network super-chef, challenges Homer to a smoke-off. But when someone steals Homer’s secret weapon – a smoker he bought off a mysterious man at a BBQ shack – Lisa and Bart are on the case.	The Simpsons	18	Cue Detective	27
13	\N	Lonely Professor Frink uses science to turn himself into a man whom women find attractive. Then,  overwhelmed by the attention, he invents an algorithm to perfectly pair the lonely men and women of Springfield, realizing that scientific exploration is his true love. Meanwhile, Marge, Bart, and Lisa visit Grampa for Valentine's Day and try to rescue the old folks from a drug-induced hallucination that allows them to relive their happiest memories.	The Simpsons	18	Love is in the N2-O2-Ar-CO2-Ne-He-CH4	27
20	\N	"The Simpsons are going to..." Paris (well, Homer and Marge are), but in order to be able to afford the trip, Homer has to smuggle an exotic snake into France so it can be made into a gourmet meal.	The Simpsons	18	To Courier with Love	27
8	\N	Homer finds a new app that makes his life much easier and outsources his father-son bonding. Meanwhile, Grampa finds that he is about to be a father again.	The Simpsons	18	Dad Behavior	28
16	\N	Bart and Lisa return home from Kamp Krustier early, interrupting Homer and Marge's romantic encounters; Bart and Lisa confront a source of trauma.	The Simpsons	18	Kamp Krustier	28
4	\N	Maggie becomes possessed by an ancient demon, Lisa discovers a creepy/perfect version of her family in an alternate universe and Homer cannibalizes himself.	The Simpsons	18	Treehouse of Horror XXVIII	29
11	\N	Mr. Burns will build a doomsday ark after he believes that the end of the world is near when he sees an old Orson Welles show about Nostradamus. Meanwhile, Professor Frink comes up with a new way of testing everyone in Springfield after Burns wants a test to determine who should go on a spaceship with him.	The Simpsons	18	Frink Gets Testy	29
21	\N	Bart falls into a coma after being struck by lightening.	The Simpsons	18	Flanders' Ladder	29
3	\N	The men and boys in Springfield become obsessed with Ultimate Punch Kick and Choke Championships, a violent sport where fighters inflict severe pain on each other. When Marge and her friends stage a protest against the sport, the show's promoter embraces the controversy and challenges Marge to a match, promising to shut down the competition if she wins. She begins to train with rhythmic gymnastics, but her family step in and get her professional martial arts help to give her a real chance at winning.	The Simpsons	18	The Great Wife Hope	21
11	\N	Homer blows off Marge to buy a lottery ticket and winds up winning the million-dollar jackpot. Fearing how Marge will react if she finds out the reason Homer missed their date, Homer keeps his newly inherited fortune a secret and spoils his family with “anonymous” gifts. When Bart finds out, he and Homer spend the money like it’s going out of style, including buying front-row to tickets to see Coldplay in concert.	The Simpsons	18	Million Dollar Maybe	21
22	\N	Bart becomes convinced that his new neighbor, Walt, is his archenemy, Sideshow Bob, disguised and back for revenge. But when Marge tries to convince Bart otherwise by taking him to visit the state penitentiary, a disturbing truth is revealed.	The Simpsons	18	The Bob Next Door	21
7	\N	Bart helps nurse an injured pigeon back to health. After Santa's Little Helper eats the bird, Bart has a hard time coping with the loss. Worried that Bart needs some help getting over the loss, Marge and Homer take him to a therapy session with Dr. Thurston, who advises that the only cure for Bart’s blues is to give away the family dog, but when the Simpsons visit the pup’s new home, a shock causes them to rethink their decision.	The Simpsons	18	How Munched is that Birdie in the Window?	22
17	\N	The tables are turned for Homer and Bart after a therapist cures Homer of his violent tendencies toward the boy.	The Simpsons	18	Love Is a Many Strangled Thing	22
7	\N	The Simpsons host a tastemaker party at their home to promote Absolut Krusty, Krusty the Clown's own brand of liquor. Mr. Burns takes notice of the party's success and decides to promote Homer to "Account Man" for the Springfield Nuclear Plant.	The Simpsons	18	The Man in the Blue Flannel Pants	23
17	\N	Mr. Burns replaces all of Springfield Power Plant's employees with robots (guest voice Brent Spiner) but decides to keep Homer as the sole human worker. With unemployment at an all-time high and mechanical arms operating the workplace, Springfield becomes a dismal and humorless place. But when Homer's machine-programmed peers start to turn on the community and his former real-life employees come to the rescue, they all realize that robots can't replace human friends.	The Simpsons	18	Them, Robot	23
5	\N	Homer is shocked to discover that his bowling teammate is an accountant for Fat Tony and his mob. When Fat Tony gets jury duty, he appoints Dan as the temporary don of the mafia. Meanwhile, Lisa adds insects to her vegetarian diet after she passes out in the middle of a saxophone solo, but starts questioning her decision when bugs start pleading for mercy in her dreams.	The Simpsons	18	Penny-Wiseguys	24
14	\N	Homer's obsession with the TV show "Storage Battles" leads the family to discover Grampa's past identity as "Gorgeous Godfrey," the most feared, villainous man in pro-wrestling history	The Simpsons	18	Gorgeous Grampa	24
2	\N		The Simpsons	18	Treehouse of Horror XXIV	25
8	\N	Springfield is inundated with holiday revelers after the nuclear power plant springs a radiation leak, causing snow to fall all over town. When the tourists drive up Christmas shopping prices, Marge opens up the Simpsons' house to boarders.	The Simpsons	18	White Christmas Blues	25
16	\N	Homer is recruited as a World Cup referee after Lisa extols his integrity on the youth soccer field in a Springfield Elementary speech contest. But when the Simpsons travel to Brazil (again), Homer finds his honesty tested by one of South America's slickest gangsters in the soccer match-bribing business.	The Simpsons	18	You Don't Have to Live Like a Referee	25
13	\N	When Lisa learns Springfield's anthem was stolen from another town she writes a replacement. Meanwhile, Homer learns the meaning of "Wide Pride".	The Simpsons	18	Walking Big & Tall	26
8	\N	Lisa sets out to restore the tarnished reputation of Springfield’s first female inventor. To find her invention, she scours an abandoned asylum and a restaurant that caters to men. Bart joins Lisa at the asylum, stealing one of the homicidal patient’s notebooks, and bragging to the boys at school that he wrote the entries himself. This revelation causes Homer and Marge to believe he is a sociopath, which Bart decides to use to his advantage until things go too far.	The Simpsons	18	Paths of Glory	27
15	\N	After performing CPR on a tased raccoon, Lisa discovers her calling to be veterinarian and becomes an intern at the local office, but learns a tough lesson when her neglected class hamster dies. Meanwhile, Marge moonlights as a crime scene cleaner for a little extra money, and the trauma of the gory scenes make her increasingly dead inside.	The Simpsons	18	Lisa the Veterinarian	27
3	\N	After Homer catches Bart rooting for Springfield’s football rival, the Boston Americans, he plans a family “hate-cation” trip to Boston in an attempt to show Bart that Boston is a terrible city.	The Simpsons	18	The Town	28
17	\N	Bart goes from delinquent with detention to the star basketball player at Springfield Elementary. Lisa covers Bart’s success for the school paper, and Homer becomes the team’s coach. Things go awry when Bart gets involved with the mafia	The Simpsons	18	22 for 30	28
5	\N	Grampa gets a hearing aid and finally hears what everyone has been saying about him. Meanwhile, Mr. Skinner discovers that his mother has kept the ultimate secret from him.	The Simpsons	18	Grampy Can Ya Hear Me	29
10	\N	When the Simpsons go to a STEM conference, Lisa falls for a crooning jazz pianist named Brendan. Meanwhile, Bart discovers that he has an affinity for chemistry	The Simpsons	18	Haw-Haw Land	29
20	\N	The Simpsons go to Denmark so Grampa can benefit from its free health-care system.	The Simpsons	18	Throw Grampa from the Dane	29
8	\N	Homer finds his calling as a TV recapper, but his harsh grading causes a brawl with Krusty. After almost killing Homer, Krusty hides out at a real circus, and finds happiness there.	The Simpsons	18	Krusty the Clown	30
9	\N	Lisa and Homer's bond gets stronger when they start spending real quality time together, and Bart feels neglected. So Marge tries to help Homer balance his attention between the kids.	The Simpsons	18	Daddicus Finch	30
18	\N	Krusty releases an all-female reboot of “Itchy and Scratchy,” so Bart and his crew of all-male friends decide to boycott the show. After Bart’s friends turn on him for laughing at the reboot, Bart joins a woke group of sixth-grade girls who commit crimes against patriarchy.	The Simpsons	18	Bart vs Itchy & Scratchy	30
8	\N	One snowy day in Springfield, Lisa informs Bart that she and Maggie share a bond that Bart will never understand because he doesn't have a brother, so Bart asks Homer for a baby brother. When Homer denies Bart's request, Bart makes his way to the Springfield Orphanage to find what he thinks he's missing.	The Simpsons	18	Oh Brother, Where Bart Thou?	21
17	\N	When the police are called to diffuse a rowdy crowd at Mr. Burns' estate, one of the officers recognizes priceless stolen paintings on the walls, and the maniacal billionaire is taken downtown for questioning. With Mr. Burns gone, Smithers takes charge of the power plant. But when employees take advantage of his good nature, he exacts revenge by forcing the employees to work night and day. These unfair working conditions prompt Homer and his crew to devise a plan to bust out Mr. Burns.	The Simpsons	18	American History X-cellent	21
5	\N	Discovering that Marge was once a stellar A+ student whose grades plummeted after being distracted, Lisa fears that she will end up just like her mom unless she pledges to focus solely on academics in an encore episode. When Marge makes a secret deal allowing Lisa to attend her dream school, Lisa learns a lesson in family and altruism. Meanwhile, Bart puts Nelson Muntz in his place and unintentionally claims the title of "School Bully"	The Simpsons	18	Lisa Simpson, This Isn't Your Life	22
14	\N	Bart and Homer make a film based on Bart's comic book character Angry Dad. The cartoon becomes a critical favorite and begins to win a number of awards, but Bart becomes upset when Homer takes all of the credit during acceptance speeches.	The Simpsons	18	Angry Dad: The Movie	22
2	\N	Superintendent Chalmers reveals his hero as former President Theodore Roosevelt, who makes an appearance in the episode with the use of archival recordings.	The Simpsons	18	Bart Stops to Smell the Roosevelts	23
10	\N	Homer lands his own political talk show and becomes the spokesperson for the Gravy Movement. He then is asked to select the next Republican nominee for President and officially endorses right-wing rock star Ted Nugent.	The Simpsons	18	Politically Inept, with Homer Simpson	23
19	\N	When Bart gets his wish for a family vacation, he becomes determined to make it last forever.	The Simpsons	18	A Totally Fun Thing That Bart Will Never Do Again	23
7	\N	A "cool family" from Portland moves in next door to the Simpsons. Homer is desperate to befriend them, while Marge is skeptical, thinking that being cool is not all it's cracked up to be.	The Simpsons	18	The Day the Earth Stood Cool	24
17	\N	Homer's behavior once again lands him in hot water with Marge and he needs to fathom a way to save his marriage, while a dose of "A Streetcar Named Desire" drives Milhouse to affect a Marlon Brando-esque bad-boy demeanor in an effort to impress Lisa.	The Simpsons	18	What Animated Women Want	24
12	\N	A recent transfer student named Diggs (Daniel Radcliffe) rescues Bart from a confrontation with bullies.	The Simpsons	18	Diggs	25
2	\N	When Bart disrespects Homer's authority, Homer makes a point to try his hand at parenting. This proves fruitless, so Marge signs them up for the Relation Ship, where they'll resolve their conflicts at sea. Meanwhile, Marge is in charge of Homer's fantasy football league, but manages to win despite being the underdog.	The Simpsons	18	The Wreck of the Relationship	26
9	\N	After Moe convinces Homer to stay out drinking on Christmas Eve, Marge tells Homer not to come home. This leads to Homer's sad trek through lonely Springfield, where he learns that the only place where one should truly get drunk on Christmas is home.	The Simpsons	18	I Won't Be Home for Christmas	26
19	\N	When Homer gets an old film roll developed, the family takes a trip down memory lane to see the origins of how Bart and Lisa first started fighting with each other.	The Simpsons	18	The Kids are All Fight	26
1	\N	Homer is diagnosed with narcolepsy, but instead of returning home with his prescription medication, he returns home drunk. He and Marge visit a marriage counselor and have a trial separation, during which Homer begins dating a 20-something.	The Simpsons	18	Every Man's Dream	27
9	\N	Bart’s coming of age story a la “Boyhood” chronicles his life from six years old to his time as an accomplished young man. Along the way, his tense relationship with Homer, an overly uncaring version of himself, and Lisa, who overshadows him in every way possible, shape Bart more than he realizes.	The Simpsons	18	Barthood	27
19	\N	Homer recalls a tense family vacation to the Grand Canyon with the Flanders family. At first, the Flanders’ perfection puts the families at odds, but when they get stranded and Ned and Bart go for help, the families finally bond.	The Simpsons	18	Fland Canyon	27
7	\N	When the Retirement Castle and the V.A. Hospital can’t solve Grampa’s health issues, the Simpsons decide to take a family trip to Cuba to get him cheap medical care.	The Simpsons	18	Havana Wild Weekend	28
13	\N	Mr. Burns tries to relive his glory days and crosses paths with a mysterious music mogul. After being conned by him and reduced to bankruptcy, Mr. Burns seeks revenge on the Music Producer with the help of Homer, Bart, rapper Jazzy James and the mogul's ex-wife, Praline. Also, Lisa is courted by the richest kid in town, Smithers begins a perilous journey and Marge opens an obscure boutique store.	The Simpsons	18	The Great Phatsby Part 2	28
21	\N		The Simpsons	18	Moho House	28
13	\N	Homer and Marge recount the story of their transition from loving their life without kids to being miserable parents.	The Simpsons	18	3 Scenes Plus A Tag From A Marriage	29
4	\N	Homer wins an oyster-eating contest against the mythical Cthulhu, Springfield is overrun by plant body-snatchers, Lisa finally snaps and Mr. Burns opens a retirement home with some Jurassic upgrades.	The Simpsons	18	Treehouse of Horror XXIX	30
10	\N	After a failed Black Friday shopping spree, Marge is determined to fix Christmas; Homer and the kids surprise Marge with a vacation to a Florida resort.	The Simpsons	18	'Tis the 30th Season	30
15	\N	Comic Book Guy sues Homer for joyriding in his car. Meanwhile, Guillermo del Toro saves Mr. Burns from his troubles with the law.	The Simpsons	18	101 Mitigations	30
20	\N	Marge becomes director of Springfield's local theater, armed with Lisa's script resembling "Hamilton"; Homer joins a baby class with Maggie, and he takes a liking to supervisor Chloe.	The Simpsons	18	I'm Just a Girl Who Can't Say D'oh	30
7	\N	The Simpsons join other Springfield families on the Van Houten's annual trip to Costa Rica, which they obviously can't afford. While there, Homer befriends Patty's new girlfriend, Evelyn, and Lisa tracks down the real reason the Van Houtens can go on this trip every year	The Simpsons	18	Livin La Pura Vida	31
4	\N	The 666th episode of the Simpsons parodies the Omen and Stranger Things, not to mention a little Crazy Rich Aliens.	The Simpsons	18	Treehouse of Horror XXX	31
7	\N	Lisa befriends three teenaged Wiccans after getting lost in the woods during a game of hide-and-seek, and must clear her new friends' names when they are accused of cursing the townspeople with their supposed witchcraft. Meanwhile, Homer befriends Cletus after learning that he and his friends make their own moonshine.	The Simpsons	18	Rednecks and Broomsticks	21
18	\N	Homer is completing his court-ordered community service when he befriends his supervisor, Chief Wiggum, by offering him one of his sandwiches. Touched by the act of kindness, Wiggum assigns the other convicts unpleasant tasks, but allows Homer to join him at the picnic table. They continue to grow close, but when the Chief gets injured during a botched bank robbery, Homer doesn't come through when Wiggum needs him the most. Meanwhile, Bart becomes addicted to Battle Ball, a Japanese game made up of plastic balls and magnetic cards, and his family and teachers try to help him kick the habit.	The Simpsons	18	Chief of Hearts	21
4	\N	"Treehouse of Horror XXI" is the fourth episode of The Simpsons' twenty-second season. It first aired on the Fox network in the United States on November 7, 2010. This is the 21st Treehouse of Horror episode, and, like the other "Treehouse of Horror" episodes, consisted of three self-contained segments: In "War and Pieces", Bart and Milhouse discover a real-life board game that they must win to return home; in "Master and Cadaver", Marge and Homer go on a honeymoon on a sailboat, and rescue a mysterious castaway named Roger; and in "Tweenlight", Lisa falls in love with a vampire named Edmund.\\n\\n"Treehouse of Horror XXI" was written by Joel H. Cohen and directed by Bob Anderson. Daniel Radcliffe and Hugh Laurie both guest starred in the episode. The first segment references Jumanji, the second is a loose parody of Dead Calm and the third satirizes the Twilight novel and film series. The episode also contains references to The Office, A Clockwork Orange and Sesame Street.\\n\\nIn its original airing on the Fox Network during the November sweeps period, the episode had a 3.7 Nielsen rating viewed in approximately 8.2 million homes. Critical opinion of the episode was mixed, with "Tweenlight" generally being regarded as the best of the three segments.	The Simpsons	18	Treehouse of Horror XXI	22
13	\N	Moe gets Homer to be his wingman, but becomes distraught when the women are drawn to Homer as well. Meanwhile, Marge discovers some gray hairs and tries a new more mature hair style to go along with it, much to Bart's dismay.	The Simpsons	18	The Blue and the Gray	22
1	\N	Homer befriends Wayne, a reserved security guard recently hired by the nuclear power plant. Plagued by violent flashbacks from his past as a CIA agent, he must overcome his tortured nightmares to save Homer from a Ukranian terrorist. Meanwhile, Marge fantasizes about being a contestant on "Top Chef" hosted by Tom Colicchio, and the future of Springfield's hottest "it" couple Nedna, Edna Krabappel and Ned Flanders, will be revealed after months of online fan voting and speculation.	The Simpsons	18	The Falcon and the D'Ohman	23
13	\N	Marge and Lisa's mother-daughter Valentine's Day plans take a turn when Lisa meets Nick, an intellectual romantic who shares the same passion for culture, history and literature. Lisa and Nick fall head over heels for each other in a fairytale romance and make a secret getaway to Mulberry Island to profess their eternal love.\\n\\nMeanwhile, Bart and Milhouse are inspired by the hosts of "MythCrackers" to "crack" Springfield Elementary's own legends.	The Simpsons	18	The Daughter Also Rises	23
22	\N	In the Season 23 finale, Lisa tries to boost her popularity by ghost writing positive things about herself on the school blog. The effort fails miserably, until a psychic force tells Lady Gaga (who provides her own voice) that Lisa needs her help.	The Simpsons	18	Lisa Goes Gaga	23
11	\N	A tornado touches down in Springfield which sucks up Santa's Little Helper. While Homer and Marge are out looking for the family dog, the tornado strikes again and almost takes Marge and Homer. Marge is distraught about the kids and decide to pick a  guardian to care for the children.	The Simpsons	18	The Changing of the Guardian	24
21	\N	Homer, Moe, Lenny and Carl win $200,000 in the Springfield Lottery. But when Carl takes off to Iceland – his homeland – with all the winnings, the guys embark on a Nordic adventure to get the cash back.	The Simpsons	18	The Saga of Carl	24
5	\N	When Homer helps a woman give birth in an elevator, he forms an emotional attachment to the baby; cheerleaders for the local professional football team recruit Lisa.	The Simpsons	18	Labor Pains	25
13	\N	During a research trip, Lisa learns that Sideshow Bob is the chief scientist at a big chemical engineering company; Marge tries to teach a teen church group about healthy sexual practices.	The Simpsons	18	The Man Who Grew Too Much	25
4	\N	In a Halloween-theme episode Bart reads Aramaic symbols from the bottom of his desk and he and Lisa are transported to an alternate world filled with demons. Also, Moe organizes a "Clockwork Orange"-ish gang in which member Dum (Homer) falls for a young lady (Marge) who wants him to quit. In a homage to "The Others," the Simpsons reconnect with their earlier incarnations from the Tracey Ullman era.	The Simpsons	18	Treehouse of Horror XXV	26
11	\N	Bart has a new accomplice and best friend when Homer is hypnotized at the circus and believes he is a young boy again.	The Simpsons	18	Bart's New Friend	26
21	\N	After Bart gets bullied at the school dance, Marge convinces the town to pass anti-bullying legislation. Homer then gets arrested and sent to rehab for bullying Ned Flanders, only to subsequently leave rehab as a hero.	The Simpsons	18	Bull-E	26
6	\N	Lisa makes a new pal at school named Harper, whose internet billionaire father becomes buddies with a different Simpson: Homer. Soon, though, Lisa becomes worried that Harper is a little too entitled.	The Simpsons	18	Friend with Benefit	27
17	\N	After Smithers is crushed by Mr. Burns' lack of affection towards him, other characters attempt to find a boyfriend for him. Meanwhile, Milhouse competes against a new boy for the lead role in a school production of Casablanca, so he can act alongside his own unrequited love, Lisa.	The Simpsons	18	The Burns Cage	27
5	\N	Lisa and Bart investigate Krusty’s suspicious new "Krustaceans" candy. Meanwhile, Homer wants a promotion at the nuclear plant and asks Marge to help him dress the part, and news anchor Kent Brockman struggles to find his feet in the changing media world.	The Simpsons	18	Trust But Clarify	28
11	\N	When Marge becomes obsessed with a Japanese style of living, the Simpsons must part with any item that no longer brings them joy. For Homer, this means finding a new home for the family pig. For Lisa, it means saying goodbye to her beloved sax	The Simpsons	18	Pork and Burns	28
13	\N	Homer angers Marge by binging their favorite show without her, and has to pick up a new skill in order to make amends. Meanwhile, Bart prepares to compete in "Krusty's Holiday Trample".	The Simpsons	18	I'm Dancing as Fat as I Can	30
13	\N	When Miss Hoover asks her students to research their family history, Lisa is horrified to discover that most of her ancestors were bad people – a motley crew of horse thieves and deadbeats. But while rummaging through the attic, Lisa happens upon a diary kept by her ancestor, Eliza Simpson. As Eliza’s story unfolds, Lisa learns that her family was part of the Underground Railroad, a group that helped slaves escape to freedom. Eliza recounts liberating a slave named Virgil, but when Lisa presents her findings at school, some of her classmates refute it, leaving Lisa determined to exonerate her family’s name.	The Simpsons	18	The Color Yellow	21
23	\N	When Moe discovers a hidden talent for judging contests, he is approached by a television agent to join the AMERICAN IDOL judges' panel. Moe flies to Los Angeles where he tours the Fox lot and receives some sage career advice. Meanwhile, Homer drives Marge crazy when he begins hanging around the house.	The Simpsons	18	Judge Me Tender	21
8	\N	When the rest of the family seems to lack Christmas spirit, Marge contacts Martha Clause (Martha Stewart).	The Simpsons	18	The Fight Before Christmas	22
18	\N	The family is greeted by folk singer Ewell Freestone (guest voice McBrayer) when they visit a peach farm, but when Marge goes overboard with peach-inspired dishes, Lisa and Bart try to get rid of the unwanted fruit. Later, Lisa becomes a magician’s apprentice to the legendary Great Raymondo (guest voice Landau) who helps her develop her craft, but a schoolgirl crush clouds her judgment when she is coaxed into revealing the Great Raymondo’s most famous magic trick to his phony archnemesis. But when the rival magician’s act takes a risky turn, the Great Raymondo has one last trick up his sleeve and stages showdown with Ricky Jay, Penn & Teller and David Copperfield (guest-voicing as themselves), showing them why he is the master of the craft	The Simpsons	18	The Great Simpsina	22
5	\N	Marge takes Bart and Lisa on a weekend excursion, and when an unexpected restaurant detour awakens their taste buds, fellow foodies Amuse Bruce and Fois Garth (guest voices Tim Heidecker and Eric Wareheim) inspire them to start their own food blog, “The Three Mouthketeers.”	The Simpsons	18	The Food Wife	23
15	\N	In order to get back at his dad, Bart goes undercover as a graffiti street artist and plasters Homer's unflattering image all over Springfield. But one night, Bart and Milhouse get caught in the act by established street artists Shepard Fairey, Ron English, Kenny Scharf and Robbie Conal (guest voicing as themselves), and to Bart's surprise, they invite him to exhibit his satirical artwork in his very own gallery show.\\n\\nMeanwhile, a hip, new health food superstore opens in Springfield that threatens to put Apu and the Kwik-E-Mart out of business.	The Simpsons	18	Exit Through the Kwik-E-Mart	23
3	\N	When Marge's car falls into a sink hole, she buys the perfect replacement to fit her family of five. But she quickly grows to hate it because, as she tells a shocked Homer, the car would be too small if she wanted to have another baby. Meanwhile, Bart and his friends are determined to find out what secret Lisa is keeping when Bart finds her cryptic messages and follows her sneaking off downtown for covert meetings after school.	The Simpsons	18	Adventures in Baby-Getting	24
13	\N	Bart and Milhouse explore the perks of adulthood following a shaving experiment.	The Simpsons	18	Hardly Kirk-ing	24
18	\N	Set in the future, Homer has a new clone for every time he dies. Lisa is married to a zombie version of Milhouse, while Bart deals with custody issues with his ex-wife, Jenda. Each defines what love means to them.	The Simpsons	18	Days of Future Future	25
5	\N	Lisa brings in assembly woman Maxine Lombard to put a stop to Mr. Burns' fracking operation, but is taken aback when the two political opponents find themselves attracted to one another.	The Simpsons	18	Opposites A-Frack	26
10	\N	During a trip to "Dizzneeland" the Simpsons board the wrong ride, Rocket To Your Doom, and are transported through the galaxy to Kang and Kodos' home planet, where they are held captive at the local zoo and the inhabitants decide to eat Homer.	The Simpsons	18	The Man Who Came to Be Dinner	26
4	\N	When Lisa becomes scared at the Krustyland Halloween Horror Night, Homer is forced to take down his Everscream Terrors decorations. Halloween pop-up employees seek vengeance on Homer for causing them to lose their jobs, and rob his house while Homer and Lisa hide out in the attic. Homer and Lisa light up their stored holiday decorations to attract attention and stand up to the intruders.	The Simpsons	18	Halloween of Horror	27
12	\N	Sanjay passes his stake in the Kwik-E-Mart to his millennial son, Jay, who turns it into a hip, health food market against Apu’s insistence on tradition. Bart, whom Homer had convinced to give up pranking, is called upon to return to his trickster life and take down the new store.	The Simpsons	18	Much Apu About Something	27
22	\N	Marge goes to prison for letting Bart play in a park unsupervised.	The Simpsons	18	Orange is the New Yellow	27
15	\N	Bart deals with his guilt after betraying Lisa; Springfield is in awe of Homer when he is revealed to be a chess savant.	The Simpsons	18	The Cad and the Hat	28
3	\N	Homer discovers that Maggie is a whistling savant and launches her baby-celebrity career. Meanwhile, Marge impresses Fat Tony with her interior design taste, and he hires her to style his brothel.	The Simpsons	18	Whistler's Father	29
15	\N	In an attempt to bring the family together, Marge forces everyone to hand in their electronics and take a trip to a book store.	The Simpsons	18	No Good Read Goes Unpunished	29
3	\N	God and St. Peter contemplate what merits a soul getting into heaven, while citizens of Springfield remember their divine encounters.	The Simpsons	18	My Way or the Highway to Heaven	30
12	\N	When Lisa spots a new best friend from the window of the bus, she gets a taste of what life could be like with a different, more cultured family.	The Simpsons	18	The Girl on the Bus	30
19	\N	Homer works extra shifts at the plant so Lisa can play in the Capitol City Philharmonic.	The Simpsons	18	Girl's in the Band	30
21	\N	Lisa is mistakenly given political asylum in Canada during a family trip to Niagara Falls; Homer goes to a “Daddy and Me” class with Maggie.	The Simpsons	18	D'oh Canada	30
3	\N	During the San Castellanta street festival, much of the town finds their wallets have been pickpocketed; after the state investigator puts the wrong man in jail, Chief Wiggum sets out to catch the real criminal and show he's still up for police work.	The Simpsons	18	The Fat Blue Line	31
5	\N	After a trip to Aquatraz Water Park, Lisa becomes determined to set free Springfield's most vicious animals in captivity. Meanwhile, Homer fulfills a lifelong dream of buying a boat, and quickly realizes boat ownership sucks.	The Simpsons	18	Gorillas on the Mast	31
11	\N	Comic Book Guy and his wife Kumiko debate about having a baby and we learn about his awesome origin story.	The Simpsons	18	The Dad Feelings-Limited	32
15	\N	Principal Skinner announces that Mrs. Krabappel was called out of town and budget cuts dictate that, until she returns, the school's two fourth grade classes will merge. Bart reluctantly shares a desk with Nikki and develops a flirtatious rapport. Bart talks to Grampa about his new crush, and at Grampa's suggestion, gives Nikki a kiss. But when Nikki starts sending Bart mixed signals, he swears off women forever. Meanwhile, Lisa's classmates ostracize her for being an overachiever, and First Lady Michelle Obama, a self-professed nerd, comes to Lisa's defence.	The Simpsons	18	Stealing First Base	21
2	\N	Lisa invests in Nelson's brand-new business venture, but soon realizes that her friend's instant success might lure him away from the classroom. Worried that his judgment might be clouded, Lisa introduces Nelson to the well-educated and successful creator of Facebook, Mark Zuckerberg, only to find out that he too dropped out of school.	The Simpsons	18	Loan-a-Lisa	22
15	\N	Lisa's school project leads to the discovery of a new drug that makes the elderly less cranky and more tolerable.	The Simpsons	18	The Scorpion's Tale	22
3	\N	Simpsons' twentysecond Halloween show.\\n\\nThe Diving Bell and the Butterball:\\n\\nHomer is bitten by a radioactive spider.\\n\\nDial "D" for Diddly:\\n\\nNed becomes a serial killer.\\n\\nIn the Na'Vi:\\n\\nBart and Milhouse in an Avatar spoof.	The Simpsons	18	Treehouse of Horror XXII	23
12	\N	After Moe is heckled for not having any real companions, Moe's best friend and beloved bar rag narrates his incredible thousand-year journey to Springfield.\\n\\nBeginning in the Middle Ages, the bar rag was loomed into a beautiful and ornate medieval tapestry and traveled around the globe through the hands of royalty before finding himself found himself at Moe's Tavern.\\n\\nMeanwhile, Bart begs Milhouse for forgiveness after the two friends get into a tiff, and when the bar rag goes missing, Moe realizes that he has more friends than he thought.	The Simpsons	18	Moe Goes from Rags to Riches	23
1	\N	Bart will be visited by many of his past girlfriends.	The Simpsons	18	Moonshine River	24
10	\N	The fate of Springfield Elementary rests on Bart and his test scores, and Homer finds way to make money with his own parking meter.	The Simpsons	18	A Test Before Trying	24
20	\N	Marge encourages Bart to explore his creative side, and his initial reticence quickly subsides when she hires Slava’s beautiful daughter, Zhenya, as his new piano instructor. Homer is shocked when he loses the last two hairs on his head, and employs a wide variety of headgear to try and keep his new found baldness a secret from Marge.	The Simpsons	18	The Fabulous Faker Boy	24
17	\N	Lisa dates a competitive eater; Bart benefits from helping convict Snake Jailbird escape from a jam.	The Simpsons	18	Luca$	25
22	\N	Bart feels guilty after he wins the annual "last day of school" race around Springfield Elementary School, with help from Nelson, who beats up the frontrunner, Milhouse. Meanwhile, Homer tries to bring back 4th of July fireworks after they are canceled due to budget cuts.	The Simpsons	18	The Yellow Badge of Cowardge	25
8	\N	Homer has a mid-life crisis, takes up bass guitar and forms a cover band with some of the other dads in town. But the band's modest early success is soon overwhelmed by the breakout potential of their most unlikely star, Apu.	The Simpsons	18	Covercraft	26
18	\N	Bart lies about being involved in a bulldozer crash, so Marge decides to follow him everywhere until he confesses. Meanwhile, Homer ignores Santa’s Little Helper when Flanders gets a new dog.	The Simpsons	18	Peeping Mom	26
3	\N	Upon learning that their father really died of lung cancer, Selma and Patty agree to quit smoking. When Selma relapses, an angry Patty moves in with Marge and Homer.	The Simpsons	18	Puffless	27
11	\N	There is a new teacher at Springfield Elementary, and a captivated Bart tries everything to win her over. Meanwhile, Homer decides to buy a new brand of “milk,” which causes early puberty, both for Bart (augmenting his wooing powers) and Lisa (whose small bout with acne opens her up to the world of makeup and popularity).	The Simpsons	18	Teenage Mutant Milk-Caused Hurdles	27
2	\N	Mr. Burns hires the Simpsons, except Homer, to be his virtual family; Homer becomes best friends with the girl next door.	The Simpsons	18	Friends and Family	28
14	\N	All of the fast food restaurants in Springfield go healthy, forcing Homer to turn to the last bastion of greasy food for comfort.	The Simpsons	18	Fatzcarraldo	28
1	\N	In a magical medieval world, Marge's mother is turned into an Ice Walker and the only way for Homer to afford the cure is to force Lisa to use illegal magic. When the King discovers this, he kidnaps Lisa, and Homer must lead a feudal uprising to save her.	The Simpsons	18	The Serfsons	29
12	\N	When Homer is accused of stealing a million-dollar painting, only a detective from the 1970s can clear his name.	The Simpsons	18	Homer Is Where the Art Isn't	29
1	\N	Bart takes a dare, and ends up in the hospital. To cover for himself and Homer, he says he went to Heaven and met Jesus. Christian producers offer the Simpsons a movie deal, which Homer takes. But Bart can't deal with the guilt and comes clean to Marge after the movie is finished.	The Simpsons	18	Bart's Not Dead	30
11	\N	When Marge and Homer leave Grampa to baby-sit the kids, some little green army men trigger a PTSD episode, sending the family on a journey to Grampa's past and the time period when he was a post-war toy model.	The Simpsons	18	Mad About the Toy	30
22	\N	The documentary crime series “Dateline: Springfield” goes in-depth to solve the case of Lisa’s missing college fund.	The Simpsons	18	Woo-Hoo Dunnit?	30
6	\N	When Marge realizes that everyone views her as boring, she takes up competitive lumber-jacking as a hobby (and has a real gift for it). The circuit of competitive timbersports takes her on a month-long retreat to Portland with her trainer, Paula, whom Homer worries is going to steal her away forever	The Simpsons	18	Marge the Lumberjill	31
14	\N	Bart accidentally sees a new superhero movie one month before its intended release, and uses his knowledge to terrorize the other fans. Two executive producers of the film attempt to prevent Bart from leaking any more news to the public.	The Simpsons	18	Bart the Bad Guy	31
16	\N	Bart bonds with Ned Flanders, which leaves Homer jealous, so he retaliates by mentoring Nelson Muntz; a heroic act by Homer makes Bart look up to him again.	The Simpsons	18	Better Off Ned	31
9	\N	Todd blames God for the death of his mother and rejects his faith, so Ned sends him to live with the Simpsons, hoping they can scare him into believing in God again.	The Simpsons	18	Todd, Todd, Why Hast Thou Forsaken Me?	31
18	\N	Mr. Burns tasks Homer with swindling Cletus Spuckler out of his newfound helium fortune. Meanwhile, Maggie is reunited with Hudson from Playdate with Destiny again, only for Marge to tear them apart after his mother annoys her.	The Simpsons	18	The Incredible Lightness of Being a Baby	31
19	\N	The Simpsons decide to embrace a cheaper, alternate source of energy by erecting a wind turbine in their backyard. But when Homer realizes some of the power is being directed to the local electric company, he decides to remove his home from the grid and becomes completely dependent upon an unreliable source of power. Meanwhile, a storm erupts, trapping a magnificent 150-foot-long blue whale ashore, and Lisa and Homer attempt to help the poor creature.	The Simpsons	18	The Squirt and the Whale	21
9	\N	Jon Hamm will guest star as a Federal Bureau of Investigation agent as Homer goes undercover to infiltrate Fat Tony's mob. Joe Mantegna will return as Fat Tony, and also voice his cousin Fit Tony.	The Simpsons	18	Donnie Fatso	22
19	\N	Fat Tony (voice of Joe Mantegna) woos Marge's sister Selma, and they marry. Marge worries that Selma is choosing her new lifestyle over family after the whirlwind romance, but Tony invites Homer and Marge to join them on a getaway at the Jersey shore. Meanwhile, Bart develops a gift for finding truffles, much to Lisa's delight.	The Simpsons	18	The Real Housewives of Fat Tony	22
6	\N	Lisa becomes disheartened when she learns the shocking truth behind the “tween lit” industry and her beloved fantasy novel characters, but Homer decides to cash in on the craze and forms a team to group-write the next “tween lit” hit, with the king of fantasy, Neil Gaiman, lending his expertise to the effort.	The Simpsons	18	The Book Job	23
16	\N	Karma gets the best of Homer after he gets his friends in trouble, and as a result, his bedwetting problem worsens. The family goes on a mission to infiltrate his dreams to search for clues in his subconscious to determine the source of his problem. But just as things take a dangerous turn in the dream, a figure from Homer's past appears, and he is finally reassured that the fond memories of his mother Mona (guest voice Glenn Close) remain alive, giving him just the right amount of reassurance to cure him of his problem.	The Simpsons	18	How I Wet Your Mother	23
4	\N	Homer and Marge try to track down Grampa by following clues that lead to secrets from his past.	The Simpsons	18	Gone Abie Gone	24
15	\N	When Flanders' parents prove to prefer Homer's company to his, he jealously responds by giving Homer a shiner, and then tries desperately to reconcile with him. Meanwhile, Lisa is at a loss to understand why a new substitute teacher is bullying her for no obvious reason.	The Simpsons	18	Black-Eyed, Please	24
1	\N	A parody of "Homeland". Homer starts to act strangely polite after returning from a nuclear power plant convention, prompting a suspicious Lisa to ask an intense FBI agent named Annie (Kristen Wiig) to help her solve this mystery.	The Simpsons	18	Homerland	25
7	\N	Principal Skinner promises the students that the best-behaved among them can take a ride in a submarine. When Skinner gives all the kids a clean slate, Bart believes even his own past indiscretions will be forgotten if he doesn’t get into any more trouble. Meanwhile Lisa tries to help a cash-poor Krusty to turn things around by suggesting he sell the foreign rights to his shows.	The Simpsons	18	Yellow Subterfuge	25
19	\N	When Bart's voodoo doll spell accidentally makes his teacher pregnant, he becomes a savior to couples hoping to conceive.	The Simpsons	18	What to Expect When Bart's Expecting	25
14	\N	When Marge gets fed up with the thankless duty of chauffeuring her kids around, she begins working as a driver for a transportation app service. Meanwhile, Homer bankrupts Moe when he watches over the bar for one night, which forces Moe to take a temporary job as a janitor at the nuclear plant.	The Simpsons	18	My Fare Lady	26
1	\N	When a fire levels Springfield, Mr. Burns agrees to the Simpsons' pleas that he fund the town's rebuilding, on the condition that he gets to put on a variety show.	The Simpsons	18	Monty Burns' Fleeing Circus	28
10	\N	Krusty tries to impress his daughter as they spend Christmas with the Simpsons. Meanwhile, Reverend Lovejoy seeks converts after church attendance plummets, and Maggie is haunted by a spooky Christmas toy.	The Simpsons	18	The Nightmare After Krustmas	28
2	\N	Marge and Lisa turn Lisa’s sad experience into a successful graphic novel-turned-Broadway show, but they struggle with creative differences and ego.	The Simpsons	18	Springfield Splendor	29
9	\N	When Bart goes missing, the town puts together a search party to find him. After most give up hope, Sideshow Bob manipulates Millhouse into revealing where Bart is hiding.	The Simpsons	18	Gone Boy	29
18	\N	Grampa makes a confession to Homer while on his deathbed. After his recovery, he comes to realize that this issue will not be easy to reconcile.	The Simpsons	18	Forgive and Regret	29
7	\N	Marge wants a job, and stumbles into becoming a plastic food storage container-selling drag queen. Meanwhile, Lisa tries to make the world better in the style of "Amelie"	The Simpsons	18	Werking Mom	30
17	\N	As Bart begins to excel in video game competitions, Homer discovers a passion for coaching him; Lisa attempts to bring Homer back to reality, but the plan causes chaos.	The Simpsons	18	E My Sports	30
2	\N	Homer must supervise interns, among whom is a go-getter who asks Homer to be his mentor.	The Simpsons	18	Go Big or Go Homer	31
1	\N	When a video of Bart and Homer fighting goes viral, they begin a journey as social media celebrities; Lisa battles the school's new industrialized detention system.	The Simpsons	18	The Winter of Our Monetized Content	31
15	\N	When Marge implements a screen time limit for the family, she realizes that she is the one addicted.	The Simpsons	18	Screenless	31
11	\N	Homer and Marge attend Artie Ziff’s wedding and become quite uncomfortable when they realize that his bride-to-be is a clone of Marge. Meanwhile, Lisa grapples with the misogynistic implications of the immediate popularity she receives after getting her new Invisalign braces.	The Simpsons	18	Hail to the Teeth	31
12	\N	Marge recruits Chrissy Teigen and John Legend for an education-based proposal.	The Simpsons	18	The Miseducation of Lisa Simpson	31
19	\N	Helen Lovejoy's request for a youth pastor is answered by Bode Wright, a charismatic young preacher from Michigan. When Bode quickly has the Springfield congregation enamored by his easy-going and liberal approach to religion, an outcast and suspicious Reverend Lovejoy decides to look into the newcomer's past.	The Simpsons	18	Warrin' Priests (1)	31
20	\N	While Bode has won over most of Springfield, he finds one churchgoer he can't sway in Ned Flanders. Meanwhile in Michigan, Reverend Lovejoy finds the ammunition he needs to get rid of his replacement.	The Simpsons	18	Warrin' Priests (2)	31
21	\N	After severing her sibling ties with Bart, Lisa attends a sleepover at her new friend Addy's house, only to discover that Addy's clique are a group of cruel snobby rich girls that taunt her. Meanwhile, Homer takes Marge on a sunset cruise for the evening and finds himself at odds with the boat's cover band.	The Simpsons	18	The Hateful Eight-Year-Olds	31
10	\N	After "The Citizen" prints an explosive story, Iris' life is threatened; refusing to hide from her attackers, Iris sets out to expose a dangerous organization; Barry must face the consequences of the Crisis and fulfill Oliver Queen's wish for him.	The Flash	17	Marathon	6
1	\N	When an experiment to save Barry's speed backfires, Nash Wells searches for a way to save The Flash and comes up with a dangerous plan. Meanwhile, Iris makes a startling realization inside the Mirrorverse and Cecile faces off with Rosa Dillon.	The Flash	17	All's Well That Ends Wells	7
6	\N	When Lisa get a bad case of the blues, jazz musician Bleeding Gums Murphy teaches her how to express her feelings through music.	The Simpsons	18	Moaning Lisa	1
3	\N	The Simpson kids hide in the family treehouse and tell each other spooky stories. The first regards haunted houses, the second introduces Kang and Kodos for the first time in an alien abduction, and the third is a Simpson-adapted retelling of The Raven.	The Simpsons	18	Treehouse of Horror	2
13	\N	Homer becomes the most popular guy in town when he gets an illegal cable hook-up, but Lisa fears he will go to hell for violating the Eighth Commandment.	The Simpsons	18	Homer vs. Lisa and the 8th Commandment	2
22	\N	When Mr. Burns is saved by a transfusion of Bart's blood, Homer expects a handsome reward but is outraged to receive only a simple thank-you note.	The Simpsons	18	Blood Feud	2
11	\N	Mr. Burns sells the Springfield Nuclear Power Plant to wealthy German investors who are shocked at the conditions. When the ceiling caves in, the Germans are desperate to sell the plant... back to Mr. Burns.	The Simpsons	18	Burns Verkaufen der Kraftwerk	3
22	\N	Otto loses his job driving the school bus and the Simpsons take him in. When he must get a driver’s license, he finds common ground with Patty and Selma.	The Simpsons	18	The Otto Show	3
8	\N	Bart has a crush on his new neighbor, a teenage girl who only has eyes for Jimbo Jones. Bart sets out to prove that Jimbo is not as tough as he seems.	The Simpsons	18	New Kid on the Block	4
19	\N	Convinced that Itchy & Scratchy has been going downhill, Bart and Lisa pen their own script and sign Grandpa Simpson's name to it. Meanwhile, Homer goes back to school to make up a missing credit.	The Simpsons	18	The Front	4
6	\N	When Marge has a girls' night out with a new neighbor, they wind up roaring toward a cliff in a Thelma-and-Louise-style car chase.	The Simpsons	18	Marge on the Lam	5
16	\N	Homer and Flanders bond over a football game. As the two friends become inseparable, Flanders struggles with a growing dislike of Homer that finally blows up in front of the entire church congregation.	The Simpsons	18	Homer Loves Flanders	5
4	\N	The family's trip to Itchy & Scratchy Land takes an unexpected turn when high-tech robots malfunction and become violent.	The Simpsons	18	Itchy & Scratchy Land	6
15	\N	Krusty the Clown's reckless spending forces him to open a clown college to keep afloat. New graduate Homer discovers the perks and perils of being Krusty.	The Simpsons	18	Homie the Clown	6
24	\N	The simmering rivalry between Springfield and a neighboring town heats up when Shelbyville kids steal Springfield's prized lemon tree.	The Simpsons	18	Lemon of Troy	6
7	\N	Homer tries to gain sixty pounds so he can stay home on disability. When he nearly causes a catastrophe at the plant, Homer reconsiders his plan.	The Simpsons	18	King-Size Homer	7
17	\N	Forced to take a vacation, Smithers needs to find a temporary replacement who won't outshine him. Homer seems the perfect choice until a sudden outburst forces Mr. Burns to assert his independence.	The Simpsons	18	Homer the Smithers	7
2	\N	When Homer accepts a job offer, the Simpsons move to Cypress Creek, where everything seems too good to be true. Finally happy at his job, Homer fails to notice that his new boss is an evil megalomaniac bent on world domination.	The Simpsons	18	You Only Move Twice	8
12	\N	To promote teamwork amongst the power plant's employees, Mr. Burns makes them go on a corporate retreat up in the mountains.	The Simpsons	18	Mountain of Madness	8
22	\N	Disturbed that Reverend Lovejoy has lost interest in counseling parishioners, Marge volunteers as the "Listen Lady." Meanwhile, Homer sees his likeness on a box of Japanese detergent.	The Simpsons	18	In Marge We Trust	8
8	\N	When a skeleton is unearthed at the site of a future shopping mall, all Springfield is convinced it is the skeleton of an angel – except Lisa.	The Simpsons	18	Lisa the Skeptic	9
16	\N	Moe goes broke trying to wine and dine a new girlfriend. Desperate for money, he cooks up an insurance scam with Homer.	The Simpsons	18	Dumbbell Indemnity	9
1	\N	Homer and Bart try to make money by selling used grease. Meanwhile, Lisa organizes a school dance but feels alienated when a new classmate and her friends try to act like adults.	The Simpsons	18	Lard of the Dance	10
11	\N	Scapegoated for the vandalism of drunken Isotopes fans, the children of Springfield wage war on the adults by broadcasting their secrets on the radio.	The Simpsons	18	Wild Barts Can't Be Broken	10
21	\N	A new mogul wins the hearts of the townspeople with a shower of cash. Jealous, Mr. Burns asks Homer to help make him a beloved billionaire too, and they hatch a plan to bring the Loch Ness Monster to Springfield.	The Simpsons	18	Monty Can't Buy Me Love	10
8	\N	After winning a motorcycle at a dance contest, Homer becomes part of a motorcycle gang. But when he puts Marge's photo in a biker magazine, a much tougher gang takes her, and he must win her back.	The Simpsons	18	Take My Wife, Sleaze	11
18	\N	After being embarrassed by a drunken video of himself, Barney vows to sober up. Newly clean, he gets work as a helicopter pilot.	The Simpsons	18	Days of Wine and D'oh'ses	11
6	\N	Homer decides to buy a computer after turning up to the Plant to find it closed by e-mail. He then creates his own website and it eventually gains attention when he posts gossip. Homer dubs himself as "Mr. X" to conceal his identity. When he reveals that he is Mr. X, he becomes drugged into a mysterious island where people who know too much are imprisoned after Homer starts writing conspiracy theories such as flu shots.	The Simpsons	18	The Computer Wore Menace Shoes	12
20	\N	After spraining his knee during a basketball game, Homer begins taking care of the neighborhood kids to cure his boredom, prompting jealousy from Bart and Lisa, who feel that Homer is giving the kids the attention they never had.	The Simpsons	18	Children of a Lesser Clod	12
10	\N	Sideshow Bob gets contracted as this year’s mall Santa. Meanwhile, someone is stealing all the Christmas packages off people’s front porches.	The Simpsons	18	Bobby: It's Cold Outside	31
1	\N	Mr. Burns goes undercover as "Fred" at the nuclear power plant and becomes friends with Homer and the gang. Burns implements all sorts of amenities to improve his employees' lives, but a jealous Smithers plots to bring the old, bitter Burns back and destroy Fred.	The Simpsons	18	Undercover Burns	32
10	\N	A cable channel films a Christmas movie in Springfield and Skinner falls in love.	The Simpsons	18	A Springfield Summer Christmas for Christmas	32
4	\N	A shocking twist in the murder investigation brings Layton and Till's manhunt to a cat-and-mouse climax. But Layton is getting too close to Melanie's big secret, which may prove the most dangerous game of all.	Snowpiercer	19	Without Their Maker	1
5	\N	Layton and Miss Audrey make a risky play for Big Alice, but Wilford has his own plans.	Snowpiercer	19	Keep Hope Alive	2
11	\N	While Naruto and Sasuke train, Sakura watches over Tazuna. During a nice dinner, Sakura notices a man's face torn from a picture. The man's name was Kaiza, and he was what the country called...a "hero". What happened to cause Inari so much pain?	Naruto	20	The Land Where a Hero Once Lived	1
22	\N	Rock Lee challenges Sasuke to a one-on-one fight. Naruto grows angry and attacks him, only to be beaten in one attack. Sasuke realizes the challenge and eagerly accepts. But will Sasuke be defeated just as easily by this mysterious ninja? Sasuke's only advantage seems to be his Sharingan, but what happens when not even that will work?	Naruto	20	Chūnin Challenge: Rock Lee vs. Sasuke!	1
28	\N	To prevent further problems, Sasuke thinks up a password to determine friend from foe, but will it be that simple? Meanwhile Naruto has his hands full with a giant snake. Can he handle this on his own and what about Sasuke and Sakura, can they survive the ordeal?	Naruto	20	Eat or Be Eaten: Panic In the Forest	1
38	\N	With so many participants still left, the groups are told that they will be pitted against each other in preliminary matches. Kabuto leaves, then Sasuke is told he has to fight. They know that Sasuke was given the cursed seal and if it takes over they will stop him. Can Sasuke stop the seal from taking over again and still win?	Naruto	20	Narrowing the Field: Sudden Death Elimination!	1
49	\N	As the battle between Lee and Gaara continues, Gai remembers how hard Lee used to train and how Lee has pretty much no ninjutsu or genjutsu skills. Lee is also a dropout, like Naruto. In order to defeat Gaara, Lee will have to use the move Gai forbade him to use.	Naruto	20	Lee's Hidden Strength: Forbidden Secret Jutsu!	1
59	\N	Waking up late, Naruto hurries to the stadium where the Chuunin matches will be held, along the way he stops at his old training ground and meets up with Hinata. Naruto tells Hinata that he's afraid he'll lose, but with Hinata's encouragement and sort-of-confession of her feelings, Naruto is filled with renewed confidence and proceeds to the stadium leaving a shellshocked Hinata in his wake. Now Naruto must try to make it the stadium before it's too late, and Konohamaru has a plan to help him out.	Naruto	20	The Final Rounds: Rush to the Battle Arena!	2
69	\N	Knowing that Sasuke is in over his head, Kakashi sends Naruto, Sakura, and Shikamaru, being guided by a dog named Pakkun, to stop Sasuke from pursuing Gaara.	Naruto	20	Village in Distress: A New A-Ranked Mission!	2
79	\N	Transformed into Kyubi, Naruto and Gamabunta prepare to stop Shukaku by waking Gaara up. Though they succeed, the battle is far from over as Gaara won't stop until Naruto is dead. Naruto and Gaara prepare for their final attacks. Meanwhile, Sarutobi continues trying to defeat Orochimaru. And even though Sarutobi isn't strong enough to kill Orochimaru, he does have enough strength to take away Orochimaru's most prized possession...the use of his arms!	Naruto	20	Beyond the Limit of Darkness and Light	2
92	\N	While Naruto continues to try and master the third step, Tsunade continues to think about Orochimaru's offer. Jiraiya tries to convince her by taking her out for a drink, only she slipped a paralyzing potion into his drink while he wasn't looking. Will Tsunade agree to Orochimaru's offer? And will Naruto master the Rasengan before the week is up?	Naruto	20	A Dubious Offer! Tsunade's Choice!	2
106	\N	Now that Sasuke and Sakura are trapped at the bottom of a cliff, it's up the Number One Knucklehead Ninja to defeat the malevolent Aoi and help Idate cross the finish line.	Naruto	20	The Last Leg: A Final Act of Desperation	3
112	\N	As Shikamaru and the rest of the squad move in, Jirobo, one of the Sound Ninja, traps them within an Earth Dome Prison and sucks up their chakra!	Naruto	20	Squad Mutiny: Everything Falls Apart!	3
128	\N	Finally catching up to Sasuke, Naruto does all he can to keep him from going to Orochimaru. Does he have enough strength to stop him or is Sasuke gone for good?	Naruto	20	A Cry on Deaf Ears	3
137	\N	Naruto, Sakura and Jiraiya end up in a town that is even worse than the one they were chased out of. Jiraiya heads off and leaves Naruto and Sakura to get some food. Along the way they find the ninja that attacked them before, but things are not as clearcut as they might seem.	Naruto	20	A Town of Outlaws, The Shadow of the Fuma Clan	3
141	\N	The battle between Naruto and Arashi continues, but Naruto's injury is making it difficult for him to succeed. Sasame jumps in to try to save Naruto but will it be enough?	Naruto	20	Sakura's Determination	3
152	\N	When Naruto rescues three strangers he finds himself dragged into yet another mission. However, this time he doesn't want to partake in it! That is until he hears that there might be a connection to Akatsuki. With Neji, Lee and Tenten as his teammates, will he find the information he is looking for?	Naruto	20	Funeral March for the Living	3
164	\N	Naruto decides to do some investigating on his own over the matter of the ghost, while Neji and Tenten try a different approach. WIth the help of two frogs, Naruto begins to learn more and more about the truth of the matter....but will what he discovers, cost him his life?	Naruto	20	Too Late for Help	4
174	\N	In addition to Naruto's normal missions, he gets a special mission involving a VIP. Naruto is forced to hang out with a young boy, who likes ninja. However, the boy thinks money can buy him everything, and Naruto won't stand for that. Teaching the boy will prove to be difficult, especially when he is the target of kidnappers.	Naruto	20	Impossible! Celebrity Ninja Art - Money Style Jutsu!	4
183	\N	After Akahoshi tries to execute Sumaru, Hakato and the rest of the children stand up to protect their village. Akahoshi, finding the village turning against him, takes drastic steps to ensure his success. Naruto is the only one left who can take down this menace, can he do it alone? or will he find help from someone more powerful....	Naruto	20	The Star's Radiance	4
194	\N	Naruto, Hinata, and Kiba are sent to the Land of Honey to search for the Daimyō's wife. There, they find an eerie castle, and journey inside to search for clues.	Naruto	20	The Mysterious Curse of the Haunted Castle	4
22	\N	Santa's Little Helper nips at Marge, causing the family to reflect on the difficult life that the dog led prior to being adopted by the family. They end up reuniting him with his mother to avoid having to euthanize him.	The Simpsons	18	The Way of the Dog	31
13	\N	Bart becomes a successful caddy, but Marge worries it is ruining his character.	The Simpsons	18	Wad Goals	32
7	\N	On a divided Snowpiercer, Melanie intensifies her search for Layton while Layton is weaponizing her secret. Third Class faces a reckoning when he presents them with a choice.	Snowpiercer	19	The Universe Is Indifferent	1
7	\N		Snowpiercer	19	Our Answer for Everything	2
12	\N	Naruto has a dangerous encounter with Haku in the forest, but is Haku there to cause trouble? Naruto and Sasuke better complete their training, as Zabuza is alive and has returned for round 2. Will Kakashi, Sasuke, and Sakura be able to defeat the Demon of the Mist? And, can Naruto arrive in time to help out?	Naruto	20	Battle on the Bridge! Zabuza Returns!	1
19	\N	Zabuza is no longer Kakashi's enemy, and thanks to a little speech by Naruto about how ninja are, Zabuza takes on Gato's men single handedly. The Demon of the Hidden Mist takes his vengeance on Gato and all of those dumb enough to follow him, and apologizes to Haku for what he did to the kind little boy. After the group takes care of the rest of Gato's men, Zabuza asks Kakashi one final request, to see Haku one final time. This is Zabuza's requiem.	Naruto	20	The Demon in the Snow	1
29	\N	Sasuke is about to give up and give their scroll to the enemy, when Naruto stops him and accuses him of being a fake. Naruto then turns his attention to the Grass Ninja.... The battle is intense and when the Grass Ninja appears to get the upper hand, can Sasuke muster up the courage to fight?	Naruto	20	Naruto's Counterattack: Never Give In!	1
39	\N	Unable to use his chakra against Akado, Sasuke has to rely on good old-fashioned taijutsu to defeat him. Kakashi senses something is wrong with Sasuke and takes him away after the match.	Naruto	20	Bushy Brow's Jealousy - Lions Barrage Unleashed!	1
51	\N	As Chouji faces off against Dosu, Orochimaru gives an order for Kabuto to abduct Sasuke. He also tells Kabuto that if he wants to stop him, he'll have to kill Sasuke. As Kabuto approaches Sasuke, he hesitates on what to do. His spy cover is soon blown though, as Kakashi appears on the scene. Will Kakashi save Sasuke from Kabuto's grasp?	Naruto	20	A Shadow in the Darkness: Danger Approaches Sasuke	1
60	\N	The opening ceremony to the Final Matches begins and Sasuke is missing, worrying Naruto. The ceremony ends and Naruto starts his fight with Neji. Will Naruto's confidence lead him to a victory or are Neji's skills to much for him? And where is Sasuke?	Naruto	20	Byakugan vs. Shadow Clone Jutsu!	2
70	\N	Naruto, Sakura, Shikamaru, and Pakkun are being chased down by several Sound ninja. Shikamaru decides to stop and try to hold them off so the others can catch up to Sasuke without fear of pursuit. Shikamaru is the logical choice because of his Shadow Possession Jutsu...needless to say, Shikamaru's not too thrilled by this.	Naruto	20	A Shirker's Call to Action: Layabout No More!	2
82	\N	Kakashi takes on Itachi, with both of them using the Sharingan. However, Kakashi soon realizes that he stands no chance against the legendary ninja. Itachi reveals that he has not come for his little brother, but instead he's come to do something else...abduct Naruto, and Kyubi as well!	Naruto	20	Eye to Eye: Sharingan vs. Sharingan!	2
95	\N	Naruto finally lands a Rasengan into Kabuto's stomach, but not before Kabuto assures Naruto's certain death. Can Tsunade save him and protect him from Orochimaru?	Naruto	20	The Fifth Hokage! A Life on the Line!	2
105	\N	With Naruto's help, Idate reaches the Modoroki Shrine... But just as he's about to cross the bridge, an old nemesis stands in his way.	Naruto	20	A Fierce Battle of Rolling Thunder!	3
116	\N	While Naruto and the others go after Sasuke and the other Sound Ninja, Neji is locked in a desperate no-holds-barred battle with Kidomaru.	Naruto	20	360 Degrees of Vision: The Byakugan's Blind Spot	3
124	\N	Rock Lee's back and he's full of a special medicine that has Kimimaro on the run! Can he take out the fifth Sound Ninja?	Naruto	20	The Beast Within	3
138	\N	When Sasame drugs the gang, she prepares to hand them over to Orochimaru. But, when she discovers that they are to be killed, she has a change of heart...	Naruto	20	Pure Betrayal, and a Fleeting Plea!	3
148	\N	Naruto is unable to search for Sasuke due to Tsunade's orders, while Kiba and Hinata wonder how they can help him out. Shino remembers a special type of bug that if it is found, could easily track Sasuke down. they go and discuss it with Tsunade, who agrees to let them search for it, making Shino the leader. Tsunade discovers Naruto eavsfropping the conversation and lets him go with them. But, can they complete a mission with only a 10% success rate? As they travel, Naruto has difficulty dealing with Shino's bizzare behavior. Hinata also sneaks out in the middle of the night to practice some mysterious moves. After two days of travelling, they finally reach their destination. And they're not alone, a mysterious group is also after the same thing.	Naruto	20	Search for the Rare Bikochu Beetle	3
158	\N	Every Genin is assigned a squad of Cadets to lead on a mission that forces all of them to race to the top of a mountain to retrieve a scroll and, wouldn't you know it, guess who Naruto ends up leading? Its none other than the Konohamaru corps. However, when a storm causes the mission to be cancelled without his knowing, he will have to be a better leader than ever to keep his team alive!	Naruto	20	Follow My Lead! The Great Survival Challenge	3
168	\N	Mr. Ichiraku, the owner of the Ichiraku Ramen shop is in trouble. His daughter has been kidnapped and he only has two days to win her back! Can Nauruto, Chouji and Sakura help Mr. Ichiraku win the contest, or will he have to hand over his Legendary Ramen recipe?	Naruto	20	Mix It, Stretch It, Boil It Up! Burn, Copper Pot, Burn!	4
178	\N	About 200 years, a star fell to the Hidden Star Village. This star supposedly as mystic powers. However, the village has few ninja, so they require the help of other villages. Naruto accompanies Lee, Neji, and Tenten on a mission to protect it.	Naruto	20	Encounter! The Boy with a Star's Name	4
188	\N	The group splits off into two, in an attempt to deter their mysterious attackers. However, when Naruto and Chouji discover the plan hasn't worked as intended, they soon realise that somebody is hiding something important....	Naruto	20	Mystery of the Targeted Merchants	4
195	\N	When Lee misses his check-up with Tsunade, Naruto is sent to find him. Meanwhile Gai is training someone called Yagura and has decided that Lee and Yagura should have a training match. Can Lee beat the new trainee after hearing some uncomfortable news at his examination?	Naruto	20	The Third Super-Beast!	4
3	\N	Lisa stays home from school to explore the wonders of Western art. She appears as Lisanardo, while Bart takes the shape of a French impressionist, Homer and Marge as Diego Rivera and Frida Kahlo, and Maggie as a warrior Cupid.	The Simpsons	18	Now Museum, Now You Don't	32
12	\N	Bart finds his old teacher's diary and learns a surprising secret. Then, Lisa discovers an even bigger surprise.	The Simpsons	18	Diary Queen	32
6	\N	Hiding out with help from his allies, Layton lays track for revolution and an engineering emergency threatens every soul on Snowpiercer.	Snowpiercer	19	Trouble Comes Sideways	1
3	\N	Melanie embarks on her most dangerous mission yet, while Layton reckons with his personal choices.	Snowpiercer	19	A Great Odyssey	2
3	\N	Naruto is preparing himself for the Genin orientation. It's all a happy story until Sensei picks a team for all the ninjas. Naruto was teamed up with his crush, Sakura, and his worst enemy, Sasuke. Can Naruto learn to work together with two people whom despise him?	Naruto	20	Sasuke and Sakura: Friends or Foes?	1
8	\N	With Kakashi captured, Naruto, Sasuke and Sakura must defend against Zabuza's attacks. Naruto realizes that working together with Sasuke may be the only way to save Kakashi. Will the combined effort of the two be enough to free Kakashi and defeat Zabuza?	Naruto	20	The Oath of Pain	1
23	\N	A reunion of all the rookies isn't a very happy one, as all of them prepare to take the Chuunin Exam. With so many rivals around, Naruto's team will need help from a fellow ninja named Kabuto to know what they're up against. Will the group be able to last through the exam?	Naruto	20	Genin Takedown! All Nine Rookies Face Off!	1
31	\N	Since Sakura was the only one who did not get injured in the previous battle she must watch over and protect her teammates. Unknown to her though, there are enemies watching from the trees.... They attack, but a friend arrives to help. Will it be enough?	Naruto	20	Bushy Brow's Pledge: Undying Love and Protection	1
41	\N	Kankuro takes on Kabuto's teammate, Misumi, in a quick battle, proving how tough the Sand ninja really are. However, the real match comes when Sakura and Ino are pitted against one another!	Naruto	20	Kunoichi Rumble: The Rivals Get Serious!	1
50	\N	The match between Gaara and Lee draws to an end as Lee unleashes his ultimate move. But will even this be enough to defeat Gaara? Even if Lee does make it out in one piece, even more shocking news awaits him.	Naruto	20	The Fifth Gate: A Splendid Ninja is Born	1
61	\N	Naruto begins his assault with his Shadow Clones but Neji analyses Naruto's actions and determines what he believes to be the real one. Unable to figure out why Naruto won't admit defeat, he takes off his headband and reveals a mysterious mark on his forehead. What is the truth about his hatred towards the main family of the Hyuuga Clan?	Naruto	20	Ultimate Defense: Zero Blind Spot!	2
71	\N	The battle of kings has begun as Orochimaru has summoned some unexpected help. How can the Third Hokage handle this uncomfortable situation? Meanwhile, Sasuke finally catches up with Kakurou, Gaara and Temari...	Naruto	20	An Unrivaled Match: Hokage Battle Royale!	2
80	\N	As the war draws to a close, Gaara admits his defeat to Naruto, and Orochimaru is forced to retreat as Sarutobi took away his arms. Now, all of the Konoha shinobi gather together to pay their respects to the person whom they respected the most...Sarutobi, the Third Hokage.	Naruto	20	The Third Hokage, Forever...	2
93	\N	Because Orochimaru lied to her about not attacking Konoha, Tsunade begins her onslaught against him and Kabuto. Kabuto eats a food pill and begins to attack Tsunade with his medical techniques but are they enough to defeat her? Will Jiraiya, Shizune and Naruto show up in time?	Naruto	20	Breakdown! The Deal is Off!	2
103	\N	The trio continue to follow Idate while fending off attacks by three Shinobi sent to kill him. They find out later just how important winning this race is to the Wasabi clan's future...	Naruto	20	The Race is On! Trouble on the High Seas!	2
114	\N	With his life on the line against the Sound Ninja Jirobo, Choji looks back on the seeds of his friendship with Shikamaru. Can he defeat his fearsome opponent without any Chakra?	Naruto	20	Good-bye Old Friend...! I'll Always Believe in You!	3
123	\N	Naruto's Shadow Clones are no match for Kimimaro's attacks. But when an old bushy-browed buddy from the Leaf Village shows up, all bets are off!	Naruto	20	The Leaf's Handsome Devil!	3
133	\N	Naruto proves to be too much for Sasuke to handle as Naruto fights back with renewed vigour. Finally acknowledging Naruto's strength, Sasuke puts on his forehead protector, symbolizing both as equals. But when Sasuke's Sharingan is upgraded to level 3, the tables turn on Naruto. Just when all hope seems lost for Naruto, he undergoes a startling transformation, but will it be enough?	Naruto	20	A Plea from a Friend	3
146	\N	Naruto, Iruka and Pakkun meet up with Mizuki's fiancee Tsubaki and she has come to offer help to the three. Meanwhile, Shikamaru, Ino and Chouji are having trouble holding the two brothers at bay. While this is going on, Tsunade discovers a startling secret about Mizuki and Orochimaru and plans to take matters into her own hands....	Naruto	20	Orochimaru's Shadow	3
156	\N	Ranmaru is determined to bring Raiga back from the dead and appears to suceed! An enraged raiga now goes on the offensive, starting with Tenten. Karashi runs back to the Curry House to tell the others what has happened, but who's side is he really on?	Naruto	20	Raiga's Counterattack	3
166	\N	Sagi prepares his plans for revenge and he won't let anyone stand in his way! Disguised as the Noroimusha, he confronts Musou, but shocking news is revealed when they both reveal their true identities!	Naruto	20	When Time Stands Still	4
176	\N	Naruto, Kiba, and Hinata must make it back to Konoha and stop their evil look-alikes from ruining their village. The imposters think it'll be an easy task, but when the real Naruto and Kiba expose their weakness, they discover that it may not be so easy.	Naruto	20	Run, Dodge, Zigzag! Chase or Be Chased!	4
186	\N	Naruto and Shino go on a mission together to Motoyoshi Village, where a man named Fuuta has a strange request. To receive his inheritance money, he must not laugh at his fathers funeral. There is however one clause that may be enough to save him from losing everything when his relatives try every trick in the book, to cause laughter...	Naruto	20	Laughing Shino	4
193	\N	When Naruto returns from a mission, he discovers that Lee has set up a Dojo and is desperate for a challenger. When Gai discovers nobody has challenged him he steps up to the plate! However, a last minute change in plans throws changes everything, and when an imposter joins the fray, chaos ensues....	Naruto	20	Viva Dojo Challenge! Youth is All About Passion!	4
4	\N	The 31st annual Simpsons Halloween special includes a frightening look at the 2020 election, parodies of Toy Story and Spider-Man: Into the Spider-Verse and a 9th birthday Lisa just can't get over.	The Simpsons	18	Treehouse of Horror XXXI	32
1	\N	A grisly murder stokes class division on Snowpiercer, the Great Ark Train. Melanie Cavill, the powerful head of hospitality, deputizes a dangerous rebel to help solve the killing -- Andre Layton, the world's only surviving homicide detective.	Snowpiercer	19	First, the Weather Changed	1
1	\N	Mr. Wilford arrives and threatens Snowpiercer, so Melanie makes a move that can't be undone.	Snowpiercer	19	The Time of Two Engines	2
1	\N	Welcome to the Village Hidden in the Leaves, where deadly serious Ninja roam the landscape and the seriously mischievous Naruto Uzumaki causes trouble everywhere he goes. But when he steals the ancient scroll of sealing, he unleashes a rare power rarely seen in a 12-year-old boy!	Naruto	20	Enter: Naruto Uzumaki!	1
5	\N	Time is running out for Naruto and his group. With Sasuke the only one left, he tries to succeed where the others failed. Will they be able to get the bells before time runs out?	Naruto	20	You Failed! Kakashi's Final Decision	1
15	\N	Naruto and Sasuke continue to fight Haku and are getting beaten bad. After having Naruto try and escape a few times, Sasuke begins to see a pattern. Meanwhile, outside Kakashi and Zabuza begin their fight. Can Naruto and Sasuke escape from Haku's jutsu? What plan does Zabuza have to defeat the Sharingan?	Naruto	20	Zero Visibility: The Sharingan Shatters	1
25	\N	As time ticks away, Naruto's only hope of passing the test lies in the final question. However, there is a requirement to answering the final question. If you choose not to answer it, you fail the test and can try again next time. But, if you choose to answer it and get it wrong, you can never take the test again and must stay a Genin forever! What will Naruto's choice be?	Naruto	20	The Tenth Question: All or Nothing	1
35	\N	Team Kakashi still has only one scroll and there is only a day left before the test ends. Naruto decides they need to make a fake scroll and goes to open their Earth scroll, when Kabuto shows up and stops him, explaining that the scroll will knock them out until after the exam ends. He then tells them he will help them find the scroll they need. They seem to be the ones on the hunt, but what happens when they fall into a trap set by the enemy?	Naruto	20	The Scroll's Secret: No Peeking Allowed	1
45	\N	The battle between Naruto and Kiba draws to a close, with each of them giving it everything they've got. After being tricked by Naruto, Kiba can no longer rely on Akamaru's help. Naruto decides now is the time to release his new jutsu, only Kiba won't give him time to prepare it!	Naruto	20	Surprise Attack! Naruto's Secret Weapon!	1
55	\N	Sakura goes to visit Sasuke and Lee in the hospital, along the way, she meets up with Ino and the two make the trip together. Lee tries to resume his training with limited success, making Sakura worry more about him and Sasuke.	Naruto	20	A Feeling of Yearning, A Flower Full of Hope	2
64	\N	Shikamaru takes on Temari, only he doesn't want to fight. Can the lazy Shikamaru even last the round? Or is there more to Shikamaru than meets the eye?	Naruto	20	Zero Motivation: The Guy with Cloud Envy!	2
74	\N	While Shino and Kankuro fight the match they should've fought back during the Chuunin Exam, Naruto, Sakura, and Pakkun slowly catch up to Sasuke. Meanwhile, Sasuke has finally caught up with Gaara and Temari, but is he ready to face true horror when Gaara reveals his demon form?	Naruto	20	Astonishing Truth! Gaara's Identity Emerges!	2
83	\N	Jiraiya and Naruto begin their search for Tsunade, but are constantly sidetracked by Jiraiya's peeping and hitting on pretty girls. Jiraiya tells Naruto some stories about the 3rd and 4th Hokages. Meanwhile, Sasuke learns that his brother, Itachi, is after Naruto and goes to warn him.	Naruto	20	Jiraiya: Naruto's Potential Disaster!	2
96	\N	With Tsunade in her current conidtion, and Jiraiya still under the effects of the drug, Tsunade and Jiraiya must work together to defeat Orochimaru. And with all three ninja having summoned their signature beasts, it's sure to be one heck of a battle!	Naruto	20	Deadlock! Sannin Showdown!	2
107	\N	Hospital bound and feeling his pride shattered, Sasuke finds there is only way to redeem himself: Battle Naruto! Meanwhile, the Ino-Shika-Cho Squad sit down for some barbeque to celebrate a special occasion!	Naruto	20	The Battle Begins: Naruto vs. Sasuke	3
113	\N	Upon breaking free from the Earth Dome Prison, The Sasuke Retrieval Squad realize they don't have enough chakra to take on Jirobo... but Choji's got another idea up his sleeve.	Naruto	20	Full Throttle Power! Choji, Ablaze!	3
122	\N	Shikamaru's got his hands full with Tayuya and her melodic attacks. Can he stop her and put an end to her malevolent flute playing?	Naruto	20	Fakeout: Shikamaru's Comeback!	3
132	\N	Kakashi learns the truth about the chase after Sasuke, and orders his dogs, including Pakkun, to go find Naruto and Sasuke. However, things are looking grim as the clash between the Chidori and the Rasengan ensues. The attacks are even, causing Naruto and Sasuke to both fly back. Naruto finally realizes how serious Sasuke is, and gets the snot beat out of him while he remembers how he always wanted to be friends with Sasuke.	Naruto	20	For a Friend	3
145	\N	Naruto's backup has arrived and they are Shikamaru, Ino, and Chouji. They tell Naruto that they will take care of the brothers. Naruto leaves to catch up to Iruka, who is fighting Mizuki. Can Naruto arrive before Mizuki kills Iruka? And can Shikamaru, Ino, and Chouji hold off the brothers?	Naruto	20	A New Formation: Ino-Shika-Cho!	3
155	\N	With Raiga seemingly defeated, the group can get on with clearing up the remaining enemy Ninja and returning the village to normal. However, what will they do with Ranmaru who tells them about his tragic past?	Naruto	20	The Dark Creeping Clouds	3
165	\N	Kakashi orders Neji and Tenten to return to the village with him, much to their protest. Meanwhile Koumei is about to be executed, at least until the Noroimusha shows up! Is the ghost an ally or an enemy and whatever became of Naruto? Questions are answered as Sagi reveals the truth!	Naruto	20	The Death of Naruto	4
175	\N	Naruto, Kiba, and Hinata are ordered on a special mission: A treasure hunt! There is a downside though; if they fail the mission, they have to go back to the Academy. They set off confident that the mission will be easy, but still worried about having to go back to the academy. Everything is going as well as expected until some mysterious characters show up. Can Naruto and crew find the gold, or will they have to go back to the Academy with the other little kids?	Naruto	20	The Treasure Hunt is On!	4
185	\N	While Naruto trains in the forest, a mysterious creature latches onto his back. This legendary creature can't be removed until it becomes an adult, but that's only the beginning of Naruto's problems.	Naruto	20	A Legend from the Hidden Leaf: The Onbaa!	4
8	\N	Odd couple Skinner and Chalmers embark on an 800-mile car ride to Cincinnati to attend an administrator's convention - but can they reach their destination without killing each other first?	The Simpsons	18	The Road to Cincinnati	32
5	\N	Tensions between Third Class and First Class are boiling as Melanie stages the trial of the Snowpiercer killer. Third Class threatens a work stoppage, demanding representation on the jury, and Melanie makes a fateful decision about which side to favor.	Snowpiercer	19	Justice Never Boarded	1
6	\N		Snowpiercer	19	Many Miles From Snowpiercer	2
10	\N	With Zabuza gone things are now settling and Tazuna can go and build the bridge without fear. Or so everyone thinks. Kakashi believes something is wrong with Zabuza's death and teaches Naruto, Sakura, and Sasuke a way to train so they could better use their chakra. Is Zabuza really dead?	Naruto	20	The Forest of Chakra	1
18	\N	Kakashi prepares to stop Zabuza once and for all, but Haku has other plans. Zabuza's employer shows up and he's decided to take matters into his own hands...	Naruto	20	The Weapons Known as Shinobi	1
34	\N	Kiba, Shino, and Hinata decide to try and eliminate their opponents by taking more scrolls. They arrive upon a battlefield where three Rain ninjas are battling Gaara, Kankuro, and Temari. They remain hidden and observe the battle, thinking one of the Rain ninjas is a dangerous foe. After realizing Gaara's amazing abilities, they discover who is the really the dangerous one, and will be lucky if they can sneak away with their lives!	Naruto	20	Akamaru Trembles: Gaara's Cruel Strength!	1
43	\N	Temari of the Sand Village battles against Tenten from the Leaf Village. After the battle its Shikamaru's turn, but can he defeat an opponent who has already seen his moves once before?	Naruto	20	Killer Kunoichi and a Shaky Shikamaru	1
53	\N	While Ebisu trains Naruto at a hotspring, he spots someone trying to peep on the women bathing! Ebisu attacks, but it doesn't go quite as planned. Naruto then demands that the stranger become his teacher instead, but he's going to need some convincing. Does Naruto have any special Jutsu for this situation?	Naruto	20	Long Time No See: Jiraiya Returns!	2
63	\N	With Sasuke still absent, and everyone anxiously anticipating his match against Gaara, the tournament is forced to move on to the next round. Meanwhile, Neji learns the shocking truth about his father.	Naruto	20	Hit It or Quit It: The Final Rounds Get Complicated!	2
73	\N	An unlikely ally appears to help Sasuke and allows him to continue to pursue Gaara. Meanwhile, the Hokage prepares to make the ultimate sacrifice to rid his village of Orochimaru!	Naruto	20	Forbidden Secret Technique: Reaper Death Seal!	2
85	\N	Jiraiya and Naruto look on as Sasuke takes on Itachi alone. However, when the young ninja is severely outclassed, Jiraiya is forced to step in. Itachi and Kisame try to flee, but Jiraiya isn't about to let them get away so easily.	Naruto	20	Hate Among the Uchihas: The Last of the Clan	2
90	\N	Jiraiya and Naruto catch up to Tsunade, whereupon she learns that Konoha wants her to be the 5th Hokage. She refuses the title, angering Naruto, who mistakes her for being a weakling. Naruto learns first-hand how strong she really is. Naruto decides now is the time to try out the Rasengan, only he hasn't perfected it yet.	Naruto	20	Unforgivable! A Total Lack of Respect!	2
100	\N	As Lee decides whether or not to go through with the operation, Gai decides to give him some motivation. Meanwhile, Tsunade frantically struggles to increase the operation's success rate.	Naruto	20	Sensei and Student: The Bond of a Shinobi!	2
110	\N	Now that word of Sasuke's departure has spread to the Fifth Hokage, she calls upon the newest Chunin, Shikamaru, to put together a squad to bring Sasuke back to the village.	Naruto	20	Formation! The Sasuke Retrieval Squad	3
121	\N	With the Sasuke retrieval squad now split into individual battles, it's up to Naruto, Kiba and Shikamaru to stop the sound ninja. But little do they realize that there's more to their opponents than their basic techniques.	Naruto	20	To Each His Own Battle	3
131	\N	While Naruto is busy underwater, Sasuke remembers the fateful day in which his clan was killed. He remembers why Itachi spared his life, and why Itachi did what what he did. Now, in order to gain the same power as his brother, he must kill his closest friend...Naruto!	Naruto	20	The Secrets of the Mangekyō Sharingan	3
144	\N	Naruto is having trouble with the two brothers and Iruka is having his share of difficulties with Mizuki! Iruka struggles to try and get the old Mizuki back but he doesn't have much success.... Meanwhile, when things are looking bleak for Naruto, can 3 friendly Ninja save the day?	Naruto	20	A New Squad! Two People and a Dog?!	3
153	\N	Out to try and save Rourusuke, Naruto and the others ambush members of the Kurosuke Family and save an old man. They soon hear the funeral bell and go and save Rourusuke. However, Rock lee meets an old friend among the group, and Lee must now convince Kurashi to return his his old way of life. Their time together is cut short, as Raiga watches from the sidelines. Can Naruto, Neji, Rock Lee, and Tenten defeat an enemy that not even Neji's Byakugan can see?	Naruto	20	A Lesson Learned: The Iron Fist of Love!	3
162	\N	Naruto, Tenten, and Neji travel to the Bird Country to exterminate a ghost named Noroimusha.	Naruto	20	The Cursed Warrior	4
172	\N	After narrowly escaping the collapsing lab, Naruto and the others must catch up to the money convoy. However, Amachi has already set his trap, and the convoy crew has taken the bait. Naruto and the others arrive to save the day, as all of them prepare for battle. But can the group defeat Amachi when he reveals his true self? And what will happen when Isaribi realizes how far Naruto will go to save her?	Naruto	20	Despair: A Fractured Heart	4
181	\N	Naruto has been rescued by the mysterious woman and soon learns who she really is. Can the two of them continue the mission the was started so very long ago and what will Subaru think when he discovers the truth?	Naruto	20	Hoshikage: The Buried Truth	4
197	\N	Naruto meets an old man, a construction worker named Gennou. However, when Gennou steals plans for some of the buildings in Konoha, Naruto suddenly finds himself under investigation by the ANBU. What is the truth behind Gennou and why does nobody seem to know what is going on?	Naruto	20	Crisis: The Hidden Leaf 11 Gather!	4
208	\N	Naruto and Kiba are ordered to escort a man named Shinemon who is transporting a rare and valuable artifact. However, when Bandits steal the artifact, can the pair retrieve it and keep Shinemon alive?	Naruto	20	The Weight of the Prized Artifact!	4
220	\N	The exciting conclusion to Naruto. What will become of Gaara, and now that Jiraiya has returned, will Naruto finally leave Konoha to begin his training?	Naruto	20	Departure	4
2	\N	Layton uses his new position as train detective to investigate the murder while gathering intel for the revolution on the side. Meanwhile, Melanie faces a resource crisis, with potentially drastic consequences for the entire train.	Snowpiercer	19	Prepare to Brace	1
2	\N	An exchange is made between the two trains, but a far greater revelation might be just over the horizon.	Snowpiercer	19	Smolder to Life	2
2	\N	Naruto finally graduates from the Ninja Academy and claims to know it all. Well, at least that what he tells Konohamaru, the Village elder's pint-size grandson. Much to the dismay of Ebisu, Konohamaru's teacher and mentor, Naruto teaches him the hormonally lethal "Sexy Jutsu!"	Naruto	20	My Name is Konohamaru!	1
14	\N	Naruto finally joins the battle on the bridge. But when Naruto stupidly gets caught in the middle of Haku's jutsu as well, he and Sasuke must work together to escape. Kakashi is unable to help them, as he must deal with Zabuza to protect Sakura and Tazuna. How will the two escape from the ice mirrors without any help?	Naruto	20	The Number One Hyperactive, Knucklehead Ninja Joins the Fight!	1
21	\N	After the three ninjas take their leave, Sasuke realizes he has a powerful rival out there. The next day, Kakashi announces that he has recommended all of them for the Chuunin Exams. While Naruto and Sasuke are pleased, Sakura is afraid of letting everyone down. Also, someone decides they aren't ready and decides to test their abilities.	Naruto	20	Identify Yourself: Powerful New Rivals	1
33	\N	With Sakura defeated and facing certain death, more reinforcements step into the fray. However, they sense an even bigger level of power, and its not coming from the sound trio! Meanwhile Sasuke wakes up with an ominous dark aura surrounding him and the mysterious seal spreading over his body. He has but one goal....make his enemies pay!	Naruto	20	Battle Formation: Ino-Shika-Cho!	1
44	\N	The match between Kiba and Naruto kicks off, with Kiba immediately proving he has the upper hand in the battle. Everyone still believes Naruto is the weak ninja he's always been, everyone except for Hinata, Kakashi, and Sakura. Now it's Naruto's time to shine, and this time...everyone will be watching him!	Naruto	20	Akamaru Unleashed! Who's Top Dog Now?	1
54	\N	While Jiraiya attempts to teach Naruto the Summoning Jutsu, while doing research as well, Dosu learns the hard way why Gaara is so dangerous. Meanwhile, Baki and Kabuto secretly meet and reveal a sinister plot against Konoha. When Hayate discovers this dark secret, he attempts to warn the Hokage. However, he'll have to get through Baki first!	Naruto	20	Summoning Jutsu; Wisdom of the Toad Sage!	2
65	\N	It's time for Sasuke's match against Gaara, only Sasuke has yet to show up. Normally they'd disqualify him, but everyone's anxiously awaiting the match. Therefore, they give Sasuke a time limit before disqualifying him. As time slowly begins to run out, only one question remains on everyone's mind...where's Sasuke?	Naruto	20	Dancing Leaf, Squirming Sand	2
75	\N	Sasuke struggles to keep up with Gaara's monstrous capacity. Only able to use Chidori twice in normal circumstances, Sasuke remembers that tragic day when his family died and realises he must risk the use of Chidori beyond his limit if he is to defeat Gaara. That is, if he can...	Naruto	20	Sasuke's Decision: Pushed to the Edge!	2
84	\N	Sasuke remembers the day that Itachi single-handedly wiped out the entire Uchiha clan as he desperately searches for Naruto. However, Itachi and Kisame have already found him.	Naruto	20	Roar, Chidori! Brother vs. Brother!	2
97	\N	The group are on their way back to Konoha when they stop at a town with hotsprings. Unknown to them they are being watched by men looking for Tsunade. Naruto's room gets raided and the necklace he was given goes missing with nothing but a ransom note left behind. What does it all mean? Can Naruto get the necklace back and why are they looking for Tsunade in the first place?	Naruto	20	Kidnapped! Naruto's Hot Spring Adventure!	2
104	\N	While the Shinobi that is working for Wasarabi begins to beat up Idate, Naruto, Sasuke and Sakura finally reach the same island. However, some old enemies appear to get in their way once again! Will they manage to find Idate and rescue him before its too late?	Naruto	20	Run Idate, Run! Nagi Island Awaits!	2
117	\N	Neji's on the run from Kidomaru's bow and arrow attacks. Will Neji make it out alive or will his new-found enemy hit his blindspot dead on?	Naruto	20	Losing is Not an Option!	3
125	\N	Down for the count and at the mercy of the Sound Ninja, Kiba, Shikamaru and Rock Lee get help from an unlikely bunch of new allies.	Naruto	20	The Sand Shinobi: Allies of the Leaf	3
134	\N	The battle between Naruto and Sasuke comes to a close, as One-Tailed Naruto takes on Cursed Seal Level 2 Sasuke in one final Rasengan vs. Chidori clash! And this time...only one person will emerge victorious. Will Kakashi and Pakkun make it in time? And who is this mysterious ninja watching everything?	Naruto	20	The End of Tears	3
147	\N	Mizuki is determined to make Naruto and Iruka suffer and it appears that he has the upper edge with his improved strength and speed! Shikamaru, Ino and Chouji are also at their limits and now Fuujin and Raijin are free. Can Tsunade arrive in time to help?	Naruto	20	A Clash of Fate: You Can't Bring Me Downe	3
157	\N	Lee is left facing Raiga alone while Tenten and the others hurry to bring them the curry of life. Ranmaru is reunited with Raiga, but are things the same as they were before?	Naruto	20	Run! The Curry of Life	3
167	\N	Shima saves Naruto from Ooki's genjutsu trap and proceeds to try and protect him. When all seems lost for our hero, a mysterious white figure appears and asks him to grant one last wish. Will Naruto find the strength to grant this request and save the day?	Naruto	20	When Egrets Flap Their Wings	4
177	\N	Naruto accidently meets up with Jiraiya and demands that he trains him. Jiraiya refuses however, as he has to finish the next volume of his series. Anxiously wanting to train, Naruto tries to help and as usual, it all goes wrong. Naruto and Jiraiya vs the Courier Ninja, who will come out on top?	Naruto	20	Please, Mr. Postman!!	4
187	\N	Naruto, Hinata, and Chouji are chosen on a mission to protect some peddlers running away from a war at the Greenery Country. However, Tsunade gave them more than just a simple guard duty mission, making them movers as well. The peddlers are just simple folk, who were never even registered citizens in the country. But, when Naruto discovers the group is being pursued, the three ninja realize that there is more going on than meets the eyes.	Naruto	20	Open for Business! The Leaf Moving Service	4
192	\N	When the daughter of a Feudal Lord calls for a double, Ino is brought in to take her place. The only problem is they look nothing alike, the princess has become big boned because she had a lot of stress and ate a lot. Now Ino must stand in for her and arrange a marriage with a man from Udon Country. Can Ino arrage the marriage without problem?	Naruto	20	Ino Screams! Chubby Paradise!	4
3	\N	Layton descends into the black market with Till, searching for both the killer and a valuable commodity for his revolution. Melanie stages a prize fight to distract the passengers from mounting class tension.	Snowpiercer	19	Access Is Power	1
4	\N	As the Big Alice crew are granted shore leave on Snowpiercer, Layton and Wilford have differing opinions on the future.	Snowpiercer	19	A Single Trade	2
4	\N	Naruto finally meets his new sensei. His name is Kakashi Hatake. He tells the group that before they could become Genin, they will have to pass his survival test. The problem is, the test has a 66% chance of failure, and if they fail they'll be sent back to the academy. To make matters even worse, one of them will fail no matter what. Can the three pass Kakashi's test?	Naruto	20	Pass or Fail: Survival Test	1
9	\N	With Kakashi free, the fight between him and Zabuza resumes. Kakashi decides to show Zabuza what the Sharingan is really capable of. Can Kakashi's Sharingan defeat Zabuza? And who is the mysterious person watching the fight?	Naruto	20	Kakashi: Sharingan Warrior	1
24	\N	The first test of the Chuunin Exam is just that, a written test. When Ibiki issues a strict set of rules, Naruto fails to realize that the objective of the test is to cheat without getting caught. Can Naruto realize the truth before time runs out? And what about the tenth question?	Naruto	20	Start Your Engines: The Chūnin Exam Begins!	1
32	\N	Lee in his weakened state is having trouble defeating Dosu. Sakura realises everyone has been protecting her until now and that its her time to protect them! Can Sakura succeed where even Lee failed?	Naruto	20	Sakura Blossoms!	1
42	\N	Sakura and Ino prepare to settle the score once and for all! However, when Sakura becomes the victim of Ino's Mind-Body Switch Justu, will she be forced to give up the match?	Naruto	20	The Ultimate Battle: Cha!	1
52	\N	Naruto wants Kakashi to train him, but Kakashi has other plans. Ebisu arrives to an unhappy Naruto and makes a deal with him. If Naruto can get away from Ebisu, he'll make Kakashi train him. Naruto decides to accept Ebisu's challenge, but can he win?	Naruto	20	Ebisu Returns: Naruto's Toughest Training Yet!	1
62	\N	When it looks as if Naruto can't win, Neji continues to tell him that he cannot change his fate and that he has no idea what it feels like to carry a seal that cannot be removed. Naruto thinks back about his childhood and how he was treated because of the Nine-Tails sealed inside him. However, that same curse may prove to be his only chance at winning...	Naruto	20	A Failure's True Power	2
72	\N	While Naruto and Sakura continue to catch up to Sasuke, Temari trys to stall Sasuke long enough for Kankuro to get Gaara to safety, but Sasuke doesn't have time to waste on her! Meanwhile, The Third Hokage continues his battle with Orochimaru and is ready to use a move that not even he knows...	Naruto	20	A Mistake from the Past: A Face Revealed!	2
81	\N	Two mysterious ninja infiltrate Konoha, and one of them bares the Sharingan. Just what are these two after? Why has Itachi Uchiha returned to Konoha?	Naruto	20	Return of the Morning Mist	2
94	\N	With Tsunade still paralized with fear and Naruto being a low level ninja, it is up to Shizune and Jiraiya to defeat Kabuto and Orochimaru. Orochimaru and Kabuto summon two giant snakes while Jiraiya summons Gamakichi, who does nothing. Naruto tries to help Jiraya, but he too only summons a small frog that also does nothing. Orochimaru and Kabuto attack and Shizune is easily defeated. Naruto tries Rasengan but fails. Can he master the technique before Kabuto does anything to Tsunade? How far will he go to master it?	Naruto	20	Attack! Fury of the Rasengan!	2
102	\N	Naruto, Sakura and Sasuke find out their newest mission will be without Kakashi who has responsibilities elsewhere. Tsunade sends them to the Tea Country to protect someone, but the details are vague at best. Along the way they meet Idate Morino who causes the group a lot of trouble, especially when they discover who they have to protect!	Naruto	20	Mission: Help an Old Friend in the Land of Tea	2
118	\N	In pursuit of the Sound Ninja, Naruto, Kiba and Shikamaru strike at dawn to retrieve Sasuke and bring him back to the Hidden Leaf Village.	Naruto	20	The Vessel Arrives Too Late	3
127	\N	As Gaara demonstrates he has more than enough backbone to take on Kimimaro, Orochimaru recollects on how he brought him as a young man into the Sound Village.	Naruto	20	Vengeful Strike! The Bracken Dance!	3
135	\N	Shikamaru's group is brought back to Konoha with many injuries. Neji and Chouji could possibly die, Kiba has a deep wound but nothing too serious, and Naruto and Shimakamru have a few injuries. When Sakura finds out they are back ,she goes immediatley to see Sasuke and Naruto but finds out Sasuke got away. Can Naruto keep his promise to Sakura? And what news does the Jiraiya have for Naruto?	Naruto	20	The Promise That Could Not Be Kept	3
139	\N	Sasame leads Naruto, Jiraiya, and Sakura to Orochimaru's hideout. They send Sasame back to the village because of the danger level. Jiraiya summons Gamakichi to go in first and investigate. The four come to three tunnels. Jiraiya goes off to the right, Naruto and Sakura down the middle and Gamakichi down the left. Will the four of them make it past the traps?	Naruto	20	Pure Terror! The House of Orochimaru	3
150	\N	With Hinata's safety in danger, the group must try and figure out a way to save her and protect the Bikouchuu at the same time. Every time one side seems to have an edge though, the other reveals yet a new trick. As dawn approaches, they don't have long left....can they succeed?	Naruto	20	A Battle of Bugs: The Deceivers and the Deceived	3
160	\N	Turns out Sazanami is really a wanted criminal named Toukichi who is wanted for the murder of a family of three. Truth is however, he's innocent, and wants to capture the man responsible to prove it! Sazanami teams up with the Konoha group to stop Gosunki once and for all....	Naruto	20	Hunt or Be Hunted?! Showdown at the O.K. Temple!	4
170	\N	Naruto is recovering thanks to the mysterious girl, Isaribi. While Naruto is recovering, Anko, Shino, and Ino search for him and also meet the man in charge of the payroll shipment. The group eventually meets back up, but not before finding the sea monster's lair.	Naruto	20	The Closed Door	4
184	\N	When Akamaru is taken ill and starts to undergo a mysterious transformation, can Kiba do anything to save his friend? When the whole village appears to be against him what lengths will he go through, to protect his friend?	Naruto	20	Kiba's Long Day!	4
198	\N	In order to get the information they need about Gennou, the ANBU put Naruto in a trance, hoping to prong the information they need from Naruto's memory. However, even by doing all of this, will they get the information they need?	Naruto	20	The ANBU Gives Up? Naruto's Recollection	4
206	\N	Naruto, Kurenai, Yakumo and Team 8 return to Konoha to a shocking discovery. Can this really be reality or is it all some kind of sick illusion?	Naruto	20	Genjutsu or Reality?	4
6	\N	Tired of doing lame missions, Naruto asks the Hokage to give them something challenging. The Hokage caves and gives them a C-rank mission. They will be bodyguards for a bridge builder. It appears to be a simple mission, until the group is attacked by something more than common thugs...other ninja!	Naruto	20	A Dangerous Mission! Journey to the Land of Waves!	1
16	\N	Naruto and Sasuke continue their rigorous battle against Haku. When Haku targets a vulnerable Naruto, Sasuke risks everything to save him. Seeing his friend lie before him, a powerful force awakens inside Naruto. Has Kyubi been set free. If so, can anyone stop him?	Naruto	20	The Broken Seal	1
26	\N	Before the second exam can begin, Konohamaru and his friends pull the members of Team 7 aside for interviews, where they retell the storyline to this point.	Naruto	20	Special Report: Live from the Forest of Death!	1
36	\N	Naruto and the gang realise they have been caught in an illusionary technique and then they are attacked! Can the four defeat the ninja when they can't even see them and what are Kabuto's true reasons for helping out the group?	Naruto	20	Clone vs. Clone: Mine are Better than Yours!	1
46	\N	Kiba alerts Hinata, as he's being taken away, that there are only a few fighters left. He warns her that if she fights Gaara, she has to give up immediately or she could be killed. He also tells her to give up if paired against Neji, because Neji already has issues with her. Just then, the board shows the next fight...Hinata vs. Neji. Just how far will Hinata go to prove herself?	Naruto	20	Byakugan Battle: Hinata Grows Bold!	1
56	\N	Since Naruto is having little to no success at summoning frogs, Jiraiya figures that if Naruto's to learn how summon Kyubi's chakra, he's going to need to be put into a life-threating situation. After having Naruto do a bunch of tasks, he throws Naruto off a cliff. Naruto's only hope of survival lies within an encounter with the Nine-Tailed Demon Fox himself. But, will Kyubi be willing to help him?	Naruto	20	Live or Die: Risk It All to Win It All!	2
66	\N	Sasuke's match against Gaara finally begins! Gaara seems to have the upper hand at the beginning, until Sasuke shows off his newly found taijutsu techniques. Gaara is reliving the battle against Rock Lee all over again, only this time he's facing an opponent who can use more than simple taijutsu attacks.	Naruto	20	Bushy Brow's Jutsu: Sasuke Style!	2
76	\N	As Sasuke is about to be defeated, Naruto and Sakura show up to save him. With this Gaara begins to have flashbacks of his childhood. What happened in Gaara's past to make him experience so much suffering?	Naruto	20	Assassin of the Moonlit Night	2
86	\N	Now that Sasuke is in safe hands, Naruto and Jiraiya can continue their search for Tsunade. When they arrive at a city with a festival on the way, Jiraiya and Naruto have some fun, at least until Naruto puts a stain on a man's shirt. Jiraiya uses a new technique that easily defeats the man and offers to teach it to Naruto. What is this new technique and can Naruto master it?	Naruto	20	A New Training Begins: I Will Be Strong	2
91	\N	Naruto makes a bet with Tsunade, that if he can master the Rasengan in one week, she'll give him a necklace belonging the to the First Hokage. However, Shizune reveals some startling information. Everybody, except for Tsunade, who's worn that necklace has died the next day!	Naruto	20	Inheritance! The Necklace of Death!	2
108	\N	As their rivalry reaches a fever pitch, Kakashi-sensei breaks up the battle and sends Naruto and Sasuke to their corners. Meanwhile, Four Sound ninja enter the Hidden Leaf Village with only one thing on their mind... Sasuke!	Naruto	20	Bitter Rivals and Broken Bonds	3
115	\N	Hot on Sasuke's trail, Shikamaru and his squad get caught up in a web of unparalled chakra when they tangle with the six-armed Kidomaru!	Naruto	20	Your Opponent Is Me!	3
126	\N	Itching to fight and with a sense of guilt from the past, Gaara tells Rock Lee to stand down and let him take on Kimimaro. Meanwhile, Naruto continues on his quest to catch the runaway Sasuke.	Naruto	20	Showdown: Gaara vs. Kimimaro	3
136	\N	Jiraiya begins to worry about Naruto and Sakura's wellbeing. He then requests that Tsunade send them on a mission with him. He finds Naruto telling Sakura he is not going to stop her from going after Sasuke, but he is going with her, and tells them about the mission. They head off to Rice Country to find the Hidden Sound Village, and hopefully Sasuke as well.	Naruto	20	Deep Cover?! A Super S-Ranked Mission!	3
140	\N	Naruto arrives in the nick of time to save Sakura, but not before Kabuto tells her that Sasuke is dead! Naruto attacks but ends up tangled in a deadly trap of Kabuto's. Is it all over for our hero and will they find Arashi?	Naruto	20	Two Heartbeats: Kabuto's Trap	3
149	\N	The group struggles to find a Bikouchuu, but seem to fail at every turn. When it starts to rain they realise they only have one more chance to find it, will Hinata's Byakugan be enough?	Naruto	20	What's the Difference? Don't All Insects Look Alike?	3
159	\N	Naruto, Hinata and Kiba are sent off on a mission to capture a thief named Gosunkugi. However, on the way they meet another bounty hunter, who is after the same target as them....	Naruto	20	Bounty Hunter from the Wilderness	4
169	\N	Being some of the few Genins available, Naruto, Ino, and Shino are forced to accompany Anko on her mission to the Sea Country to destroy a sea monster and protect a boat carrying gold. However, Anko is acting strange as she begins to remember more and more events from her past, and the connection she once had with Orochimaru.	Naruto	20	Remembrance: The Lost Page	4
179	\N	When the mysterious attacker flies away with the star, using only their Chakra, the Konoha group are left in the dust. They swear to reclaim the star but it isn't as simple as they might hope. Meanwhile, Naruto learns some of Subaru's history and Natsuhiboshi...	Naruto	20	The Remembered Lullaby	4
191	\N	The battle with the third and final evil ninja is on. He has only one desire and that is to kill Princess Haruna. Will Naruto be able to defeat this new menace and save Haruna?	Naruto	20	Forecast: Death! Cloudy with Chance of Sun!	4
201	\N	While Shikamaru tries to figure out what Gennou is planning next, Naruto is fighting Gennou in the Great Stone faces. Can Shikamaru stop Gennou's next step in the plan before it is to late? And will Naruto be able to defeat the Trap Master?	Naruto	20	Multiple Traps! Countdown to Destruction	4
216	\N	A Sand shinobi, Matsuri, has been abducted by a mysterious ninja. In order to bring them bring back, Gaara must accept the mystery ninja's challenge. Can Naruto prevent this challenge ending in catastrophe?	Naruto	20	The Targeted Shukaku	4
7	\N	Team Kakashi and Tazuna are on their way to his home. On the way there they run across a ninja named, Zabuza Momochi. Is the Sharingan enough to defeat this new enemy, or is team Kakashi's first mission over before its even begun?	Naruto	20	The Assassin of the Mist!	1
17	\N	Naruto takes out his rage on Haku, who doesn't stand a chance. However, Naruto realises that Haku is the boy he met back at the forest. Haku tells Naruto the story of his past and asks for Naruto to do him one favour..... Will Naruto do the one thing he could never do just as Haku wishes?	Naruto	20	White Past: Hidden Ambition	1
27	\N	The second exam is about to begin, and every ninja must sign a form so that their team can get either the Heaven or Earth Scroll. The goal is to get one of each scroll and make it to the tower in five days. The groups get their scrolls and the exam begins. Naruto is ambushed by a ninja who poses as him. This ninja doesn't fool Sasuke, who immediately figures it out. Meanwhile, a new foe seeks them out, but who is this foe?	Naruto	20	The Chunin Exam Stage 2: The Forest of Death	1
37	\N	The exam is over, but did they truly pass? An old friend arrives to explain and show his concern. Meanwhile, Anko informs the ANBU about Orochimaru, the S-Class criminal who even they cannot stop. Later the Third Hokage explains to everyone what the third exam truly means....	Naruto	20	Surviving the Cut! The Rookie Nine Together Again!	1
47	\N	Hinata will not give up so easily, especially with Naruto watching her. Will Hinata be willing to give up her own life in order to prove herself, or will the match be stopped before Neji can connect a killing move?	Naruto	20	A Failure Stands Tall!	1
57	\N	Overjoyed at his success, Naruto manages to enrage Gamabunta. With him not willing to accept that Naruto was able to summon him, Naruto challenges Gamabunta to accept him as his subordinate if he is able to stay on his back until sundown.	Naruto	20	He Flies! He Jumps! He Lurks! Chief Toad Appears!	2
68	\N	Sasuke's match is interrupted when Orochimaru puts his plan into action. Temari and Kankuro are ordered to get Gaara to safety until he recovers, leaving Sasuke to chase after them. War has begun!	Naruto	20	Zero Hour! The Destruction of the Hidden Leaf Village Begins!	2
78	\N	Naruto and Gaara continue their fight. Naruto begins to get an advantage, and Gaara transforms into the final form of Shukaku of the Sand. As he begins to put the squeeze on Naruto, Naruto summons Gamabunta Oyabun, and his comeback begins. Once again, Naruto begins to get an advantage, but Gaara casts the technique of fake sleep, releasing the full power of Shukaku. Now that the demon is free, what will Naruto do?	Naruto	20	Naruto's Ninja Handbook	2
88	\N	After passing stage one of the training, Naruto moves into stage two: power training. Jiraiya realizes that, like him, Naruto has a hard time concentrating, so he paints a spiral in the palm of Naruto's hand to help him to focus. With the aid of the spiral and a quick flashback to Iruka-sensei, Naruto completes stage two. Meanwhile, Tsunade's luck has become uncommonly good, which worries her. After being talked into sightseeing by her assistant, Tsunade meets Orochimaru...and she doesn't look at all pleased.	Naruto	20	Focal Point: The Mark of the Leaf	2
98	\N	Naruto, Tsunade, and Shizune finally return to Konoha so Tsunade can take over and become Hokage. Konohamaru finds out that Tsunade is the Fifth but refuses to believe it. Naruto then takes Tsunade to the hospital so she can heal Sasuke, Kakashi, and Lee. She heals Sasuke and Kakashi just fine...However, her diagnosis of Rock Lee has heartbreaking consequences for him and his future.	Naruto	20	Tsunade's Warning: Ninja No More!	2
101	\N	After their mission, Naruto persuades Sakura and Sasuke to help him unmask their sensei, Kakashi. However, Squad 7 soon finds out that this is easier said than done...	Naruto	20	Gotta See! Gotta Know! Kakashi-Sensei's True Face!	2
111	\N	The Sound Ninja have Sasuke in their clutches and it's up to the Hidden Leaf Village's top Shinobi to stop them.	Naruto	20	Sound vs. Leaf	3
119	\N	Naruto, Kiba and Shikamaru intercept Sasuke from the Sound Ninja Four, but little do they know that another ninja from the Sound Village has been dispatched to grab Sasuke as well.	Naruto	20	Miscalculation: A New Enemy Appears!	3
129	\N	Naruto and Sasuke face off in battle as we get a glimpse into Sasuke's past where his achievements were ignored by his father and his brother Itachi's behavior began to take a turn for the worst.	Naruto	20	Brothers: Distance Among the Uchihas	3
142	\N	With the events of the Rice Field Country behind them, everyone prepares for their training. But a new threat soon arises. Remember Mizuki? He's back and he's planning to break out of Konoha's Correctional	Naruto	20	The Three Villains from the Maximum Security Prison	3
151	\N	With the group trapped, Shino makes a deal to trade the Bikouchuu for Hinata. Unfortunately for the opponents, Hinata got away, making the deal worthless! They begin to attack but can Hinata show up to save the day?	Naruto	20	Blaze Away, Byakugan! This is My Ninja Way!	3
161	\N	As Gai and Lee leave Konoha on a mission, two strangers disguise themselves as them and sneak into the village to learn its secrets. Tsunade, Sakura and Tenten have big plans in store for these imposters, plans that'll make their lives miserable.	Naruto	20	The Appearance of Strange Visitors	4
171	\N	After Isaribi escapes, Naruto and his team decide to go to the forbidden island and confront Orochimaru and his subordinates. They soon discover that Orochimaru is not the man behind the curtain, but a man known as Amachi. Amachi is the one responsible for turning Isaribi into a monster, so why is she helping him?	Naruto	20	Infiltration: The Set-Up!	4
180	\N	The Konoha team continue to investigate the star's theft and start to realise everything is not quite as it seems. Everything seems to be leading to a final battle, but who is the real enemy behind all this?	Naruto	20	Hidden Jutsu! The Price of the Ninja Art: Kujaku	4
189	\N	Naruto, Chouji, and Yurinojou take on Ruiga, who uses water as a weapon. Ruiga has the power to draw out water from the Earth, giving him an unlimited supply of ninja weapons. How can they defeat an opponent who has a limitless supply of water? Even if they can win, can they defeat the second ninja, Jiga? Also, what is the Princess' true motive for running away?	Naruto	20	A Limitless Supply of Ninja Tools	4
200	\N	With the city of Konoha mapped in explosive tags, a decision must be made weather to try and remove them, or to evacuate the entire city! However, something is strange about these tags, can they discover what it is? And can they remove all of them in time?	Naruto	20	The Powerful Helper	4
210	\N	With the ship split in half, Naruto, Todoroki and Gantetsu are seperated from the others. Now Naruto must face the other three Shinobazu that Gantetsu was with. Can Naruto lead them out or will they have to trust Gantetsu to lead the way?	Naruto	20	The Bewildering Forest	4
13	\N	Round two with Zabuza has started, but this time...Zabuza has Haku fighting along side him. Haku and Sasuke go at it with Sasuke falling behind until he manages to get a kick in. Meanwhile Naruto deals with some of Gato's henchmen. Back at the bridge Haku uses his secret jutsu, Demonic Ice Mirrors. What does this jutsu hold in store for Sasuke? Will Naruto make it to the bridge in time and save Tsunami and Inari as well?	Naruto	20	Haku's Secret Jutsu: Crystal Ice Mirrors	1
20	\N	With their latest mission complete, it's time once again for the group to go back to mediocre missions. After all are done, Konohamaru and his friends pay a visit to Naruto. All which result in being chased by Sakura. Everyone is soon over though, as two mysterious ninja block their way, and one of them isn't too happy with Konohamaru. Sasuke arrives to save the day, but the leader of the group shows up, with stealth skills that surprise even Sasuke. Meanwhile, the Third Hokage announces that it's time once again for the Chuunin selection exams.	Naruto	20	A New Chapter Begins: The Chūnin Exam!	1
30	\N	Sasuke is still stuck in his trance and even Sakura's pleas can't get him back to normal. Meanwhile, Anko searches for the grass ninja fake. When the team appear to get the upper hand the question begs to be asked. Are the ninja truly defeated, or is there more to them than meets the eye?	Naruto	20	The Sharingan Revived: Dragon Flame Jutsu!	1
40	\N	While Shino and Zaku finish their fight, Kakashi works on Sasuke's cursed seal. However, someone sinister shows up to ruin things, will Kakashi be able to protect Sasuke from this skilled foe?	Naruto	20	Kakashi and Orochimaru: Face-to-Face!	1
48	\N	The second-to-last match finally arrives!  Rock Lee must face down the mysterious and dangerous Gaara, a ninja who is said to have never been truly injured in a fight before.	Naruto	20	Gaara vs. Rock Lee: The Power of Youth Explodes!	1
58	\N	Due to the events with Gamabunta, Naruto is now stuck in the hospital. Shikamaru unexpectedly pays him a visit, saying the two of them are the types who never get girls to visit them. Meanwhile, Gaara approaches an unconscious Rock Lee, with the full intention of taking his life. Luckily for Lee, Naruto and Shikamaru are there to protect him. However, can they save even themselves after learning Gaara's shocking secret? What is it that Naruto has realized about Gaara?	Naruto	20	Hospital Besieged: The Evil Hand Revealed!	2
67	\N	With Gaara's ultimate defense in place, Sasuke's only hope of winning lies within the move Kakashi taught him...Chidori. But, how will Gaara react when Sasuke causes him to bleed?	Naruto	20	Late for the Show, But Ready to Go! The Ultimate Secret Technique is Born!	2
77	\N	Gaara continues to talk about his past. When Gaara states that Naruto can't become stronger when he fights for everyone else, Naruto recalls that if he didn't meet his friends, he would be the same as Gaara. Realizing that he has to protect his friends, Naruto overcomes his fear and decides to take on Gaara.	Naruto	20	Light vs. Dark: The Two Faces of Gaara	2
87	\N	Jiraiya gives Naruto the task of rotating the water in a balloon until it pops. Naruto is confident that he will accomplish this stage of the training by night, but soon learns it's not as easy as expected.	Naruto	20	Keep on Training: Pop Goes the Water Balloon!	2
89	\N	Naruto continues his training of the Rasengan, having mastered the stages of spin and power. The final stage proves to be the most difficult: control. Meanwhile, Orochimaru and Kabuto accost Tsunade and ask her to restore Orochimaru's arms. If she restores Orochimaru's arms, he promises to use his Rebirth of the Impure World kinjutsu to revive her lost lover and little brother.	Naruto	20	An Impossible Choice: The Pain Within Tsunade's Heart	2
99	\N	Konohamaru locks himself in the office used by the 3rd to stop them from replacing his grandfather, the previous Hokage. Tsunade spends the day locked out of her office and researches a way to heal Rock Lee so he has a better chance of surviving the operation,	Naruto	20	The Will of Fire Still Burns!	2
109	\N	Sasuke takes on all four Sound Ninja, but soon learns it's going to take more than Chidori to defeat them!	Naruto	20	An Invitation from the Sound	3
120	\N	Faced against the vicious twin duo of Sakon and Ukon, Kiba and Akamaru team up to take them out, using their most powerful jutsu.	Naruto	20	Roar and Howl! The Ultimate Tag-Team!	3
130	\N	As Sasuke squares off against Naruto, he reflects on his past when he was neglected by both his stern father and Itachi, his brooding older brother.	Naruto	20	Father and Son, the Broken Crest	3
143	\N	Shizune and her team encounter Mizuki, but it doesn't go as planned! When Ton-ton comes back to warn Tsunade, Naruto takes the initiative to find Shizune with Ton-ton's help. Kakashi arrives and lends Pakkun's assistance to Iruka before departing on a mission of his own. Will it all be enough to save the day?	Naruto	20	Tonton! I'm Counting on You!	3
154	\N	Naruto, Tenten, Neji and Lee continue their mission to stop Raiga and save the Rourusuke Family. They try to work out a plan but the thick fog makes it difficult for them to see. Even Neji's Byakugan doesn't seem to help. Lee fights Raiga and manages to knock a bag off his back. What is this bag and what is inside it that seems so important? Meanwhile Naruto steps up to battle Raiga. Will he be able to defeat him?	Naruto	20	The Enemy of the Byakugan	3
163	\N	Naruto and the others attempt to prove that Kouhmei is the one responsible for the ghost. However, what Naruto and the gang discover leaves even more mysteries unsolved.	Naruto	20	The Tactician's Intent	4
173	\N	Naruto and Amachi's battle comes to a rather quick end, or does it? Also, Anko recovers more of her past including a significant event.	Naruto	20	The Battle at Sea: The Power Unleashed!	4
182	\N	Subaru finally meets his mother, but is it too late for them? Can Naruto defeat Akahoshi and stop the star from falling back into his hands, and what side will the village choose to take?	Naruto	20	Reunion, The Remaining Time	4
190	\N	With Naruto defeated, Hinata decides to join the fight. Will she be able to defeat the second evil ninja? And what of the princess?	Naruto	20	The Byakugan Sees the Blind Spot!	4
199	\N	Naruto and the others continue their search for any clues leading to Gennou or his plan. During an investigation of the Ninja Academy, they discover a suspicious training post which leads to an even scarier discovery.	Naruto	20	The Missed Target	4
209	\N	Naruto, Sakura and Lee are sent to escort a prisoner named Gantetsu to the Forest Country Capital. Their job is only to back up the escort group incase something goes wrong, which inevitably, it does....	Naruto	20	The Enemy: Ninja Dropouts	4
218	\N	Shikamaru and Ino arrive to help out Temari against Kyaku, while Kiba and Chouji go to help Konkuro. All seems to be going well until Neji notices something odd...	Naruto	20	The Counterattack!	4
196	\N	Gai is trapped inside a fortress made of practice posts. Yagura appears but is he there to help or to hinder? Naruto, Neji and Tenten show up to try and rescue Gai, but will it be too much for them to handle on their own?	Naruto	20	Hot-Blooded Confrontation: Student vs. Sensei	4
207	\N	Naruto and the members of Team 8 head into Yakumo's house to find her with Kurenai. It is revealed that a mysterious entity might be behind all this. Can the group discover the truth in time?	Naruto	20	The Supposed Sealed Ability	4
217	\N	The rogue ninjas continue running as Gaara, Temari and Kankuro give chase. At the same time, Shino, Hinata and Neji are using their abilities to try and find the Shitenshounnin. Who will end up fighting first and, who will ultimately win?	Naruto	20	Sand Alliance With The Leaf Shinobi	4
202	\N	Naruto and Sakura host a special recap episode featuring the top five battles so far! There are also interviews with some of the team, and perhaps even some of the enemy....	Naruto	20	The Top 5 Ninja Battles!	4
214	\N	Naruto and Menma manage to get Tsunade to let them go find Menma's memories. However, they are forced to go with Neji and Tenten guarding them. On the way, they come across a burned-down village. There, they greet the villagers and ask them what happened. Unfortunately, the villagers aren't too happy to see them.	Naruto	20	Bringing Back Reality	4
203	\N	Naruto encounters a girl named Yakumo who has a surprising talent for destruction. Shortly after, Kurenai Yuhi, leader of Team 8 makes a startling decision and Naruto is determined to find out why.	Naruto	20	Kurenai's Decision: Squad 8 Left Behind	4
211	\N	Todoroki wants to avenge his family and kill Gantetsu. The only problem is that Naruto has other ideas. Elsewhere, Lee and Sakura are surrounded by children who are demanding they give them Gantetsu. Can Naruto and Todoroki get Gantetsu back? And what are the childrens reasons for wanting him?	Naruto	20	Memory of Flames	4
205	\N	As Kurenai attempts to escape with Yakumo, Naruto and Sakura, Team 8 and Might Gai arrive to lend their assistance. We learn some of the history between Kurenai and Yakumo and discover why things have turned out the way they have...	Naruto	20	Kurenai's Top Secret Mission: The Promise with the Third Hokage	4
213	\N	Naruto rescues a kid who was injured but he is an outsider to Konoha. Tsunade assigns Naruto to take care of the kid until he gets his memory back. What was this kid doing outside of Konoha and why can't he remember anything?	Naruto	20	Vanished Memories	4
204	\N	Naruto sneaks into Yakumo's mansion in the night, and has a dream that Kurenai threatened to seal Yakumo's abilities. He then discovers that this is the reason why she left the team, but Kurenai refuses to disclose any more. As Kurenai goes to see Yakumo, several Kurama Clan members attack.	Naruto	20	Yakumo's Sealed Ability	4
212	\N	Naruto arrives to save Gantetsu and the kids but has trouble when Akio is kidnapped and Todoroki realizes his brother is alive. Will Naruto and Todoroki be able to save Akio?	Naruto	20	To Each His Own Path	4
219	\N	Even with his chakra so low, Gaara fights the Shitenshounin leader. When he fails and is trapped, Naruto arrives to try and rescue him. But when the leader of Takumi Village, Seimei, is revived, can Naruto save Gaara before Shukaku takes complete control of him?	Naruto	20	The Ultimate Weapon Reborn	4
215	\N	Ran wants to kill Menma, upon seeing the mark on his arm, but Neji stands in the way, saying it would be unfair to kill a criminal without any memories of his crimes. Ran finally agrees and performs surgery on Menma, saving his life, but the villagers aren’t as happy. Are they prepared for when foreign shinobi group comes for a second attack?	Naruto	20	A Past to Be Erased	4
\.


--
-- TOC entry 3030 (class 0 OID 17733)
-- Dependencies: 201
-- Data for Name: genres; Type: TABLE DATA; Schema: public; Owner: postgres
--

COPY public.genres (name) FROM stdin;
Comedy
Drama
Animation
Sci-Fi & Fantasy
Crime
Documentary
Mystery
Family
Action & Adventure
\.


--
-- TOC entry 3031 (class 0 OID 17739)
-- Dependencies: 202
-- Data for Name: seasons; Type: TABLE DATA; Schema: public; Owner: postgres
--

COPY public.seasons (serie_id, name, air_date, overview, poster, id, number, serie) FROM stdin;
15	Season 2	2012-04-01 00:00:00+00	The cold winds of winter are rising in Westeros...war is coming...and five kings continue their savage quest for control of the all-powerful Iron Throne. With winter fast approaching, the coveted Iron Throne is occupied by the cruel Joffrey, counseled by his conniving mother Cersei and uncle Tyrion. But the Lannister hold on the Throne is under assault on many fronts. Meanwhile, a new leader is rising among the wildings outside the Great Wall, adding new perils for Jon Snow and the order of the Night's Watch.	http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198271/zjz3zdcbmqrjrnsxqaol.jpg	1	2	Game of Thrones
16	Season 1	2009-09-10 00:00:00+00	Life hasn't been the same for Elena since the tragic death of her parents, but she tries to pick up the pieces and provide support for her troubled younger brother, Jeremy. On her first day back at Mystic Falls High School, Elena meets the mysterious new guy, Stefan, and the two seeming lost souls form an instant connection. What Elena doesn't know, however, is that Stefan is a vampire, constantly resisting the urge to taste her blood. But Stefan, it seems, has a greater evil to deal with when his dangerous older brother, Damon, shows up to wreak havoc on the town of Mystic Falls — and claim Elena for himself.	http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198271/dmddpdxj9qooxgab6c9o.jpg	2	1	The Vampire Diaries
15	Season 6	2016-04-24 01:00:00+01	Following the shocking developments at the conclusion of season five, survivors from all parts of Westeros and Essos regroup to press forward, inexorably, towards their uncertain individual fates. Familiar faces will forge new alliances to bolster their strategic chances at survival, while new characters will emerge to challenge the balance of power in the east, west, north and south.	http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198271/yu5txbkty62u6axn0vmp.jpg	3	6	Game of Thrones
16	Season 2	2010-09-09 00:00:00+00	This season, Katherine's appearance in Mystic Falls will throw a wrench into the love triangle between Stefan, Elena and Damon, and the other residents of Mystic Falls must choose sides as they fall victim to a new breed of danger. New and unexpected friendships will be forged, allies will become enemies and hearts will be broken. Plus, Stefan and Damon will be forced to face a villain more evil and diabolical than they thought possible.	http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198271/d46dhadtxnfl23od6ph3.jpg	4	2	The Vampire Diaries
5	Season 4	2007-09-27 00:00:00+00	The fourth season of the American television medical drama Grey's Anatomy, commenced airing in the United States on September 27, 2007 and concluded on May 22, 2008. The season continues the story of a group of surgeons and their mentors in the fictional Seattle Grace Hospital, describing their professional lives and the way they affect the personal background of each character. Season four had twelve series regulars with ten of them returning from the previous season, out of which eight are part of the original cast from the first season. The season aired in the Thursday night timeslot at 9:00 EST. In addition to the regular seventeen episodes, a clip-show narrated by the editors of People recapped previous events of the show and made the transition from Grey's Anatomy to Private Practice, a spin-off focusing of Dr. Addison Montgomery and aired on September 19, 2007, before the season premiere. The season was officially released on DVD as a five-disc boxset under the title of Grey's Anatomy: Season Four – Expanded on September 9, 2008 by Buena Vista Home Entertainment.\\n\\nFor the first time in the show's history, many cast changes occur, seeing the first departure of two main cast members. The season received mixed response from critics and fans, resulting in several awards and nominations for the cast members and the production team. Show creator Shonda Rhimes heavily contributed to the production of the season, writing five out of the seventeen episodes. The highest-rated episode was the season premiere, which was watched by 20.93 million viewers. The season was interrupted by the 2007–2008 Writers Guild of America strike, which resulted in the production of only seventeen episodes, instead of twenty-three originally planned.	http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198271/kmac7wtctot8fa9gkrdo.jpg	5	4	Grey's Anatomy
9	Season 2	2016-09-19 01:00:00+01	Lucifer returns for another season, but his devil-may-care attitude may soon need an adjustment: His mother is coming to town.	http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198271/kboi2zwch7nicdglsc4i.jpg	6	2	Lucifer
15	Season 3	2013-03-31 00:00:00+00	Duplicity and treachery...nobility and honor...conquest and triumph...and, of course, dragons. In Season 3, family and loyalty are the overarching themes as many critical storylines from the first two seasons come to a brutal head. Meanwhile, the Lannisters maintain their hold on King's Landing, though stirrings in the North threaten to alter the balance of power; Robb Stark, King of the North, faces a major calamity as he tries to build on his victories; a massive army of wildlings led by Mance Rayder march for the Wall; and Daenerys Targaryen--reunited with her dragons--attempts to raise an army in her quest for the Iron Throne.	http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198271/qpqqtnqwpyehiie87vha.jpg	7	3	Game of Thrones
16	Season 7	2015-10-08 01:00:00+01	In the wake of Elena Gilbert's goodbye, in season seven, some characters will recover while others falter. As Lily tries to drive a wedge between the Salvatore brothers, we'll still hold onto hope that Stefan and Caroline's love story is strong enough to survive.	http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198271/u8hfyejlhuh7odixdqtl.jpg	8	7	The Vampire Diaries
18	Season 26	2014-09-28 01:00:00+01	In this season, Homer and Bart attempt to solve some father/son conflicts, Marge opens a sandwich franchise, the Simpsons meet their former selves, Bart schemes to bring down his new fourth grade teacher, Homer has a mid-life crisis, and the cast of Futurama make an appearance in Springfield.	http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198271/viwcomashfzqmgv1d8tq.jpg	9	26	The Simpsons
15	Season 7	2017-07-16 01:00:00+01	The long winter is here. And with it comes a convergence of armies and attitudes that have been brewing for years.	http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198271/zcrbvlyeaoaalpcipiqo.jpg	10	7	Game of Thrones
14	Season 1	2021-02-10 01:00:00+01		http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198271/klpvosdc9wtsfejd92jr.jpg	11	1	Crime Scene: The Vanishing at the Cecil Hotel
15	Season 4	2014-04-06 01:00:00+01	The War of the Five Kings is drawing to a close, but new intrigues and plots are in motion, and the surviving factions must contend with enemies not only outside their ranks, but within.	http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198271/ymr8gnbs56qjkykubo9q.jpg	12	4	Game of Thrones
16	Season 6	2014-10-02 01:00:00+01	Season six follows the characters’ journey back to each other as they explore the duality of good versus evil inside themselves. Michael Malarkey joins the cast as Enzo, an old vampire friend from Damon’s past, and Matt Davis reprises his role as Alaric Saltzman, recently returned from The Other Side.	http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198272/l9lkiodhitpqplddspba.jpg	14	6	The Vampire Diaries
16	Season 8	2016-10-21 01:00:00+01	The final season of "The Vampire Diaries" begins a few months after it left off, with Damon and Enzo on an epic killing spree after being kidnapped and enslaved by the Siren Sybil. During the search to find them, Stefan, Bonnie, Caroline, and Alaric discover that the mysterious force they are up against may be more powerful than they thought and they must go to great lengths to keep the people they love safe. When they discover Sybil's motive, they must do everything in their power to prevent her from accomplishing her goal. Caroline and Stefan take a big step in their relationship, but when Stefan is forced to turn off his humanity to protect the people he loves their plans are put on hold.	http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198271/ngbtkn02wpmgmtbwcfdp.jpg	13	8	The Vampire Diaries
18	Season 28	2016-09-25 01:00:00+01		http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198272/ut9yqhpang39bugp6p7d.jpg	33	28	The Simpsons
18	Season 15	2003-11-02 00:00:00+00	The Simpsons' 15th season began on Sunday, November 2, 2003, with "Treehouse of Horror XIV". The season contains five hold-over episodes from the season 14 production line. The most watched episode had 16.2 million viewers and the least watched had 6.2 million viewers.	http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198272/nnfs28k0plu205ec3uuh.jpg	43	15	The Simpsons
18	Season 18	2006-09-10 00:00:00+00	The Simpsons' 18th season aired from September 10, 2006 to May 20, 2007. The season contained seven hold-over episodes from the season 17 production line. Al Jean served as the Showrunner, a position he has held since the thirteenth season.\\n\\nThe season finale, "You Kent Always Say What You Want", was the series' 400th episode. Additionally, the Simpsons franchise celebrated its 20th anniversary, as it has been on the air since April 1987, beginning with shorts on The Tracey Ullman Show.\\n\\nSeason 18 included guest appearances by Metallica, Tom Wolfe, Gore Vidal, Michael Chabon, Jonathan Franzen, Fran Drescher, The White Stripes, Kiefer Sutherland, Mary Lynn Rajskub, Richard Lewis, Phil McGraw, Elvis Stojko, Natalie Portman, Jon Lovitz, Betty White, Eric Idle, Sir Mix-a-Lot, Stephen Sondheim, Cristiano Ronaldo, Meg Ryan, Andy Dick, Peter Bogdanovich, James Patterson and others.	http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198272/vbaubxa5cfqk4706yyfk.jpg	51	18	The Simpsons
18	Season 4	1992-09-24 00:00:00+00	The Simpsons' fourth season originally aired on the Fox network between September 24, 1992 and May 13, 1993, beginning with "Kamp Krusty." The showrunners for the fourth production season were Al Jean and Mike Reiss. The aired season contained two episodes which were hold-over episodes from season three, which Jean and Reiss also ran. Following the end of the production of the season, Jean, Reiss and most of the original writing staff left the show. The season was nominated for two Primetime Emmy Awards and Dan Castellaneta would win one for his performance as Homer in "Mr. Plow". The fourth season was released on DVD in Region 1 on June 15, 2004, Region 2 on August 2, 2004 and in Region 4 on August 25, 2004.	http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198272/bo92oukspzo6pev4e1qp.jpg	61	4	The Simpsons
18	Season 3	1991-09-19 00:00:00+00	The Simpsons' third season originally aired on the Fox network between September 19, 1991 and May 7, 1992. The showrunners for the third production season were Al Jean and Mike Reiss who executive produced 22 episodes for the season, while two other episodes were produced by James L. Brooks, Matt Groening, and Sam Simon. An additional episode, "Brother, Can You Spare Two Dimes?", aired on August 27, 1992 after the official end of the third season and is included on the Season 3 DVD set. Season three won six Primetime Emmy Awards for "Outstanding Voice-Over Performance" and also received a nomination for "Outstanding Animated Program" for the episode "Radio Bart". The complete season was released on DVD in Region 1 on August 26, 2003, Region 2 on October 6, 2003, and in Region 4 on October 22, 2003.	http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198272/jbpo1vszzpbhdn4kkqwk.jpg	68	3	The Simpsons
9	Season 3	2017-10-02 01:00:00+01	As Lucifer struggles with an identity crisis, a gruff new police lieutenant shakes up the status quo with Chloe and the rest of the LAPD.	http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198272/tjsfbfwjssmzdksqzrmo.jpg	83	3	Lucifer
7	Season 3	2021-01-01 01:00:00+01	With a new sensei at the helm of the Cobra Kai dojo, a three-way feud takes center stage. Old grudges — like Cobra Kai — never die.	http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198272/rpodf6eys3j3pai2kwrm.jpg	89	3	Cobra Kai
8	Season 2	2014-02-27 00:00:00+00	Season two brings crises of faith, of power, of relationships. Brothers rise up against one another. Loyalties shift from friend to foe, and unlikely alliances are formed in the name of supremacy. Ragnar’s indiscretions threaten his marriage to Lagertha, tearing him and his beloved son apart. Plots are hatched, scores are settled, blood is spilled…all under the watchful eyes of the gods.	http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198273/xxbf1hqllwzjtjfhwm10.jpg	99	2	Vikings
8	Season 3	2015-02-19 00:00:00+00	With the promise of new land from the English, Ragnar leads his people to an uncertain fate on the shores of Wessex. King Ecbert has made many promises and it remains to be seen if he will keep them. But ever the restless wanderer, Ragnar is searching for something more … and he finds it in the mythical city of Paris.	http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198273/rcfod7gmwvbinze8fgab.jpg	108	3	Vikings
2	Season 4	2019-10-09 01:00:00+01		http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198273/ban6efmb5nzfmv06rlwc.jpg	115	4	Riverdale
5	Season 6	2009-09-24 00:00:00+00	The sixth season of the American television medical drama Grey's Anatomy, commenced airing on the American Broadcasting Company in the United States on September 24, 2009, and concluded on May 20, 2010. The season was produced by ABC Studios, in association with Shondaland Production Company and The Mark Gordon Company; the showrunner being Shonda Rhimes. Actors Ellen Pompeo, Sandra Oh, Katherine Heigl, and Justin Chambers reprised their roles as surgical residents Meredith Grey, Cristina Yang, Izzie Stevens, and Alex Karev, respectively. Heigl was released from her contract in the middle of the season, while T.R. Knight did not appear as George O'Malley, because Knight was released from his contract at the conclusion of season five. Main cast members Patrick Dempsey, Chandra Wilson, James Pickens, Jr., Sara Ramirez, Eric Dane, Chyler Leigh, and Kevin McKidd also returned, while previous recurring star Jessica Capshaw was promoted to a series regular, and Kim Raver was given star billing after the commencement of the season.\\n\\nThe season follows the story of surgical interns, residents and their competent mentors, as they experience the difficulties of the competitive careers they have chosen. It is set in the surgical wing of the fictional Seattle Grace Hospital, located in Seattle, Washington. A major storyline of the season is the characters adapting to change, as their beloved co-worker Stevens departed following the breakdown of her marriage, O'Malley died in the season premiere—following his being dragged by a bus, and new cardiothoracic surgeon Teddy Altman is given employment at the hospital. Further storylines include Shepherd being promoted to chief of surgery, Seattle Grace Hospital merging with the neighboring Mercy West —introducing several new doctors, and several physicians lives being placed into danger—when a grieving deceased patient's husband embarks on a shooting spree at the hospital, seeking revenge for his wife's death.	http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198272/pejsejrww24nj0kgkxck.jpg	15	6	Grey's Anatomy
18	Season 27	2015-09-27 01:00:00+01	The twenty-seventh season of The Simpsons began airing on September 27 2015 with the episode "Every Man's Dreams" it ended on May 22 2016 with the episode "Orange is the New Yellow ( A parody of Netflix show, Orange is the New Black)"	http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198272/gqr6a30xsqtkxjzdctzi.jpg	23	27	The Simpsons
20	Season 2	\N	Before the final round of the Chunin Exam, Naruto receives some special training from the legendary Toad Sage, Jiraiya. When the battles resume, Naruto is ready, but what about Sasuke? He's about to face the one ninja no one, not even Naruto thinks he can beat. But in the midst of everything, a sinister plot is set in motion, and the Village Hidden in the Leaves finds itself under attack!	http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198272/mpcaxe8dcsed36zinlsv.jpg	29	2	Naruto
5	Season 7	2010-09-23 00:00:00+00	The seventh season of the American television medical drama Grey's Anatomy, commenced airing on September 23, 2010 on the American Broadcasting Company, and concluded on May 19, 2011 ending the season with a total of 22 episodes. The season was produced by ABC Studios, in association with Shondaland Production Company and The Mark Gordon Company; the showrunner being Shonda Rhimes.	http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198272/oucffwalpqke86atsyyy.jpg	37	7	Grey's Anatomy
18	Season 17	2005-09-11 00:00:00+00	The Simpsons' seventeenth season originally aired between September 2005 and May 2006, beginning on Sunday, September 11, 2005. It broke Fox's tradition of pushing its shows' season premieres back to November to accommodate the Major League Baseball games airing on the network during September and October of each year.	http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198272/v6cfpl4wadszkmdkncqm.jpg	47	17	The Simpsons
18	Season 1	1989-12-16 00:00:00+00		http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198272/oe5qibnuvrki76x3jies.jpg	57	1	The Simpsons
18	Season 20	2008-09-28 00:00:00+00	The Simpsons' twentieth season aired on Fox from September 28, 2008 to May 17, 2009. With this season, the show tied Gunsmoke as the longest running American primetime television series in terms of total number of seasons. The season was released on BD January 12, 2010, making this the first season released on BD. It was released on DVD in Region 1 on January 12, 2010, and in Region 4 on January 20, 2010. The season was only released on DVD in Region 2 in a few areas.	http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198272/uyedw1cm790j7gdoofhe.jpg	65	20	The Simpsons
5	Season 11	2014-09-25 01:00:00+01	During an interview, Shonda Rhimes stated that "Season 11 is really a Meredith-centric season. She lost her ‘person’, her half-sister has shown up, her husband is chafing to go someplace else…” She went on to reveal that she's been wanting to do the "familial grenade" storyline for a long time, and at the end of Season 10, she knew it was the time to do it. Rhimes also claimed that Season 11 will pick up right where Season 10 left us, so there won't be much that the audience won't see. In another interview discussing this storyline, Rhimes revealed that she and the writers are thinking about doing flashback periods to the younger days of Drs. Ellis Grey and Richard Webber.	http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198272/ss0bkw1fdrphrcxegjad.jpg	94	11	Grey's Anatomy
12	Season 4	2021-02-08 01:00:00+01		http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198273/prmpm5bexazhrqednhht.jpg	113	4	Black Lightning
16	Season 4	2012-10-11 00:00:00+00	The fourth season starts off with everything in transition. Elena faces her worst nightmare as she awakens from her deadly accident to find she must now endure the terrifying change of becoming a vampire — or face certain death. Stefan and Damon are torn even further apart over how to help Elena adjust to a life she never wanted, and everyone must cope with the chaos created after the vampires and their supporters were outed to the town council and local leaders. Despite everything, as Elena and her friends enter into the final stretch of high school before graduation sends them on different paths, they feel the bond to their home town of Mystic Falls take on a deeper meaning when a new mysterious villain is introduced who seems intent on destroying it.	http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198272/pac2pguhtdux3gjcpajb.jpg	21	4	The Vampire Diaries
20	Season 3	\N	Naruto returns from his training journey eager to see his friend Sasuke. But Sasuke has only one thing on his mind: his quest for revenge against his older brother. His unquenchable thirst for power knows no bounds, and soon he is lured from the Leaf Village by Orochimaru's minions, the Sound Four. Determined to get him back, Shikamaru and Naruto put together a team of the top genin in the village to go after him, and the chase begins!	http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198272/znk6kso4fclvztiy4kjf.jpg	34	3	Naruto
18	Season 21	2009-09-27 00:00:00+00	The Simpsons' twenty-first season aired on Fox from September 27, 2009 to May 23, 2010. It was the first of two seasons that the show was renewed for by Fox, and also the first season of the show to air entirely in high definition.\\n\\nWith this season, The Simpsons established itself as the longest-running American primetime television series surpassing Gunsmoke.\\n\\nThe season received mainly positive reviews from critics, with many praising "The Squirt and the Whale", "To Surveil with Love" and "The Bob Next Door". The show moved up 16 positions in the Nielsen ratings from the previous season and received numerous award nominations, winning two - an Emmy Award for Anne Hathaway for her voicing in "Once Upon a Time in Springfield", and an Annie Award for "Treehouse of Horror XX".	http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198272/hguwgqizuhhmmt7jurlw.jpg	42	21	The Simpsons
18	Season 23	2011-09-25 00:00:00+00	The Simpsons' twenty-third season began airing on Fox on September 25, 2011 and ended on May 20, 2012. The show's 500th episode, "At Long Last Leave", aired on February 19, 2012.	http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198272/bvii7y2xikdlkvw0ntbr.jpg	53	23	The Simpsons
3	Season 1	2017-09-25 01:00:00+01		http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198272/kt983qrcnvzqbj1ghek8.jpg	63	1	The Good Doctor
5	Season 3	2006-09-21 00:00:00+00	The third season of the American television medical drama Grey's Anatomy, commenced airing on the American Broadcasting Company on September 21, 2006, and concluded on May 17, 2007. The season was produced by Touchstone Television, in association with Shondaland Production Company and The Mark Gordon Company, the showrunner being Shonda Rhimes. Actors Ellen Pompeo, Sandra Oh, Katherine Heigl, Justin Chambers, and T.R. Knight reprised their roles as surgical interns Meredith Grey, Cristina Yang, Izzie Stevens, Alex Karev, and George O'Malley, respectively, continuing their expansive storylines as focal points throughout the season. Previous main cast members Chandra Wilson, James Pickens, Jr., Kate Walsh, Isaiah Washington, and Patrick Dempsey also returned, while previous guest stars Sara Ramirez and Eric Dane were promoted to series regulars, following the extension of their contracts.\\n\\nThe season followed the continuation of the surgical residency of five young interns, as they experience the demands of the competitive field of medicine, which becomes defining in their personal evolution. Although set in fictional Seattle Grace Hospital, located in Seattle, Washington, filming primarily occurred in Los Angeles, California. Whereas the first season mainly focused on the impact the surgical field has on the main characters, and the second one provided a detailed perspective on the physicians' private lives, the third season deals with the tough challenges brought by the last phase of the surgeons' internship, combining the professional motif emphasized in the first season, with the complex personal background used in the second. Through the season, several new storylines are introduced, including the arrival of Dane's character, Dr. Mark Sloan, conceived and introduced as an antagonizing presence.	http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198272/gxcntcuaqqilkw99wkud.jpg	69	3	Grey's Anatomy
12	Season 3	2019-10-07 01:00:00+01		http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198273/je9zeorhcpkpduaxha9x.jpg	111	3	Black Lightning
4	Season 1	2018-10-25 01:00:00+01	Continuing the tradition of The Vampire Diaries and The Originals, the story of the next generation of supernatural beings at the Salvatore Boarding School for the Young & Gifted. Klaus Mikaelson's daughter, 17-year-old Hope Mikaelson; Alaric Saltzman's twins, Lizzie and Josie Saltzman; and other young adults come of age in the most unconventional way possible, nurtured to be their best selves... in spite of their worst impulses. Will these young witches, vampires and werewolves become the heroes they want to be — or the villains they were born to be?	http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198273/qltr2iaecyansgr4rw1a.jpg	92	1	Legacies
2	Season 5	2021-01-20 01:00:00+01		http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198273/zcehasynj8r8fzrugh8f.jpg	101	5	Riverdale
5	Season 16	2019-09-26 01:00:00+01		http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198273/dfiugosim34j2zrxkhqh.jpg	109	16	Grey's Anatomy
18	Season 25	2013-09-29 01:00:00+01	The Simpsons' twenty-fifth season began airing on Fox on September 29, 2013.\\n\\nIn this season, Homer sells his Mapple stock to buy a bowling ball, Marge blames herself and KISS for Bart's rebellious streak, Lisa becomes a cheerleader for Springfield's football team, and Homer delivers a baby. Guest stars for this season will include Christiane Amanpour, Will Arnett, Stan Lee, Rachel Maddow, Elisabeth Moss, Joe Namath, Gordon Ramsay, Aaron Sorkin, Eva Longoria, Daniel Radcliffe, Kristen Wiig, Billy West, Katey Sagal, John DiMaggio, Phil LaMarr, Zach Galifianakis, Harlan Ellison, Anderson Cooper, Maurice LaMarche, and Judd Apatow. This is Al Jean's 13th consecutive season as showrunner and 15th overall. Matt Groening, James L. Brooks, Matt Selman, and John Frink serve as executive producers.	http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198272/gjv1lyw4fncusywime5l.jpg	16	25	The Simpsons
18	Season 30	2018-09-30 01:00:00+01		http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198272/t4fwgfsy037om4gpouza.jpg	22	30	The Simpsons
20	Season 4	\N	In the Village Hidden in the Leaves, there are few things Naruto and Choji love more than a steaming bowl of Ichiraku ramen, and when the daughter of the owner is kidnapped, they're on the case. Then, missions for the Leaf ninja lead them to the Land of Bears after a fallen meteorite and the Land of Greens to protect a princess. When an evil ninja who's after the princess gets in their way, it's Naruto's life on the line!	http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198272/ehxjqvlvnpgef9bwkblr.jpg	32	4	Naruto
18	Season 8	1996-10-27 00:00:00+00	The Simpsons' eighth season originally aired between October 27, 1996 and May 18, 1997, beginning with "Treehouse of Horror VII". The showrunners for the eighth production season were Bill Oakley and Josh Weinstein. The aired season contained two episodes which were hold-over episodes from season seven, which Oakley and Weinstein also ran. It also contained two episodes for which Al Jean and Mike Reiss were the show runners.\\n\\nSeason eight won multiple awards, including two Emmy Awards: "Homer's Phobia" won for Outstanding Animated Program in 1997, and Alf Clausen and Ken Keeler won for "Outstanding Individual Achievement in Music and Lyrics" with the song "We Put The Spring In Springfield" from the episode "Bart After Dark". Clausen also received an Emmy nomination for "Outstanding Music Direction" for "Simpsoncalifragilisticexpialacious". "Brother from Another Series" was nominated for the Emmy for "Sound Mixing For a Comedy Series or a Special". For "Homer's Phobia", Mike Anderson won the Annie Award for Best Individual Achievement: Directing in a TV Production, and the WAC Winner Best Director for Primetime Series at the 1998 World Animation Celebration. Gay & Lesbian Alliance Against Defamation awarded the episode the GLAAD Media Award for "Outstanding TV – Individual Episode".	http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198272/ppp2c03jkqnaosme4gvg.jpg	41	8	The Simpsons
18	Season 6	1994-09-04 00:00:00+00	The Simpsons' sixth season originally aired on the Fox network between September 4, 1994, and May 21, 1995, and consists of 25 episodes. The Simpsons is an animated series about a working class family, which consists of Homer, Marge, Bart, Lisa, and Maggie. The show is set in the fictional city of Springfield, and lampoons American culture, society, television and many aspects of the human condition.\\n\\nThe showrunner for the sixth production season was David Mirkin who executive-produced 23 episodes. Former showrunners Al Jean and Mike Reiss produced the remaining two; they produced the two episodes with the staff of The Critic, the show they left The Simpsons to create. This was done in order to relieve some of the stress The Simpsons' writing staff endured, as they felt that producing 25 in one season was too much. The episode "A Star Is Burns" caused some controversy among the staff with Matt Groening removing his name from the episode's credits as he saw it as blatant advertising for The Critic, which was airing at the time. Fox moved The Simpsons back to its original Sunday night time, having aired on Thursdays for the previous four seasons. It has remained in this slot ever since. The sixth season won one Primetime Emmy Award, and received three additional nominations. It also won the Annie Award for Best Animated Television Production.	http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198272/msgvpftxygw5hkjvyyud.jpg	50	6	The Simpsons
17	Season 3	2016-10-04 01:00:00+01	Forensic scientist Barry Allen, aka The Flash, is living his dream life. His parents are alive. He's dating beautiful, smart Iris West. And he's able to stand back and let the new speedster in town, Kid Flash, step in to protect Central City. But the better Barry's life gets, the more dangerous it becomes. His nemesis, Reverse Flash, warns Barry of serious repercussions if he remains in the alternate Flashpoint universe: In addition to memory loss, his powers will fade. When disaster strikes, Barry must decide whether to continue life as Barry Allen or return to his universe as The Flash. As Barry deals with his identity crisis, he and the S.T.A.R. Labs team fight off lethal threats from the God of Speed, Savitar.	http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198272/gyf8uryjothicafdk3ei.jpg	60	3	The Flash
1	Season 1	2021-01-15 01:00:00+01		http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198272/knjsj29r5dxywlndzepx.jpg	75	1	WandaVision
3	Season 3	2019-09-23 01:00:00+01	Dr. Shaun Murphy continues to use his extraordinary medical gifts at St. Bonaventure Hospital’s surgical unit. As his friendships deepen, Shaun tackles the world of dating for the first time and continues to work harder than he ever has before.	http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198272/nxyv1u7lifx3huvlzsyo.jpg	81	3	The Good Doctor
3	Season 4	2020-11-02 01:00:00+01	Dr. Shaun Murphy continues to use his extraordinary medical gifts at St. Bonaventure Hospital’s surgical unit. As his romantic relationship with Lea deepens, he will also face new responsibilities as a fourth-year resident when he is put in charge of supervising a new set of residents that will test him in ways he cannot predict. Meanwhile, the team must deal with the uncertainty and pressure that the COVID-19 pandemic brings now that it has hit their hospital.	http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198272/dpaghiiziejqtqh00mab.jpg	88	4	The Good Doctor
17	Season 5	2018-10-09 01:00:00+01	Barry Allen and his new wife, Iris West, finally settling into married life when they're visited by Nora West-Allen, their speedster daughter from the future. Nora's arrival brings to light the legacy every member of Team Flash will leave years from now, causing many to question who they are today. And while Nora idolizes Barry, she holds a mysterious grudge against Iris. As Team Flash adjusts to the next generation of speedster, they discover Nora's presence has triggered the arrival of the most ruthless, vicious and relentless villain they have ever faced: Cicada!	http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198273/trm5gt5mpsvx4xyewys3.jpg	97	5	The Flash
2	Season 3	2018-10-10 01:00:00+01		http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198273/yrmq8jygj8b0aeryuawe.jpg	104	3	Riverdale
16	Season 3	2011-09-15 00:00:00+00	Season three opens the door to learn more about Klaus and the Original Family as his motives for wanting Stefan on his side are finally revealed. As Stefan sinks deeper into the dark side, Damon and Elena struggle with the guilt of their growing bond, even as they work together to bring Stefan back from the edge.	http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198271/zxgffhrsbb5iq2zlupvw.jpg	18	3	The Vampire Diaries
18	Season 29	2017-10-01 01:00:00+01		http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198272/uitgymfrp50dgu8n4rt8.jpg	28	29	The Simpsons
5	Season 1	2005-03-27 00:00:00+00	The first season of the American television medical drama Grey's Anatomy, began airing in the United States on the American Broadcasting Company on March 27, 2005 and concluded on May 22, 2005. The first season introduces the main character, Meredith Grey, as she enrolls in Seattle Grace Hospital's internship program and faces unexpected challenges and surprises. Season one had nine series regulars, six of whom have been part of the main cast ever since. The season initially served as a mid-season replacement for the legal drama Boston Legal, airing in the Sunday night time slot at 10:00, after Desperate Housewives. Although no clip shows have been produced for this season, the events that occur are recapped in "Straight to Heart", a clip-show which aired one week before the winter holiday hiatus of the second season ended. The season was officially released on DVD as two-disc Region 1 box set under the title of Grey's Anatomy: Season One on February 14, 2006 by Buena Vista Home Entertainment.\\n\\nThe season's reviews and critiques were generally positive, and the series received several awards and nominations for the cast and crew. The first five episodes of the second season were conceived, written and shot to air as the final five episodes of the first season, but aired during the 2005-2006 season due to the high number of viewers that watched "Who's Zoomin' Who?", the season's highest-rated episode with 22.22 million viewers tuning in.	http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198272/pr2jmxrgtgsbmbl5icln.jpg	36	1	Grey's Anatomy
18	Season 22	2010-09-26 00:00:00+00	The Simpsons' twenty-second season began airing on Fox on September 26, 2010 and ended on May 22, 2011. The Simpsons was renewed for at least two additional seasons during the twentieth season leading up to this season. The cast is currently signed through the 25th season. On November 11, 2010, the series was renewed for a 23rd season by Fox with 22 episodes.	http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198272/rq0elbbo0rohufr4wltp.jpg	46	22	The Simpsons
18	Season 11	1999-09-26 00:00:00+00	The Simpsons' 11th season originally aired between September 1999 and May 2000, beginning on Sunday, September 26, 1999, with "Beyond Blunderdome". The showrunner for the 11th production season was Mike Scully. The season contained four hold-over episodes from the season 10 production line.	http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198272/ffyzajcjo1ckamkzkmtw.jpg	56	11	The Simpsons
18	Season 10	1998-08-23 00:00:00+00	The tenth season of the animated television series The Simpsons was originally broadcast on the Fox network in the United States between August 23, 1998 and May 16, 1999. It contains twenty-three episodes, starting with "Lard of the Dance". The Simpsons is a satire of a middle class American lifestyle epitomized by its family of the same name, which consists of Homer, Marge, Bart, Lisa and Maggie. Set in the fictional city of Springfield, the show lampoons American culture, society, television, and many aspects of the human condition.\\n\\nThe showrunner for the tenth season was Mike Scully. Before production began, a salary dispute between the main cast members of The Simpsons and Fox arose. However, it was soon settled and the actors' salaries were raised to $125,000 per episode. In addition to the large Simpsons cast, many guest stars appeared in season ten, including Phil Hartman in his last appearance before his death.\\n\\nThe season, which won the Annie Award for "Outstanding Achievement in an Animated Television Program", has been cited by several critics as the beginning of the series' decline in quality. It ranked twenty-fifth in the season ratings with an average of 13.5 million viewers per episode. The tenth season DVD boxset was released in the United States and Canada on August 7, 2007. It is available in two different packagings, both featuring Bart.	http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198272/pczn4rds9a2fqecegayi.jpg	64	10	The Simpsons
18	Season 24	2012-09-30 01:00:00+01	The Simpsons' twenty-fourth season began airing on Fox on September 30, 2012 and concluded on May 19, 2013.	http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198272/dggcrjglktz8rmb7zthi.jpg	71	24	The Simpsons
17	Season 4	2017-10-10 01:00:00+01	The mission of Barry Allen, aka The Flash, is once more to protect Central City from metahuman threats. But with Barry trapped in the Speed Force, this mission falls to his family – Detective Joe West; fiancée Iris West; and Wally West/Kid Flash – and the team at S.T.A.R. Labs: Caitlin Snow/Killer Frost, Cisco Ramon/Vibe and brilliant scientist Harrison Wells. When a powerful villain threatens to level the city unless The Flash appears, Cisco risks everything to free Barry. But this is only the first move in a deadly game with Clifford DeVoe, aka The Thinker, a mastermind who’s always ten steps ahead of Barry, no matter how fast Barry runs.	http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198272/o4ylcmav2nfm5hvkl0ff.jpg	74	4	The Flash
8	Season 4	2016-02-18 00:00:00+00	A ferocious battle between the Vikings and the French eventually comes down to Ragnar against Rollo. The outcome will seal the fate of the two brothers.	http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198272/bcca6jvndo1mqiqwmtwl.jpg	82	4	Vikings
4	Season 2	2019-10-10 01:00:00+01		http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198272/tpiukltlwjvl7fivcy24.jpg	86	2	Legacies
3	Season 2	2018-09-24 01:00:00+01	Dr. Shaun Murphy’s world has begun to expand as he continues to work harder than he ever has before, navigating his new environment and relationships to prove to his colleagues at the prestigious St. Bonaventure Hospital’s surgical unit that his extraordinary medical gifts will save lives.	http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198273/jtwbvs5qewzinboaumyo.jpg	96	2	The Good Doctor
16	Season 5	2013-10-03 01:00:00+01	The hit series enters its fifth season with some characters headed off to college, Katherine trying to survive as a human and a shocking Salvatore secret.	http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198272/a9hokx4yvsqf2tuh86j4.jpg	19	5	The Vampire Diaries
18	Season 31	2019-09-29 01:00:00+01		http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198272/wmplzg4gjutq46jlvxuy.jpg	27	31	The Simpsons
15	Season 5	2015-04-12 01:00:00+01	The War of the Five Kings, once thought to be drawing to a close, is instead entering a new and more chaotic phase. Westeros is on the brink of collapse, and many are seizing what they can while the realm implodes, like a corpse making a feast for crows.	http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198272/saqpwttbsbkvuo24rdba.jpg	35	5	Game of Thrones
18	Season 14	2002-11-03 00:00:00+00	The fourteenth season of the animated television series The Simpsons was originally broadcast on the Fox network in the United States between November 3, 2002 and May 18, 2003. The show runner for the fourteenth production season was Al Jean, who executive produced 21 of 22 episodes. The other episode, "How I Spent My Strummer Vacation", was run by Mike Scully. The season contains five hold-overs from the previous season's production run. The fourteenth season won two Primetime Emmy Awards, including Outstanding Animated Program, four Annie Awards and a Writers Guild of America Award. On December 6, 2011, it was released on DVD and Blu-ray in North America.	http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198272/c4avmz9n2bqrm86j6i6g.jpg	45	14	The Simpsons
18	Season 16	2004-11-07 00:00:00+00	The Simpsons' 16th season began on Sunday, November 7, 2004 and contained 21 episodes, beginning with Treehouse of Horror XV. The season contains six hold-over episodes from the season 15 production line.	http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198272/ubgrrgqmkduskhsc1w63.jpg	55	16	The Simpsons
12	Season 2	2018-10-09 01:00:00+01		http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198272/todjs5nbzdnmnt4qeoun.jpg	72	2	Black Lightning
11	Season 1	2019-11-12 01:00:00+01		http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198272/bya8ddpgajbzcmonx1w1.jpg	77	1	The Mandalorian
2	Season 1	2017-01-26 00:00:00+00		http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198272/qyklhrgkbsipyo3g4z1s.jpg	84	1	Riverdale
5	Season 10	2013-09-26 01:00:00+01		http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198273/hovdjwcwavv2l0utdhod.jpg	90	10	Grey's Anatomy
5	Season 15	2018-09-27 01:00:00+01		http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198273/nb1bb1osmuejfkjo2els.jpg	102	15	Grey's Anatomy
9	Season 5	2020-08-21 01:00:00+01	Lucifer makes a tumultuous return to the land of the living in hopes of making things right with Chloe. A devil’s work is never done.	http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198273/oshtq6gxp7svz4dlzg2y.jpg	106	5	Lucifer
19	Season 2	2021-01-25 01:00:00+01	In season two, an entirely new power struggle emerges, causing a dangerous rift as people are divided between their loyalty to Layton and to Mr. Wilford, who has a new train, new technology and a game plan that keeps everyone guessing. While Layton battles Wilford for the soul of Snowpiercer, Melanie leads the charge on a shocking new discovery that could change the fate of humanity.	http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198273/ews3vl1afatlcp84qiax.jpg	114	2	Snowpiercer
18	Season 2	1990-10-10 00:00:00+00	The Simpsons' second season originally aired between October 11, 1990 and May 9, 1991, and contained 22 episodes, beginning with "Bart Gets an F". Another episode, "Blood Feud" aired during the summer after the official season finale. The executive producers for the second production season were Matt Groening, James L. Brooks, and Sam Simon, who had also been EPs for the previous season. The DVD box set was released on August 6, 2002 in Region 1, July 8, 2002 in Region 2 and in September, 2002 in Region 4. The episode "Homer vs. Lisa and the 8th Commandment" won the Primetime Emmy Award for Outstanding Animated Program, and was also nominated in the "Outstanding Sound Mixing for a Comedy Series or a Special" category.	http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198272/jife8s8igavj04jgby8m.jpg	20	2	The Simpsons
5	Season 2	2005-09-25 00:00:00+00	The second season of the American television medical drama Grey's Anatomy commenced airing on the American Broadcasting Company on September 25, 2005, and concluded on May 15, 2006. The season was produced by Touchstone Television, in association with Shondaland production company and The Mark Gordon Company, the showrunner being Shonda Rhimes. Actors Ellen Pompeo, Sandra Oh, Katherine Heigl, Justin Chambers, and T.R. Knight reprised their roles as surgical interns Meredith Grey, Cristina Yang, Izzie Stevens, Alex Karev, and George O'Malley, respectively. Previous main cast members Chandra Wilson, James Pickens, Jr., Isaiah Washington, and Patrick Dempsey also returned, while Kate Walsh, who began the season in a recurring capacity, was promoted to series regular status, after appearing in seven episodes as a guest star.\\n\\nThe season continued to focus on the surgical residency of five young interns as they try to balance to the challenges of their competitive careers, with the difficulties that determine their personal lives. It was set in the fictional Seattle Grace Hospital, located in the city of Seattle, Washington. Whereas the first season put the emphasis mainly on the unexpected impact the surgical field has on the main characters, the second one provides a detailed perspective on the personal background of each character, focusing on the consequences that their decisions have on their careers. Throughout the season, new story lines were introduced, including the love triangle between Meredith Grey, Derek Shepherd, and Addison Montgomery, the main arc of the season. Also heavily developed was the story line involving Izzie Stevens' relationship with patient Denny Duquette, which resulted in critical acclaim and positive fan response.	http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198272/fzgmztqhhzzfxanygytv.jpg	30	2	Grey's Anatomy
5	Season 5	2008-09-25 00:00:00+00	The fifth season of the American television medical drama Grey's Anatomy, created by Shonda Rhimes, commenced airing on American Broadcasting Company in the United States on September 25, 2008 and concluded on May 14, 2009 with twenty-four aired episodes. The season follows the story of a group of surgeons as they go through their residency, while they also deal with the personal challenges and relationships with their mentors. Season five had thirteen series regulars with twelve of them returning from the previous season. The season aired in the Thursday night timeslot at 9:00 pm. The season was officially released on DVD as seven-disc boxset under the title of Grey's Anatomy: The Complete Fifth Season – More Moments on September 9, 2009 by Buena Vista Home Entertainment.	http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198272/qkqtonmsoodhgjzowpyg.jpg	39	5	Grey's Anatomy
17	Season 1	2014-10-07 01:00:00+01	When an unexpected accident at the S.T.A.R. Labs Particle Accelerator facility strikes Barry, he finds himself suddenly charged with the incredible power to move at super speeds. While Barry has always been a hero in his soul, his newfound powers have finally given him the ability to act like one. With the help of the research team at S.T.A.R. Labs, Barry begins testing the limits of his evolving powers and using them to stop crime. With a winning personality and a smile on his face, Barry Allen — aka The Flash — is finally moving forward in life … very, very fast!	http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198272/xgt8njlcb9tqq17zfwz2.jpg	48	1	The Flash
18	Season 9	1997-09-21 00:00:00+00	The Simpsons' ninth season originally aired between September 1997 and May 1998, beginning on Sunday, September 21, 1997 with "The City of New York vs. Homer Simpson". The showrunner for the ninth production season was Mike Scully. The aired season contained three episodes which were hold-over episodes from season eight, which Bill Oakley and Josh Weinstein ran. It also contained two episodes which were run by David Mirkin, and another two hold-over episodes from season seven which were run by Al Jean and Mike Reiss.\\n\\nSeason nine won three Emmy Awards: "Trash of the Titans" for Primetime Emmy Award for Outstanding Animated Program in 1998, Hank Azaria picked up "Outstanding Voice-Over Performance" for the voice of Apu Nahasapeemapetilon, and Alf Clausen and Ken Keeler picking up the "Outstanding Music and Lyrics" award. Clausen was also nominated for "Outstanding Music Direction" and "Outstanding Music Composition for a Series" for "Treehouse of Horror VIII". Season nine was also nominated for a "Best Network Television Series" award by the Saturn Awards and "Best Sound Editing" for a Golden Reel Award.	http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198272/rw0dhumdpr8ujyxhxglp.jpg	58	9	The Simpsons
18	Season 13	2001-11-06 00:00:00+00	The Simpsons' thirteenth season originally aired on the Fox network between November 6, 2001 and May 22, 2002 and consists of 22 episodes. The show runner for the thirteenth production season was Al Jean who executive-produced 17 episodes. Mike Scully executive-produced the remaining five, which were all hold-overs that were produced for the previous season. The Simpsons is an animated series about a working-class family, which consists of Homer, Marge, Bart, Lisa, and Maggie. The show is set in the fictional city of Springfield, and lampoons American culture, society, television and many aspects of the human condition.\\n\\nThe season won an Annie Award for Best Animated Television Production, and was nominated for several other awards, including two Primetime Emmy Awards, three Writers Guild of America Awards, and an Environmental Media Award. The Simpsons ranked 30th in the season ratings with an average viewership of 12.4 million viewers. It was the second highest rated show on Fox after Malcolm in the Middle. The DVD boxset was released in the United States and Canada on August 24, 2010, eight years after it had completed broadcast on television.	http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198272/ugidtbirkgejlrn4e9rv.jpg	66	13	The Simpsons
5	Season 13	2016-09-22 01:00:00+01		http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198272/jdlvssz70glpiugskcsn.jpg	76	13	Grey's Anatomy
13	Season 1	2021-01-22 01:00:00+01		http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198272/wecnbjhvfyfj5pgr9hsh.jpg	79	1	Fate: The Winx Saga
17	Season 6	2019-10-08 01:00:00+01	When Barry and Iris deal with loss of their daughter, the team faces their greatest threat yet - one that threatens to destroy all of Central City; Killer Frost has a brush with death that will change her relationship with Caitlin. Faced with the news of his impending death, Barry's resiliency suffers as he struggles to fight fate.	http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198272/btcmf8ldgxu6ppgdrnhy.jpg	85	6	The Flash
15	Season 8	2019-04-14 01:00:00+01	The Great War has come, the Wall has fallen and the Night King's army of the dead marches towards Westeros. The end is here, but who will take the Iron Throne?	http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198272/xn5ohao7nsl1imuc7ufd.jpg	24	8	Game of Thrones
5	Season 8	2011-09-22 00:00:00+00	The eighth season of the American television medical drama Grey's Anatomy, commenced airing on the American Broadcasting Company on September 22, 2011, with a special two-hour episode and ended on May 17, 2012 with the eighth season having a total of 24 episodes. The season was produced by ABC Studios, in association with Shondaland Production Company and The Mark Gordon Company; the showrunner being Shonda Rhimes.	http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198272/ukirw2dutzdrc2tkmcql.jpg	31	8	Grey's Anatomy
18	Season 32	2020-09-27 01:00:00+01		http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198272/rsxgav934zjhwldo7l2d.jpg	40	32	The Simpsons
18	Season 5	1993-09-30 00:00:00+00	The Simpsons' fifth season originally aired on the Fox network between September 30, 1993 and May 19, 1994. The showrunner for the fifth production season was David Mirkin who executive produced 20 episodes. Al Jean and Mike Reiss executive produced the remaining two, which were both hold overs that were produced for the previous season. The season contains some of the series' most acclaimed episodes, including "Cape Feare" and "Rosebud". It also includes the 100th episode, "Sweet Seymour Skinner's Baadasssss Song". The season was nominated for two Primetime Emmy Awards and won an Annie Award for Best Animated Television Program as well as an Environmental Media Award and a Genesis Award. The DVD box set was released in Region 1 on December 21, 2004, Region 2 on March 21, 2005, and Region 4 on March 23, 2005.	http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198272/akocrquqrbnbcnv7qpfm.jpg	49	5	The Simpsons
18	Season 12	2000-11-01 00:00:00+00	The Simpsons' 12th season began on Wednesday, November 1, 2000 with "Treehouse of Horror XI". The season contains three hold over episodes from the season 11 production line. The show runner for the twelfth production was Mike Scully. The season features three episodes that were produced for the eleventh season which was also run by Scully. The season won and was nominated for numerous awards including two Primetime Emmy Awards wins and an Annie Award.	http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198272/wom0wsvj32m4393eda2f.jpg	59	12	The Simpsons
5	Season 9	2012-09-27 01:00:00+01		http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198272/on8jdch8cgpdqkktrula.jpg	67	9	Grey's Anatomy
8	Season 1	2013-03-03 00:00:00+00		http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198272/d3omqgfsdwg9yy93shue.jpg	80	1	Vikings
17	Season 7	2021-03-02 01:00:00+01	After a thrilling cliffhanger last season which saw the new Mirror Master victorious and still-at-large in Central City, The Flash must regroup in order to stop her and find a way to make contact with his missing wife, Iris West-Allen. With help from the rest of Team Flash, Barry will ultimately defeat Mirror Master. But in doing so, he’ll also unleash an even more powerful and devastating threat on Central City: one that threatens to tear his team—and his marriage—apart.	http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198273/qmgezzz59g5bivis4evn.jpg	110	7	The Flash
8	Season 5	2017-11-29 00:00:00+00	Season five begins with Ivar the Boneless asserting his leadership over the Great Heathen Army, while Lagertha reigns as Queen of Kattegat. Ivar’s murder of his brother Sigurd sets the stage for vicious battles to come as Ragnar’s sons plot their next moves after avenging their father’s death. Bjorn follows his destiny into the Mediterranean Sea and Floki who is suffering from the loss of his wife Helga, takes to the seas submitting himself to the will of the Gods. This season is full of startling alliances and unbelievable betrayals as the Vikings fight to rule the world.	http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198273/dutijhu1lntmojdog3vy.jpg	98	5	Vikings
5	Season 12	2015-09-24 01:00:00+01		http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198273/bx7afsgfyl8hmwmi7tsm.jpg	105	12	Grey's Anatomy
15	Season 1	2011-04-17 01:00:00+01	Trouble is brewing in the Seven Kingdoms of Westeros. For the driven inhabitants of this visionary world, control of Westeros' Iron Throne holds the lure of great power. But in a land where the seasons can last a lifetime, winter is coming...and beyond the Great Wall that protects them, an ancient evil has returned. In Season One, the story centers on three primary areas: the Stark and the Lannister families, whose designs on controlling the throne threaten a tenuous peace; the dragon princess Daenerys, heir to the former dynasty, who waits just over the Narrow Sea with her malevolent brother Viserys; and the Great Wall--a massive barrier of ice where a forgotten danger is stirring.	http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198271/vs92cq8ngcmulhjnux0p.jpg	25	1	Game of Thrones
18	Season 7	1995-09-17 00:00:00+00	The Simpsons' seventh season originally aired on the Fox network between September 17, 1995 and May 19, 1996. The show runners for the seventh production season were Bill Oakley and Josh Weinstein who would executive produce 21 episodes this season. David Mirkin executive produced the remaining four, including two hold overs that were produced for the previous season. The season was nominated for two Primetime Emmy Awards, including Outstanding Animated Program and won an Annie Award for Best Animated Television Program. The DVD box set was released in Region 1 December 13, 2005, Region 2 January 30, 2006 and Region 4 on March 22, 2006. The set was released in two different forms: a Marge-shaped box and also a standard rectangular-shaped box in which the theme is a movie premiere.	http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198272/tj6nngqbxaqrbpcxbp0g.jpg	38	7	The Simpsons
9	Season 1	2016-01-25 00:00:00+00	Bored with being the Lord of Hell, the devil relocates to Los Angeles, where he opens a nightclub and forms a connection with a homicide detective.	http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198272/d5eh84fiw6sne493cgyr.jpg	52	1	Lucifer
17	Season 2	2015-10-06 01:00:00+01	Following the dramatic events of season 1, Team Flash quickly turns their attention to a threat high above Central City. Armed with the heart of a hero and the ability to move at super speeds, will Barry be able to save his city from impending doom?	http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198272/xpslb6y5wg16uhtpgblp.jpg	62	2	The Flash
2	Season 2	2017-10-11 01:00:00+01		http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198272/gpdhx3qtzlmyhz6g3fzc.jpg	87	2	Riverdale
5	Season 17	2020-11-12 01:00:00+01		http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198272/dphz0guawvfh13kac7hf.jpg	93	17	Grey's Anatomy
12	Season 1	2018-01-16 00:00:00+00		http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198273/gsesbiyt0wyr2btjyxwz.jpg	103	1	Black Lightning
4	Season 3	2021-01-21 01:00:00+01	As season three begins, Hope has risked everything to pull her friends back from the brink of a monstrous prophecy that threatened them. But when a heartbreaking loss shatters her whole world, Hope Mikaelson will be forced to fight fate itself.	http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198273/huuqxjnvxe2k5iubwmfh.jpg	107	3	Legacies
20	Season 1	2002-10-03 00:00:00+00	Deep within the Hidden Leaf Village, young ninja Naruto Uzumaki carries sealed inside him the Nine-Tailed Fox Spirit, which once almost destroyed the village. Always an outcast because of his secret, now Naruto battles alongside his teammates Sasuke and Sakura to prove to himself and everyone else that he's the greatest ninja ever. But he's got a long list of challenges to face before he gets there!	http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198272/zmm4cukygazswap1dv22.jpg	26	1	Naruto
9	Season 4	2019-05-08 00:00:00+00	As Chloe struggles to come to terms with Lucifer's disturbing revelation, a rogue priest sets out to stop a long-rumored prophecy.	http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198272/rmurlqofrtlzfcvtd6ga.jpg	44	4	Lucifer
18	Season 19	2007-09-23 00:00:00+00	The Simpsons' nineteenth season originally aired on the Fox network between September 23, 2007 and May 18, 2008.	http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198272/nofz7sfrakkimgvpb79p.jpg	54	19	The Simpsons
7	Season 1	2018-05-02 01:00:00+01	Decades after the tournament that changed their lives, the rivalry between Johnny and Daniel reignites.	http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198272/tkzwaklutlzaup4efjri.jpg	70	1	Cobra Kai
19	Season 1	2020-05-17 00:00:00+00		http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198272/e6vz2vvkrbxo1upstlfo.jpg	73	1	Snowpiercer
6	Season 1	2021-01-08 01:00:00+01		http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198272/egj1hxfcjcgz06ftnlmc.jpg	78	1	Marvel Studios: Legends
11	Season 2	2020-10-30 01:00:00+01	The Mandalorian and the Child continue their journey, facing enemies and rallying allies as they make their way through a dangerous galaxy in the tumultuous era after the collapse of the Galactic Empire.	http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198273/kmh4axeixejtb5e6c9yn.jpg	95	2	The Mandalorian
5	Season 14	2017-09-28 01:00:00+01		http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198273/uokdz7cxaupw9p96pxcp.jpg	112	14	Grey's Anatomy
8	Season 6	2019-12-04 01:00:00+01	The final season finds Bjorn now the king of Kattegat, while Ivar is a fugitive in Russia and Lagertha plans a peaceful retirement to a country farm.	http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198273/zydmsq9ge2gay7zttbwp.jpg	91	6	Vikings
7	Season 2	2019-04-24 01:00:00+01	Johnny continues building a new life, but a face from his past could disrupt his future. Meanwhile, Daniel opens a Miyagi-Do studio to rival Cobra Kai.	http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198273/tprsturljzt4bhru5rq7.jpg	100	2	Cobra Kai
\.


--
-- TOC entry 3033 (class 0 OID 17747)
-- Dependencies: 204
-- Data for Name: series; Type: TABLE DATA; Schema: public; Owner: postgres
--

COPY public.series (description, image, language, name, network, tagline, url, id, air_date, in_production) FROM stdin;
In another world, ninja are the ultimate power, and in the Village Hidden in the Leaves live the stealthiest ninja in the land. Twelve years earlier, the fearsome Nine-Tailed Fox terrorized the village and claimed many lives before it was subdued and its spirit sealed within the body of a baby boy. That boy, Naruto Uzumaki, has grown up to become a ninja-in-training who's more interested in pranks than in studying ninjutsu.. but Naruto is determined to become the greatest ninja ever!	http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198272/vt7ctt4tt8hy3szms4f8.jpg	ja	Naruto	TV Tokyo		http://www.tv-tokyo.co.jp/anime/naruto2002/	20	2002-10-03 00:00:00+00	f
The story of two vampire brothers obsessed with the same girl, who bears a striking resemblance to the beautiful but ruthless vampire they knew and loved in 1864.	http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198272/huxka2nqgwhylw3gopen.jpg	en	The Vampire Diaries	The CW	You remember your first kiss forever... and ever.	http://www.cwtv.com/shows/the-vampire-diaries	16	2009-09-10 00:00:00+00	f
The notorious Cecil Hotel grows in infamy when guest Elisa Lam vanishes. A dive into crime's darkest places.	http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198272/oqdpkcuhy2fjgblyn34m.jpg	en	Crime Scene: The Vanishing at the Cecil Hotel	Netflix		https://www.netflix.com/title/81183727	14	2021-02-10 01:00:00+01	f
Set in Springfield, the average American town, the show focuses on the antics and everyday adventures of the Simpson family; Homer, Marge, Bart, Lisa and Maggie, as well as a virtual cast of thousands. Since the beginning, the series has been a pop culture icon, attracting hundreds of celebrities to guest star. The show has also made name for itself in its fearless satirical take on politics, media and American life in general.	http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198272/qgpd7vyvtw2ttn0ruo6q.jpg	en	The Simpsons	FOX	On your marks, get set, d'oh!	http://www.thesimpsons.com/	18	1989-12-16 00:00:00+00	t
After the fall of the Galactic Empire, lawlessness has spread throughout the galaxy. A lone gunfighter makes his way through the outer reaches, earning his keep as a bounty hunter.	http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198272/dls2rimewgtq3twp9ivw.jpg	en	The Mandalorian	Disney+	Bounty hunting is a complicated profession.	https://www.disneyplus.com/series/the-mandalorian/3jLIGMDYINqD	11	2019-11-12 01:00:00+01	t
A young surgeon with Savant syndrome is recruited into the surgical unit of a prestigious hospital. The question will arise: can a person who doesn't have the ability to relate to people actually save their lives	http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198272/w6j2luzkslzuut1fy6hn.jpg	en	The Good Doctor	ABC	His mind is a mystery, his methods are a miracle.	http://abc.go.com/shows/the-good-doctor	3	2017-09-25 01:00:00+01	t
Set in the present, the series offers a bold, subversive take on Archie, Betty, Veronica and their friends, exploring the surreality of small-town life, the darkness and weirdness bubbling beneath Riverdale’s wholesome facade.	http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198272/ppnjzzzpvl9rjesik8um.jpg	en	Riverdale	The CW	Small town. Big secrets.	http://www.cwtv.com/shows/riverdale/	2	2017-01-26 00:00:00+00	t
Bored and unhappy as the Lord of Hell, Lucifer Morningstar abandoned his throne and retired to Los Angeles, where he has teamed up with LAPD detective Chloe Decker to take down criminals. But the longer he's away from the underworld, the greater the threat that the worst of humanity could escape.	http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198272/l6fmxbrxew8iomzsuvsp.jpg	en	Lucifer	FOX	It's good to be bad.	https://www.netflix.com/title/80057918	9	2016-01-25 00:00:00+00	t
The coming-of-age journey of five fairies attending Alfea, a magical boarding school in the Otherworld where they must learn to master their powers while navigating love, rivalries, and the monsters that threaten their very existence.	http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198272/ppduw6xnfyqoa1f3qaml.jpg	en	Fate: The Winx Saga	Netflix	Channel your element. Change your fate.	https://www.netflix.com/title/80220679	13	2021-01-22 01:00:00+01	t
Set more than seven years after the world has become a frozen wasteland, the remnants of humanity inhabit a gigantic, perpetually-moving train that circles the globe as class warfare, social injustice and the politics of survival play out.	http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198272/kdrchcoufrqiat1hon6w.jpg	en	Snowpiercer	TNT	Prepare to brace.	https://www.tntdrama.com/snowpiercer	19	2020-05-17 00:00:00+00	t
Wanda Maximoff and Vision—two super-powered beings living idealized suburban lives—begin to suspect that everything is not as it seems.	http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198272/metvpmf4sjaui0l7q6w0.jpg	en	WandaVision	Disney+	Experience a new vision of reality.	https://www.disneyplus.com/series/wandavision/4SrN28ZjDLwH	1	2021-01-15 01:00:00+01	t
Jefferson Pierce is a man wrestling with a secret. As the father of two daughters and principal of a charter high school that also serves as a safe haven for young people in a New Orleans neighborhood overrun by gang violence, he is a hero to his community.	http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198273/lbwmnhwsa6hq7lxsczak.jpg	en	Black Lightning	The CW	High voltage action	http://cwtv.com/shows/black-lightning	12	2018-01-16 00:00:00+00	t
Seven noble families fight for control of the mythical land of Westeros. Friction between the houses leads to full-scale war. All while a very ancient evil awakens in the farthest north. Amidst the war, a neglected military order of misfits, the Night's Watch, is all that stands between the realms of men and icy horrors beyond.	http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198273/g1kjgerpz9cpux7hknzz.jpg	en	Game of Thrones	HBO	Winter Is Coming	http://www.hbo.com/game-of-thrones	15	2011-04-17 01:00:00+01	f
After a particle accelerator causes a freak storm, CSI Investigator Barry Allen is struck by lightning and falls into a coma. Months later he awakens with the power of super speed, granting him the ability to move through Central City like an unseen guardian angel. Though initially excited by his newfound powers, Barry is shocked to discover he is not the only "meta-human" who was created in the wake of the accelerator explosion -- and not everyone is using their new powers for good. Barry partners with S.T.A.R. Labs and dedicates his life to protect the innocent. For now, only a few close friends and associates know that Barry is literally the fastest man alive, but it won't be long before the world learns what Barry Allen has become...The Flash.	http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198273/qiies5ecjblrkh9dizib.jpg	en	The Flash	The CW	The fastest man alive.	http://www.cwtv.com/shows/the-flash/	17	2014-10-07 01:00:00+01	t
In a place where young witches, vampires, and werewolves are nurtured to be their best selves in spite of their worst impulses, Klaus Mikaelson’s daughter, 17-year-old Hope Mikaelson, Alaric Saltzman’s twins, Lizzie and Josie Saltzman, among others, come of age into heroes and villains at The Salvatore School for the Young and Gifted.	http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198273/haurohv4gimwrrkglpij.jpg	en	Legacies	The CW	Heroes. Villains. Whatever.	http://www.cwtv.com/shows/legacies	4	2018-10-25 01:00:00+01	t
This is a very descriptive test	http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616277040/wtzrlkp1cmw62htzawoc.png	en	Testname	network test	This is a testing tagline	fake url for a test	21	2021-03-20 20:35:44.477+01	t
Follows the personal and professional lives of a group of doctors at Seattle’s Grey Sloan Memorial Hospital.	http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198272/rqe59erbnmjpabjwe27b.jpg	en	Grey's good das german ja	ABC	The life you save may be your own.	http://abc.go.com/shows/greys-anatomy	5	2015-03-27 00:00:00+00	t
Revisit the epic heroes, villains and moments from across the MCU in preparation for the stories still to come. Each dynamic segment feeds directly into the upcoming series — setting the stage for future events. This series weaves together the many threads that constitute the unparalleled Marvel Cinematic Universe.	http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198272/rdi18rtmmx3vjvaeaw5a.jpg	en	Grey's Anatomy is a big girl show	Disney+	As the universe expands, explore the stories of those destined to become legends.	https://www.disneyplus.com/series/wp/7YmtoS60RMH6	6	2015-03-27 00:00:00+00	t
This is a very descriptive test	http://res.cloudinary.com/vef2-2021-h2/image/upload/v1616198272/vdbjxhkpphsg06gyppli.jpg	en	Grey's Anatomy is a big girl show	network test	Cobra Kai never dies.	https://www.netflix.com/title/81002370	7	2015-03-27 00:00:00+00	t
\.


--
-- TOC entry 3034 (class 0 OID 17753)
-- Dependencies: 205
-- Data for Name: series_genres; Type: TABLE DATA; Schema: public; Owner: postgres
--

COPY public.series_genres (series_id, genres_name) FROM stdin;
16	Sci-Fi & Fantasy
18	Comedy
14	Crime
14	Documentary
20	Animation
14	Mystery
18	Family
11	Sci-Fi & Fantasy
11	Action & Adventure
18	Animation
20	Sci-Fi & Fantasy
7	Drama
16	Drama
3	Drama
2	Mystery
2	Crime
2	Drama
20	Action & Adventure
9	Sci-Fi & Fantasy
13	Drama
7	Action & Adventure
13	Sci-Fi & Fantasy
12	Sci-Fi & Fantasy
9	Crime
12	Action & Adventure
12	Drama
15	Sci-Fi & Fantasy
15	Drama
1	Sci-Fi & Fantasy
1	Mystery
19	Sci-Fi & Fantasy
1	Drama
17	Drama
17	Sci-Fi & Fantasy
4	Sci-Fi & Fantasy
4	Drama
15	Action & Adventure
\.


--
-- TOC entry 3036 (class 0 OID 17761)
-- Dependencies: 207
-- Data for Name: users; Type: TABLE DATA; Schema: public; Owner: postgres
--

COPY public.users (id, password, admin, username, email) FROM stdin;
\.


--
-- TOC entry 3038 (class 0 OID 17771)
-- Dependencies: 209
-- Data for Name: users_series; Type: TABLE DATA; Schema: public; Owner: postgres
--

COPY public.users_series (series_id, user_id, status, rating) FROM stdin;
\.


--
-- TOC entry 3047 (class 0 OID 0)
-- Dependencies: 203
-- Name: seasons_id_seq; Type: SEQUENCE SET; Schema: public; Owner: postgres
--

SELECT pg_catalog.setval('public.seasons_id_seq', 115, true);


--
-- TOC entry 3048 (class 0 OID 0)
-- Dependencies: 206
-- Name: series_id_seq; Type: SEQUENCE SET; Schema: public; Owner: postgres
--

SELECT pg_catalog.setval('public.series_id_seq', 21, true);


--
-- TOC entry 3049 (class 0 OID 0)
-- Dependencies: 208
-- Name: users_id_seq; Type: SEQUENCE SET; Schema: public; Owner: postgres
--

SELECT pg_catalog.setval('public.users_id_seq', 1, false);


--
-- TOC entry 2890 (class 2606 OID 17781)
-- Name: genres genres_pkey; Type: CONSTRAINT; Schema: public; Owner: postgres
--

ALTER TABLE ONLY public.genres
    ADD CONSTRAINT genres_pkey PRIMARY KEY (name);


--
-- TOC entry 2892 (class 2606 OID 17783)
-- Name: series series_pkey; Type: CONSTRAINT; Schema: public; Owner: postgres
--

ALTER TABLE ONLY public.series
    ADD CONSTRAINT series_pkey PRIMARY KEY (id);


--
-- TOC entry 2894 (class 2606 OID 17785)
-- Name: users uniques; Type: CONSTRAINT; Schema: public; Owner: postgres
--

ALTER TABLE ONLY public.users
    ADD CONSTRAINT uniques UNIQUE (email, username);


--
-- TOC entry 2896 (class 2606 OID 17787)
-- Name: users users_pkey; Type: CONSTRAINT; Schema: public; Owner: postgres
--

ALTER TABLE ONLY public.users
    ADD CONSTRAINT users_pkey PRIMARY KEY (id);


--
-- TOC entry 2897 (class 2606 OID 17788)
-- Name: series_genres fks; Type: FK CONSTRAINT; Schema: public; Owner: postgres
--

ALTER TABLE ONLY public.series_genres
    ADD CONSTRAINT fks FOREIGN KEY (series_id) REFERENCES public.series(id) NOT VALID;


--
-- TOC entry 2898 (class 2606 OID 17793)
-- Name: series_genres fks2; Type: FK CONSTRAINT; Schema: public; Owner: postgres
--

ALTER TABLE ONLY public.series_genres
    ADD CONSTRAINT fks2 FOREIGN KEY (genres_name) REFERENCES public.genres(name) NOT VALID;


-- Completed on 2021-03-22 00:35:40

--
-- PostgreSQL database dump complete
--

